This will be the second flight of the Challenger. And, as I said to the crew of the first flight, ``You genuinely are challengers.'' You're daring the future and the old ways of thinking that kept us from -- or kept us looking at the heavens, instead of traveling to them. And you and that white spacecraft you fly represent the hope of the future.

Now, I don't want to delay the flight, so I won't give a full-fledged speech. But, I did want to say publicly and personally how very honored America is to have public servants of your dedication, your courage and intelligence; and, on behalf of all your fellow citizens, to wish you a very successful flight and to say Godspeed and God bless you for all that you're doing.

Traditionally, Americans have looked to fathers to provide leadership and stability for their families. Fathers play a vital role in providing sustenance, protection, and guidance for their families and the community at large. We owe them our high esteem, for their presence and gift of love as role models, providers, and defenders of the Nation. They not only play an invaluable part in transmitting the values and traditions of our society, but are instrumental in encouraging the self-confidence of our youngsters in facing the future.

Fatherhood is both a great responsibility and one of the most rewarding and pleasurable experiences life has to offer. Father's Day presents a special opportunity to appreciate our fathers -- to consider all they have done, and all they continue to do, in fostering children's physical and emotional growth, encouraging success, easing failure, maintaining family life, contributing vitally to the economy, and serving their communities. The quality and scope of their activities, as well as their overriding concern for the well-being of their families and our country, inspire and strengthen us as individuals and as a Nation.

I've long believed that the future is here in the Americas. And all of you are already involved in one way or another in giving life to that future. Recently, I spoke to the Congress about the situation in Central America, giving our lawmakers my view on this crucial region that is so near to us. I asked for their bipartisan support to help ease the problems that beset our neighbors in this region, and I've been gratified by the response from the Congress and from our people.

Let me say, too, that contrary to some reports you may have seen in recent days, we're not changing the policy I outlined to the Congress. Nor is there change in the urgent need for bipartisan support for that policy. As George Shultz said this week, we're not against anyone in Central America; we are for the people there. And we will firmly resist efforts that are aimed at denying them the freedom and democracy to which they're entitled. Now, there is hope for the region, and we mustn't falter in our commitment to these neighbors whose culture and heritage are part and parcel of our own.

The contributions you've made in the past and are making today are reason for optimism about the hemisphere's future. Over the years you've contributed decisively to the export-led development that has brought about the greatest expansion of trade and well-being in the history of the world. You've developed new management techniques that have brought you into close association with citizens of the countries in which you do business. You've observed their laws and served their national goals, thereby proving the common interests of the countries of this hemisphere.

You've created employment, expanded the tax base on which social services depend, and above all, provided the dynamism and technology and the potential of technology and the opportunities of improving political and commercial ties among nations.

Now, I know that you'll be discussing these challenges at length in your meetings, but let me just say that the one essential to solving both is freedom -- freedom to garner the fruits of innovation, competition, and free trade; freedom to enlist the cooperation and creativity of the many people who value work as the fundamental ethic for bettering their lot; freedom to build and to solve problems without the suffocating weight of totalitarian tyranny.

I can think of nothing that is more important to the security of our country than building strong and healthy economies throughout the Western Hemisphere. One of the goals I've set is a new solidarity in the hemisphere. The people here have fundamental values that tie us together. Many of us are descended from pioneers who gave up everything to come to the New World in order to better themselves and their families.

And one significant thing -- and I have said this to people of these other countries and to their -- they have expressed their pleasure in it -- you can cross from border to border in any of these countries in South, Central, and North America, and you're still among Americans, because we are all Americans from pole to pole.

Today the efficiency, resources, and know-how of this part of American business are as legendary as the spirit of those pioneers, and your role is no less historic. In Central America, in the Caribbean, and throughout Latin America, your enterprise will have tremendous impact on the political and economic future of the hemisphere. So, we're grateful to you for your resourcefulness and want to encourage you to be bold and to spread American enterprise throughout the hemisphere. That's a job that you can do better than anyone else.

I know that many of you have contributed to the Caribbean Initiative, and we're now close to making this program a reality. But I still need your active support. I need it because I also realize something else that is of importance to you, and this is where we in government come in.

You must have some assurance that the violence can be curbed in some of those other countries, the subversion that is going on and the attempt to take over by force from the governments of those countries. And there, they must have our help in stemming that violence so that you can go forward with investment and bringing their economies up to where the differences in society that exist can be overcome, and they can have standards of living comparable to ours.

Authorization is being requested for fiscal years 1984 and 1985 for the ships listed in the attachment to this letter. With the exception of a new class of destroyer, the DDG - 51 Class, ships of these combatant classes have been authorized in the past. All of these ships are considered to be combat effective. Because ships last 25 to 30 years or more, their effectiveness will be enhanced in the future as new equipments are added. Combat effectiveness is judged in terms of the ability of each ship to accomplish the mission for which it was designed. In all cases, these ships provide more capability than the ships of comparable type or class that are scheduled to be retired as the new ones are delivered.

Nuclear power is proposed for two of the ship types for which authorization is requested. They are submarines. In view of higher investment cost of nuclear powered ships, I believe that nuclear power should be limited to those ships for which clear benefits are derived. Compared to the missions of surface ships, submarine missions provide a much greater opportunity to capitalize on the benefits of nuclear power. In addition, it would not be cost effective to alter either the TRIDENT or attack submarine designs for conventional power at this time. Hence, I recommend that these ships be nuclear powered and that the others be conventionally powered.

The President. Yes. In fact, I heard some time ago about their problems there. This is for civilian as well as whatever military casualties. There is a great need for it, and I am doing this in consultation with the Congress.

Affairs] today seemed to criticize those who he said won't negotiate down there. I said, Secretary Enders was criticizing those who won't negotiate down there, because he says unless we're willing to go in there with overwhelming force, negotiation is the only way.

The President. There's no one that is refusing to negotiate. We are not, however, going to allow armed guerrillas to power, at the point of a gun, their way into a sharing in the government without submitting to the voters. We're negotiating all the time, trying to get them to join in the democratic process.

The President. Well, I think that that should be a revelation to all of those people who have been believing that the guerrillas are some kind of noble freedom fighters. They aren't. They're murderers and terrorists.

Salvador. The team is a battalion-size unit of 20 to 25 members, composed of doctors, technicians, medics, and corpsmen, who will assist the El Salvadoran Government in emergency medical services. The unit is composed of military personnel from the various service branches.

Government of El Salvador. There have been reports, both from the Government and from the private sector, that have cited the serious medical problems faced by the military and civilian population in El Salvador. Of particular interest was a study by the New England Journal of Medicine, which pointed out in specific terms the difficulties faced by the people of El Salvador.

After these needs were pointed out by the Government, and prior to the New England medical publication, the U.S. sent a survey team to El Salvador to study the needs and to recommend a U.S. response. The action is a result of their recommendations.

This decision in no way conflicts with our self-imposed commitment to hold the number of military trainers to 55. The number at the moment is 52 military trainers, but it does vary virtually on a day-to-day basis. It has not exceeded 55, and we have no plans to exceed this limit.

The medical team, which will be headed by two medical service officers, will be under the policy direction of the U.S. Embassy. They will report through appropriate military channels. They will assist the Salvadoran Government in treating their civilian and military casualties. They will provide guidance to the Government in establishing their own medical services.

It is our desire in taking this action to help alleviate a devastating situation. It is our intention to provide basic humanitarian medical relief through training medics, helping establish a medical supply system, and repairing medical equipment.

This team would be able to undertake an extensive survey in the military hospital medical system and begin repair of equipment and establishment of a medical logistics system and would instruct El Salvadoran armed forces medical personnel in field-medic techniques.

This project is designed to help alleviate a bad situation, which is getting worse. They will operate in the San Salvador area. The duration of their stay is expected to be about 6 months. The U.S. survey teams, which have observed medical conditions in El Salvador for a number of weeks, report the medical situation in the country is critical. The Salvadorans are faced with crowded medical facilities, lack of equipment and sufficiently trained medical personnel.

The President, once informed and briefed on the situation, directed this effort be made to aid the people of El Salvador in coping with a difficult situation. It is an effort on our part to allow a nation struggling to establish democratic principles to meet yet another challenge imposed on them by an unfortunate and vicious war being waged and directed by forces from outside their country.

State from February 1981 until he joined the NSC staff in September 1982. He was formerly a member of the professional staff of the House Foreign Affairs Committee, serving first as a consultant to the Subcommittee on International Security and Scientific Affairs and later as a senior consultant to the full committee. Prior to that, he was employed as a defense consultant by the Rand Corp. He received his undergraduate degree from Miami University in Oxford, Ohio, and his M.A. in political science and international relations at the University of Chicago, where he held a Ford Foundation scholarship. He is married, has one son, and lives in Chevy Chase, Md. He was born in Ohio in 1947.

The President today announced his intention to appoint to the Office of Intergovernmental Affairs the following individuals who will report to Lee L. Verstandig, Assistant to the President for Intergovernmental Affairs.

The Hungarian record of the past year, during which all outstanding problem cases were resolved, was excellent. The number of Hungarian citizens who apply to leave Hungary remains small and emigration permission is granted apparently without undue difficulty. There are no sanctions imposed on those who seek to emigrate, nor do emigration procedures appear excessive.

People's Republic of China -- China continued its open emigration policy throughout the past year. Chinese who wish to emigrate do so with little difficulty. In FY - 1982, nearly 9,000 immigrant visas were issued by our Foreign Service posts in China. This figure has increased every year since the normalization of relations with China in 1979. In addition, tens of thousands of Chinese have traveled freely abroad over the past few years to study, conduct business, or simply tour and visit family. The limiting factor on Chinese emigration remains less official constraint than the limited ability or willingness of this and other countries to receive large numbers of potential Chinese immigrants.

Implementation in February, 1983, of the education repayment decree of November 1, 1982, imposed a requirement that any Romanian citizen wishing to emigrate must repay in convertible currency the costs of education received beyond the compulsory level (10 years of schooling).

It's a pleasure to take this opportunity to speak with you today. I want to thank you for all you've done for our causes and our party, and encourage you to do still more. I'm sorry I can't be with you in person, but Secretary Heckler, Faith Whittlesey, Bay Buchanan, and my other representatives with you will bring me a full report.

When that great philosopher and commentator de Tocqueville came to America from France, he took a long look at our country and wrote: ``If anyone asks me what I think the chief cause of the extraordinary prosperity and growing power of this nation is due to, I should answer, it is due to the superiority of their women.'' Well, his words are still true today, only I would add, especially our Republican women.

America needs your wisdom, your inner strength, and your compassion in every phase of our national life -- in our families, communities, businesses, politics, and government. We must work together to ensure women can participate in the manner they choose and that they are treated equally. We, in this administration, are committed to eliminating, once and for all, all traces of unjust discrimination against women. At the same time we're doing our best to restore respect for the family and the homemakers who hold our society together.

We're making progress, but there's so much to be done. Now, more than ever, we need women like yourselves -- Republican women -- to become involved in politics, run for office, or offer to serve in a local, State, or Federal appointment. You share a commitment to basic values and our system of democratic capitalism, and we need your leadership.

I'm proud to say that this administration is drawing on the talents and leadership of women in a more significant way than any other before it. For the first time in history, three women are serving in the Cabinet at the same time: Secretary Elizabeth Dole of the Department of Transportation, Secretary Margaret Heckler of Health and Human Services, and, of course, Jeane Kirkpatrick, United States Ambassador to the United Nations. Also, as you know, we appointed the first woman to serve on the Supreme Court -- Sandra Day O'Connor.

All told, there are more than a thousand women in this administration holding policymaking posts, and we're adding to the list all the time. Just to give you a perspective, we appointed more women to top policy positions in 2 years than did any previous administration.

But our commitment to women and appreciation for their perspectives and problems does not stop there. Many provisions of the law which discriminated against women have been reformed by our policies and initiatives. The so-called marriage penalty has been greatly reduced, estate taxes for a surviving spouse have been virtually eliminated, the tax credit for child care for working mothers was nearly doubled, child support enforcement has been toughened, and rules about Individual Retirement Accounts now allow larger contributions by wives who work both in and out of the home. But that's not all we're doing.

We need your help in telling other Americans just how significant our victory over inflation has been. A loaf of bread, for example, costs 2 cents more now than it did in 1980. But if we'd continued with the old rate of inflation, it would have cost 12 cents more. A half gallon of milk is about 16 cents cheaper than it would have been, hamburger about 17 cents cheaper per pound.

And the savings on a dozen eggs is as much as 49 cents. Those savings can really add up. We estimate that a family of four on a fixed income of $20,000 has $1,600 more in purchasing power this year than they would have had under the old inflation rate.

Our policies are designed to combat the inflation that stole from family budgets, expand opportunity for all our people through a renewed economy, and hasten the return of values and principles that made America both great and good.

An important part of that effort is our determination to restore the quality of America's education system. It was once the finest in the world, and we will not rest until it is so again. We will set a national agenda for excellence in education -- an agenda that will reach every child in our land.

We intend to put the basics back in school and the parents back in charge. We believe teachers should be paid and promoted on the basis of their merit and competence, and that competition will promote better schools -- that's why we've proposed tuition tax credits and vouchers to restore parental choice. We need you to join with us in a national campaign for excellence in American education. At home, in school, in State government, and at the Federal level, we must make sure we have put our children first and that their education is a top priority.

Our struggle is only beginning, and I need your continued help if we're to reach our goals. When you return to your neighborhoods and communities, help us get the message out. Tell people of the progress we've made. Use what you've learned at this forum and act on your ideas. Let me hear how you're doing, what your neighbors are saying, and what kind of help you need.

As you know, 10 months of bad weather have ravaged many sections of the country. Tornadoes, floods in the South, savage storms along the Pacific coast, an earthquake in California, and now, mudslides in Nevada and Utah have inflicted terrible destruction on lives and property.

The Red Cross is doing everything it can to help, as it always does. But its budget has been exhausted by its huge relief operations during this relentless spell of bad weather. The Red Cross has no additional disaster funds to meet these new catastrophes.

There will be other disasters, no doubt. And the Red Cross must be ready for them. All of us would want to be able to count on this vital, charitable institution if and when our families ever need help. So, let's make sure the Red Cross has what it needs to continue giving assistance to other disaster victims. We can do that through our own personal contributions. The Red Cross has launched an appeal to replenish its disaster funds. I urge you and your family: please help and give today through you local Red Cross chapter.

Now, a few words about our deliberations at the economic summit at Williamsburg. I was very pleased that the leaders of the great democracies could meet in that beautiful colonial city so rich in history and culture. It was a perfect place to renew ties and pledge our best efforts to achieve stronger prosperity and security by living up to those cherished values that bind us -- democracy, individual freedom, moral purpose, human dignity, and personal development.

I think we succeeded. Our meetings produced a shared spirit of confidence, optimism, and cooperation -- confidence that an economic recovery is beginning, optimism that it can spread to all countries and that it will last, if our countries cooperate to keep inflation down, reduce interest rates further, and put a stop to protectionism.

Williamsburg also demonstrated, to the chagrin of the Soviets, that the spirit of unity in the West for peace through strength is alive and well. Every Western leader who attended agreed that we must resist Soviet efforts to drive a wedge between us. And we all committed ourselves to maintain our security while seeking real arms reductions and working for the cause of peace.

The Williamsburg summit was a positive gain that sent a message of hope to the world. That makes it all the more important for each country to follow up with sound, commonsense policies that carry us forward toward greater progress.

This coming week I'll meet with the bipartisan leadership of the Congress to discuss concrete ways we can follow up on the summit. Here at home, we must not jeopardize what we've worked so hard to build -- a strong recovery from a terrible recession caused by years of economic mismanagement. In 2\1/2\ years, inflation has been knocked all the way down from an annual rate of 12.4 percent to 3.9 percent and, for the last 6 months, only eight-tenths of 1 percent.

The prime interest rate has been cut more than in half -- from a killing 21\1/2\ percent to 10\1/2\ percent today. Industries like autos, housing, and steel, which had been brought to their knees by those terrible inflation and interest rates, are now regaining strength and calling back workers.

Since we took office, thanks to the incentives provided by tax cuts, among other things, more than 1.1 million new businesses have started up. That's an American record. These are the seeds for millions of new jobs and new technologies for the future. Yes, unemployment is too high. But it fell slightly again in May, and it will fall further. Nearly 800,000 jobs have been created since December. Last month there were 375,000 more people on the payrolls than the month before.

The United States did not succumb to a decade of difficulties because you, the people, are not taxed enough. We got ourselves in difficulty because government spends too much. We don't need tax increases; we need spending restraint. And that's why the Williamsburg communique makes an explicit call, one I'm prepared to defend with Presidential vetoes.

We will tackle budget deficits, and we must do it by limiting the growth of government expenditures. In the spirit of the summit, I will also continue to oppose quick fixes of protectionism -- legislation like the local content rule, which would force domestic manufacturers of cars to build them with a rising share of U.S. labor and parts. Well, it's a cruel hoax. New cars would be more expensive, more jobs would be destroyed than protected. We would buy less from our trading partners, they would buy less from us, and the world economic pie would shrink.

We left Williamsburg confident that we can build lasting prosperity, but only with hard work, discipline, incentives, cooperation, and competition. And we can build a safer, more peaceful world, but only if our free nations stand together and remain strong. It's not easy, but nothing worth having ever is.

The President. We're here to honor Arland Williams, Jr. Virtually everyone in the United States knows of his heroism and knows of his deed, but very few, if any, knew his name. Those of us who do know of his bravery have remembered him only as the ``unknown hero.'' And that was in the terrible tragedy that took place down here on January 13th, 1982, when the plane crashed into the bridge and into the ice-covered Potomac. And for a long, long time we have known of the one man who repeatedly handed the line from the helicopter to others that he thought were in a worse situation than he was, saving five people in all. And then when the helicopter went back for him, he was no longer there.

Arland Williams, Jr., was the hero who gave his life that others might live. And we have here his family -- Arland and Virginia Williams; his son and daughter, Arland and Leslie, and the Vice Commander of the Coast Guard. And we are awarding to him this medal -- some 607, I think it is, have been given in the 100 years' history of the medal. There is a gold and silver medal. Two gold were given to other heroes in this same tragedy, two silver, and now this one.

And Time magazine said, ``If the man in the water gave a lifeline to the people gasping for survival, he was likewise giving a lifeline to those who observed him.'' And I think that is true, because all of us had to stand a little taller witnessing this heroic deed and knowing now the man who gets the credit.

Gold and Silver Lifesaving Medals are awarded for personal heroic daring in rescuing or attempting to rescue others from drowning, shipwrecks, or other perils of the water. Only 607 gold medals have been awarded since 1874.

Free people, if they are to remain free, must defend the liberty of others. As the custodians of a democratic tradition firmly established on this continent more than two centuries ago, Americans are deeply committed to the goal of representative government everywhere.

Nations Week, by reminding all those who are forced to live under the domination of foreign military power and alien ideology that the United States supports their aspirations for freedom, independence and national self-determination.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 6th. day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Rush and Horst G. Denk to serve as Cochairmen. The President also thanks the Chief Justice for his willingness to serve on the Commission in an advisory capacity and welcomes the Chief Justice's participation.

But all of us are proud not only of your spelling ability but of your determination to increase your knowledge. I wish all American students were as interested in their studies as you evidently are and have been. And I wish all teachers and parents took an interest in their children's educational development as your parents and teachers have taken in yours.

Now, on Wednesday, you're going to be feeling the pressure of the competition. But I want you to know that you're already -- all of you -- winners in my book and in the hearts of your hometowns. So, enjoy the competition and enjoy your trip to Washington. I hope you've been having some fun and seeing some of the sights here.

You know, I have to tell you one story. People can get so sure of themselves. I know you must have heard, or read in your studies, about the author of many years ago, Mark Twain. Mark Twain was on a ship going across to Europe. And in the dining salon that night at dinner, someone wanting to impress him at the table asked him to pass the sugar and then said, ``Mr.

Well, good luck to all of you, and as I say, you're all winners, and you all have every reason to be proud. So win, lose, or tie, we're proud of all of you. And I maybe have time to just come down and say hello to a few of you here, and I'm going to do that.

President Reagan. We're privileged to welcome to Washington today one of the world's senior statesmen, a man of outstanding stature and the father of his country -- His Excellency President Felix Houphouet-Boigny of Ivory Coast.

On the African Continent and throughout the world, he is known as a spokesman for reason and open communication as the means for resolving conflict and ensuring a better world. We share with President Houphouet this belief in dialog. I look forward to our discussing today, and in many days to come, on the vital issues which face the African Continent and the world.

Ivory Coast itself is an outstanding example of the progress and prosperity that can be achieved in an atmosphere of peace, security, and individual liberty. The President has often emphasized these as the fundamental ingredients of economic well-being and advancement. And we share his conviction -- that only in conditions of peace and liberty can a nation achieve lasting economic and social progress.

It's a particular pleasure for me to welcome today the leader of a nation which has so warmly and graciously welcomed so many of our own representatives. Mr. President, I have received enthusiastic reports about Ivory Coast and its economic vitality and vast potential from Secretaries Baldrige and Block, several Senators, Assistant Secretary of State Crocker, and others. And all of them were struck by the advances your country has made -- advances reflecting your commitment to a free economy which encourages producers through a philosophy of hard work and self-help.

There is a saying in Ivory Coast, ``If your stomach is empty, ask your hands why.'' Well, you and your countrymen have worked hard, and in doing so, you've improved your lives and gained the respect of the world. The remarkable progress of your country's agricultural endeavors is a tribute to your enlightened leadership. By making it possible for your farmers to get a fair return for their work and by recognizing the importance of this sector of your economy, you've spared the people the deprivation that has befallen many others.

Ivory Coast has built one of the richest economies in Africa by understanding that before wealth can be divided, it must be created. Ivorians can be proud of their solid record of economic improvement since independence. At the same time, your income distribution is among the fairest on the continent.

As we welcome you once again to our country, we note that many changes have occurred since your last visit to the White House in 1973. Nations around the globe, including the Ivory Coast and the United States, are struggling to overcome a period of severe economic problems and uncertainty. But together, we can face the future with confidence.

President Houphouet. Mr. President, it is with great pleasure that I return to your magnificent country, where each of my stays has been a source of discovery and admiration, and has strengthened my confidence in the future.

Your thoughtful words of welcome add to my pleasure, because they are evidence of your friendly interest in my country, and of the strength of the ties that have developed between the United States and Ivory Coast over more than 20 years.

In extending to me your invitation, which honored me greatly, you were kind enough to tell me how much you value personal contacts between heads of state. I share your view entirely and look forward to being able to discuss with you the problems that concern me and which I cannot conceive of being resolved without effective and forceful steps by the United States of America.

Mr. President, I thank you most warmly for having afforded me the opportunity, once again, to greet the American people through you and to express to them the great admiration and friendship of the people of Ivory Coast, who share their commitment to the timeless values of peace and justice.

States. Unlike many other countries, some of which are far richer in natural resources, you chose the high road of political and economic freedom. In doing so, you've made Ivory Coast a shining example to the rest of Africa and the world.

Mr. President, your wisdom has been a guiding light for your people and a beacon of reason and modernization in the world arena. You are a leader who stresses dialog as a means of solving even the most vexing problems. You advocate compromise over confrontation, conciliation over conflict. Your humane and democratic values reflect well on the people of Ivory Coast.

During our discussions today we touched on many mutual areas of concern, especially those dealing with the promotion of economic growth. The President had been forced to make tough decisions concerning government spending. Well, I can identify with that. [Laughter] And I deeply admire his farsighted commitment to the long-range interests of his people. Today we're confident that closeness and interaction between our two peoples can be nothing but a blessing for us all.

President Houphouet. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, allow me first of all to thank you for your warm welcome and for all the thoughtfulness that has been shown us since our arrival here. I should also like to express to you our sincere gratitude for your kind words describing Ivory Coast policies and for having affirmed so clearly your desire to develop our cooperation.

One of your predecessors remarked that history has given the United States the role of being either a witness to the failure of freedom or the architect of its triumph. I can only subscribe to that fine thought. Yet the extent of your commitments, the immense responsibility they imply, even for the most powerful nation in the world, might have led me to fear that in a time of crisis, when, especially in your own hemisphere as well as in Asia and the Middle East, problems as worrisome as they are sensitive require all or your vigilance and that of the team around you. I might have feared that your attention might have been diverted from the seemingly less pressing problems of Africa. It was therefore most reassuring for me to note your determination to help Africa to regain its peace and to achieve a prosperity that seems discouragingly ever more remote.

You, Mr. President, said on February 13, 1980, that the United States has an obligation to its citizens and to the people of the world never to let those who would destory freedom dictate the future course of human existence on our planet. There is no lack of opportunity for the enemies of freedom who find, in poverty and ignorance, the best fuel for their sinister designs. It is, therefore, important not to neglect any political, social, economic, educational, or cultural sector -- any country, and region, any society where there may develop and explode the kind of conflicts that the enemies of freedom provoke or sustain. And since prevention is better than cure, one must also be certain not to allow the perpetuation of unjust situations that foster them.

To be sure, you, Mr. President, have consistently stressed the need for individuals, like nations, to take their problems into their own hands, to assume responsibility for their own future, and to cease to rely solely on assistance, as some at times are all too pleased to do.

But no one can deny that there are individuals and there are nations that are handicapped and cannot emerge from their tragic situation without aid -- extended aid. Nor can anyone deny that the world today finds itself in the absurd situation of wasting money on ever more costly weapons -- sums of money which, compared to which the amounts of money that go for development assistance, are pitifully small.

And the situation is aggravated by the constant threat of insecurity, which compels the developing nations that have modest, indeed, even inadequate resources to fight simultaneously on two fronts: the development front and the security front, with development too often having to be sacrificed for the sake of security. So, what the developing countries and Africa, in particular, need most is peace and stability, the precondition for any harmonious development.

You, the American people, are the best equipped to recognize the lack of progress of countries that do not enjoy political stability and which are becoming increasingly serious threats to world peace. The best factor for peace is the well-being, the happiness of peoples. Peace and well-being are inseparable.

The West has the means to lend effective assistance to Africa, but that aid will be for naught if our own production efforts are constantly ruined by speculators. To be sure, Africa at present only accounts for 2 percent of world trade. That is not a great deal; we recognize that. But that is the Africa of today. It is not the Africa of tomorrow, the Africa of the future, the Africa we want to build with the West, drawing on our own efforts. Our potential is great.

Reagan and to Mrs. Reagan to whom I present my most respectful and heartfelt compliments, and also to the happiness and to the prosperity of the great people of the United States and to the friendship between the United States and the Ivory Coast.

The Foundation has a long record of excellence in supporting advancements in science, and last year's accomplishments add to and build upon that record. Achievements such as the ones described here underlie much of this Nation's strength -- its economic growth, national security, and the general well-being of our people.

By supporting top quality science projects, the National Science Foundation is part of the national effort to strengthen our great capabilities in research and innovation and the productivity of our industrial enterprise. I hope you will share my enthusiasm for its fine work.

I would like to speak for a moment about my hopes for these important negotiations and about changes which I've decided to make in our START proposal. Such changes reflect concerns and recommendations of the Scowcroft commission, the Congress, and others. They offer the prospect of new progress toward a START agreement.

I was struck there not only by the facts and figures pointing toward economic recovery but also by a spirit of optimism and cooperation which was remarkable. This same spirit is visible in our discussion on security issues.

In NATO, as in other alliances, there's a new feeling of partnership. The Atlantic alliance is alive and well, and its close consultations are a source of strength and participation for each of its members. At least as important, and very gratifying to me, is the new spirit of bipartisanship on national security issues which is increasingly evident in both Houses of Congress.

When I established the Scowcroft commission, I could not then foresee the impact that this outstanding panel would have. Clearly, the Commission's work, which went beyond MX to address critical issues of deterrence and arms control, has become a major stimulus to the rethinking of national policy. The Commission's report challenged some favorite assumptions and called for changes in our strategic planning. At the same time, it expressed support for my administration's most heartfelt objectives in arms control -- deep reductions, modernization for stability's sake, and the elimination of the first-strike threat.

I have pledged to Congress my full support for the Scowcroft commission recommendations and my intention to incorporate them in our START proposal. So that we can continue to benefit from the wisdom of its counsel, I intend to ask the Commission to continue to serve. Its bipartisan membership will thus be able to provide timely advice to me, both with respect to the adoption of its proposals into our defense program, and our arms control policies.

In recent weeks, I and officials of my administration have had an extensive series of private meetings with many Members of Congress. We've reviewed implications for the START negotiations of the Scowcroft commission recommendations and also of the mutual guaranteed build-down advocated by a number of distinguished Members of the Congress. The review of our START position was capped by four recent meetings, three yesterday and one today.

Yesterday morning at a meeting of the National Security Council, my senior advisers and I reviewed major implications and options. We also considered a range of congressional viewpoints. Yesterday afternoon I met with groups of Senators and Congressmen whose interest and expertise in arms control I value highly. I discussed with them the major issues before us. And this morning, I met with the leadership of both Houses of the Congress. And throughout the START negotiations, the administration has consulted with our allies.

Three full rounds of negotiations of START are now behind us. It's my judgment that these rounds have been useful and have permitted us to cover necessary ground. However, due largely to Soviet intransigence, we have not yet made meaningful progress on the central issues. I remain firmly committed to take whatever steps are necessary to increase the likelihood of real, substantive progress toward an agreement involving significant reductions in U.S. and Soviet strategic nuclear arsenals and in the national security interests of both sides.

The report of the Scowcroft commission offers us a new opportunity for progress. It has provided a consistent and coherent framework to guide our thinking about the fundamental elements of our national security policy -- deterrence, defense, and arms control. But more than that, it has provided the basis for renewed, bipartisan support for that policy.

To capitalize on this critical opportunity and on the basis of the widest possible range of advice, I have directed new steps toward progress in achieving real arms reductions at the START negotiations. The purpose of this guidance, provided to Ambassador Ed Rowny, our Chief START Negotiator, is to adjust the U.S. START position to bring it into line with the Scowcroft commission's recommendations and to provide additional flexibility to our negotiators in pursuing our basic goals.

Although we have put forth a comprehensive proposal on limiting strategic ballistic missiles and bombers, our primary aim in the START negotiations has been, and continues to be, to reduce the threat posed by the most destabilizing systems, namely ballistic missiles. To achieve that aim, measures that constrain the number and destructive capability and potential of ballistic missile warheads are essential. Our proposed limit of 5,000 total ballistic missile warheads -- a reduction by one-third of the current level -- remains the central element of the U.S. START position.

The U.S. START position tabled in previous negotiating rounds includes another constraint. It would have limited each side to no more than 850 deployed ballistic missiles. This measure was never viewed as being as useful or important a constraint as the limit on total ballistic missile warheads. The Scowcroft commission report specifically suggested that it should be reassessed, since it could constrain the evolution we seek towards small, single-warhead ICBM's. Acting upon the Commission's recommendation, I have now directed our negotiators to adjust our position on deployed ballistic missiles by relaxing our current proposal for an 850 deployed ballistic missile limit.

At the same time, the United States remains firm on the point that the destructive capability and potential of ballistic missiles must be addressed in START. Our current position includes a network of constraints designed to lead toward a more stable strategic balance at reduced force levels while addressing the destructive potential of missiles.

The Soviets and others have complained that these constraints are designed to dictate Soviet force structure according to U.S. standards. This is not the case. We believe, as does the Scowcroft commission, that ability -- or stability -- can be increased by limitations on the destructive capability and potential of ballistic missiles. As a consequence, we will continue to propose such constraints which indirectly get to the throw-weight problem, while making clear to the Soviets our readiness to deal directly with the corresponding destructive capability, if they prefer.

There may be more than one way to achieve our objective of greater stability at reduced levels of arms. So, I've instructed Ambassador Rowny to make clear to the Soviet delegation our commitment to our fundamental objectives, but I have also given him the flexibility to explore all appropriate avenues for meeting our goals. I sincerely hope that the Soviet Union will respond with corresponding flexibility.

Finally, high priority work is continuing on how the mutual and guaranteed build-down concept proposed by several United States Senators can be applied in our quest for significant and stabilizing strategic arms reductions.

You came so close to winning the championship so many times before, others might have become frustrated, but none of you gave up. Your owner, Harold Katz, was determined to do whatever it took to gather the best players into the club. Your coach, Billy Cunningham, played on the last Philadelphia championship team, so he had the vision. But you, the players, are the ones who put it all together with your individual effort and team spirit.

But whenever people excel the way you have, it's usually because they burn for excellence somewhere down deep inside. I remember once reading that Dr. J said he put the most pressure on himself because of his ambitions to be the best basketball player ever. ``What happens around me,'' he said, ``can't put any more pressure on me than that.'' Well, your team history of come-from-behind striving tells me that you felt that internal pressure as a team. You were determined to be the best, and because of that, today you are. I can't think of a better example of the American dream come true.

On behalf of your admirers -- which by now include all Americans -- thank you for a thrilling season, those spectacular playoff games, and the inspiration that you provided all of us to find the best within ourselves.

Association]  Mr. President, on behalf of the NBA, I want to express our deep appreciation for your invitation to the World Champions and the NBA here today. It's wonderful of you to do it, and I'm sure fans throughout the country and the world are equally appreciative.

And I've been told that there are occasions when you do a little refereeing here, and I want to present to you, therefore, an official referee's jacket which you can wear on those occasions when Tip and the rest come down to visit you. [Laughter] And it is the official referee's jacket. So, now you are an honorary referee in the NBA, Mr. President.

The President. You bet. Well, we're all proud of you, and I did -- later, and on a replay -- get to see some of the last few minutes of that all-important game. And all it did was just make me wish to hell I'd seen the rest of the game. [Laughter] All right.

The President. I have agreed and approved the report in its entirety. I think it is an outstanding thing. I think that the whole country, those who have had an opportunity to read it, or a summary of it, it is causing great debate, but also great agreement that most people -- I think it has touched a nerve, an American nerve in the whole population.

Mr. Johnson. Mr. President, increased salaries for merit pay, incentives for master teachers will cost millions of dollars. The Commission has properly noted that excellence does cost. What is your administration prepared to do to assist the States in meeting these costs?

The President. Well, first of all, this whole question of cost in education, and I think there's a lot of misunderstanding about it -- I recognize it would cost more for this. At the same time, I believe that if such a plan is instituted, then in budgeting you take care of that and, at the same time, possibly see whether there are other things of much lower priority.

Government.'' The amount of money in education today, incidently -- with regard to the reaction to a previous statement -- is that in 1982 the total budget for national defense was $179 billion. It was 215 billion for education. And I don't fault that at all. Education is truly important and as important to our national security as defense. But we can't neglect either one of them.

But I think that the whole question of school funding comes down to one of laying out the layers of government. We built the greatest public school system the world has ever seen, and we built it at the local school level -- local, the State, and the Federal Government. And right now, they've been lined up vertically. And it's local and State, and then on top is the Federal Government, which only provides 8 percent of the educational budget, but which has, kind of, grabbed off about 50 percent of trying to regulate the schools.

Education] there, could show you some startling figures about one of the things that I'm proud of that we've accomplished -- how much less paper he has to fill out with regard to Federal paperwork and requirements than he did a couple of years ago.

The President. But I think that then you work out in this the -- I said that we were vertical; we ought to be horizontal. We should be looking at what properly belongs for decision at the local level, what is the proper place for the State, and what is the proper place for the Federal Government -- its interest in education and its responsibility -- and look at them in that way; and then, proportionately to their responsibilities, expect the support of schools to be laid out in that same way.

Mr. President, you've endorsed the recommendations in this report. How do you see, or how do you perceive the Federal Government responding to the recommendations in this report? In other words, what role do you see for, at the Federal level, for responding to the contents of this report?

We're doing a number of things at the Federal Government that have come out of the things in this report by the Commission on Excellence in Education. We're going to -- Secretary Bell is going to hold meetings with government officials and Governors at the State levels throughout the country. We're also going to have meetings at the private sector to find out what more the private sector can do.

And I would like to point out that already, as a result of this report, there is a thing sweeping the country of businesses and neighborhood groups and communities adopting schools for whatever help they can be to the schools -- not only in, maybe, in financing some special projects but also in bringing the outside world into the school, where, for example, business and industry might be able to offer something to the students with regard to their own decisions they have to make on what they're going to do with their lives.

There are any number of things here that we've laid out in this program, and we want to bring it to a national debate for all the people of the country to be familiar with it, and particularly the parents and the teachers. And so, all of us are stepping up our efforts in that regard to promote it.

Secretary Bell. I'm very grateful that we have education now up where it's high on the education agenda of this country. It certainly has occupied a great deal of nationwide importance. And we're grateful to you, and those in the discussions today Mr. President, express their appreciation for the fact that we do have education now such a high priority. And I know it's because you've participated in events like this one, and we appreciate that.

The President.  --  -- to do something else -- because I know I left out a half a dozen of the things that we are doing. I know we're promoting legislation having to do with excellence in certain lines of teaching.

Secretary Bell. Well, we have a number of other initiatives. We'll be announcing soon a major effort in the area of adult illiteracy. That'll be coming at the latter part of this month, and I discussed that with you earlier. And that will be launched, and we'll be involved to try to help the huge number of adult illiterates we have in this country. And that's highlighted in the report.

Another thing we're doing is -- as you recall in your State of the Union message, you recommended a block grant for mathematics and science. And that legislation is moving through the Congress, and we'll be able to offer some scholarships under a block grant basis to add further momentum in that direction.

We're also examining, Mr. President, the Student Financial Aid program to see if we can work in, as that bill is up for renewal, to see if we can work in some emphasis in the student aid program as we rewrite it, where we can encourage more gifted and talented and promising young people to move into teaching so we can increase the supply of teachers.

So, those are just starters. We're looking at our entire budget and our entire legislation to see what we can do with some of the resources we have and looking at some of the other block grants that we're now getting ready to propose to Congress and see if we can work into some of them some legislation to fund these efforts. So, we do have quite a number of initiatives like that moving forward.

The President. Ted, I wonder if just -- if I could interrupt for a second and say to many people who might not understand the significance of calling it a block grant. There's a Governor here and a former Governor here -- and I was a former Governor also -- and from that vantage point I think we can tell you that so much of Federal spending, grants to States or to local communities, comes so belabored and loaded down with redtape and regulations as to how every dollar of that money must be spent that you find out that a great deal of it is wasted in the spending.

Secretary Bell. Thank you, Mr. President. I'm getting numerous testimonials now on the first block grant that you got passed in the fall of 1981 from superintendents expressing their appreciation for the flexibility that they have in that regard.

Now, as I look at my watch, Mr. President, I was told that we could have 30 minutes of your time, and we're almost out of that. We thought, turnabout, you ought to have an opportunity to ask some of these panelists a question. And if you have any summary comments that you want to make, Mr. President, before you have to leave, we'd appreciate hearing that.

David Gardner about. And it gets back to one of the first subjects that was here today: that is, can we evaluate teacher performance, can we do this and pay for outstanding performance? And, as to the first part of the question, if you can evaluate it at the college and university level, why is it that some say that it can't be done in the public schools, and can it?

Commission in the course of its deliberations. We took testimony on this issue. We had commissioned papers on it. And we offered a recommendation in our report which was intended to foster the development of performance-based compensation for teachers.

I'm well aware of the arguments that are being advanced against that recommendation, the most prominent of which is that such judgments are difficult to make, give rise to the possibility of arbitrariness on the part of administrators and so forth. But I think it's fair to say that, to the Commission at least, the most arbitrary assumption one can make is that there are no differences among people, that everyone is equally possessed of the same level of competence and commitment. That, surely, is arbitrary.

To say that, on the other hand, that it can be done doesn't mean it's easy. But every profession undertakes to do it. The trades undertake to do it. And it seems to me, the profession -- the teaching profession, itself -- has the principal burden of coming forth with a set of recommendations and criterion procedures that will permit that evaluation to occur in ways that are comfortable to the profession, and responsive to the basic and genuine talents and competencies of the teachers in the classroom.

The surest ways to drive out able teachers is to reward the least able as much as those who are the most able. And I think we tend to have that experience more than we would prefer. And the evidence that the Commission's received tends to corroborate that.

At the higher education level, it's done routinely. We have assistant professors, associate professors, full professors. We have a career ladder. Peer evaluation is undertaken. Judgments are made about the worth of one professor as against another. And compensation flows from those decisions. It does seem to me, however difficult it is and however possible it might be for error to creep in, the greatest error is to assume that everyone is equally competent and equally committed when, in fact, we know they are not.

Secretary Bell. Now, Mr. President, as I look at my watch, it looks like we've about spent our time. If you have any final comments here or any additional questions you want to raise, I was admonished that we had to be concluding this so you could meet your other commitments. But any comments or any summary that you want to give, I just express, on behalf of everyone here, our appreciation for your coming and your participation in this panel. I think this is a panel discussion we'll all remember for quite awhile.

I would like to take advantage of you too -- in a little self-defense here, the word ``budget'' -- or term ``budget cut'' has been so widespread, and I usually find it applied to me. [Laughter] And the truth of the matter is we haven't cut any budgets. What we've done is reduced the proposed increase in the budgets. But each budget is still bigger than the last one.

We have removed -- and the thing that I mentioned with regard to Dr. Crosby -- we have removed 30 sets of regulations at the State and local level, which as we figure them out has reduced by 191,000 person-hours of work the administrative process of filling out those papers.

And I'm going to leave that, and I think the best concluding thing, if it hasn't been done here -- I'm so proud of this Commission and what they have accomplished. And they know and will agree better than anyone else, we didn't ask them what party they belong to when they were appointed, and I didn't suggest anything to them. I figured they all knew more about the subject than I did.

But this I thought you might just be interested in hearing a little review of what's happened already. The Florida House has passed the Commission's basic curriculum. The Senate in Florida's passed a different bill, and they're in conference now working out their differences. The board in Ypsilanti, Michigan, has voted to extend the school year. This is directly attributable to the Commission report.

Washington State Board of Education unanimously approved a plan to upgrade high school graduation and requirements. It tripled the minimum credits necessary in science from two to six, doubled the minimum in mathematics from three to six, added a year in English. Battle Creek, Michigan, School Board is reviewing the text of the Commission's report to determine implications for school district policies.

And, as a direct result of the report, Chelmsford, Massachusetts, School Board will consider new classes for the gifted, which has been dropped in recent years. Probably the most neglected students in our educational system in recent years have been those with special aptitudes and talents.

Depression and the Great War, World War II, maybe thought we ought to make things easier for our children. Maybe we're partly responsible for what has happened, and we've thought that they should enjoy things more than sometimes have to work at things. And, in effect, what I'm saying is maybe a lot of us put together have shortchanged those wonderful young people that are sitting up there, and, God bless them, let's stop doing that and give them a good running start in that relay race they're going to enter in a few short years.

The regional forum, the second of 11 planned to be held around the country, consisted of a day-long program of panel discussions and group sessions on the findings of the National Commission on Excellence in Education. The President was present for three summaries of the forum's proceedings, after which he participated in the discussions.

Q. Mr. President, there has been a good deal of praise since your announcement yesterday concerning a new flexibility with respect to our negotiating position at the arms reduction talks in Geneva. A lot of people think it's the right medicine at the right time to get these talks moving toward a favorable agreement with the Soviets. But part of our position requires the Soviets to destroy, do away with, nearly two-thirds of their heavy missiles. Do we have any signs, any indication, inkling that they'll go for this feature?

The President. Well, both sides, according to our proposal, are going to have to do away with some of their weapons. I think what you're referring to is a thing -- on which we can be very flexible -- and that is whether there is a sub-limit. I doubt very much that there will be much of a problem about the mix of weapons. The whole -- our whole aim is a reduction in the number of missiles for both sides to the 5,000 limit and a reduction in the destructive power. This is another place in which they are superior to us.

The President. Well, that, or before it. The thing that makes me hopeful is that the Russians, who so many times just simply say ``nyet'' to everything, they did in previous meetings propose a lower figure than they presently have. And at least that's a starting point. We're willing to come up from the figure that we had, as I indicated yesterday, and so if one's the Moon and the other's green cheese, maybe we can meet some place in between.

Q. Okay. July 1st, a Federal tax cut is scheduled to take effect. In the past week, Speaker O'Neill has been demanding that a ceiling be put -- a $700 ceiling be put on the maximum amount that any taxpayer can receive under this cut. He apparently wants to soak the rich or the wealthiest taxpayers more. Are you going to tamper in any way with this tax cut?

Now, when you stop to think that with our graduated income tax the top 10 percent of earners in this country pay 50 percent of the total amount of tax and the top half, the top 50 percent of earners pay 93 percent of the total tax, I think it's only fair that a tax cut goes across the board, ``even Steven,'' the same percentage cut for everyone.

Q. Your top budget people are warning that the money supply is growing too fast, and there's a fear, at least among some of them -- Stockman and Feldstein -- that we could be headed for more inflation. Are you worried about that at this point?

The President. Not really, because I think that there's no question the market's been a little frightened by a surge there. And probably what makes them worried about that is the 1980 -- before we got here, there was a giant surge, and that was the one that took us up to 21.5 percent interest rates and so forth. And then the string was pulled very firmly -- 1981 -- bringing it down.

But it is a kind of an uneven thing. It isn't something that you can actually specify and say it's going to grow exactly at this amount -- the money supply. And a few weeks ago, there was something of a surge. The Fed has immediately moved on that, and I don't anticipate that.

Q. Okay. You're well aware that State and local governments, school districts, say they're strapped for money badly these days. Under the recommendations of the Commission which you appointed on Excellence in Education, part of the recommendation is for the Federal Government -- all levels of government -- to help finance this. Are you satisfied that local governments can, in fact, find the money it's going to take to implement the longer school days and the back-to-the-basics curriculum that the Commission recommended?

The President. Well, the Commission report also made it plain that just throwing money at it isn't the answer. Right now, the highest tax finance program in the United States is public education -- some $215 billion. And incidentally, it has increased over the last 20 years, when everyone is so concerned about the decline in education, funding for education has increased by 600 percent.

So, I don't think that money is the problem. But what is necessary is to work out Federal, State, and local, and what are the proper functions for each to perform in education, and then have the responsibility of funding those.

Now education is basically a local and State function -- always has been and always should be. At this moment, the Federal Government only supplies 8 percent of the total educational budget, and yet, one of the problems has been that over the years the Federal Government for that 8 percent has wanted about 50 percent of the control of the schools.

The President. [Laughter] Well, my thinking, basically, is that it is far too early for anyone of my position to announce his intentions. [Laughter] And I can tell you why. If I did, and the answer was ``no'', then it wouldn't do me any good to ask Congress for anything. I'd be considered a lameduck. And if I said the answer was ``yes'' at this point, the media -- forgive me -- but the media, very largely would be tagging everything I did, including a trip to Minneapolis, as political in nature.

But you know, talking about -- and Rudy spoke here about the agricultural section here and what a contrast that is -- I have a little hobby I've picked up lately, now that there are as many defectors as there are. I love to collect stories that can be validated as being the stories told by the Russian people among themselves and which reveal a certain cynicism about their government. And the most recent one happened to deal with a farm.

But it's wonderful to be here in a special State with a special Senator. We'll be visiting a number of Republican Senatorial candidates in the days ahead, but I want you to know that this visit is one of the most important. Like you, I can kid Rudy Boschwitz about his flannel shirts, but all of us who are Rudy's friends, and who are here tonight, are here because in our eyes he exemplifies something special about our way of life, something we like to believe is true about America.

You know -- and it's been referred to here tonight -- about Rudy's personal story: a son of immigrant parents with big dreams and an even bigger capacity for the faith and hard work that made those dreams come true. And today he is known as Minnesota's likeable, easygoing Senator, but believe me, Rudy, you're not fooling anybody. We're proud of you not just for being the warm and generous person you are, but also for being a shrewd and highly intelligent public servant who has had a great first term looking out for his State's concerns and for his country's ideals.

It didn't surprise me at all that in his few minutes here at this podium he spoke of the agricultural sector in Minnesota. When I mention his State's concerns, I mean that Rudy has been a major force on agricultural policy in the United States Congress. He's never forgotten what the industry means to this State, and he's fought hard to see that Minnesota's farmers get a fair break in Washington.

On the problems of the dairy industry, especially, he's brought insight and concern to our discussions. No one in public life has more to say on these issues than Rudy. We may not agree on everything all the time, but let me tell you, I always listen to Rudy Boschwitz.

I can assure the farmers and dairymen that no administration will ever take their problems more seriously or work harder for solutions than this administration. And I can also assure them that they couldn't have a more able advocate or harder fighter on their side than Rudy Boschwitz.

Minnesota is directly related to what happens in our nation as a whole. If the national economy is on an upswing, that means good times everywhere -- from the farms and dairies to the high-tech businesses to the basic industries.

Now, I have never been one to underestimate the work cut out for Republicans in upcoming elections. And you're sure going to have your hands full here in Minnesota, which is traditionally a Democratic State. But let me just tell you, now, why I feel very confident about next year's election for our party.

All of this -- the economic mess we inherited -- was largely the result of years of rule by the other party and, especially, their domination of both Houses of Congress. There have been deficits 45 of the last 53 years. Their philosophy had been simple and straightforward: tax and tax, spend and spend. And the results were just as plain: inflation and inflation, recession and recession. There have been eight recessions since World War II.

And after that, we went to work. We cut the rate of growth in Federal spending, and we cut through the thicket of Federal regulations. We horrified the conventional thinkers in Washington by even managing to cut taxes. And we brought about one of the most important reforms of the tax system in history.

Under the old system, inflation had been driving average Americans into tax brackets that were once reserved for millionaires. We ended that by indexing taxes to the rate of inflation. Now, it's true; this change won't take effect until 1985. But then the big spenders who want to increase your taxes will have to come out from the bushes and stand up and say right out loud, they want a tax increase. They won't be able to do it by just letting bracket creep take a little bigger share of your earnings.

We said all along that economic recovery would take some time, that the going might get rough, but that in the long run we'd get this country back on the road to prosperity. And now we're on that road. We've got a way to go, of course. We have to get unemployment and deficits down.

We've got the economic indicators going upward. And we've given everyday Americans more real income, because their taxes are down and inflation is no longer eating up their paychecks. We've restored consumer and business confidence.

I know that every once in awhile they just -- it's irresistible that we hear about how many businesses have gone bankrupt and have bellied up in these hard times. And yet, how seldom do we hear that during this same period -- yes, that has been true -- but last year more than 600,000 new businesses started up in the United States, went into business to begin with. And that is an all-time record in the history of our country.

We're making it possible for the spirit of enterprise and excellence -- the spirit Rudy Boschwitz has exemplified in his business and political careers -- to make America strong again. Last week, we got the bad news that there were -- little, temporary laying off. There was a little holiday in the automobile industry. And there was. But already this week, that automobile production is up 16.4 percent, and that's 27 percent higher than it was in the same week last year.

Now, next year the job before us is simple. Republicans have to go to the American people, remind them of the mess we were in in 1980 and how far we've come since those days. And then we have to ask them for the political tools to help us finish a job that has been so well begun.

No one has been more instrumental in helping bring this about, this kind of responsible but steady change, than Senator Rudy Boschwitz. When we were trying to get Federal spending under control, he stood with us. When we were trying to get taxes, he fought -- or to cut taxes, I should say -- he fought the good fight. When we tried to bring about regulatory reform and open up an opportunity in American commerce and industry, he helped lead that fight.

But for all the reasons I've just mentioned, America also needs him. Rudy's been a battler and a leader on the most important issue of the past few years -- that of returning America to economic growth and prosperity. By reelecting people like Rudy Boschwitz, we Republicans can help finish the job now.

Remember, there are plenty of people in Washington who want to take back your tax cuts and send Federal spending and inflation skyrocketing again. Incidentally, Rudy, if those votes you missed today were on appropriation bills, if the bills were too big, I'll veto them, so don't worry about missing the vote. [Laughter] We need Rudy to help keep America on the road to recovery, to keep her strong at home and abroad.

You know, of all the things that I've talked about here and the things that some of us are proud of in Washington and we think we've accomplished, I stop to think that had we not gotten that slim majority in the United States Senate, that one House of the legislature, none of these things would ever have happened. All we would have had going was veto and hope that we could uphold a veto on some of the things. Government would've gone along on the same course.

So, you are one of the key areas of the United States in the coming election year. I thank you for coming tonight. I hope you'll work hard for Rudy. And believe me, I look forward to working with him and you in the future.

Prior to the dinner, the President attended three receptions at the hotel -- one for Republican leaders, one for major contributors, and one for the Senatorial Trust. Following the dinner, the President returned to Washington, D.C.

Samuel Lewis, the president of B'nai B'rith, and all of the leaders of our group. We are honored by your willingness to interrupt your day to speak to us and grateful for the time you're giving to us, sir.

I know the Anti-Defamation League has justly earned the recognition as a champion of human rights. For seven decades, you've worked to ensure that all members of our society, no matter what their race, religion, or background, have an equal opportunity to succeed. And I deeply appreciate your support for my recent appointments to the U.S. Commission on Civil Rights. Like you, I, too, was deeply troubled by the strident attacks against them.

I know that we share a belief that all people, no matter where they live, have the right to freedom of religion. This is not a right that is any government's to give or to take away. It's our right from birth, because we're all children of God.

But in 1975, the Soviet Government signed the final act of the Helsinki agreement. The Soviets pledged to deal in a positive and humanitarian spirit with the applications of persons who wish to be reunited with their families.

We're very pleased with the recent efforts of Secretary Shultz in working out the Israeli-Lebanon withdrawal agreement. This bold initiative by Israel and Lebanon is one more step toward a more stable Middle East. Our ultimate goal remains peace between Israel and all her Arab neighbors.

Arab States must formally recognize that Israel does exist and that she has a right to exist. We'll continue our diplomatic efforts to seek the withdrawal from Lebanon of all foreign forces, Syrian and PLO as well as Israeli.

This question isn't who has the most perfect democracy. The question is, who's trying to build democracy and who is determined to destroy it. Many nations, including the United States, which once condoned slavery, have evolved into better democracies over time. But nations which fall into the clutches of totalitarianism do not become free and democratic again. And freedom can't be lost in one nation without being diminished everywhere.

Again, as you embark on your next 70 years, you have the thanks of all Americans for a job well done and our best wishes for the future. May we continue to be allies, may God bless you, and may He be with us all in our human rights struggles ahead.

Mr. Levinson. Mr. President, it's a pleasure to talk to you. I'd like to ask how you assess the chances of Syria withdrawing from Lebanon according to the agreement so ably worked out by Secretary Shultz.

The President. Well, I just have to remain optimistic. I can't believe at this point, having crossed that one hurdle prior to real peace negotiations, that it's all going to end here. And I know we've been working very closely with the other Arab States. And I know that almost to the last one of them, they're with us in wanting a solution to this problem and wanting Syria out of there.

So, I'm hopeful that Syria will see the light on this and make that decision, because it was true that in the beginning all of them, including Syria, everyone said that when everyone else got out of Lebanon, that they would all get out. They made that promise as well. And I'm hoping they'll stick with it.

Mr. Bialkin. Mr. President, we thank you very much. We are very grateful and praising of your efforts in the Middle East. We congratulate you and Secretary Shultz on achieving the Israel-Lebanese achievement, and we assure you that you will have our continued support in your efforts to achieve a peaceful solution of -- results in the Middle East. Thank you for being with us, sir.

First, I want to take this occasion to again thank Members of both parties in the Congress for their support of the Scowcroft commission's recommendations on modernization, deterrence, and arms control. Their support for these crucial, interdependent recommendations gives us a genuine chance to achieve balanced, verifiable arms reductions -- the goal we all seek. I am determined to achieve effective deterrence and significant strategic arms reductions, and I am confident that they can be achieved. But if we are to secure our common objectives, the consensus we now have must be maintained.

I look forward to working with the Congress in the days ahead to maintain and strengthen this bipartisan consensus. In this regard, I will submit an annual status report to the Congress. To assist me in this effort, I am pleased to announce that I have asked the members of the Scowcroft commission to continue to serve until January 3, 1984. The Commission will review, on a periodic basis, the progress made in implementing the recommendations contained in its report of April 1983, with particular reference to the deployment of the Peacekeeper missile, development and deployment of a small, single warhead intercontinental ballistic missile system, and developments in strategic arms reductions. The Commission will consider carefully the views of the Congress during the review. The value to the country of this bipartisan framework, both with the Congress and through the Scowcroft commission, is evident to all. It must be and shall be sustained through and beyond the work of the Commission. I pledge this to the Congress and ask their reciprocal good faith.

Scowcroft to seek out views and assistance from a wide variety of leading authorities in the strategic and arms control field. As before, the Chairman has authority to appoint Senior Counselors as he deems appropriate.

As we continue to move forward in this vital bipartisan effort, let us all keep in mind our fundamental goal -- to conclude agreements that will enhance security and stability by reducing overall strategic force levels, while permitting modernization of forces necessary for effective deterrence.

I think it's time to clear the air and straighten out the record on where my administration stands on environmental and natural resources management matters. I know you've heard and read a million words about where others think we stand. Now, how about 5 minutes of the truth?

Protection Agency, he very graciously pointed out that when his Agency was created 13 years ago, with him as its first Director, California was the environmental leader of the Nation. Having been Governor of California at that time, I was, and am, very grateful to Bill for those kind words.

Let me just say, I feel now as I felt then about environmental matters. I believe in a sound, strong environmental policy that protects the health of our people and a wise stewardship of our nation's natural resources. But that's enough about me.

The Secretary of Interior, Jim Watt, is the prime target for those who claim that this administration is out to level the forests and cover the country with blacktops. Someone in the press the other day said if Jim discovered a cure for cancer, there are those who would attack him for being pro-life.

When he came to Washington 2\1/2\ years ago, Jim found that visitor facilities in our national parks had been allowed to deteriorate to the point that many failed to meet standards for health and safety. It's being corrected. The National Park Service has made a major effort to improve maintenance at the parks that so many Americans love and love to visit. And today, they provide a wider, more beautiful variety of outdoor splendor than you can find anywhere else in the world.

Not too long ago, however, a new fire-storm was raised about our wilderness lands. The perception was created that Secretary Watt was turning some of these lands loose from wilderness classification and government ownership. I should point out that wilderness lands are areas of such wild beauty that they're totally preserved in their natural state. No roads violate them, and no structures of any kind are allowed, and there are now almost 80 million acres of such land.

So, what was the fire-storm all about? Well, hang on, and follow me closely. As a result of legislation passed several years ago, a study was made of some 174 million acres of land to see if any or all of it should be declared wilderness and added to the present 80 million acres.

If, for example, there were roads on the land, it was ineligible. It was ineligible if there was any dual ownership by other levels of government or if title to mineral rights was held by individuals or governments. Also, with limited exceptions, any package had to contain no less than 5,000 acres to be eligible. The study had been going on under the previous administration, and some 150 million of the designated 174 million acres had already been turned down by previous administrations as being ineligible for wilderness classification.

Well, nobody bothered to mention that our administration has proposed to the Congress addition of another 57 wilderness areas encompassing 2.7 million acres. That's more than three times as much land as was disqualified. Nor did anyone mention that I've already signed legislation designating sites in Indiana, Missouri, Alabama, and West Virginia as new wilderness areas.

Our environmental programs also are the strongest in the world. Last year, expenditures by business and government to comply with environmental laws and regulations were estimated at over $55 billion, or $245 per man, woman, and child in the United States.

We have made a commitment to protect the health of our citizens and to conserve our nation's natural beauty and resources. We have even provided financial and technical support to other nations and international organizations to protect global resources. Thanks to these efforts, our country remains ``America the Beautiful.'' Indeed, it's growing more healthy and more beautiful each year. I hope this helps set the record straight, because it's0one we can all be proud of.

I understand that in Special Olympics, your torch is called the Flame of Hope. And that's exactly what your athletes represent today. By training and competing in these events, you're realizing your hopes for a fuller, more productive life. And you're kindling in the rest of us the hope that through individual effort we can make this a more caring world. And, Eunice, we're grateful for all you've done to give these special young people new opportunities for special growth.

We've had a productive session, reviewing bilateral issues as well as world developments. And, more importantly, we've had a chance to put our relationship on a personal basis. We find we have much in common, but that's no surprise between friends and allies. The bonds between our two nations are of long standing. Our ties are a precious tradition, reflecting our many concerns and shared values.

Australia is a great nation that plays a vital role in regional and world affairs. It's a key ally upon whom we can count. Ours is an alliance of trust and friendship. I'm grateful for the good will expressed by Prime Minister Hawke today, and I welcome his wise counsel. I've been looking forward to getting to know him. And it was our first meeting, but certainly not our last. We will be in frequent contact in the future. And I wish the Prime Minister and all Australians the best of luck. And again, welcome.

I, like you, have been looking forward to this meeting. I have been able to convey to you, and through you to the people of the United States, the fundamental importance that we in the new Labor government attach to the relationship with the United States.

I was able to remind the President that it was a Labor government during the last war which fundamentally reoriented the international relationship of Australia toward that alliance with the United States. It was an alliance which served us well, the United States and Australia, during that war. And in the period since the war, that relationship, in general, and particularly in terms of the ANZUS Treaty relationship, has continued to serve both our countries well.

There is no country, I have suggested to the President, that this country will be able to rely on more as a constructive ally than Australia. It will be a relationship of deep friendship and, as is befitting between people and nations who are friends, it will be one, at times, where there may be differences of emphasis in our perceptions of particular issues. Those differences, if they exist, will be honestly and directly expressed but will in no way diminish the fundamental depth of the relationship between our two countries.

I appreciate the opportunity that I have had to discuss with the President matters of immediate bilateral importance to us, matters of concern in the immediate region of Australia, and issues of global consideration. And we have found in all those areas an identity of interest. And I have expressed to the President, as he has to me, our firm intention on both our parts to ensure that the relationship, which has been strong and productive in the past, will continue to be even more so in the future. And that will reflect the relations between our countries and what is now a firm, personal relationship between the President of the United States and myself as Prime Minister of Australia.

I once learned in a public-speaking class that you should never open your remarks with an apology. [Laughter] But, then, how can I explain to you that I'm sorry I was late and have kept you waiting here? I'll tell you how that happened here if some of the fellows behind me won't get mad. They had a meeting scheduled also with a delegation from the Congress, and I've found out that every time that happens I'm late from then on. [Laughter] But welcome to the White House.

Baltic people and freedom-loving people everywhere will always remember. The Soviet Union invaded these small but proud countries in 1940. And then, in June of 1941 -- only days before Hitler turned on his partners in the Kremlin -- the Soviets arrested tens of thousands, executed many, and began a mass deportation to Siberia. At the end of the war, the horror continued as hundreds of thousands were sent to the Gulag.

Today, it's no coincidence that a large percentage of people living in these occupied countries are not of Baltic descent. The Soviets have tried their best to Russify the Baltic peoples, as they have with so many of the other oppressed nationalities within the Soviet empire.

The worship of God, once at the heart of Baltic culture, has been brutally suppressed. Any legitimate attempt at independence from Moscow has been suppressed. Any tangible effort to preserve their national identity has been denied. But the Soviets have never broken their spirit.

It seems ironic that those responsible for the repression I've been describing are now proposing what they call an atom-free Baltic, a Nordic nuclear-free zone, especially since unidentified submarines have repeatedly violated the territorial waters of Norway and neutral Sweden. This kind of conduct doesn't lend itself to a spirit of trust. As a matter of fact, the curious thing is, if you really stop to think about it, their description of a nuclear-free zone is that there won't be nuclear weapons in that zone. The kind of nuclear-free zones we want in the world are zones where nuclear weapons will not be landing and exploding.

I urge the Soviets to concentrate on the serious negotiations in Geneva instead of making meaningless gestures. Last week, as you're aware, I unveiled a new arms control proposal. We hope the Soviets will take this proposal seriously. We've demonstrated flexibility. The ball is now in their court. We're seeking verifiable and equitable agreements, because we're firmly convinced that such agreements are in the interest of both our countries and all the people of the world.

However, we should never delude ourselves as to just who and what we're dealing with. I can promise you we will not, in the process of seeking peace, be lured from our moral commitment to those captive peoples who are now held in bondage.

There are those who believe that we should muffle our criticism of totalitarianism in the mistaken notion that this will further the cause of peace. But we Americans want nothing more than to remain free and at peace. Nevertheless, ignoring reality, giving up the moral high ground, refusing to speak the truth will not engender the respect needed for the preservation of peace and human liberty. Totalitarian regimes must know that free men will not cower. Then and only then can conflict be avoided.

I'm happy to report after the Williamsburg summit that I'm confident freedom and peace can be preserved. The leaders of the Western democracies gathering there in the cradle of liberty met as friends and allies. A new spirit is emerging in the West, a fellowship of decent and free people.

June 14th, the day in 1941 when the massive deportation of the Baltic people began, is a day which reaffirms our commitment to our ideals. The people of Latvia, Estonia, Lithuania, and all the other captive nations look to the United States. We must keep the peace, and we will. We must also keep the beacon of freedom shining, and from that sacred responsibility, we will never shrink.

Estonia. The peaceful, Western-oriented Baltic nations were crushed by the force of arms of their hostile neighbor. Under the cynical arrangements of the infamous Ribbentrop-Molotov agreement, the Soviet Union forcibly incorporated the three Baltic Republics into its empire.

Following the Soviet takeover, tens of thousands of the Baltic peoples were subject to imprisonment, deportation, persecution, and execution. Their religious, cultural, and historical heritage has been denigrated. The foreign political system which now controls their homelands has attempted to force these unwilling people to accept an alien life of totalitarian domination. But it has failed.

Today, the Baltic peoples continue to struggle to attain the freedoms we enjoy. These men and women still suffer harsh imprisonment, banishment, and persecution for their beliefs. Brave Lithuanians, Latvians, and Estonians still seek to exercise their human rights to think, speak, and believe as their conscience directs them.

The people of the United States of America share the just aspirations of the people of the Baltic nations for national independence, and we cannot remain silent in the face of the continued refusal of the government of the U.S.S.R. to allow these people to be free. We uphold their right to determine their own national destiny, free of foreign domination.

Who could stand before this scene with Old Glory unfurled in all its majesty across the area of two football fields and not feel their heart fill with pride? This flag is a gift from the people to the people. It was made at painstaking effort, financed, as you've been told, by a coalition of workers and managers, corporations and individual givers. I commend members of the Washington, D.C., Labor Council who spent hours this morning carefully unfolding it for presentation and who have volunteered to set up this flag every Flag Day.

If you look out at that grand flag stretched behind us, you can see what we think of ourselves, our country, and our future. That flag was made by and for men and women who still know how to dream great dreams and who still believe they can make their dreams come true. That giant banner was not created by a timid nation, but by a bold one. Not a stitch was sewn in confusion or doubt. We understand that those stars and stripes stand for freedom and the forces of good. We apologize to none for our ideals or our principles, nor the prosperity that we've made for ourselves and shared with the world. Let this grand flag forever be a symbol of the potential before us that free men and women can soar as high as their dreams and energy and ambitions will take them.

On behalf of all Americans, I would like to thank the Great American Flag Fund and all the men and women who've made this inspiring gift possible. I promise you your government will keep it and treasure it and use it as a reminder of the greatness that is America.

I have to go now. I am leaving in that whirlybird for the Volunteer State, Tennessee. So, I'm looking forward to it for one reason, too. At the very start of the trip, I will get to see that magnificent flag from above, from the air.

The President. I'm more used to having people ask me questions. [Laughter] And I don't know, with all of the facets of this subject that have been brought to the fore by the Commission [National Commission on Excellence in Education] -- and I must say here in the presence of two members of the Commission, I am wholeheartedly in support of that Commission's report. It was a bipartisan commission and intended to be such. And the two here will attest that they didn't have any telephone calls or messages from the President urging them to find out this or that. I stayed completely hands-off and was -- and as I say, I think that they've come in with a masterful report.

Governor here, of course, was ahead of the Commission's report -- hadn't waited for that -- with his idea of better and fairer compensation for teachers. And, certainly, I think the chart up there illustrates the importance of that. And I'm glad that we're, all of us here, on that side in that subject.

There is one thing about education. I think there have been elements in our country over recent years that have thought of education and that it should become more and more national, a nationalized school system, if you will. I am unalterably opposed. I think that in the great diversity of this country we created the greatest public school system the world has ever seen, and we created it at a local level where there could be the intimate and close contact with education on the part of the parents of the children getting that education. I think we should continue, and that basically is where it lies.

I think, with the advent of the Federal Government in some funding for education -- and most people are totally unaware of how little the Federal Government participates in that, about 8 percent at all levels of education is the government's share. I think, however, that in recent years, the Federal Government has sought to have far more control than 8 percent of the money would justify. And there's been a kind of image created of education in a vertical line: local, State, and, up here, the Federal Government. Where they really -- these branches of government -- belong in my view is horizontal. And that is: local, State, and the Federal Government, and divided as to what are the proper, the legitimate functions with regard to education of each level of government. And then, assess where the costs should be to each level based on what its particular interest is and what is necessary to guarantee that interest.

I'm making a speech instead of asking a question. I'm filibustering here, because I wanted to get down, in the questioning, to something that hasn't been mentioned here, now that we're all agreed on this one element.

I've been disturbed -- and I would like to have -- and I won't pick any one of you here; I'm not well acquainted enough to do that. But any one who could respond to this. I think there's something in what has happened in education in recent years -- that we're all at fault. And by that I mean parents, within the school system, in our whole social structure. Maybe it came out of the Great Depression and the great war that followed. But maybe generations like my own had a feeling that we should do better by our children. But what we meant by doing better was that they shouldn't have it as hard as we had it, and maybe we made it too easy.

I question the abandonment of compulsory courses. I challenge in my mind that the average person entering high school, for example, is not qualified to determine what courses they would choose to take. They're not going to get the exposure they should get to all the other choices that are out there. I can recall a science class, and it didn't appeal to me at all. But I was forced to take it. And at the end of the year, it hadn't appealed to me at all. [Laughter] But, I guess I learned a little something in exercising my mind -- of having to do it, because I had to do it if I wanted to play on the football team and if I wanted to get a diploma someday.

But I also saw others that didn't have any more knowledge of it than I did suddenly find themselves in what you could see was where they wanted to be. And this was true in other subjects. And this is part of what I think education could do. And I just wonder if someone would like to speak to this subject of -- I know that, just since the Commission report came out, a number of Governors here in the country, a number of school districts, a number of cities, communities -- amazing number -- have suddenly jumped at the Commission's report and are going forward implementing. And the main thing they're implementing is a return to the idea of 3 or even 4 years of compulsory English, x number of years of compulsory math and science -- these things that once used to be taken for granted in school.

Commission on Excellence in Education] Well, I think it's long overdue that we should go back to a curriculum. I, as an immigrant to America, was very surprised that I had to do very little to get a high school diploma. It was as easy as apple pie. [Laughter] And I think that the results are showing now, unfortunately.

And, Mr. President, you're absolutely right. We have to go back and believe that our students cannot make a choice in terms of what they are studying. And, indeed, we ought to tell them what we think is important, because we have that experience. And we shouldn't underestimate their ability. They can do a lot better than they have been doing in the recent years.

The President. Gee, I can't resist commenting. As Governor, every year I used to invite the exchange students from the other countries in California to come to the capital and meet with them. And I just have to tell you that every year I would ask one question of those foreign students: How does our schooling here compare with the schooling in your own land? Is it harder, is it easier? And every year the answer was exactly the same. They'd look out of the corners of their eyes at each other, and then they'd begin to smile, and then they'd begin to giggle, and pretty soon they were all laughing out loud. And the answer was we're just too soft and easy compared to what they had to do in their own lands.

Education] Responding to that -- and this may take a little bit longer for the answer, because I'd like to relate something in terms of your last comment -- and that is, in regards to the curriculum and having a basic core curriculum. And I know even when we as a commission, the members, were looking at it, we also felt that 1 year of math at the ninth grade was not enough math to get a youngster through for the rest of his life. And 1 year of science -- and I was amazed to find that there were many districts in this country that did not even require 1 year of science, even though we talked about 3 -- and when we start talking about our environment, when we start talking about the sciences as needed, our youngsters are just not prepared to move on.

I looked at something else. We do have a lot of youngsters who are coming in the country -- a lot of them from Southeast Asia. And I was surprised, just this spring, to find out how many of these youngsters came into this country speaking no English at all. But they were so glad to have the opportunity to go to school, that within 4 years, they are now valedictorians of their classes. And I think New York was one example. Of the seven top prizes in science, six of them were won by students that had only been in this country about 4 years. We've just taken it so easy as Americans, and yet we have it there that we're not even preparing ourselves to move into the 21st century.

Unidentified speaker. Repeating one example of the kind of thing I think we ought to do, along the line of what you said earlier, I dare say you probably ask that question each year in English, and they were laughing because it was so easy here. I would say that if we took an average group of students from the United States, took them to Germany and had Helmut Kohl ask them that question in German, they'd be laugh=Tng too, but it'd be out of embarrassment, because they couldn't understand the question.

I think that sort of thing we have to do if we'rve going to live in a world in which most people do not speak English or speak it only for their own purposes. We need to learn their language. And no one is going to volunteer -- very few, should I say, are going to voluntarily study language that first year. It's too hard. But you get beyond that.

And I -- incidentally, I have called on the phone and congratulated some of those Asian students that have made the press by virtue of their becoming valedictorians of their class. And you had a very warm feeling after talking to them on the phone and their determination and, incidentally, their appreciation for this country of ours and what it has meant to them.

Governor Alexander. Mr. President, let me -- we're about out of time. I have the unpleasant job of regulating that time. I wanted to ask Lieutenant Governor Wilder, who played a major role in the appointment of our legislature's Comprehensive Task Force on Education, which reported in January and which we're very proud, anticipated a number of the concerns of the national commission, if he had anything to add.

Mr. President, certainly the legislative branch of government is proud that you are here with us today, and, you know, education is 50 percent of our business. And it's been that way always. It's half of all that we do in State government. It's been our focal point of attention for years, and yet that attention has been sharpened recently by Governor Alexander and by the Comprehensive Task Force on Education. And it was encouraging to us when your commission on excellence came forward with the same kind of recommendations that we had.

I have a personal commitment. Coming out of the business world, I certainly am committed to merit -- merit and production. I think that merit should be in the field of education. And I think we ought to have evaluation and review on a continuing basis. The legislature now has a commission that is looking at these issues, and we are trying to determine for sure that we will get implementation and continuity in implementation.

You ladies and gentlemen, who are so instrumental to provide American children with this great gift of education, please be very generous. Help the Governor to bring about a better educational system, because America has to be better educated than it is. The burdens of the world are on our shoulders. We have to make peace in the Middle East. We have to make peace in Europe. We have to make sure that tyranny doesn't rise to the Hitler proportions. So, please, most importantly -- whatever details you are going to have to work out, I am sure you'll find a way -- but be sure that you are very generous with American children.

I think it would be appropriate for me to say that we Tennesseeans are very proud of our public school system. And my seatmate, making the references, I recall having the opportunity last year to spend a month in the Soviet Union visiting many republics far down in Asia. And I want to say to those here as well as the President and the Governor and my colleagues that we should not only be proud of our system; we should be thankful, and emphasize the public education system after reviewing the Soviet system that I had an opportunity to see being practiced.

Senate, the Lieutenant Governor. We members of the General Assembly are dedicated to improving education in Tennessee. I personally am committed to a merit pay concept, because that's the American system.

The President. Well, here in the auditorium of Farragut High School, Washington may seem like a far-distant bureaucracy. But let me reassure you that Washington is not too far away for some of us to hear the voices of the people of Tennessee.

Here, the talents and the problems of every child are very real to you, and that is obvious. And you're not waiting for handouts or bailouts or directives from Washington. You've made it obvious -- and that's why I'm here -- that you're taking action to educate every child so that he or she can compete with anyone anywhere else in the world.

Your Governor, many of your State legislators, parents, and the teachers are calling national attention to the sorry state of America's educational system, a system that was once the finest in all the world. So, I've come here to listen and to learn. Farragut High School and the Knox County school system are shining examples of public education at its best. And it's here that the idea for the basic skills -- the first section of Governor Alexander's Better Schools program -- started.

Last year your school board was named the Tennessee School Board of the Year. Under the leadership of Lieutenant Governor Wilder and Speaker McWherter, the legislature has established an education task force whose report anticipated many of the findings of the National Commission on Excellence in Education. Your State slogan is, ``America at Its Best.'' And that certainly holds true for Tennessee's schoolrooms.

It's a simple American philosophy that dominates nearly every other profession, so why not this one? There are plenty of outstanding teachers in Tennessee and in every other State. What we must do is find them, promote them, hold them up as role models, not just for other teachers but for our children.

I've learned a lot listening to your discussion here today; and I know there are disagreements, but it's important for me to hear those as well. I'll use what I've heard today as we frame our national agenda for excellence in education.

There are many important jobs in American life, but I can't think of any that's more important than teaching our children. William Ellery Channing, an early American clergyman, once said that ``it's a greater work to educate a child than to rule a state.'' What he said was right then as America set her first priorities, and it is still true today as we return to them. With the help and guidance of the people of Tennessee, all those millions of other Americans who agree with you, we will restore America's ability to educate all her children to the highest standards that we know.

And I thank you for a very informative session and for the teachers who are present. I know sometimes it must get very hard -- and the cartoons and the jokes every June portray you as leaping and running across the schoolyard yelling you're free. [Laughter] But, on the other hand, I think you all have something of what one teacher in my life had.

There came a moment between us in which he said to me, ``It isn't very important to me what you think of me now.'' He said, ``It is important what you may think of me 15 years from now.'' And I had the experience, 15 years later, the rewarding experience of being able to face him and tell him what I thought of him 15 years later. And it was far different than it would have been at that angry moment -- [laughter] -- 15 years earlier.

Note: The President spoke at 2:20 p.m. in the mini-auditorium of Farragut High School. His remarks and the general discussion followed several briefings by panel members on the Tennessee school program.

Shirley Mynatt. [Inaudible] -- we would be very pleased if we could get you to read some of these lines to us. I can find a place with my favorite passage -- I don't know about theirs. But I wonder if I could get you to do that.

I hope that none of you ever get that pessimistic or that cynical about life. I think that humankind is very important, and their lives are not as futile as he would have us believe; but he'd done it unto himself.

The President. Then, I'd seek help. I'd go to teachers and let them know how much you really want to make it, and it isn't a case of being careless or not trying, that you want to make it. And I think you'd be surprised how much help you'll get.

The President. That's a very funny thing. It wasn't a goal in any way. As a matter of fact -- it's funny what life does to you -- not too many years ago, I would have been willing to bet the house and farm and everything that there was no way that I would ever aspire to public office.

I was very happy in the career that I had in Hollywood and thought that that -- I've always believed that you pay your way. So, taking advantage of the fact that I was a performer and, thus, recognized and so forth, I would campaign for people -- candidates that I believed in, help at fundraisers and so forth, the causes that I believed in, and thought, there, I was paying my way. I was doing what I should: return a little something for how good life had been to me. And it really came about almost by accident.

And they kept on to the point that I -- one night, Nancy and I -- we found we couldn't sleep. We were saying -- because they kept putting it on the basis that I offered the only chance to win and to bring the party back together -- finally, we were saying to each other, ``Well, could we live with ourselves if they're right and we're wrong,'' and finally gave in.

The President. Well now, I've just been through a couple of panels and meeting with teachers from all over Tennessee, and I've been in a panel that was just held here in your building, on the Governor's program here for merit pay for teachers. So, you'll have to realize that I am talking about education somewhere else than here. But there has been a decline in the quality of education.

But I hasten to say I understand and -- one of the reasons I'm here is I know that here in this particular school and in much of Tennessee, you have stayed ahead of the rest of the country. You have not suffered that decline that has been so apparent, particularly in some of our large city schools.

But the difference that I have seen is that -- I think frankly, and it's all our fault -- and by ``ours'' I mean parents and the rest of us that went along before you -- I think we tried to make it too easy for you. When I was going to school, for example, English was required for 4 years, and mathematics was required for 3 years in high school. Science was required for at least 2 years.

You had required courses -- language was required -- I took Latin and then 2 years of French, as required -- and I think that we've dropped a lot of the required courses. And very frankly, I think that you need someone requiring -- because left to your choice now, you haven't had the experience to know that you might find an interest in a different direction -- like me finding out this job that I just answered about, instead of the one that I had.

The President. When you graduate from college. Well, I think all the signs of recovery are very much with us, and I think we'll have recovery long before then. But this is what's also important in your education now. I think we're in a period -- we've been in these periods before -- but in a period of change where some of the things that were legitimate jobs in the past are no longer going to exist. There's going to be a whole new era in high technology and so forth, and you should be prepared and ready for those jobs. But I am quite sure that recovery is going to come long before then, and there will be employment opportunities.

As a matter of fact, you'd be surprised if you take a metropolitan, big city newspaper, the Sunday edition, where they run all the classified ads, even today with 10 million unemployed -- there were 10 percent unemployed -- even today you will find that those Sunday editions -- the Washington paper, the New York papers, Pittsburgh, Los Angeles -- you will gind those papers will carry as many as 50 and 60 pages of help wanted ads. But when you read them, you realize that these are employers advertising for people, and the people that are presently unemployed do not have the skills and the training for those jobs. This is why what we're doing at the Federal level, one of our programs is aimed at retraining for people who are unemployed in these new lines of work.

Q. Thank you. Over the past 20 years or so, the Supreme Court has made several decisions concerning separation of church and state. And I wonder how you feel about the direction that we appear to be heading in this matter.

The President. Well, I happen to differ with the decision that took prayer out of schools. I don't think the Constitution says anything about -- it says, quite to the contrary, that Congress shall make no laws pertaining to religion, either establishing it or preventing the practice thereof.

And we are still a nation under God. It says so on our coins -- ``In God We Trust''. It's over the very hall of the Supreme Court. And I have been very interested and have been trying to promote and am still trying to promote a constitutional change, a constitutional amendment that will restore the right of prayer.

But I don't think that the Constitution ever meant to -- it's meant to separate church and state so that we couldn't have an enforced state religion. I don't think it was ever meant to separate our government or our people from religion.

The President. I think that a woman could handle being President. I have just come from a summit conferenceS in which one of the star performers was Margaret Thatcher, the Prime Minister of England. And, of cgourse, you could.

It may sometimes seem as if it isn't very important, but -- and you'll wonder why -- but there's a reason for all of it. And you'll look back -- and I just told in there on the panel a little experience of my own.

I once sat in the principal's office at about your stage of life. And the principal, for very good reason, said to me, ``I don't care what you think of me now.'' He said, ``I am more concerned with what you'll think of me 15 years from now.'' And 15 years later, I had the satisfaction and the real rewarding experience of facing him again and telling him I understood now, 15 years later, what it was he was trying to do and thanking him for what he was trying to do. So, stay with it. Don't give up.

School. Following his meeting with the students, he met with Tennessee Republican Party leaders in the school library. He then traveled to Albuquerque, N. Mex., where he met with New Mexico Republican Party leaders at the Albuquerque Hilton Hotel. He remained overnight at the hotel.

This is a very special day for me. I don't believe a group exists which understands better, or does more, than yours to safeguard the value of education for us in our country. Thanks to you, education has been the key that opened the golden door of opportunity and, just as important, it's been the faithful servant of our democracy, preserving the values and the freedoms that we hold so dear.

I urge you, send a message to Washington, D.C., and make it loud and clear. Tell them you want the basics in your schools and the parents back in charge. Tell them that education must never become a political football, because your children come first and they must come first.

America can become more competitive in world markets and so we can protect our national security. Now, all of us know that our schools must meet the demands of an ever more sophisticated technology. Our instruction in English, math, science, and computer programing must be the best. But I hope we never lose sight of the fact that true wealth and security are born in the spirit, conscience, and character of a nation. And here it is again that you, parents and teachers, who open the eyes and minds of our children to a proud and noble culture. You do it with literature, music, and poetry, and you do it another way that could never be duplicated by government -- you do it by giving of yourselves. Every day, in so many personal ways, you show what it means to live a good and worthy life.

I confess, I was not as attentive as I might have been during my classroom days. I seem to remember my parents being told, ``Young Ron is trying -- very trying.'' [Laughter] But I also remember the attitudes and actions of my parents and teachers. Sometimes stern, sometimes gentle; always they strived with quiet courage to teach us responsibility, discipline, honesty, tolerance, kindness, and love.

These priceless values cannot be taught from instruction manuals. We can't find them in computer printouts. We can't create them with more Federal spending. They must come from the heart, from your hearts. That's the true source of good citizenship, fine people, and a great country, and I just hope that you never let anyone in Washington forget it.

When I ran for President in 1980, I said that this country must recognize the problems in our educational system and start doing something about them. For one thing, many teachers were facing a virtual ``mission impossible.'' I noted at the time that they'd been forced to deal with negative, often destructive trends from outside their classrooms. We can only admire the dedication with which the great majority have tried to meet these problems, because let's face it: It wasn't teachers who created and condoned the drug culture, sexual license, and violence in our society. It wasn't teachers who encouraged the banality of TV over the beauty of the written word. And it wasn't teachers who asked for a ``Washington knows best'' attitude that often showered them with rules, regulations, and uniformity, while discouraging the rich variety and excellence of our heritage.

For too long, teachers have been fighting a lonely war, and it's about time they got some reinforcement from the rest of us. And that's one reason I moved early in our administration to do something never tried before.

We wanted a thorough, no-holds-barred study that would stimulate debate and action. So, we set up a bipartisan group called the National Commission on Excellence in Education. Well, as you know, the Commission has just come out with its report card, and it's pretty tough. And, incidentally, let me interject something here. I think the Commission will assure you they never heard a word from me after they were appointed. They were bipartisan, and they had no interference from any level of government.

About 13 percent of our 17-year-olds, they found, are functional illiterates. Among minority youth, the rate is closer to 40 percent. About four-fifths of our high-schoolers can't write a decent essay. Most of them do less than an hour of homework a night. In many schools, the hours spent learning how to cook and drive count as much toward a high school diploma as the time spent studying mathematics, English, chemistry, U.S. history, and biology. Maybe that helps explain why verbal and math college board scores fell 50 and 40 points, respectively, between 1963 and 1980.

Now, some people are already wringing their hands at this bad news and casting about for scapegoats. Well, I believe the report is good news. It can mobilize, energize, and unify this country in a way that we haven't seen for years. Instead of worrying about whether we put together a Republican plan or a Democratic plan, can't we join together on a course of common sense for an American plan?

Let us stand together -- parents, teachers, concerned citizens -- and say ``no'' to all those who would divide, delay, and drag us down. And let us say ``yes'' to the challenge of a national agenda for excellence that will reach every child in our land.

America is no second-best nation. We came back from Pearl Harbor to win the greatest military victory in history. We came back from the shock of Sputnik to send our astronauts to the Moon and bring them safely home. I believe the nation that met these great challenges can surely meet another. Let us resolve today, the United States will not only reverse its decline in college board scores, we will raise verbal and math scores at least 50 points, and do it within the next decade.

During the 20-year period between 1960 and 1980, spending on education was shooting up and up. But by 1963 college board scores began going down and down. Total spending on education increased in that period almost 600 percent. At the Federal level, spending on education increased twice as fast as spending on defense. Those who argue about the exact level of spending are missing the key point. The question I urge every concerned citizen to ponder is this: If a 600-percent increase couldn't make America smarter, how much more do we need?

First, true excellence in education will require much greater emphasis on the basics -- basic skills of learning and teaching with discipline, basic standards and rewards for excellence, and basic values of parental involvement and community control. Second, to meet the demands of this fast-changing world, we need also to broaden our vision of education. Education must become more than just the province and responsibility of our schools. It's also an integral part of our homes, churches, synagogues, communities, and workplaces. And we must recognize that.

To advance our agenda for excellence, I strongly endorse the Commission's fundamental recommendations. The Commission seeks to require 4 years of English in high school, 3 solid years each of math, science, and social studies, and one-half year of computer science. It wants more and longer school days, tighter discipline, higher goals, and tougher standards for matriculation and graduation. It calls for improved preparation for teachers and better rewards for teachers who excel. And I say, amen.

The Commission recognizes that school officials must take the lead in developing community support and that States and localities have the primary responsibility for school finance. We're already seeing strong evidence that the Commission's report touched a nerve. All over America, it's stimulating debate and sparking action. The Florida State House has passed the Commission's basics curriculum. The board in Ypsilanti, Michigan, has voted to extend their elementary school day and raise high school graduation requirements. In Illinois, high school graduation requirements are also being increased. Ditto for Washington State and, also, Virginia, where the school board of education plans to overhaul their public school curriculum this summer.

As President, I intend to do everything I can to promote and enhance these reforms and to broaden the scope of education throughout our society. For example, to help reform the education system, there are areas where the Federal Government can make a direct contribution.

We want to provide more opportunities for parents, so we're proposing education savings accounts to help hard-working families save for college education. As parents, we want to enable you to save up to $1,000 per year, per child, with no tax on the interest.

Now, I happen to believe that just as more incentives are needed within our schools, greater competition is needed among our schools. Without a race, there can be no champion, no records broken, no excellence in education or any other walk of life.

Where the Federal Government is not making a direct contribution, we can provide leadership to highlight local programs that merit special attention. Yesterday, I had the great pleasure of meeting with the dynamic young Governor of Tennessee, Lamar Alexander. He is pushing a simple idea which I believe is long overdue for our country -- merit pay increases to attract and keep the very best people in the teaching profession.

Teachers should be paid and promoted on the basis of their merit and competence with real rewards for excellence. Rewarding personal initiative and productivity has always been our secret for success. Unfortunately, the idea of merit pay may enjoy wide support in Tennessee and across the country, but it is adamantly opposed by the leadership of the NEA [National Education Association]. They cling to a payscale based on seniority and the number of college credits earned.

I sincerely believe the leadership of the NEA is mistaken. In all due respect, I must ask them, if we test other professionals, why shouldn't we test the people who will be responsible for teaching our children? And if we can evaluate people in other professions and reward them for superior results, why should our schools be different?

We want to work with NEA's leadership, but until it relaxes its opposition to the badly needed reforms the country wants in hiring, salary, promotion, and tenure, the improvements that we so desperately need could be delayed.

We're trying to broaden community support for education so it, in turn, can more effectively serve society and strengthen democracy. We're urging corporations, community organizations, and neighborhood groups across the country to adopt schools and help them meet their educational and vocational needs with funds, equipment, and personnel. There's a wealth of talent, training, and wisdom among the members of our communities, whether it be in business, labor, the professions, or the military. Learning from the achievers of America can greatly enrich the educational experience of our children. And I'm happy to say that this is spreading already, just with the announcement of the Commission's report across the country. People are lining up and volunteering, wanting to be of help to their local school systems.

There's no barrier that can stop our climb toward excellence if good and decent people like you will it to be. But make no mistake, there remains a dark and dangerous enemy who could perilize our progress unless we mobilize to defeat him. Together, we must eliminate the spectre of drug and alcohol abuse that poisons the minds and bodies of America's next generation. I deeply appreciate all that you are doing to help combat this threat. And, if you'll forgive me for doing a little bragging, I think you and Nancy make a mighty fine team.

I have one final request. I know this may often be laughed and sneered at in some sophisticated circles, but ours is a Judeo-Christian heritage, and ours is a loving and living God, the fountain of truth and knowledge. I can't help but believe that He, who has so blessed this land and made us a good and caring people, should never have been expelled from our classrooms. [Applause] Thank you. Thank you very much. Thank you.

The President today announced the appointment of Catalina Villalpando to be Special Assistant to the President in the Office of Public Liaison with responsibility for relations with the Hispanic community.

In 1982, advisory committees afforded a unique opportunity for over 19,000 private citizens of all backgrounds to provide valued and needed counsel to Federal officials in establishing policies and improving operations of the government.

In keeping with the strong commitment of this Administration to promote voluntary citizen participation in government, by year end the number of chartered advisory committees increased by three percent over the previous year, reaching the highest level since 1976. At the same time, government agencies utilizing these committees achieved a further overall reduction in committee operating costs. In 1982, committee operating costs totaled $74 million, 7.5 percent lower than in 1981, and 15.2 percent below comparable 1980 levels.

In 1983, the opportunity exists for additional improvements in the management and cost-effectiveness of advisory committees. New guidance and information prepared by the General Services Administration and contained in this report will provide agency management with the ability to realize this opportunity.

Consistent with my belief that the strength of this Nation flows from the talent and resourcefulness of its people, we shall foster and support the continued active use of advisory committees in the government decision-making process.

The report covers the implementing activities undertaken by Federal agencies during FY 1981 to fulfill the requirements of Section 381 (a) and (b) of the Act. The report describes actions within the Federal government, implementing energy conservation and efficiency standards in procurement activities and progress towards developing a 10-year plan for improving the Eenergy efficiency of Federally-owned or -leased buildings. It also describes programs for carrying out public education activities to encourage energy conservation and efficiencies and to promote carpooling and vanpooling arrangements.

Applications of Nuclear Energy Authorization Act of 1982, I am submitting to the Committee a reference plan on the permanent disposal of nuclear wastes resulting from atomic energy defense activities prepared by the Department of Energy.

As you know, this Administration is strongly committed to putting in place the means for disposing of nuclear wastes. Earlier this year I signed into law the Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982. In addition, construction will begin in South Carolina this fall of a large scale plant to solidify nuclear waste. This plant, to be completed in 1989, will encapsulate nuclear waste in a form suitable for final disposal in a future underground repository. Also, once the necessary approvals are obtained, we plan to move ahead with full construction of the Waste Isolation Pilot Plant in New Mexico. This research and development facility is intended to demonstrate the safe disposal of radioactive waste from national defense programs.

Congress in considering defense nuclear waste activities to be proposed in future years. It is important to note, however, that the Plan has not been subjected to the normal budget review process of the Executive Branch. The future activities covered in this document can be regarded as logical sequential steps. But the precise timing and scope of the disposal activities to be pursued need to be considered as part of the annual budget process.

Thank you very much. This is not exactly the climate for me to have kept you waiting out here in the sunshine. I've been across the street in the Executive Office Building doing all sorts of important things -- while I fidgeted, watching the clock go by.

It's a privilege to welcome such a distinguished group of high school seniors to the White House, along with your parents, teachers, and Members of the Congress. And on behalf of a proud nation, I congratulate the 1983 Presidential Scholars on their achievements. You are America's future and symbolize her greatest hopes. You're among our best young achievers not only in book learning but in the arts and in leadership. Your very presence here represents the commitment of your communities and your country to excellence in education.

For a democracy to function, its people must understand not only reading, writing, and arithmetic but literature, history, and values. Someone once said that, ``if you think education is expensive, you should try ignorance.'' And that sums up the situation pretty well. To be American means to understand that education is the key that opens the golden door of opportunity and, just as important, it's been the faithful guardian of our democracy. It's preserved the conscience and the character of our nation.

We know that knowledge and freedom are inseparable, and so it's no accident that we are the freest people on Earth. And we who are that, built an educational system unrivaled in the history of civilization. You're among its finest graduates, so a great deal of responsibility naturally falls upon you. Many of you wrote in your essays about the debt you owe your families, communities, and schools, and how you intend to pay them back. I'm glad you feel that way. America needs your commitment, your knowledge, and your education. Your country has made an enormous investment in you, and we're relying on your energies and abilities to carry us into the next century -- free and strong and prosperous.

While you finish your education, I plan to work with your parents and teachers and business and labor, civic and government leaders in a national drive for educational excellence. Although your instruction, obviously, has been superb, a study commissioned by my administration warned that the overall quality of American instruction was declining dangerously. As a result, we're taking steps to ensure that every young person in America receives the best education possible. One priority is to weed out teachers who can't teach and promote those who excel. We're looking into ideas like merit pay and the master teachers programs. But perhaps most importantly, we want to make ours an agenda behind which all our people can unite.

Your generation is coming of age in one of the most challenging and exciting times in our history, and we must be certain that you're prepared. High technology is revolutionizing our industries, renewing our economy, and promising new hope and opportunity in the years ahead. There's a dazzling new world waiting for you, and you must be sure to have the training and skills to compete for its rewards with anyone, anywhere. And we must also be sure that you have the vision to use them wisely.

I know all of you want to pursue your dreams in a peaceful and secure world. Like every other generation, you want the world you inherit to be one of hope, free from conflict. I have no higher priority than to make such a world possible. The prevention of conflict and reduction of weapons are subjects that concern us all.

I know many of you and your friends back home are concerned by the destructive capability of the world's nuclear weapons. Well, I want to make something very plain. I pray for the day when nuclear weapons will no longer exist anywhere on Earth.

During this administration, the United States has launched the most far-reaching programs of arms reduction initiatives and negotiations in history. Never before has any nation engaged in so many major, simultaneous efforts to limit and reduce the instruments of war. And we're determined to follow them through, day after day after day, until we succeed. We're now better able to do this because of more truly bipartisan support of our arms control proposals. With patience, resolve, and national will, I am convinced that we can reach equitable, verifiable agreements and actually reduce nuclear arsenals on both sides.

As you know, a very important ingredient of a good education is to learn well the lessons of history. Your studies must show in painful detail all that your parents and grandparents have sacrificed so that you can be free. You can be proud today that your country is contributing to this valiant struggle for peace. We're keeping our military strong for only one reason -- to deter any adversary from thinking it can achieve its goals through war. The Americans who came before you learned horrible lessons about taking the easy way out of challenges to freedom. No war in this century started because America was too well prepared. Every one was triggered because some tyrant, somewhere, figured we were off guard. The highest cost in American lives were paid not because we were too strong, but because we were thought to be weak.

In these last 2\1/2\ years, the enormity of my responsibility to preserve the peace has made my commitment to peace even deeper. But it is a complex and a difficult subject. Some may wish we could unilaterally disarm because they imagine others would follow. Well, we tried that; it didn't work. You have a responsibility and a right to speak out about your concerns. Here, as well as back home, we have that right because we're Americans. But let us always remember with that privilege goes a responsibility to be right.

We live in a free country. There's no room for dissent in other societies, with which we're too familiar. There, such dissent will cause a noted scholar to be committed to a mental hospital or stripped of his rights to study and work with his colleagues. We must not ignore those powerful forces who have no respect for our traditions of freedom and who would like to make the world over in their image.

Scholar.'' Let this award be both a recognition of past accomplishments and a challenge to excel in the years ahead. Your parents, teachers, and others deserve all our thanks for encouraging you this far, but now it's up to you. What you've learned is a beginning, not an end. Keep your minds open to new thoughts and new ways of thinking. We're counting on you to understand and shape a better world tomorrow.

We're waiting to pass the mantle of responsibility to you for the freedom and prosperity of generations of Americans waiting to be born. Remember one thing: Freedom is never more than one generation away from extinction. Every generation has the responsibility to preserve it and then pass it on to the next generation, or it will be gone forever.

The Commission on Presidential Scholars is a group of private citizens appointed by the President to select the scholars. Presently in its 19th year, the Presidential Scholars program recognizes students for their outstanding achievement, leadership abilities, and involvement in school and community activities. One young man and one young woman are selected from each State, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, and Americans living abroad. Fifteen are selected at large, and 20 are recognized for their accomplishments in the visual, creative, and performing arts.

Accordingly, I join millions of Americans expressing profound disappointment at the decisions announced by the Supreme Court in striking down several efforts by States and localities to control the circumstances under which abortion may be performed.

As Justice O'Connor emphasized in her dissenting opinion joined by Justices White and Rehnquist, the legislature is the appropriate forum for resolving these issues. The issue of abortion must be resolved by our democratic process. Once again I call on the Congress to make its voice heard against abortion on demand and to restore legal protections for the unborn whether by statute or constitutional amendment.

These United States-Norway agreements are similar in objective to the social security agreements already in force with Italy, the Federal Republic of Germany, and Switzerland. Such bilateral agreements, which are generally known as totalization agreements, provide for limited coordination between the United States and foreign social security systems to overcome the problems of gaps in protection and of dual coverage and taxation for workers who move from one country to the other.

May 13 calling for ``meaningful, result-oriented, constructive and substantive negotiations'' between the two communities. Approximately 50 countries spoke in the Assembly and supported continuation of the intercommunal talks under the aegis of the Secretary General. We reaffirmed our commitment to the success of the Secretary General's good offices role although we abstained on the Resolution, believing it contained elements potentially unhelpful to the intercommunal talks.

Now that the U.N. General Assembly session is past, we anticipate a period of reevaluation by both communities. We expect, nevertheless, representatives of the two communities to return to the intercommunal talks. We continue to believe those talks hold the best prospect for finding answers to the problems of Cyprus.

Assistant Secretary of State Richard Burt visited Cyprus during the period for in-depth discussions with leaders of both communities and with U.N. officials. Other diplomatic representatives also remain in close contact with all parties to the problem.

You don't forget how a man like Jesse cares about you and the people of North Carolina. You don't forget his kind of courage and compassion -- like when he helped rescue a fellow citizen's wife from Poland after imposition of martial law; like when he cut through redtape to bring home from China another citizen stricken with a blood clot on the brain; like when he helped a North Carolina woman locate and contact her injured husband serving with the Marines in Lebanon.

And bit by bit, he became more than a lonely crusader. He grew into a lionhearted leader of a great and growing army. So, Jesse, we just want you to know the reinforcements are here, the cavalry is ready, and we intend to march with you until victory is yours on Election Day, 1984.

We've seen the kind of courage that Sam Ervin speaks about. Here in Washington, there is great sympathy for practically any scheme to spend more money. But for years, Jesse Helms has been telling the truth: Government can only spend what it borrows or taxes away. And working Americans who pay this nation's bills need higher taxes like they need a plague of locusts.

If the liberals in the Congress had their way, the American people would never have recieved any tax cut -- no first year, no second year, no nothing. If we had followed their definition of compassion, the average family of four would be paying nearly $700 in higher taxes in 1983. But they don't have to. [With] the unwavering support from Jesse, we passed the first decent tax rate reduction for every working American since 1964. And I promise you, the final 10 percent reduction will go into effect July 1st, and it will be followed by indexing in 1985.

Indexing will not help those who are already in the top brackets; it will protect working people from being pushed by inflation into those same high brackets. And that's why I think it's important for the people of North Carolina to know that Jesse Helms has given a rock-solid pledge to defend indexing. But his likely opponent has already said that it's probably a good idea, this eliminating indexing. So you tell me: Who's determined to protect the people's real interests?

So, when they start telling you ``We can do something for everybody below $50,000 but not above,'' you're talking about clobbering an awful lot of people that are out there in the middle-income and lower-income brackets, trying to send the kids through school and stay even with what inflation has done to them.

Jesse, I hope the good people of North Carolina won't mind if I tell them how effective you've been as chairman of the Senate Agriculture Committee, the first chairman from North Carolina in nearly 150 years. Without you, there probably would be no tobacco program.

I also want to thank you, Jesse, for your great help in strengthening our foreign policy and standing up for a strong national defense, making America second to none. You and I both know that this debate on defense is about more than deficits and rooting out waste, as important as they are. It's about protecting lives and preserving freedom, because that's the source of all our other blessings. What occurred during the last decade when the Soviets raced ahead militarily while we stood still was dreadfully wrong. We believe it's immoral to ask the sons and daughters of America to protect this land with second-rate equipment and weapons that won't work. We can only keep our families safe and our country at peace when the enemies of democracy know America has the courage to stay strong. And Jesse Helms and I intend to make sure they know that.

Jesse is chairman of the Senate Subcommittee on Western Hemisphere Affairs. He understands that we have vital interests in helping our neighboring countries in Central America. Either we pay a small price now with mostly economic but some military assistance so we can prevent a crisis, or we listen to the do-nothings and risk an explosion of violence and millions of refugees on our doorstep later on. Make no mistake: The United States must and will support our friends who are building and defending democracy in Central America. We will not permit dictators to ram communism down the throats of innocent people in one country after another.

You know, the other day the Soviet paper, Pravda, actually said something I support. It said that peace in Central America is possible only on the basis of respect for the right of each people to choose, itself, its way of life. Well, I would only add this: the two perfect places to begin are Cuba and Nicaragua, where free and democratic elections are not permitted.

Jesse understands this. That's why he's worked so hard and will deserve so much credit when two blessed days arrive, finally arrive -- the day when we welcome the Lord back into America's classrooms and the day when we protect the lives of the unborn child.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 16th day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Millicent Fenwick, of New Jersey, for the rank of Ambassador during the tenure of her service as United States Representative to the Food and Agriculture Organization in Rome.

President Reagan. President Magana and I have had a cordial and a very useful exchange of views on the situation in El Salvador and in Central America. At this time, his government is deeply involved in preparations for Presidential elections and is attempting through the Peace Commission to encourage the participation in the electoral process of all Salvadorans, including the extreme left. This is the true path of peace for that country.

We discussed the military situation in El Salvador. President Magana also detailed his government's reform efforts, including the land reform program and the recently announced plan for judicial reform. He reaffirmed his government's commitment to human rights.

President Magana is a courageous and talented leader. He's making admirable progress in the difficult task of moving El Salvador toward democracy while at the same time coordinating a defense against Marxist-led guerrillas who would turn his country into a Cuban-style dictatorship.

President Magana. Thank you, Mr. President, for your encouraging words. We believe in democracy, liberty, and all the principles that have made this country great. We welcome your support, and we want a lasting peace through democracy. This is the summary of the remarks that I'm going to make.

It is a propitious opportunity to present to the people of the United States of America a true picture of my country and of the goals we have set within the context of the difficult conditions which confront us. These goals sustain our conviction that President Reagan is giving his support to a legitimate government, and to the just cause of the Salvadoran people for maintaining and consolidating a democratic system in accordance with the tradition of liberty and human solidarity which have constituted the basis for the birth and the greatness of the United States of America.

However, our problems are not solely the result of external factors. For a long time, social and economic inequalities have been obstacles to the full development of democracy. They have provided the opportunity for extra-hemispheric interests, most particularly those of the Soviet Union and her satellites working through two Latin American countries to make us victims of their expansionistic policy.

In order to insure the accomplishment of these objectives put forth by the platform, a political commission was set up. This commission being composed of the Constitutional President of El Salvador, the Foreign Minister, the Defense Minister and representatives of the political parties.

Respect for human life and the physical integrity, along with the dignity of all Salvadorans is the responsibility of the Commission on Human Rights and the constant concern of my Government. I am pleased to say that in order to safeguard those human rights, we have adopted concrete and pragmatic measures, such as the granting of amnesty, accelerated consideration of cases involving political crimes, plans to reform legal procedures applicable to such crimes, cooperation with the International Red Cross, ministerial directives to the security forces to insure strict compliance to legal procedures, and other similar measures. One important step toward guaranteeing respect for human rights will be the judicial reform which is envisioned in the new constitution: independent judicial authority and an independent Attorney General, with sufficient authority and sufficient means to improve the administration of justice. Furthermore, the Attorney General will have the technical capability for the scientific investigation of crime.

The reduction in the gravity of conflicts resulting from the economic and social reforms has contributed to the strengthening of the democratic process which the Government of National Unity has committed itself to maintain and consolidate: well aware that they are important conditions for social stability, created in an atmosphere of confidence, and a determinating factor in the exercise of democracy.

National Unity has sought to create a favorable climate for the growth of private enterprise. The private sector has joined the public sector in forming a committee charged with economic recovery in El Salvador. These efforts at recovery face difficult obstacles caused primarily by low prices paid for our basic exports, increased prices of imports, and the problems of the Central American Common Market. To these I must add violence and the destruction of the infrastructure. Nonetheless, based on the spirit of diligence and sacrifice of the Salvadoran people, the economic cooperation of the United States of America, and a financial discipline of austerity which has permitted us to maintain tolerable rates of inflation and reasonable currency stability, my government has succeeded in reverting the declining trend of the economy.

The peace program of the Government of National Unity rests fundamentally upon the electoral process and on behalf of this government I reaffirm that the solution to the problem of violence should be essentially democratic. Accordingly, elections with participation by all Salvadorans without distinction, constitute the only means to obtain a definitive and permanent peace in order to establish a pluralist system that insures democracy.

In view of the importance of the participation of all Salvadorans in the coming elections, in a spirit of good will and in order to create conditions favorable to this full participation, we have enacted a generous amnesty law. To date 500 political prisoners who were subject to the legal process, have been freed under this law.

In order to better achieve our objectives, the Peace Commission on May 31 of this year appealed to the political sector of the subversive elements for the establishing of a dialogue to determine conditions and guarantees for their participation in the next elections. This appeal has been repeated twice in recent days.

Just as the essence of democracy consists of the right of the citizens to elect their leaders and to confer political power on their representatives, negotiating away a portion of this political power would be a divestment and betrayal of the electorate. This my government would never commit.

Our program of peace is the genuine democratic alternative. In this way, peace will be the logical consequence of the democratic process which will be assured in the next electoral events. It will also result from respect for human rights, consolidation of the social reforms, and economic recovery. In summary, it will result from the combined efforts of all Salvadorans.

Foreign military intervention in domestic affairs constitutes the main obstacle to our efforts to attain peace. The interference of extracontinental Communist countries by way of Cuba and Nicaragua in support of armed groups against a legitimate constitutionally elected government, is a form of aggression which violates the essence of international law, specifically the principle of non-intervention in the internal affairs of other states.

Faced with this situation, our armed forces have the constitutional obligation to defend the nation's sovereignty and to repel, in legitimate self-defense, the armed subversion that has been imposed upon us from abroad.

Salvadorans to abandon their homes. It has subjected our productive facilities, our crops, our bridges and roads, our communication and transportation systems and the infrastructure of all public services to systematic destruction.

Reconstruction of Specific Areas'', coordinated by the armed forces and tending to bring normalcy of activities to the inhabitants of areas affected by violence, with the reestablishing of public services and the reconstruction of the infrastructures.

No one can dispute a nation's right to defend itself against external aggression and against the destruction of the scarce assets which in a developing country are produced at great sacrifice. For this reason, we have the right to the understanding and solidarity of all free nations of the world.

For these reasons we have the right to the understanding and solidarity from all other free nations; as we have had from our Central American brothers, those with whom we share democratic ideals, and for whom I wish to express our gratitude.

El Salvador has not responded to aggression with aggression, nor to intervention with intervention. Last year, with a peace loving spirit we proposed a regional dialogue to strengthen democratic institutions, to end the arms race and the arms traffic, and to improve commercial and economic relations. With the same spirit we accepted the initiative of the ``Grupo Contadora'', whose invitations we have always responded to positively.

With the future of democracy in our country in great peril, we do know how to appreciate and be grateful for the solidarity and sympathy that President Reagan has clearly expressed for our cause, both in public and in private, and has responded with concrete and significant action.

El Salvador fights not only for the survival of its own democratic system; we also defend western democracy. For this reason I want to appeal to the honorable members of the United States of America's Congress to support the efforts of President Reagan to aid El Salvador. This assistance strengthens the cause of democracy in the Central American region. A weak, vacillating commitment endangers peace and hemispheric security. For this reason the people of the United States must fully understand that we face a common threat.

Constituent Assembly of El Salvador will debate and vote upon in the next days. Therein will be established the constitutional guarantees for the great objectives of the Government of National Unity first embodied in the ``Apaneca Pact,'' and will become a permanent reality.

Scleroderma is a painful and debilitating connective tissue disorder that causes hardening of the skin and can also affect several internal organs of the body. Although it can begin at any age, it usually afflicts people in their productive years. Several thousand middle-aged Americans -- women more than men -- have scleroderma.

In the more serious systemic form, scleroderma can not only affect the skin, joints, and muscles but also strike the gastrointestinal tract, lungs, heart, or kidneys. The cause and cure of scleroderma remain unknown, and it may be difficult to treat.

Nevertheless, there is ample reason for hope because the outlook for victims of scleroderma has improved significantly in recent years. Previously, the chances of survival were slim when scleroderma attacked the kidneys. But this is no longer the case. Medical researchers have discovered in the past few years that aggressive treatment with newly-developed anti-hypertensive drugs can lower blood pressure, improve kidney function, and dramatically save lives. In addition, recent research has revealed the importance of abnormalities of fine blood vessels in the development of scleroderma.

Supported by the National Institutes of Health and by private voluntary agencies, researchers throughout the world are focusing their efforts on scleroderma. Improved methods for diagnosis, treatment, and control are being explored.

However, section 5 of the bill, added by an amendment on the Senate floor, would allow a particular school to transfer to taxable investors tax benefits attributable to a building that it refurbished with Federal funds. Without this legislation, the proposed transaction would result in the school being required to repay the Federal funds used to refurbish the building.

Recently there has been a great deal of concern about the sale of tax benefits by tax-exempt entities through leasing transactions. Leasing transactions similar to the one contemplated by this legislation present tremendous potential for abuse and could result in billions of dollars of revenue loss to the Federal Government. The transaction that this legislation would condone would permit a school that has already received tax deductible contributions and Federal grant money to sell certain tax benefits to outside investors. This case is particularly offensive in that the tax benefits being sold are attributable to property that was paid for with Federal grant money. In addition to receiving money for selling tax benefits, the school, as a tax-exempt entity, would be able to invest the proceeds of the sale and receive the income from such investment tax-free.

The propriety of leasing transactions involving the sale by tax-exempt organizations of tax benefits needs to be scrutinized very carefully. Where the tax benefits being sold are attributable to expenditures of Federal funds, the transaction becomes totally unjustifiable. We cannot condone the sale by a tax-exempt entity of tax benefits produced through the use of Federal funds.

As you assume your new duties, I hope that together we can find ways to promote peace by reducing the levels of armaments and moving toward the elimination of force and threats of force in settling international disputes. You will have my full cooperation in moving toward these goals on a basis of equality, reciprocity, and respect for the rights and interests of all.

As the saying goes, we interrupt this program for a news flash. Some years ago, a favorite movie theme was the crusading reporter. In every such picture, the reporter -- hat on the back of his head, clutching the phone -- would yell, ``Give me the city desk. I've got a story that'll crack this town wide open!'' I've read that line a few times myself. Well, I'm not wearing a hat or clutching a phone, but before getting into today's broadcast, I'd like to make an important announcement.

Chairman Paul Volcker to accept reappointment for another term. He's agreed to do so, and I couldn't be more pleased. Paul Volcker is a man of unquestioned independence, integrity, and ability. He is as dedicated as I am to continuing the fight against inflation. And with him as Chairman of the Fed, I know we'll win that fight. End of news flash.

Today marked the launching of the seventh space shuttle flight. This particular shuttle flight is unique in several respects. It's the first space flight of an American woman -- Dr. Sally Ride, another example of the great strides women have made in our country. Women are working as hard and contributing as much as men, and their work is finally receiving the recognition it deserves. I know I speak for all of us when I wish Dr. Ride and her fellow crew members the best of luck in their bold journey. Nancy and I look forward to being on hand to greet them when they land next Friday.

This particular shuttle flight also represents another first. Aboard that space shuttle will not only be communications satellites and NASA experiments  but also a small colony of ants. This experiment is designed to look at the effect of prolonged weightlessness on the ant colony's social structure. While this particular experiment is interesting, the story behind it is even more fascinating.

About 5 years ago, some folks in two high schools in Camden, New Jersey, got together and launched a project for students to send up an experiment in a space shuttle flight. Community leaders and local education officials saw this as a fresh opportunity for students to develop an interest in science and engineering. Now, this may not sound all that original. After all, there are lots of high schools with strong science preparatory programs. But the people backing this project didn't go out hunting for an exceptional high school or exceptional scholars.

This project started in two inner-city high schools in Camden, New Jersey. Camden High School is about 85 percent black and 15 percent Hispanic. Woodrow Wilson High School is about 51 percent black and 44 percent Hispanic. Many of the students are from poor families. Before this project, interest in science was not very strong. One Camden High student said, ``When it came to taking science, a lot of students didn't want to do it. They didn't want to try.'' But that good old American volunteer spirit found a way.

RCA, Camden's largest private employer, offered to pay the cost of launching an experiment on the shuttle if the students could come up with an idea for a project and actually design and build it. The administration and faculty at the high schools took up RCA's offer and started space science courses and encouraged student participation.

Dozens of local companies, universities, and individuals helped out by contributing money, materials, or manpower. And most importantly, the students themselves studied computers and designed computer programs to help run the experiment. They built the canister in which the experiment would take place. They raised funds for the project by selling tee-shirts.

Not only were they interested in the project itself, they developed a broader interest in science and engineering in general. Elective science classes now have many more students than they had before the project. One of the schools installed a planetarium because of the interest in space.

This whole project illustrates some very important lessons in the area of education. It shows the part local community involvement plays in stimulating intellectual curiosity and educational excellence. Local businesses, school teachers, and administrators and, most importantly, the students themselves developed ideas and turned those ideas into real educational opportunities.

Washington, though NASA played a positive role, but mainly because of interest developed at the grassroots level. Regardless of whether or not this experiment in the space shuttle flight succeeds, these high school students in Camden, New Jersey, have gained a new-found interest in learning and in the wonders of science that will serve them well all their lives.

It's true what Trent said, I've been here a number of times. I have a number of wonderful warm memories. As a matter of fact, I was just telling Trent earlier today, I remember being here as Governor of California, sitting in a box at Ole Miss with your then Governor Williams. Ole Miss hadn't had a good season. They were playing Auburn, and Auburn was heavily favored to win.

But isn't it wonderful to see so many Republicans in Mississippi? [Applause] Times have changed and for the better. Former Congressman Prentiss Walker, who I understand is here today, tells a story about his first campaign. He dropped in on a farm and introduced himself as a Republican candidate. And as he tells it, the farmer's eyes lit up, and then he said, ``Wait till I get my wife.

Seriously, though, we have to understand the importance of reaching out to Democrats with whom we have fundamental agreement. Democrats, we have little in common with the national and State Democratic platforms. And I'm quite sure there are many here who were and some who still are Democrats but who have found it more and more difficult to follow their party's leadership.

One of our top priorities since getting to Washington has been turning power back to the levels of the government closer to the people. For this to succeed, we need good people, like Leon Bramlett, in positions of authority at the State level. I hope that from now until election day you will put out a maximum effort to make him Mississippi's first Republican Governor in more than a hundred years.

Democrats, seriously, I think it is time to point out that there are many fine, patriotic Democrats in this country who are beginning to recognize that the present leadership of their party and the leadership in recent years has strayed far from the principles that once characterized the Democratic Party in the days of Jefferson and Jackson. They would no longer be at home, I think, with the present leadership of that party and what it advocates.

Colmer, a fine man who ably represented his State for many years. When Congressman Colmer retired and Trent ran as a Republican to fill his seat, the old man didn't know who to endorse. He loved Trent like a son, but at heart, he was still a Democrat. Well, he figured that out, because near the end of the campaign this veteran Congressman held a press conference. And he mentioned that, although he wasn't endorsing anyone, he wanted everybody to know that he was voting for Trent Lott. [Laughter] I'll take that kind of an endorsement anytime.

Incidentally, on that dinner at Williamsburg for the press, they weren't the only ones that dined on catfish and hush puppies. So did the seven heads of state that were gathered around a table that night. And it was a marvel to see some of those with the gourmet backing of France and the cuisine of Europe tasting catfish for the first time in their lives and wondering why they had missed such a delicacy all their lives.

Trent represents all that's best in the new generation of Republican leaders. He combines a deep, personal commitment to the ideals of free enterprise and individual liberty with a practical expertise in getting things done. He's put together one of the best staffs on Capitol Hill and is admired on both sides of the aisle for his efficient handling of constituent problems. Yes, as you've been told, he's number two in the House minority leadership, and I pray that someday soon, we will be saying, the House majority leadership.

Republicans -- against the taxing and spending irresponsibility that shoved our country into the economic turmoil and decline from which we're now just emerging. I'd like to take this opportunity to thank Trent, to thank Webb Franklin, to thank Thad Cochran for the courage they've shown in tackling what seemed like overwhelming problems just 2\1/2\ years ago.

In 1980 we promised to make America strong again. It's taken everything we could muster, but we've ridden out the storm. We've beaten back attempts to get our program before it had a chance. And I'm proud to tell you today that, even as our critics now have to admit, it's working.

We've brought inflation, as you were told by Trent -- formerly public enemy number one -- down from -- it was 12.4 at exactly that point to less than 1 percent for the last 6 months. And as Trent told you, we were handed prime interest rates of 21\1/2\ percent. We ignored the calls for a quick fix. We worked the prime down slowly but surely to 10\1/2\ percent. And that's good news for thousands of Mississippians involved in the construction and timber industries.

To finance all that spending, Federal income taxes doubled between 1976 and 1981. And I heard a gentleman on the air yesterday on one of the panel shows, and he was talking about the terrible deficits that we now confront. Well, those deficits were very large and were the greatest that we'd had until that time. In those 5 years in which taxes were doubled, the deficits went up. By 1980 many working people were being taxed at rates reserved for the well-to-do only a few years ago.

Much of the economic turmoil we've gone through can be traced directly to overspending and overtaxing. Those who think they can pull the wool over the eyes of the voters and return to the tax-and-spend and spend-and-inflate policies of the past are badly mistaken. For my part, if confronted with budget-busting spending bills or any attempt to take away the people's tax cuts or indexing, I will not hesitate to veto -- indeed, I look forward to it.

The big spenders, anxious to get their hands back in the public's pockets, are now trying to use greed and envy to undercut the economy-building aspects of our tax program. They're calling for a tax cap on benefits that would undermine new investment, job creation, and economic growth.

I hope the American people remember that many of those advocating this tax cap opposed any reduction in tax rates for anybody. They don't think we're taxed enough. And what they're suggesting now isn't a cap on tax cut benefits; it's a cap on the recovery -- a permanent tax increase -- and we can't let that happen.

And let's set the record straight about indexing. Indexing prevents lower and middle-income earners from being pushed into higher tax brackets. It doesn't have any impact on the tax rates of our wealthiest citizens. They're already in those top brackets. Those who advocate eliminating indexing are trying to perpetrate a cynical hoax on lower and middle-income earners in America.

Retail sales and produc- tivity are up. Real wages are up. This morning at 10 o'clock in the East, they announced that personal earnings were up 1.2 percent for the month of May; personal spending for consumer items was up 1.4 percent. Those are the two highest, most solid gains for any month since the recovery began. Housing starts are up; automobile sales are up; and new business incorporations are at near-record levels. And unemployment -- always a lagging indicator -- has finally begun inching down.

A weak economy wasn't the only cause for concern in the 1980 election. During the last decade, our military strength was permitted to erode dangerously. At a time when the Soviets were dramatically increasing their military effort, real spending for our defense needs was reduced by almost 20 percent. By 1980 our fleet, which had numbered nearly a thousand ships in the late 1960's, had dwindled to less than 500. Our military personnel were relying on weapons designed a generation before, and many of our airmen were flying in bombers that were older than the pilots.

We promised to turn this threatening situation around. Again, with the help of your Republican representatives, we've set a place in program to rebuild our defensive capabilities. We're doing our best to keep costs down. But no matter how diligent we are, there's no escaping the fact that providing this country with an adequate defense is an expensive undertaking, especially when you're forced to make up for the irresponsibility of so many past years. But, I say to our critics, we will not send our brave young men and women in the military out to defend us with second-rate weapons and bargain-basement equipment. If they can put their lives on the line for us, we can afford to give them what they need to do the job right. And with those young men and women and the training that they are getting and the morale and esprit de corps they have and with the proper kind of weapons, they won't have to use those weapons, because no one will dare tread on us.

The security of our country, of course, depends on more than weapons. We must have the will to meet the challenges of an adversary who is constantly testing our resolve to defend our vital national interests. And this is exactly what is happening in Central America.

I appreciate the sincere motives of many who point to the faults of our friends and ask for reforms. I agree with those who insist on economic as well as military assistance. Nevertheless, there is no excuse for not providing those under attack the weapons they need to defend themselves. We must not listen to those who would disarm our friends and allow Central America to be turned into a string of anti-American Marxist dictatorships. The result could be a tidal wave of refugees. And this time, they'll be ``feet people'' and not ``boat people'' swarming into our country, seeking a safe haven from Communist repression to our south. We cannot permit the Soviet-Cuban-Nicaraguan axis to take over Central America.

What we have in this country is the most precious gift God has given to mankind. Our country, more than any other, has been blessed with liberty and abundance. A few years ago some people were counting America out, claiming that our best days were behind us, that our country was in decline. Well, not anymore. That pessimism is something else we've turned around.

I'm as confident as ever that the character of the American people is still strong, the soul of this nation is still something of which we can be proud. And that was never more apparent than recently when the floods swept through your State. From all reports, your citizens, young and old, white and black, proved that the American spirit is alive and well.

Well, during the floods, there were numerous accounts of neighbor helping neighbor, of heroism and kindness crossing all racial and economic lines. The people of Mississippi showed the country that when the chips are down, we are all Americans.

Today, we have a heavy responsibility; the future peace and freedom of our children and of all mankind rests on our shoulders. But we have no reason to fear. Instead, like Tommy Wallace and all good Americans, we'll do what we have to do.

I just have to inject something here, because we had a Cabinet meeting this morning. It was on a subject that you haven't heard talked about at all, but it's something -- a program that we've had underway for about 2 years. And this is a program that has to do with something we had promised, and that was that we were going to make government smaller; we were going to make it more efficient. And we've had a task force working for 2 years now on the actual operations of government -- not the programs that you hear about in the budget discussions, but how to manage things more efficiently in government.

Well, there's going to be a surprise pretty soon, coming another budget time when they find out how much we are able to cut, how many billions of dollars simply in the improvement of management to bring the Federal Government up somewhere close to what has been just common business practice for all of you that are out there in business today -- that you've taken for granted, but government's still been doing it. The only thing we've changed is from horses to automobiles. And we're changing the rest of the government to come up to date at the same time.

Research on liver diseases is continuing in order to increase our understanding of the underlying causes of these disorders, find preventive measures, develop better means of early detection, and improve our current methods of treatment.

President Reagan. I would like to take this opportunity to underscore our great pleasure at receiving President Gonzalez and express once again our friendship and admiration and support for the Government and the people of Spain.

The President and I had an exceptionally productive and cordial meeting today. We reviewed international and bilateral matters in an open, understanding, and democratic spirit that one would expect between friends and allies. We affirmed the need for strong leadership to deal with the political and economic and social problems which underlie so much of the unrest in the world today.

We agreed on the importance of maintaining Western strength and solidarity in these critical times and expressed our desire to work closely together as we face the challenges ahead. We agreed on the desirability of early, positive, and balanced conclusion to the CSCE Review Conference presently underway in Madrid. I expressed our appreciation for President Gonzalez' recent initiative in this regard, which we'll be discussing with our friends and allies.

There are numerous areas of closer cooperation, including the pursuit of our common energy security interests. We value Spain as an important partner. We welcome the President's high sense of responsibility in guiding his country at this critical moment in its history. We applaud Spain's aspirations to join Europe fully and to make its voice heard in Europe's leading institutions.

We believe the West's most fundamental resource is the strength of democratic institutions. The consolidation of democracy in Spain is a ringing affirmation of the vitality of Western institutions and the appeal of Western values.

President Gonzalez. Good afternoon. First of all I want to thank President Reagan for this occasion to hold an open conversation with the U.S.A., which we consider a friendly country, a good friend of Spain.

As you know, Spain is a very old European country who, among other things, discovered this land that nowadays occupies this great country of yours. But it's also a young country, not only because the country people are young but because we just recovered the dignity of being a democratic country.

European and a Western country -- the most Western of the European countries -- nothing then more logical than its wish to, and its desire, to participate and integrate in the European and the Western world and cooperate with the Western world in a common destiny.

The fact that I cannot communicate with you in English means that there is another dimension in our policy and identity: the fact that we can communicate in our language, in Spanish, with practically 300 million people in the American Continent. This gives a third dimension in the foreign policy of Spain, without meaning that any one of them means a priority against the others.

Let me tell you that I am 41 years old, and during 33 of these years, I was dreaming of a free and democratic Spain. This is, of course, what we want and we hope for our people. But this is also what we want and we hope for other peoples wherever we can project this foreign policy. We, therefore, wish and want for other countries who can communicate with us in cultural level: peace, freedom, pluralism, and progress.

Because it's America and because it's such an important country in the world, you'll understand perfectly well that we want also to make our links with the United States even closer, which explains two things: first of all, my presence here accepting a gracious and very kind invitation of President Reagan, and my satisfaction because of the course of these conversations we have just had.

I'm delighted today to take the first step toward what will be for all Americans a proud and joyous moment: the celebration of the 25th anniversary of Alaska's statehood. Alaska was admitted to the Union on January 3, 1959; then, as now, Alaska was a treasure house of natural resources and a State of undisturbed vistas and incomparable beauty.

In many ways, the story of Alaska and her people is America's story, the struggle of courageous men and women with a wild and bounteous frontier. Today the State of Alaska reminds us of this rich heritage and our own continuing efforts toward developing a nation while seeking to preserve its irreplaceable beauty and resources.

The resolution which I am signing speaks of Alaska's material wealth. It notes that Alaska provides one-eighth of the Nation's gold, one-fifth of its oil production, and two-fifths of its harvested fish. Alaska possesses 10 of the 16 vital materials needed for the Nation's security, and all of this has resulted in the National Treasury collecting $3 for every $1 of Federal money that is spent in this rich and vital State.

As the resolution notes, the United States has reaped economic rewards from Alaska many times greater than its original $7 million investment. But Alaska's contribution to our nation goes far beyond this. All Americans benefit from the commitment and courage, the vitality and frontier spirit of the people of Alaska. Alaskans and Alaska remain an inspiration to all Americans and a reminder of the richness, diversity, and beauty of America's heritage.

Well, thank you very much. And thank you very much, Wilson Johnson. Your warm words of welcome touched my heart. And believe me, it's with a happy heart that I join you today for this important mile- stone -- the 40th anniversary of the great National Federation of Independent Business.

Something else is getting better that gladdens my heart and, I hope, yours, too -- America, the world's brightest jewel of hope and adventure. Our country is the keeper of the dreams that nourish the soul and spark fire in our breast. This good and mighty nation is rising from a decade of neglect to reclaim her noble heritage. America is getting well. She's growing strong. And, together, we'll keep her free.

And there's one man here who epitomizes that unselfish courage, that leadership, and commitment. He went to the Congress in 1981 and said spending was out of control. We know a lot of people say that. But he said more. He said that his organization had no sacred cows and that no program should be spared. And to drive home his point, he added, ``Small business volunteers to go first.'' How much smaller would the deficit be if we had more of that attitude, asking not what our country can do for us, but what we can do for our country?

Bay Buchanan, our United States Treasurer, to be its Chairman. The committee will ensure that the activities of the departments and agencies of the executive branch contribute to the establishment and promotion of women's business enterprise.

Also, I will sign today an Executive order that will create the first President's Advisory Committee on Women's Business Ownership; and we will appoint up to 15 members with particular knowledge and expertise of women's participation in business. They will review the status of businesses owned by women, foster further support for women entrepreneurs, and provide appropriate advice to me and the Administrator of the Small Business Administration.

I'm also directing the Small Business Administration to sponsor a series of conferences across the country that will reach thousands of present and potential women business owners. We want to assist them to compete equitably in the total business environment. We'll be asking both the public and private sector to pitch in and help, and I know that NFIB, as you have so often before, will be there on the frontlines to help us.

Well, wouldn't it be nice to hear a little more about the forgotten heroes of America -- those who create most of our new jobs, like the owners of stores down the street; the faithfuls who support our churches, synagogues, schools, and communities; the brave men and women everywhere who produce our goods, feed a hungry world, and keep our families warm while they invest in the future to build a better America? That's where miracles are made, not in Washington, D.C.

We hear so much about the greed of business. Well, frankly, I'd like to hear a little more about the courage, generosity, and creativity of business. I'd like to hear it pointed out that entrepreneurs don't have guaranteed annual incomes. Before they can turn a profit, they must anticipate and deliver what consumers want. They must risk their money with investments.

I believe business works best, creates the greatest wealth, and produces the most progress for all when we're free to follow the teachings of Scripture: Give and you will be given unto . . . search and you will find . . . cast your bread upon the waters and it will return to you manyfold.

Just think about it. In the Parable of Talents, the man with the small-business spirit who invested and multiplies his talents, his money, was praised. But the rich who hoard their wealth are constantly rebuked in Scripture. I believe we're meant to use wisely what is ours, make it grow, then help others to share and benefit from our success. And the secret of success is understanding that true wealth is not measured in material things, but in the treasures of the mind and spirit.

Oil was worthless until entrepreneurs with ideas and the freedom and faith to take risks managed to locate it, extract it, and put it to work for humanity. Someday, oil itself will be replaced if those driven by great dreams are still free to discover and develop new forms of energy.

So, Carver began peeling apart the peanut. And from this storehouse of wonders came a stream of food and products that helped revolutionize Southern industry, and all because he invested the gifts of knowledge that God had given him in a spirit of giving to his fellow men.

Trust the people. We wanted to use that special principle of giving by putting America's destiny back in your hands. And this meant slowing the growth of an already bloated government and providing you incentives to save, to invest, and to take risks, so more wealth will be created at every level of our society.

Take a look at what we've done so far just by sticking together: Personal tax rates have been cut for every working American for the first time in almost two decades. In 1985, tax rates will be indexed to protect you from being pushed by inflation into higher brackets. Depreciation schedules have been shortened. Estate taxes on family owned farms and businesses have been cut dramatically to help working wives and mothers. We've reduced the marriage penalty and increased the child care credit. To give small savers a higher rate of return, we've deregulated financial institutions. We've introduced strong, new incentives for Individual Retirement Accounts, extended IRA's to participants in employer-sponsored pension programs, and doubled the maximum Keogh contributions. Further tax breaks for savers will be coming up in 1985, when 15 percent of interest income -- up to $450 for single taxpayers and $900 for married couples -- can be excluded from all taxation.

I hope I'll be forgiven for reminding our critics that these tax cuts didn't exist when they were in charge. These critics say the tax cuts are too big. The truth is, they're barely big enough to keep people even. Still, I believe it's fair to say this is the most sweeping program of incentives ever passed to help families and firms lift America up and give us all real hope for our future.

We're doing everything we can to help you rebuild America. Spending growth has been cut. We passed the Prompt Payment Act so that when you deal with the Federal Government, you must get paid promptly. The Small Business Innovation Development Act will direct millions of dollars in research funds to high-tech firms. The Paperwork Reduction Act and the Regulatory Flexibility Act will help your firms.

You don't have the luxury of hiring extra people just to fill out forms and keep track of new regulations. More work needs to be done, but by the end of 1983, American industry will have saved 300 million working hours filling out forms. And that's a pretty good start.

Last year, they gave me their word there would be $3 in outlay cuts for every additional dollar of revenue that I agreed to in that tax bill. They are breaking that promise. They voted to balloon domestic spending above our budget request for next year. And this is after they bottled up, then scuttled, a constitutional amendment requiring them to approve a balanced budget -- an idea backed by some 80 percent of you, the American people.

Our critics sob enough about deficits to fill an ocean -- an ocean of crocodile tears. Well, the same holds true for their argument about fairness. Capping the third year of the tax cut won't soak the rich, but it will drown millions of taxpayers in the middle class. The wealthiest earners with incomes above $110,000 got their full tax cut in 1981. And it was a Democratic amendment to our tax program that lowered the top rate from 70 to 50 percent in one fell swoop. Funny how they all forgot about that. Well, I haven't forgotten about it, because I think it was a great thing to do. The truth of the matter is we're getting more tax revenues at the lower rate from that bracket of people than we were getting when the rate was 70 percent. And that's the secret about good taxes.

But it takes a greater leap of faith to trust the motivation and wisdom of the self-proclaimed champions of fairness who are now attacking the middle class. And make no mistake, capping the third year would raise taxes on millions of two-earner couples earning less then $50,000.

Capping the tax cut would also raise taxes on 2.4 million small businesses, including 350,000 family farms, which file personal, not corporate, tax returns. These people will invest in the new jobs, products, and technologies for the 21st century -- a century that will belong to our children and our children's children. Putting a cap on small business would put a cap on our recovery and future growth. The tax cap is not a fairness bill; it's a jobs-destruction bill. It would cut off our nose to spite our face.

You know, I try to bite my tongue, but I just have to ask: Would you agree that those who saddled this nation with double-digit inflation, the highest interest rates in more than 100 years, and the worst tax burden in our peacetime history are the last people who should be giving sermons about fairness and compassion?

Would you agree that if we're to rebuild our beloved land, then those who practice the politics of envy, who pit one group against another, must rise above their rancor and join us in a new dialog -- to encourage, honor, and reward every citizen who strives to excel and make America great again?

But I must and will oppose the congressional budget resolution. It's not good enough to reduce the deficit on paper when, in reality, you're running up the white flag on controlling domestic spending. The last thing we need is more taxes for more spending. And if they can't get that through their heads, then I am prepared to veto their budget-busting bills again and again and again.

Tax rates are prices -- prices for working, saving, and investing. And when you raise the price of those productive activities, you get less of them and more activity in the underground economy -- tax shelters and leisure pursuits. You in small business understand that you can't force people to buy merchandise that isn't selling by raising your price. But too many in Washington and across the country still believe that we can raise more revenues from the economy by making it more expensive to work, save, and invest in the economy.

We cannot compromise on fundamental principles without compromising ourselves and our future. We're not asking the Congress to do what's easy; we're asking them -- Democrats and Republicans alike -- to work with us to do what's right. On that note, let me interject a word about our bipartisan responsibility to reduce the risks of war so that our societies can truly prosper in peace.

We're determined to assure the effectiveness of our deterrent through the modernization of our aging strategic forces and to do everything we can to achieve deep reductions to equal and more stable levels of U.S. and Soviet nuclear forces. We are taking important and positive steps in the negotiations in Geneva on intermediate and strategic forces. Regarding the intermediate force negotiations, I have stated that, while we continue to favor the complete, global elimination of the entire class of land-based, intermediate-range missiles, we will agree to any proposed equal number of warheads on which [such] U.S. and Soviet missiles and upon which we can agree.

Two weeks ago, I announced that Ambassador Ed Rowny, our negotiator in the strategic arms reduction talks, the ones we call START, was going to Geneva with new instructions to give us greater flexibility in the talks. Our proposal incorporates the recommendations of the Scowcroft commission on strategic forces. It reflects a growing consensus and support crucial to effective negotiations. The Soviet Union has not yet responded positively. We sincerely hope they will. The aspirations for genuine arms reductions, stability, and peace are shared by all mankind. And I pray the day will come when nuclear weapons no longer exist anywhere on Earth.

I thank you again for all your courage and support. We've worked too hard, struggled too long, and come too far to turn back now. We're not going back to that old road where government decides it knows better than us what should be done with our earnings and how we should live our lives. We're not going back to fear, envy, and failure. We're going forward on a new road that's bold and filled with hope and opportunity.

We say, ``Trust yourselves. Trust the values that made us a good and loving people.'' Working together, giving, and trusting each other and trusting in God, we'll do what is right to preserve our freedom and America -- the last, best hope of man on Earth.

Women's Business Ownership. The Committee shall be composed of no more than 15 members appointed or designated by the President. These members shall have particular knowledge and expertise concerning the current status of businesses owned by women in the economy and methods by which these enterprises might be encouraged to expand.

Sec. 2. Functions. (a) The Committee shall review the status of businesses owned by women; foster, through the private sector, financial, educational, and procurement support for women entrepreneurs; and provide appropriate advice to the President and the Administrator of the Small Business Administration on these issues.

The American communications industry has repeatedly demonstrated our nation's technological and entrepreneurial leadership. And I'm very pleased to note that the spirit of private enterprise that's made our world leadership possible has, at the same time, demonstrated our national concern that world communications innovations should represent a force for economic prosperity and good will.

In fact, something of that technology is apparent in this very call, because I know you're utilizing a satellite, but, also, I'm calling you from Air Force One, someplace out here between Washington and Chicago.

I understand that the announcements of U.S. investments in World Communications Year projects range from large to the small and from the technical complexity of IBM's Caribbean Inter-Island Disaster Warning System to the simplicity of international educational exchange.

And while we don't want to lose sight of the importance of the educational exchange and technical assistance investments, I'm pleased to see the extraordinary possibilities of the new technologies represented in the New York Teleport. The Teleport project represents the best kind of public-private partnership with the Port Authority of New York, the city of New York, the States of New York and New Jersey, Merrill Lynch, and Western Union -- have all joined in creating a facility that will establish a communications gateway and permit vast, new communications possibilities.

At this Council meeting of the World Communications Year, we should all be pleased that you've managed to combine your concern for world communications needs and for the nations and peoples who've historically been less fortunate, with this introduction of another great American achievement.

Mr. Ellinghaus. Mr. President, on behalf of the World Communications Year '83 Council, I want to thank you for your very, very encouraging words and certainly for demonstrating in a most effective way how communications do, in fact, bring us very close together. It's a great send-off for our meeting here at the White House.

Communications in 1983, a private sector group of representatives from industry, labor, academia, the media, and professional and trade associations, formed to implement goals for the United States during World Communications Year.

Our country's composed of cultures, races, and ethnic groups. But there's one thing we all have in common, something that ties us together as one people and is at the very heart of our national character, and that is a fervent love of liberty.

It's this heartfelt conviction that today finds us, not just Polish Americans but all Americans. And it binds us with those who struggle for freedom and independence in Poland. Let no one mistake our fortitude. Time may pass, but the American people will never, never forget the brave people of Poland and their courageous struggle. It seems like only yesterday when all of us were so filled with hope. Solidarity, a truly independent labor union, had emerged. And with it came new recognition of freedoms of speech, press, and the right to free association to strike and to reap the fruit of one's labor. Perhaps nothing more clearly demonstrates the repressive and insecure nature of communism than the tremor felt throughout the Communist world as a result of Polish workers and citizens exercising inalienable human rights, the rights that are so fundamental to free Western societies and that we too often take for granted.

Solidarity was born not only of the failure of the Polish Government to meet the needs of its people but also from a noble tradition of freedom preserved and nourished by the proud Polish people through two centuries of foreign and domestic tyranny. Symbolizing the battle of real workers to sustain fundamental human and economic rights in a so-called worker's state, Solidarity sought to address and to resolve Poland's deep-rooted economic ills. It acted in good faith, and it pursued a path of constructive dialog with the Polish Government. Despite these peaceful efforts on the part of Solidarity, a brutal wave of repression descended on Poland on December 13th, 1981.

The imposition of martial law stripped away all vestiges of the newborn freedom. Polish authorities resorted to arbitrary arrests, imprisonment, and the use of force. The free flow of people, ideas, and information was suppressed. A darkened cloud descended on Poland. But not all has been darkness.

Despite the unyielding repression for the last 18 months.A the will of the Polish people has not yet been broken, and we've seen that on television over these last several days. And the Papal visit to Poland, which ends today, is truly a ray of hope for the Polish people and an event of historic importance.

I was deeply moved, as I know you were, by the Pope's outspoken defense of the Polish people's human rights. His frequent statements of support for the interned, the imprisoned, and those dismissed from work for their political activities were poignant reminders to the Jaruzelski regime and the Soviets that they cannot hope to permanently erase the historic August accords.

But seriously, the need for dialog and reconciliation in Poland has never been more evident than it was during the Pope's visit. The gulf separating the Polish people from their government remains vast. And nothing showed this more clearly than the faces, the words, and the signs carried by the millions of Poles who traveled great distances to see and hear the Pope. His call on the need to find a humane way for a peaceful and rational solution to the conflict offers the only prospect of bridging this gap between the people and their government.

Government. I urge the Polish authorities to translate the restraint they showed during the Papal visit into willingness to move toward reconciliation rather than confrontation with the Polish people.

The actions of the millions of Poles who attended the Masses around the country, inspiring the spirit which gave rise to Solidarity, still flourishes in Polish hearts. There is only one way for the Polish Government to gain the confidence and trust of its own people. And that is to end martial law, to release political prisoners, to restore freely formed trade unions, and to embark on a path of genuine, national reconciliation.

I know the great sacrifices which so many of you and the Polish American community have been making to send assistance in the form of food and medical supplies. We, too, have participated in this humanitarian effort with more than $40 million worth of aid distributed through CRS and CARE. As I've said before, if the Polish Government will honor the commitments it has made to basic human rights, we in America will gladly do our share to help the shattered Polish economy just as we helped the countries of Europe after both World Wars.

I've talked of freedom. We've talked of freedom many times. Many of you have seen firsthand there, in visits to relatives or in being there before you came here, what is going on. But to many of us, freedom becomes a word, and particularly to our young people. They hear it so often. And they don't have an opportunity to really know what is so important about that word.

She goes on eloquently about other things there that she's seen and the differences. She says, ``I, too, support human rights. I was in Warsaw and Cracow. And I was asked by the people there if people in America understood what was happening in Poland under Russian domination. I said no. No, because we don't know fear, oppression, religious censorship. We have never known the hopelessness that comes from living under a dictatorship. If there could only be one protest march in Poland today, Mr. President, it would not be for arms reduction or jobs or food or even clothing. But rather for the most prized and valued fundamental right of all -- of every living soul in this universe: freedom.'' And then she asked that we keep that light of freedom burning here, because the whole world is watching and living by its glow.

The visit by John Paul II to his homeland was an inspiration to all who cherish freedom. It vividly showed that no one can crush the spirit of the Polish people. The moving words of the Polish National Anthem, ``Poland has not died while we yet live,'' are more true today than ever. The spirit of Solidarity that unites the Polish people with free people everywhere has never been stronger.

Well today, I'd like to take a clear-eyed look at our health care system. And let me start by saying as strongly as I can, the quality of American medicine is unsurpassed and on that we don't need a second opinion. What our space shuttle is to technology, our health care is to medicine. In life-saving discoveries, in innovative treatment, in the overall quality of services, America's doctors have no peers. Your medical accomplishments are a gift to mankind that honors us all.

Through computers, lasers, nuclear devices, and various ``Star Wars'' technologies, your diagnostic and healing powers have multiplied over the last decade. We're going to make sure that trend continues by promoting solid math and science skills in our schools. We'll also further that trend with an active Federal role in quality research.

Americans because no drugs have yet been developed. Statistically, they are rare diseases, yet that's small comfort for those afflicted and their families. The cost of discovering and developing a new drug, of course, is often staggering. This legislation provides incentives for the private sector to develop drugs to treat these rare diseases.

And I'm proud to say the FDA under this administration has proposed new initiatives to help streamline the drug approval process. We want a process that genuinely promotes the public health not only by keeping unsafe and ineffective drugs off the market but by enabling beneficial new drugs to reach those who need them more rapidly.

I know cost is a matter that concerns you, as well. The AMA deserves congratulations for its cost-effectiveness programs and its health policy agenda. And, as I did at the White House in April, let me again thank those medical societies that have private sector programs to assure cost will not prevent anyone from receiving medical care.

But the problem of health care costs is so pressing you can't carry that full burden alone. For the last 12-month period, health care costs went up almost two-and-a-half times the overall inflation rate. In 1982 the cost of health insurance rose nearly 16 percent. Health care costs are consuming a growing portion of the Nation's wealth, and this is wealth that cannot be spent on education or housing or other social needs.

Health care costs are not just the concern of the sick in our society. Everyone is affected. The taxpayer picks up the tab for 40 percent of all hospital bills, mainly through medicaid and medicare. Because of rising costs, the poor on medicaid have seen their coverage reduced as States make cutbacks. Because of the increased cost of health insurance, employees have received lower cash wages. Consumers have paid higher prices for goods and services, since the costs of employee health benefits must be included in the price of products. And the elderly who are covered by medicare face the threat of catastrophic illness expense, against which medicare offers no protection.

It's high time that we put health care costs under the knife and cut away the waste and inefficiency. The growth in medical costs is malignant and must be removed for the continued health of the American people.

The danger is that high medical inflation may soon jeopardize the quality and access of our health care, and America won't be able to sustain its unequaled health care system if citizens can't afford it. Not all Americans have the fancy, gold-plated, all-option insurance plans that cover every sneeze and itch. Yes, the big corporations can look after their people, but let's not forget that little guy down at the doughnut shop.

Don't get me wrong. It's not bad to spend money on health care, far from it. The Nation's high level of health expenditures is testimony to our people's compassion. We can't and we will not scrimp on the health of America's citizens. But on the subject of compassion, let me clear something up. In spite of all the stories you hear on television -- and I would turn flips down the halls of the White House if this next statement made the evening news -- [laughter] -- the truth is that this administration, in 1984, will devote more money to health care than any administration in history. That probably surprises you. But 49 million elderly, poor, and disabled persons -- one out of every five Americans -- will have health care needs met through medicare and medicaid in 1984. That's a million more than this year and 3 million more than in 1980.

Many of our critics are simply political hypochondriacs. They're complaining about every little ache. I've also read those know-nothing stories about this administration ignoring childhood diseases. Well, let me just tell you that in the last 2 years, the reported cases of diphtheria, measles, mumps, polio, rubella, and tetanus, as I'm sure many of you know, have reached all-time lows. The measles rate is down by nearly half over '81. The problem is that Washington is full of special interest groups passing around self-serving studies that are then reported as fact. They serve up headlines, but too many of them don't serve up the truth.

I understand why doctors are torn by our attempts to put the brakes on the budget. Like most citizens, you want to slow the growth in Federal spending. Yet, at the same time, professionally, you worry about this braking action and that it may affect our health care, especially the health care of the poor. Well, let me reassure you: We're not trying to limit the quality and access of America's health care; we're trying to save it. We want a health care system that is affordable and fair to all Americans. there are some who, no matter what the problem is, think money is the answer. If you told them that you had walking pneumonia, they'd give you 5 bucks and tell you to take a cab. [Laughter] And if they're not proposing more money, they're proposing more government controls over the practice of medicine.

Medical Association. Well, I'm going to tell you what I told them. [Laughter] We have the best health care in the world, because it has remained private. And, working together, we'll keep it that way. The Government plays a role, of course. I believe medicare and medicaid have filled genuine needs in our society. But our Federal health care system was designed backward. The incentives have not been to save, but to spend. medicare and Medicaid costs have gone up nearly 600 percent since 1970. For too long, the Federal Government has had a blank check mentality. The hospital simply filled in the amount they wanted and then Uncle Sam, or, to be more precise, the hard-pressed American taxpayer paid the bill.

One of our reform measures to control hospital costs has already been passed. No longer will we pay virtually whatever the hospital asks. With our Prospective Payment Program, we'll pay one fair rate, and the hospital that delivers its services at a cost less than that rate can keep the difference. In the past the government actually subsidized and encouraged inefficiency by paying more to the inefficient hospital than to the efficient one.

Medicare cost-sharing has often seemed backward as well. Under current law, unbelievable as it seems, medicare hospital coverage can actually expire in the event of catastrophic illness -- just when it's needed most. And even when the coverage has not expired, those in a hospital with stays for 60 days must make every high, out-of-pocket payment. In contrast, those with shorter hospital stays pay nothing out-of-pocket after the first day. It's cheaper for the patient to be at the hospital than at home.

We're trying to make coverage fairer by using moderate cost-sharing early in an illness, rather than imposing severe costs later, when the patient has little choice over the length of the hospital stay.

We also propose limiting the current tax subsidy for high-priced health plans. Most employer contributions for employee health benefits should be tax free because this encourages employee health insurance. Our plan would simply cap this tax-free treatment in order to correct the bias toward high-priced first dollar coverage. Health insurance should cover hepatitus and whooping cough, not hiccups. The proposed cap is an effort to make the tax law neutral in the choice between added wages and added health benefits. The Bible tells us that in creating the universe God made order out of chaos. Well, at times I think even the Almighty would have His hands full making orders out of the regulatory tangles that afflict our health care system. But our reforms are a conscientious start. Some of these reforms, such as prospective pricing, catastrophic coverage, and capping tax-free health insurance, many of you either support or remain flexible.

Well, I'd like to explain an additional proposal you don't support -- the 1-year freeze on medicare physician reimbursement. These payments have been increasing at highly inflationary rates. In 1982 they increased 21 percent and are expected to rise 19 percent more in 1983. Now we believe physicians, too, must share the burden of slowing the rise in health care costs. As the patient in the movie often says, ``Give it to me straight, Doc.'' Well, we believe the straight answer is that a 1-year freeze is painful but necessary medicine.

In spite of occasional differences of opinion, our goals are the same as the AMA's. As written in your constitution more than a century ago, the purpose of the AMA is to promote the science and art of medicine and the betterment of public health. Well, we, too, are looking for ways to improve the health of the American people, and we need your support and your ideas.

I want to insert something here. I want to applaud the efforts by the AMA to become more involved in the public debate regarding environmental health risks. Yesterday, in a speech before the National Academy of Sciences, EPA Administrator William Ruckelshaus urged the scientific community to take an active role to help clear up confusion over the health dangers of chemicals.

I think sometimes we want health and we don't want public hazards, dangers to our people, wherever they may be, but a very eminent scientist once said that he questioned whether there were any dangerous or harmless substances. He said there were only dangerous or harmless amounts. And I think that sometimes we have, with the fantastic and the dramatic -- melodramatic treatment of some of these things, we have frightened a great many people unnecessarily. And the answer is not to take risks, not at all, but to make sure, also, that we haven't frightened people unless there is truly a reason for them to be frightened.

Before I go, let me briefly mention an issue important to you, both as citizens and as doctors. Last week I sent another message to -- or a message to another group of doctors who were gathered in an international conference in Holland. They were not meeting on heart disease or nerve disorders; they were meeting on the matter of preventing nuclear war. And I told them that we have an unprecedented opportunity to reduce nuclear arsenals. Very serious negotiations are proceeding in Geneva between the United States and the Soviet Union on the means of achieving substantial, equitable, and verifiable reductions in our nuclear arsenals and on building the mutual confidence necessary to reduce the risks of nuclear war. No task has greater significance for us, our allies, and for the entire world than to work for the success of the Geneva negotiations and reverse the growth in nuclear arsenals.

We've been making a great effort to move these negotiations forward. Just 2 weeks ago, I announced that our negotiator, Ambassador Ed Rowny, would be going to Geneva with new instructions to give us greater flexibility in the talks and to take account of concerns the Soviets have expressed to us. I told the doctors meeting in Holland, those negotiations deserve the full support of all who seek genuine progress toward peace.

That was my message to the international group of physicians -- to reaffirm that nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought. I invited their support for the important arms reductions negotiations underway in Geneva, and today, I invite your support, as well, so that we can make real progress toward the genuine peace that we all seek for ourselves and for our children.

Charles Kettering once said that the greatest thing any generation can do is to lay a few steppingstones for the next generations. And that's what we're trying to do. We want to lay steppingstones to better health care and a more secure peace for America. And with your help we can do it.

The President. And now this is the second time -- you know, I was going to meet you in Florida, but then you decided to land in California -- but again, you didn't stop and pick me up off the South Lawn, like I ask you to.

I'm sure, as you know already, all of America was watching you and what you were accomplishing up there. And it was a first in many ways, one of which is the largest crew to ever go up. And I guess the first retrieval of a satellite is another first that has been talked about incessantly. And I understand that Dr. Ride wishes there wasn't so much talk about that.

Well, Dr. Ride, let me just remind you that when we had lunch here at the White House before your flight, that somebody said that ``sometimes the best man for a job was a woman.'' And, in this particular instance, your handling of that long arm and that retrieval and all did indicate you were there for one reason: You were there because you were the best person for the job.

And I think that sets a standard that's going to be followed by men and women in the force from now on with these experiments. People are picked neither because of, nor in spite of, but simply because, like all five of you, you were the best for this assignment. And you've done so much.

And to think that people as far away as Indonesia -- which didn't look far away to you when you were going over -- but people that far away will have better telephone service because of what you've accomplished and what you did up there.

Commander Crippin. Yes, we all do, Mr. President. And I think maybe you indicated to us the other day when we were having lunch that seven was a particularly valuable number in your life. I think you bestowed upon us some of the luck that is associated with it. And as John Fabian indicated to you, it was a truly international mission, and it came off, from our standpoint, as well as we could have asked.

We would have liked to have landed at Kennedy. We have lots of friends here at Edwards, and we're always proud to come back. We were all honored to fly. I've got a fantastic crew. And, hopefully, we'll all get a chance to do it again sometime.

The President. Well, there's no question about that. And, all five of you here and -- very frankly and seriously, I am sorry that the people who were all waiting down in Florida were disappointed at the fact that the landing had to be changed because of the weather. I guess still, with all of our miracles, that's the one thing we haven't been able to overcome yet. No one could do anything about the weather. But, it didn't detract at all from your accomplishment. And we know that you'll be flying again in future Columbias and Challengers, and you'll have the full cooperation that we can give to keep on with this magnificent work.

I am both saddened and appalled that the liberal House leadership is pursuing a strategy that would jeopardize our hard-earned recovery. Their continuing drive toward higher spending and higher taxes on middle-income families can only be considered a threat to the health of our economy. By approving yesterday their so-called tax cap, the Democratic House has renounced John F. Kennedy's criteria for growth and opportunity -- equal tax rate reductions for all working Americans.

I am confident that the Senate next week will defeat this ill-advised, misguided, and politically motivated proposal. Let the American people know -- their full 10-percent tax cut due on July 1st will go into effect on schedule. Our economy is just beginning to sparkle with robust growth and the lowest inflation in a decade. I stand ready to veto this tax increase should it reach my desk and any spending bills that would send inflation and interest rates shooting up again. The American people have worked too hard for this economic recovery to see it now thrown to the winds of political gimmickry.

Then, the Commission pointed out a number of remedies which, if employed, would bring the average level up to the standard our children are entitled to. Many of the remedies would call for no increase in spending; some, admittedly, would shift funding from less important things to things of greater educational value, and here and there, there might be a need for more money.

All of what I've just pointed out was lost, however, in an explosion of voices. There were special interest voices that saw a chance to get more money for their particular cause. There were political voices that saw a campaign horse to ride. And there was demagoguery to help raise the noise level.

I can only explain their hysteria by assuming that they were comparing Federal spending on education to Federal spending on defense. That, of course, is ridiculous. The Federal Government bears overwhelming responsibility for national defense, but it provides less than 10 percent of all education costs, which are and always have been a responsibility of the State and local governments.

One of the noisemakers wants the Federal Government to add $11 billion to Federal education spending. Another demands $14 billion. And most of them accuse us of whacking the budget down to a starvation level.

Now, these are a lot of figures to absorb when you can only hear them and not see them. Let me see if I can simplify things. The cost per pupil has nearly doubled, up 183.2 percent in 10 years. In the same 10 years, the number of pupils has dropped by 14 percent.

Some distinguished Members of Congress -- I'll be kind and not name them -- took me on for pointing out that the decline in educational quality seems to have begun shortly after the Federal Government started providing that less than 10 percent of the funding. What I had in mind was that the Federal Government began regulating and kibitzing a lot more than 10 percent, and maybe that contributed to the decline.

The Commission urged that we return to basics as requirements for a high school diploma: 4 years of required English; increase the number of years of required mathematics and science; eliminate some of the frill, the ``snap'' courses so tempting to students when there are few, if any, compulsory courses; make history a required course, and the same for languages for the college-bound; require more homework. These were a few of the Commission's recommendations.

Yes, they talked of something that could translate into more money -- better pay for better teachers to attract the brightest and the best to choose teaching as a career. Do what is done in every other profession and business -- offer merit pay raises for those who earn and deserve them.

And no American should forget that at Valley Forge, General von Steuben, a German volunteer, turned George Washington's demoralized troops into a disciplined fighting force capable of winning our struggle for independence.

After the Second World War, when Germany lay defeated, America gave material help through the Marshall plan and the Berlin airlift. Just as significant, if not more, we provided the inspiration to develop free institutions from the ruins of totalitarianism.

West Germans and Americans are rightfully proud of our common values as well as our shared heritage. Today we stand shoulder-to-shoulder in the NATO alliance, defending freedom and preserving the peace. For three decades the German-American partnership has been a linchpin of the alliance. Thanks to it, a whole generation has grown up in Western Europe free from the ravages of war and spared from the repression suffered by Europeans to the East.

But with freedom comes responsibility, not least the responsibility to look beyond simplistic slogans to the truth on vital matters like security and arms reductions. I hope the younger generation, both in Germany and in America, will honestly consider all that we're doing to deter and to reduce the risks of war.

At the same time, in hopes of averting the large expenditure to modernize weapons, we're making a serious effort to negotiate major and effectively verifiable reductions of Soviet and American nuclear forces to lower and more stable levels.

In Geneva we've made far-reaching proposals to reduce nuclear arsenals and to build trust. We have proposed the global elimination of the entire class of intermediate-range land-based missiles and expressed our willingness to agree to any proposal equalizing the number of warheads on such U.S. and Soviet missiles.

In the strategic arms reduction talks, which we call START, I have within the last 2 weeks issued new instructions, incorporating the recommendations of the bipartisan Scowcroft commission and giving our negotiator greater flexibility in their task.

The young people of Germany and the United States should not doubt our dedication to maintaining the peace. We share with them the dream that someday the time will come when no nuclear weapons will exist anywhere on Earth.

Federal Republic of Germany in so many ways. Building on this, we've launched a joint effort to provide more contacts between our nations and generations. In our country 22 Federal departments and agencies are participating in this effort. Plans range from traditional exchanges to an airlift program which will bring German heart patients to one of our outstanding hospitals for bypass surgery and train more German doctors to perform these life-saving operations.

Generals, colonel, the distinguished guests who are here tonight, and the members of my own band -- [laughter] -- we are present tonight at one of the most solemn and important ceremonies in the life of a military service that began in 1775. Today, or tonight, we have passed the colors.

It is altogether appropriate that we should do so in this place. We stand today on the parade deck of one of the oldest military installations in America, the Marine Barracks, selected in 1801 by President Jefferson himself. And we stand in front of Washington's oldest, continuously occupied public buildings, the home of the commandants and the battle colors of the corps.

This place marks the home base of one of the world's most modern and powerful striking forces, a corps of honor and legend, a corps of selfless Americans whose valiant service has, for more than two centuries, thrilled their countrymen and kept their nation free. Because of their valor, faraway places whose names were once strange and unfamiliar to Americans are now part of our nation's history. Places like Tripoli, Chateau-Thierry, Iwo Jima, Inchon, and Khe Sanh. Names that speak of soldierly virtue. Names that evoke the spirit and memory of all those United States Marines who have given, and still give today, so valiantly of themselves, so that their countrymen might live in peace and freedom.

Commandant of the Marine Corps, General Robert Barrow. General Barrow's valor is testified to by his decorations, by his leadership of fighting marines in three of his country's wars. In World War II he served behind the Japanese lines with the Chinese guerrillas, the campaign where the cry ``Gung ho!'' was heard. And in Korea he fought at Chosin Reservoir. In Vietnam he played a critical role in the success of Operation Dewey Canyon.

In peacetime, General Barrow has served his nation with equal distinction. Because of his leadership, the elite force that is always first to fight has never been better prepared to carry out its mission. Its weapons and tactics are modern; its morale is high; its men and women are dedicated to the standards of excellence that are synonymous with the title of United States Marine.

General Barrow, I give you, sir, on behalf of a grateful nation, what another distinguished soldier on a more somber occasion gave his departing comrades, many of whom would also return to Louisiana. ``Take with you the satisfaction that proceeds from the consciousness of duty faithfully performed.'' And I pray, as did General Lee on that occasion, that a merciful God will extend to you and Mrs. Barrow His blessing and protection.

General Kelley, I have the utmost confidence in you. Few public careers have shown as much selflessness and commitment to country as yours. In combat and in peacetime you've been a dynamic and innovative leader of marines. You've had successful tours of duty and worked closely with all of our military services. You've won the respect and admiration of military and civilian leaders throughout the world.

Marines have always been asked to accomplish the most formidable tasks, as they are, this evening, serving in the difficult and dangerous task of peacekeepers in the Multinational Force in Lebanon. I expect, General Kelley, that under your leadership that performance will exceed expectations and that you will hold with the standards of excellence that are the hallmark of the Corps and the pride of the American people. At this ceremony tonight, viewing the marines that are here with us, all of us in civilian life feel a surge of that pride.

On a personal note, I want to say that I came here early in my term as President and saw the evening parade held during the summer months at these barracks. Some call it the best show in town. I can only tell you that I consider it one of the most unforgettable moments of my term in office. Yet it is an experience I share with the countless Americans who have come here over the years and seen the drill and the pageantry and the pride of the corps.

Americans, from small towns and big cities, that is as inspiring as the marines on parade, for it is they who, thrilled beyond description, stand here and cheer. They cheer because they're grateful for the chance to show the world how America feels about her Marines.

Chief. On behalf of all Americans I want a message sent to every member of the corps, to every place where the words ``Semper Fidelis'' is a way of life. General, tell it to the Marines, whether in ceremonial white or leatherneck blue, whether in dress greens or combat camouflage, whether they serve in the air, on land, or at sea, tell them that their countrymen are grateful. Tell them that we stand behind them. Tell them that we're proud of our proudest. God bless you both, God bless you all.

States is a Pacific nation, and our interests in this part of the world have grown rapidly over the last decade. In the face of common challenges, our political and security arrangements in the area have taken on increased importance. The nations of Asia and the Pacific, particularly those which he will be visiting, have a very large role in the increasingly interdependent international economic system. As a result, we share a wide and growing range of interests with these countries.

Americans have long recognized that this nation has been blessed with abundant natural resources and a clean and healthy environment. Beginning with the early pioneers and continuing today, Americans consider clean air and water, fruitful farmlands, beautiful mountains and rivers, and plentiful energy and mineral resources to be treasured parts of their national heritage. As President and as an American citizen, I am deeply concerned that present and future generations be protected from the adverse health effects of toxic chemicals and hazardous wastes, that their water be fit to drink, their air fit to breathe, and that their natural resources be protected. As we strive for economic progress and the promise of a better life, we recognize that a clean and healthy environment is a vital part of that promise.

To ensure our natural resource heritage, the United States has enacted the most far-reaching and comprehensive environmental and natural resource legislation of any nation in history. Our laws protecting air and water quality are used as models by other countries, because they have worked.

Air quality in the United States today, especially in our cities, is much better than it was ten years ago. Streams, rivers, and lakes all across the country are becoming cleaner. The United States has passed legislation to control the manufacture, storage, transportation, and disposal of hazardous substances. We recently created a nationwide fund of over a billion and a half dollars to clean up abandoned chemical dump sites. We have enacted a program to evaluate new and existing chemicals. In 1981, private businesses and government spent over 60 billion dollars in order to comply with U.S. environmental laws.

As President, I am committed to continue this record of achievement. As we learn more and more about the causes and alternative solutions to environmental problems, we are learning how to solve them. We are applying the economic and technical lessons we have learned during the past decade in order to continue our environmental improvement into the future.

During the past two years we have worked to manage our natural resources more efficiently. We have increased state government involvement in programs ranging from water allocation to new source permit processing. We have reduced federal subsidies for economic development which contributed to environmental degradation. We have expanded innovative programs which allow industry the regulatory flexibility and economic incentives to clean up pollution. We have increased research to determine the causes and effects of acid rain, which was not a widespread public concern ten years ago.

We can be very proud of our environmental achievements. As we address the pressing environmental issues now confronting us, we will continue to move toward our common national goals: the preservation of scenic beauty, the protection of wilderness areas and parklands, and a future that is both economically prosperous and environmentally safe.

The funding authorized by this act will greatly assist in promoting the economic and political stability of that country and support the international effort to strengthen a sovereign and independent Lebanon.

Section 4(a) of the act confirms this administration's announced intention with respect to congressional authorization concerning any future substantial expansion in the number or role of U.S. forces in Lebanon. As indicated in its legislative history, that section does not prevent the initiation of such actions, if circumstances require it, while Congress is considering a request for statutory authorization; nor, of course, is it intended to infringe upon the constitutional authority of the President as Commander in Chief, particularly with respect to contingencies not expected in the context of the multinational effort to strengthen the sovereignty and independence of Lebanon.

Private Sector Initiatives, with respect to the objectives and conduct of private sector initiative policies, including methods of increasing public awareness of the importance of public/private partnerships; removing barriers to development of effective social service programs which are administered by private organizations; and strengthening the professional resources of the private social service sector.

However, members appointed from among private citizens of the United States shall be allowed travel expenses, including per diem in lieu of subsistence, as authorized by law for persons serving intermittently in the government service (5 U.S.C. 5701 - 5707).

These United States-Belgium agreements are similar in objective to the social security agreements already in force with Italy, the Federal Republic of Germany, and Switzerland. Such bilateral agreements, which are generally known as totalization agreements, provide for limited coordination between the United States and foreign social security systems to overcome the problems of gaps in protection and of dual coverage and taxation for workers who move from one country to the other.

The Railroad Retirement Board informs me that despite major changes in railroad retirement negotiated by rail labor and management and enacted in the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981, the railroad retirement system faces a serious funding shortfall. In addition, the continuing decline of railroad employment has left the railroad unemployment and sickness system deeply in debt. Prompt legislative action is needed to resolve the serious financial problems facing these systems and assure continued payment of benefits.

I haven't seen so much talent gathered together here at the White House since the Beach Boys were here. [Laughter] But I'll tell you, we're here today to talk about a popular revolution that is going to rival rock and roll when we all look back on it.

Private sector initiatives are as basic as the American traditions of neighbor helping neighbor, as selfless as are millions of volunteers and as simple as a helping hand. But these private actions are part of a national movement that is sweeping across the country like a prairie fire. The American people have developed a new way of thinking about how to solve social and economic problems.

Maybe I should say they have rediscovered an old way. We sort of got weaned away from what used to be traditional Americanism by government saying, ``We'll do it.'' And the people have found out again about what they used to do.

I had a letter from a man one day, very discouraged, a businessman, business troubles and all, and it wasn't too long ago. And I wrote him a three-page letter that I hoped was the kind of talk Rockne gave Notre Dame -- [laughter] -- about ``win one for the Gipper.'' But he was saying -- it finally ended up with this tragic line to me: ``If I knew of a country anyplace in the world that was like America was a hundred years ago, I'd go there.'' And I tried to tell him about people like yourselves and that we're going to be like we were a hundred years ago.

Today you can go to about any community and discover private individuals that are creatively solving public problems. I wish you could have been to all the places that I've already been and seen the remarkable public-spirited things that I've already witnessed. And I also hear countless stories of people whom I'll never be able to meet who have taken the initiative to find private solutions to public problems. I could give you examples all afternoon of the efforts that are already being made.

The McDonald's Corporation, already known for its Ronald McDonald Houses, has now launched a major child safety belt campaign in cooperation with the National Safety Council. And I hope they're just as successful with the safety program as they are with the hamburgers.

In New York the Private Industry Council and American Express have found a new way to put homebound handicapped people to work. American Express has given word-processing equipment to handicapped employees who are now able to work in their homes. A whole new market of productive workers has been opened up.

There are examples of food banks and job-a-thons and elderly care and any number of good causes. And everywhere I travel, people are forming new coalitions to explore ways for their communities to meet child care needs, help displaced workers find new jobs, and address important community problems like drug and alcohol abuse. Everywhere you look people are developing creative solutions to our local needs.

Throughout the country, businesses are adopting schools and new educational partnerships are forming. Private citizens and parents are getting involved in schools, and I hope that you'll take a special look at what we can do here.

As members of the new Advisory Council on Private Sector Initiatives, I'm asking you to contribute your energy to a national movement that's already energized. All over the country people are finding new solutions for the problems they see in their communities, but they can use your help too. We want to activate even more of that energy in our people. We need your help in multiplying the applications of all the good private sector ideas and projects that abound in the country.

We want the individual or company who seeks to do something about displaced workers, for example, to know there are successful programs that have worked in other communities. Bob Galvin and Jim Coyne have some proposals on how we can achieve all these ends.

We want the person with a good idea about how to help with social and economic problems to know that he or she can make a difference. We need each of you to help us find ways to build the networks, develop the partnerships, and find the resources to make seemingly small ideas become national solutions to broad problems. And this is a call to action. We need your help. The Nation needs your help to ensure that our communities, our volunteers, our service organizations and corporations are active participants in solving our critical problems.

Council, can do. I have to mention when this idea came for a private initiative task force, to begin with, to find out what could be done -- I -- it's a wonderful thing. We've got some private initiative people that man the telephone switchboards in the White House. I picked up the phone and said, ``Get me Bill Verity.'' And when I got him, I got him in the middle of the Atlantic Ocean, on a ship coming home from Europe. And I told him what I had in mind, and he didn't hesitate one second. And he was on board before he landed in America.

And the Task Force did find out -- and a great deal of their effort was in finding out what is going on throughout the country. And now we've found out. In all these various communities -- these things that are going on -- but the need is to just tell others that are looking for solutions to problems in their own country.

And I could tell you that -- Bill, I never told you this before, but one of the places where this idea first had its origin, where I'm concerned, was in California. There were letters that my people knew I wanted to see, letters from people who had exhausted all the bureaucratic answers, and somehow their problem did not lend itself to solution by government. And I wanted to see those.

And so, I used to pick up the phone, and one of them was the case of an unemployed man. And he's now the manager of a chain of restaurants in California, because the ex-actor that was owner of those restaurants put him to work. And that's what it came to be.

But the idea lived with me until here and this original task force and, now, all of you. And I think you're going to get as much as you give out of what takes place throughout this country. You're going to find that America is off on a course that you, I think, will more have to fight them off than to rope them in to doing the things that have to be done.

Competitiveness. The Commission shall be composed of no more than twenty-five members appointed or designated by the President. These members shall have particular knowledge and expertise concerning the technological factors affecting the ability of United States firms to meet international competition at home and abroad. Members appointed from the private sector shall represent elements of industry, commerce, and labor most affected by high technology, or academic institutions prominent in the field of high technology.

Sec. 2. Functions. The Commission shall review means of increasing the long-term competitiveness of United States industries at home and abroad, with particular emphasis on high technology, and provide appropriate advice to the President, through the Cabinet Council on Commerce and Trade, and the Department of Commerce.

Nearly a year ago tonight I told the American people that we were making headway against the crisis we inherited -- double-digit inflation, record interest rates, and soaring taxes were all coming down. Well, tonight we can be pleased that our economy is strong and getting stronger.

Sustaining strong growth and keeping inflation and interest rates down require bipartisan cooperation from the Congress. We must understand that undisciplined spending and tax increases threaten the recovery. By trying to increase taxes permanently with their tax cap, liberals in the Congress have renounced John F. Kennedy's criteria for growth and opportunity -- meaningful tax rate reductions for every working American. Their tax cap must not and will not become law, because fairness is not slapping tax increases on 2.4 million small businesses, 350,000 family farms, and millions of middle-income married couples who file joint returns.

Fairness is not appealing to envy, pitting group against group. And fairness is not penalizing the initiative, hard work, savings, risk-taking, and investment that we need to create more jobs. True fairness means honoring our word. It means encouraging and rewarding every citizen who strives to excel and help make America great again. So, in 3 days the American people will begin receiving the full and final 10 percent of their tax cut. This will be followed by indexing in 1985. A typical family's tax bill will be about $700 less than if our tax cut had not been passed.

Our challenge is to protect and strengthen this hard won recovery, and that means preventing inflation and interest rates from flaring up again. For the good of the country, I appeal to the Congress to work with us, to refrain from raising taxes. Concentrate on restraining spending, and we'll keep America moving forward with hope and greater opportunity for all our people.

Q. Mr. President, regarding the Carter debate material that was obtained by your 1980 campaign organization, do you think it was right or wrong to keep this material, to use it to your advantage? And also, do you think it's okay to keep someone on your staff who did, indeed, handle this material?

The President. Well now, Jim, to try and answer your several questions there, first of all, I never knew until you people made it public in the press a few days ago that there ever had been such material in possession of any people in our campaign organization. I never saw anything of the kind.

And as I recall the debate, I don't recall any particular use that could have been made of anything of that kind, because having found the papers they must have been referring to, that some of our people do recall seeing, there wasn't anything of campaign strategy in those. They were the type of thing that would be, I think, in any campaign: positions that they would take on my positions, their achievements and what they thought their administration had achieved. We probably had literature of the same kind on our side. But everything that was used in that debate had been used over and over again out on the campaign trail.

And I'd like to call to your attention also that the two contestants do not set the tone of the debate or the agenda. The four journalists that ask the questions are the ones that determine what you're going to talk about. And unless they had some material in advance, we answered the questions that they asked.

Now, the other thing is that in an effort to get at this, you ask about right or wrong. We have turned over everything that we've been able to find that we had to the Justice Department. And here, as you all, I think, have seen -- or are going to see if you haven't -- almost two full pages, is everything that we could find, with the time at which it was turned over to the Justice Department, with my request that they monitor this very carefully, and if they find that there was any incidence of wrongdoing on the part of anyone in our organization or anyone in the Carter organization, then take whatever action is appropriate, but to get to the bottom of this. Because no one ever -- it seems strange to me that since I was the debater, no one on our side ever mentioned to me anything of this kind, or that they had anything or told me any of the things that supposedly were in there.

The President. Well, I don't know that it came in any kind of a cover or anything to denote what it was. As I've said, we've asked the Justice Department to find out if there was anything improper going on or anything that was illegal in any way or any wrongdoing and take whatever action is necessary. But since it never got to the debater, what purpose did it serve?

Q. Mr. President, Jim Wright said at the White House today that there are some in Congress who don't believe that this administration wants peace in Central America. And your aides acknowledge that the polls supporting your Central American policy have gone down and the people seem to be moving away from that. And I have a followup. But how do you account for this?

The President. Well, Helen, I think there's a great lack of information on the part of the people. I do know that after I addressed the Joint Session of Congress and the people on television on that subject, there was a decided shift in favor of our position. But then -- I guess that proves the power of advertising -- there has been a constant drumbeat ever since. I made one speech, but then the drumbeat ever since to the people is somehow denigrating our position there and indicating that there's something wrong in that position.

And maybe we haven't done what we should have done in keeping the people informed of what is going on, because there -- very definitely, there are thousands of Soviets and Cubans -- well, Soviets in Cuba. There is a great number of them also in Nicaragua. There are thousands of Cubans, including one of their top generals, most experienced generals, in Nicaragua.

Several Congressmen have just come back from there and have told me that in speaking to people on the sides that we're against, high-ranking people, that they have told them that this is a revolution -- not just for one country -- this is a revolution that is aimed at all of Central America.

And I think some of you should seek out those Congressmen and hear some of the things that they had to say, because what they heard from these people -- one individual even suggesting that in a limited period of time they would be at the Arizona-Mexican border.

The President. That is a little bit not our business either. The Salvadorans have appointed a peace commission that is trying to make contact -- well, maybe has made contact -- but trying to persuade the revolutionaries, the Marxists in their country to come in and discuss with them how they can accept amnesty and join in the electoral democratic process that will be taking place soon. And so far they've had nothing but turn-downs.

On the other side in Nicaragua, it is simply reversed. It is the democratic revolutionaries who were ousted once the revolution was successful while the Marxists took over and created their totalitarian form of government. And all they want, all they're fighting for is to return to the principles of the revolution that overthrew Somoza -- free elections, human rights, free press, all of those things.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to try that right-and-wrong question once again just to see how you evaluate this. Do you see these questions about the Carter briefing book as important, really important, and possessing ethical implications, or do you see this merely as a highly political effort by the Democrats, one that you find you must address simply because it has political implications?

The President. We've all talked about this. And we evidently had a stack of papers that has gone over to the Justice Department, that are available for anyone, that were passed -- and anyone here who's been around a campaign knows the reams of paper, the reams of proposals and plans that come in to you and that were passed over. And I can understand his very well not having paid any attention. He wasn't going to wade through a stack of papers. They didn't come in a binder or a cover or anything.

And, as I say, evidently, the book that is now being peddled to many of you is not what was in our possession. No one that we've talked to that has said that they saw these papers at one time or other -- none of them say they ever saw that book that is the strategy book.

Q. Mr. President, but what was in the possession of former campaign officials who now work in this administration was over 500 pages of various materials, including some that were clearly strategic, some that gave very specific information. One memo came from some Carter staff members who were brainstorming about the debate. And I get back to the question of what you think about the ethics. Your press spokesman has said that this is nothing new in politics. Would you condone this? Do you condone this in the campaign that you ran? And would you condone it in a future campaign that you might run?

The President. No. And it's never been characteristic of any campaigns that I've been in. And, again, I repeat: I had never heard anything about this until you all started talking about it. And obviously it was never passed to me for any use in a campaign.

But the thing is that I want the Justice Department to determine -- I know many have carelessly used a term that did someone ``steal'' something from the White House. I'd suggest that anyone that would try that is pretty foolish. But I think it should be determined -- was there a disgruntled worker in the Carter campaign who did something of that kind -- but find out who did what, and if it was improper or illegal, then take action.

Q. Even if it was not illegal, how do you feel about the ethics of it? And how do you feel about the fact that of all the participants, your CIA Director is the only one who has absolutely no recollection? Yet, he was the man in charge. He was the campaign manager.

The President. Which is why he'd be the fellow that would pass it on as quickly as he got it. I do that with some papers sometimes too now that I don't look, but I know that they could be handled by someone else.

The President. The ethical question? I think that campaigning has always, in the eyes of the people, had a kind of a double standard, and I have deplored it. And that is that people have said -- people that are otherwise totally honest -- have said, when they hear about something, they've said: ``Oh, well, you know, politics.'' Well, I don't happen to believe politics should have a double standard. No. I think it should be above reproach. And there shouldn't be unethical things done in campaigns, even such things as accusing the other candidate of being a racist, and things like that.

The President. No. The stuff they had, again, was not what is in this final book. It was not campaign strategy. And most of everything that I've heard that they've found in those papers are the positions that were already public in the campaign. They were the kind of things that I had, where staff would tell me, ``Here are the -- here is what -- here's a list of the things you accomplished as Governor. Here are the things that you should be talking about.'' And it was this type of thing.

And I think what Dave Stockman meant -- although he can speak for himself -- is that Dave meant that since he was going to play President Carter, in practicing in front of a panel of questioners, that it saved him having to go out and dig up what were all of the accomplishments of the Carter administration.

The President. Well, my answer is that it probably wasn't too much different from the press rushing into print with the Pentagon Papers, which were stolen. And they were classified. And it was against the law. Now, I want the Justice Department to find out if anybody did anything that broke the law.

Q. Mr. President, your opening statement obviously reflected concern about Congress going in the wrong direction on spending, on taxes. And, although you didn't say so, I imagine you're also concerned about the level of defense appropriations. My question, sir, is: Do you see this coming, as the year progresses, to a confrontation; or do you, rather, see yourself sitting down with the leaders of Congress and coming to some kind of compromise on these key issues?

Q.  --  -- Democrats' propensity to raise taxes and the high spending. And I added, gratuitously perhaps, the defense issue, which you've expressed yourself on previously. Taking these three issues, do you see a confrontation down the road with Congress, or do you see some kind of accommodation or compromise?

The President. Well, the only confrontation would be if they succeed in passing appropriation bills that bust the budget, that are going to add to the deficit. And I would have the necessity of vetoing them. But I think we still have a coalition in the Congress that feels, as we do, that domestic spending should be reduced and not increased, as it was in the budget resolution. And I think that this is vital. This is the course that we've been on.

The President. Well, I don't expect a clash, except there will, undoubtedly, if I have to veto, they'll try to override the vetoes, if you're going to call that a clash. I'm reasonably optimistic that if I'm judicious with vetoing these padded appropriation bills that there will be support for my vetoes.

America. But at the same time, you have said that El Salvador and the rest of the region are of vital national security and of crucial importance to our country. Isn't there, therefore, an inconsistency in those two statements. If you think it is of that much of an importance to our country, why do you say you will never send combat troops in?

The President. Well, Presidents never say ``never.'' I've said that we have no plans to send combat troops nor are they needed or wanted. President Magana here said, no, that he would not ask for them. He doesn't want them. And I don't think the other countries do. I think they want to create their own democracies and continue on the path they're on.

But they do, frankly, need our help in two areas. They need us to help them with training, to provide arms and munitions so that they can defend themselves while they're instituting these democratic programs. And they need our economic help. And so far our help has been 3 to 1 -- three-fourths of our help has been in the area of economic relief and only one-fourth military.

And those in the Congress who want to whittle this down to where it is a pittance -- they don't say, ``No, we won't give you anything -- give you a few dollars here and a few dollars there.'' In my opinion, what they're doing is choosing between instant death and letting those countries bleed to death. And then they want to be able to blame somebody else because they passed a nickel instead of a dollar. And all that those countries want from us is this economic help and the help that we're giving them.

The President. Well, you were asking a kind of a hypothetical question, so I gave a hypothetical answer. And it's an old saying that Presidents should never say never. You know, they blew up the Maine. But, no, I see no need for it. They've never been asked for, nor do we have any plans or intention of sending troops to those countries.

Q. Mr. President, even on the eve of this last phase of your tax cut that you mentioned earlier, the polls continue to show that between 60 and 70 percent of the people still consider you to be a rich man's President with no idea of what the people who aren't wealthy are going through out there and really are unfair to the poor. How does that make you feel? And what, if anything, can you do to change that perception? Are you doing any -- you mentioned fairness in your opening statement about -- I mean, your pollsters say it's your biggest problem. What do you do to change that?

The President. Well, Gary, I know this has been hung on me, and you asked how I felt: It's very frustrating. I was raised in poverty, and I remember very well what poverty is. And I remember what it was like in the Great Depression. That's one of the advantages of being my age. Now there are many of you here who have only read about it.

And suggesting this unfairness thing, first of all, what is more unfair to the low-income people than the double-digit inflation that we had for 2 years in a row before we got here? A person that was only getting $5,000 a year in 1 year, he was only getting -- he only had $4,000 worth of purchasing power; 10,000, he had $8,000 in purchasing power. The people were getting -- I remember in California, we raised the Federal aid to children -- the aid to children program, we raised it three times, the grants, and yet at the end the grants, had less purchasing power than they had before we had to start making the raises. That's one thing we've done.

The other thing, with all of the talk about budget cuts and so forth, if anyone will ever study what it is we've done in many of the social programs, yes, we have taken some 800,000 people off food stamps, because their incomes were about 150 percent or more of the poverty level. But we have 4 million more people getting food stamps, because we redirected more effort and $3 million dollars more in spending on food stamps down to people that were below that level, at the poverty level or below.

The same is true in many of the things -- the school lunch programs, the aid to college students, and so forth. We redirected it from people that we believed should have been able -- had incomes that would have enabled them to not only help a child that they were sending to college, but they were in a market where they could afford to borrow. We redirected that down and increased what we were doing for the people that were in poverty.

Now, I only know from my own background -- and someday let me give you my recipe for oatmeal meat. I thought it was a luxury when I was a kid. I found out my mother was saving money on meat. I just -- my feeling, and it's very deep within me is this: No, the rich don't need my help, and I'm not doing things to help the rich. I'm doing things that I think are fair to all of the people. But what I want to see above all is that this country remains a country where someone can always get rich. That's the thing that we have and that must be preserved.

Department to monitor this case. Does ``monitor'' mean that they're going to do their own investigation of it? And also, since these serious questions are being raised about people who now hold senior positions in your administration, do you think it would be appropriate to appoint a special prosecutor, rather than having your own Justice Department look into the matter?

The President. That would be up to the Attorney General, with regard to appointing a special investigator. But all of my people who had any knowledge at all of this have been told that they are available to the Justice Department. And I've told the Justice Department, they're all available for any of the questioning they want to do.

Q.  --  -- a group of your supporters, black Republicans, charge that your civil rights policies suffer from a lack of substance, not communications, as you indicated here in the last press conference. They're urging action to appoint blacks to your administration, and they want the Assistant Attorney General for Civil Rights, William Bradford Reynolds, fired. What are you going to do to address the concerns of your own supporters?

Right now, for example, the Justice Department, school discrimination, is investigating one more case than at the same time in the Carter administration he was investigating. But at the same time, we also have investigations going in eight school districts in the country where we have suspicions of discrimination. We are also continuing cases that had been brought before we were here and that are still in litigation that the Justice Department is carrying on with.

I don't know where they can get anything that indicates that we're not -- I know that that's the perception. That's a little bit like this other question here about a rich man's President. Someone starts creating that perception and keeps on saying it loud enough; pretty soon they get some people believing it. But there is no merit in that at all.

Bunzel, who was 8 years the president of San Jose State in California, has a record of 35 years in the civil rights field and in 1974 was cited by the San Francisco Board of Supervisors for his work in civil rights.

Q. Thank you, sir. On Poland, do you think that at this point Lech Walesa ought to step back from the leadership role he has taken? And do you have any reason to believe that if he does step back from the limelight in the Solidarity leadership position that martial law in Poland would improve to the point where you could come through with the kind of relief for the Polish economy you mentioned last week?

The President. Ann, I wouldn't be able to answer that, because I know that the conversations between General Jaruzelski and His Holiness were private, and no one knows -- and I know that also with the conversations with Lech Walesa. I don't know what that situation is. I only know what the Pope himself has stated, and that is that he has urged the Government of Poland to allow a free union that is not subject to government control. And if they did that, I think that we would review what we were doing and turn back from some of those things.

States International Trade Commission on this matter, the quotas established by this proclamation shall apply to articles entered, or withdrawn from warehouse for consumption, on or after the effective date of this proclamation. However, these quotas shall not apply to articles entered, or withdrawn from warehouse for consumption, if the articles were (1) exported from the country of origin prior to the effective date of this proclamation, and (2) imported directly into the United States, as determined by the appropriate customs officials, in accordance with the criteria set forth at 19 CFR 10.174, 10.175 (1982).

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 28th day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Pursuant to Section 22 of the Agricultural Adjustment Act of 1933, as amended, I have been advised by the Secretary of Agriculture, and I agree with him, that there is reason to believe that certain articles containing sugar or sirups derived from sugarcane or sugar beets are practically certain to be imported under such conditions, at such prices, and in such quantities as to render or tend to render ineffective, or materially interfere with, the price support program for sugarcane and sugar beets undertaken by the Department of Agriculture.

All other articles, wherever classified in the TSUS, containing over 65 percent by dry weight of sugars derived from sugarcane or sugar beets, whether or not mixed with other ingredients, and capable of being further processed or mixed with similar or other ingredients, except articles within the scope of other import restrictions provided for in part 3 of the Appendix to the TSUS.

The United States International Trade Commission is therefore directed to make an investigation under Section 22 of the Agricultural Adjustment Act of 1933, as amended, to determine whether the above-described articles are being, or are practically certain to be, imported under such conditions, at such prices, and in such quantities as to render or tend to render ineffective or materially interfere with the price support program of the Department of Agriculture for sugarcane and sugar beets, and to report its findings and recommendations to me at the earliest practicable date.

Articles containing over 65 percent by dry weight of sugars derived from sugarcane or sugar beets, whether or not mixed with other ingredients, capable of being further processed or mixed with similar or other ingredients, and not prepared for marketing to the retail consumers in the identical form and package in which imported; all the foregoing articles, provided for in TSUS items 155.75, 156.45, 183.01, and 183.05, except articles within the scope of other import restrictions provided for in part 3 of the Appendix to the Tariff Schedules of the United States.

You represent this nature's [nation's] future. You will shape, fit, mold, construct, and program a new century for America. And once you've done that, you will tune it, alter it, repair it, and nurse it along so that it keeps running smoothly. America has no higher stake than in the quality of your education, the sharpness of your skills, and your opportunity to use them both in well-paying jobs.

America'' will always mean made the best. Now, some doomcriers are already saying that we've begun to lose our edge. I don't think that's true, but we do need to remind ourselves where greatness comes from. Each generation must feel the spur of competition, share the commitment to excellence, and receive the rewards for a job well done. Each generation must remake the pact among Americans to live up to the promise of their freedom: to be the first, to be the best, to reach higher, farther, and deeper for greatness than anyone ever dreamed possible.

And each generation must realize that to achieve America's potential, we need all our people with all their talents working together. And that's why our drive for excellence in education must reach every student in every school in every subject. We should see that all our young people get a good grounding in English and literature, history, math, science, and the other basics. But we must also recognize that our vocational classrooms are just as important as any other. And we should insist that the vocational courses we teach prepare this generation with the skills they need for real jobs.

When I was Governor of California, I became concerned that, as I indicated before, that our vocational education system was not training our young people for jobs that would be available when they were ready to work. As soon as I was introduced to the Vocational and Industrial Clubs of America, I became a fan. You've been in the vanguard of the effort to increase cooperation between educators and industry. And I'm proud to hold a lifetime membership in California VICA.

VICA's Skill Olympics show how industry and educators can work together to improve the opportunities and productivity of America's workers. Some 245 major corporations, trade associations, and labor unions are pooling their resources to make this competition possible; donating time, equipment, training, and funding. This year alone, industry has contributed $7 million to the Skill Olympics, and that expense is like a green light that's beckoning you into the work force. That money is not charity; it's an investment. It was spent to train workers in skills industry needs for today and tomorrow.

Other examples of private sector involvement in training workers are springing up around the country -- I've visited an Opportunities Industrialization Center sponsored by IBM in Massachusetts and one of Control Data's training institutes in Pittsburgh, to name just two. In our private sector initiatives data bank alone, we show dozens of examples of business and education partnerships, and we're working to encourage more. I am convinced that forging these kinds of partnerships today is the key to a better trained, more productive work force tomorrow.

If America's industries hope to compete and win in world markets, they must have at their hearts a broadly educated work force trained in the skills of the 21st century. American industry as well as American educational institutions should take note of the VICA experience. Together we can lead our people and the world into a dynamic new era of innovation, growth, and prosperity. In the VICA tradition, we can forge a partnership for progress that will leave no one behind, calling on a great source of our country's strength: the commitment, energy, and patriotism of the American worker. We need the strength of every back and the power of every mind to bring about another golden age of prosperity for America. That's why we must not and I will not rest until every American who wants a job not only can find one but has the skills to get one.

Instead of another make-work, bureaucratic boondoggle, that program will train more than 1 million Americans every year in skills they can market where they live. It will allow State and local government officials, business and labor leaders, and others to match the training provided with the jobs that are available in that particular area. The act also provides additional funds to our vocational institutions for effective job-training programs. You in VICA will play a key role in carrying out important provisions of this act.

Of course, America must have a thriving, growing economy for our people to work in. Since taking office, we've cut the rate of growth in government spending by 40 percent. And when the third installment of our tax cut takes effect on Friday, day after tomorrow -- and it will take effect on Friday -- and I can tell you that it will, because I have just received word since I arrived here that the Senate has voted down the attempt to change that tax law. I can put my veto pen away.

Congress and fend off their persistent attempts to raise taxes on working men and women, a great deal of progress has been made. Inflation was in double digits in 1980; today it's running at an annual rate of just 3\1/2\ percent and less than 2 percent for the last 6 months. The prime interest rate which shut down virtually the automobile industry and the housing industry was 21\1/2\ percent when we took office. It's less than half that now. Mortgage rates have been cut by 5\1/2\ percent. Our factories are beginning -- or 5\1/2\ percentage points, I should say. And our factories are beginning to hum again, our small businesses are coming up for air, and our housing and construction industries are taking off. Real wages were up in 1982 for the first time in 3 years, and last month personal income made its biggest jump in nearly 2 years.

Our task now is to hold the Congress to a course of fiscal responsibility. We must not allow these hard-won victories to become just another blip on the economic boom-and-bust roller coaster that we've been riding for a number of years. There's no doubt about it, we have begun a strong and steady recovery that will bring new opportunity and better times to all our people. Our economy is better off today than it was a month ago, and we can expect it to be better next month than it is today. Right now you can look to a future that is bright with hope, and I'll do everything in my power to ensure that the big spenders and the big taxers in the Congress won't steal it from you.

A few months ago at EPCOT Center, I saw a film which portrayed Thomas Wolfe saying, ``To everyone a chance, to all people, regardless of their birth, the right to live, to work, to become whatever their visions can combine to make them. This is the promise of America.'' Well, it's at the heart of our economic, education, and jobs program, and it's the reason for the Vocational and Industrial Clubs of America. You have a right to pursue careers of your choice and can take pride in the fact that America needs the ones that you've chosen.

As America progresses, as technology revolutionizes our way of life, we'll need you more than ever to program the computers, build the machines and make the microchips. Our service industries will need more and more of the skills that you are learning. About 8 out of 10 of the new jobs created in the last few years were in the service industries. And we will always need people expert in the basic building and mechanical skills that have been a traditional part of vocational education. You are and will be at the hub of every bit of progress we make. So, we must be sure that you get the very best training that we can provide.

VICA can be a great deal of help as we shape our agenda for excellence in American education. I understand that some of your voting delegates are serving in a task force in response to our education commission report. I'm counting on you to evaluate the report in detail and suggest activities for your local clubs. VICA can serve as a catalyst in local communities to increase awareness of the need for quality education. I would also like to commend you on your theme for the coming year: ``America's New Professionals Making Us First.'' On behalf of your fellow citizens, I thank you for your dedication to excellence and your volunteer spirit. Your efforts can only lead to a stronger, more highly motivated work force.

America's vast potential, our chance to build a bright and shining world of continued progress. I'm confident your generation is eager to take on the challenges ahead. If we who came before you do everything in our power to make sure you're ready, I know you won't let us down.

Good luck to each of you entered in the Skills Olympics tomorrow. And may the best competitors win. But let everyone go away from these Olympics knowing that the real victory is in the striving to be the best. And that makes every VICA member a winner already.

And one night, we were having a chalk talk over in one of the classrooms -- those dim bulbs that never seem to be bright enough when it's nighttime. And I had never gone into a game in my life that I hadn't said a prayer. But I never would've said it to those guys around me. I thought I was probably the only one in the world that ever did that. Somehow, the subject came up from the coach about this. And one by one, I sat there and listened. And every fellow in that room, it developed, did the same thing. And then a question came from the coach.

Now, I know what I'd figured out for myself should be a prayer. You can't ask to win, because the Lord's got to be on everybody's side. But there are things you can ask. And one by one, I heard every one of these fellows, and all of us on our own, never having admitted it before, had come up with the same idea. You can't ask to win, but you can ask that He help you do your best and that you'll have no regrets having done your best no matter how it turns out, and that you will be content with the outcome -- satisfied. Just may the best one win.

And I could say the same thing to you, because I'm quite sure that a great many of you've got some prayers in your heart about this. But that's why you're all going to go home winners no matter just how it comes out. As a matter of fact, you're winners or you wouldn't even be competing in this particular contest. You're winners already.

Kansas and to bring you a piece of breaking news, truly good news. I spoke last night in my press conference about that unfair tax cap that was being pushed by some of the liberal spenders in Washington, and I promised that the tax cap would not become law. In fact, I would have been prepared with that pencil for a veto. [Laughter] Well, I'm pleased to report that the drive to increase taxes on millions of hard-working married couples, small businesses, and family farms, many of them right here in Kansas, has just been beaten back and defeated in the Senate this morning, 55 to 45. Now, I realize that you are from all over the country, but speaking of our host State here, Kansas, one of the champions in the battle for that victory was that outstanding Kansas Senator, Bob Dole. And a vote for it was the other Kansas Senator, Nancy Kassebaum.

We're on the right path. America's economy is moving. This morning we learned the leading economic indicators were up another 1.2 percent in May, and that's the 11th straight monthly increase in those indicators. And just yesterday, we raised again our gross estimate for 1983. This stronger growth could shrink the deficit by up to $15 billion. And we intend to keep America moving forward, whacking down that deficit with higher growth and spending restraint, but not with higher taxes on hard-working people. I just thought that we could open with a news note of that kind.

But I understand that today does mark an historic first; that every NASC Conference has its share of presidents, but I believe this is the first time that a President of the United States has attended.

But even so after all these years, I remember vividly my days as student body president at Dixon and, a little later, as chairman of the student body senate at Eureka College. I suppose you could say that those two jobs were my first exposure to elective office. The issues may have been different, but the lessons of leadership were the same.

Your duties in student government, like the efforts you put into your individual studies, are worth it. They may seem heavy at times, and they are a big responsibility. But it's by accepting duty and responsibility that we learn and grow. The dividends your experience will pay in lessons learned, in pride taken in a job well done, is a kind of basic training course for future leadership. These are things that will keep on rewarding you all your lives.

Teddy Roosevelt once called the Presidency a ``bully pulpit.'' Well, by that he meant that it offered an ideal platform for getting important messages and ideas across to the American people. That was what I had in mind a few weeks ago when I launched what may be one of the most important initiatives of this administration -- a great national debate on the future of American education.

American education now will have a big effect on the opportunities you and your fellow students will have in the years ahead, your chance to play a productive part in the great adventure in new ideas, new technology, and new opportunities that await your generation.

We care about education because we care about you. And we care about you not just because you're our children and grandchildren, but because you're the future of America, the ones who will carry the torch of freedom and idealism into the 21st century, the ones that will keep the American Dream alive and, in your turn, pass it on to future generations of young Americans.

And that's why the great debate on the quality of our schools is building today in the Nation. And that's why it's so important. I've been speaking with parents, with teachers, with school principals, superintendents, and State and local officials -- all people with a vital interest in putting our schools back on the track to excellence. But I feel no group has a fresher awareness of the problems in our schools, a greater understanding of the grassroots issues involved, or a deeper personal interest in the outcome of this debate than you, the student leaders, who are gathered here today.

You represent the generation which is paying the price for past mistakes in education. You've shown your willingness to accept the responsibilities of leadership. And I hope that you will stay involved as your communities sort out their priorities and begin anew to fulfill the promise of a good education that this nation has always offered its people.

Many of you come from classrooms where teachers are struggling against mounting odds to maintain order and to teach. You and your older brothers and sisters have often seen basic, required courses replaced by electives and homework reduced or ignored. And you know that too many of your classmates will graduate from high school without some of the skills they'll need to realize their fullest potential as citizens. They'll enter a world of great opportunity, but some of them haven't been taught the things they will need to take advantage of the opportunities that are available.

America, even in cities with high unemployment among young people, employers are running page after page of want ads offering food, well-paying jobs for people educated in math and science. They're also spending billions to train people to control the sophisticated equipment in modern factories and offices. But they need more people with a solid background in reading, writing, calculating, and thinking -- people practiced in the art of modern learning.

I sometimes wonder what future historians will think looking back on our era. We live in a time when rapid, startling advances are being made in science; when men and women are traveling in space; when the secrets of nature are being unlocked in laboratories; when electronic computers have revolutionized everything from space travel to home appliances.

How will posterity reconcile these facts with the clear evidence that too many of our schools are teaching less? I find it puzzling myself, but particularly so when we know that during this 20-year period of decline in the quality of education, the cost of educating a student in the public schools has doubled -- and that is in constant dollars, not inflated dollars.

A major factor in that decline has been the unfortunate side effects of the Federal Government's efforts to aid the schools: the transfer of authority in education from the States and communities of the Nation to Washington, D.C. History shows that during the time when America built the greatest system of education the world has ever seen -- and it is still a great system -- the work, the planning, and the money were all supplied by States and local school districts with no Federal interference. Authority to conduct education had been strictly left to the States. Schools were run by elected school boards according to requirements set by State governments, and they answered directly to the people they served.

And then about 20 years ago, Congress passed the first large-scale aid to the public schools. It's not hard to understand why. School systems were struggling desperately to serve the children of the post-World War II baby boom, and millions of affluent taxpayers were leaving the cities for the suburbs. State school finance formulas couldn't keep up with the shifts in population. But, as some of us had warned, with Federal aid came Federal control, the growing demand for reports and detailed applications for all the various categories of aid the Federal Government eventually offered.

Over the same period, the schools were charged by the Federal courts with leading in the correcting of longstanding injustices in our society -- racial segregation, sex discrimination, lack of opportunity for the handicapped. Perhaps there was simply too much to do in too little time, even for the most dedicated teachers and administrators. But there's no question that somewhere along the line many schools lost sight of their main purpose: Giving our students the quality teaching they need and deserve took a back seat to other objectives.

We're trying to turn that around and with your help, we can. I'm happy to say that once again our schools are beginning to focus in on excellence in education. The question is no longer what should schools be doing, but how they can prepare students to take an active and rewarding part in the age of high technology that we've entered.

If the record of the past 20 years proves anything, it is that money alone is not a solution to the problems in our schools. First, we must have agreement on goals and plans and how to reach those goals. And this process must involve the whole community, particularly the parents and students of the Nation.

Risk'' is its title. It is clear, it's readable, and makes recommendations that every community should consider in its planning to revitalize its schools. I'll just mention one of these -- the recommendation on high school curriculum. The Commission recommends for all high school graduates a foundation in what it calls ``the Five New Basics'': 4 years of English, 3 years of mathematics, 3 years of science, 3 years of social studies, and a half a year of computer science.

Now, I'd be interested to know how many of you student leaders feel that you'll have the equivalent of that background behind you when you go to college. Well, I see the hands going up -- great. That's great. And your work is cut out for you.

When you go back to your communities, I hope you'll do so with a sense that you're part of something very important that is happening in this country. America's finally waking up to a threat to this nation caused by neglect of the most important function of our schools -- teaching the skills that people need to succeed in life.

The problem is clear. It's up to you as leaders to become a part of the solution. Together, generation to generation, from coast to coast, we can make American education great again. And we're counting on you to help in that.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Tracy Park, and I'm from Centerville, Iowa. My question is: You are on record as favoring the abolition of the Department of Education. Since the publication of ``A Nation at Risk,'' the educational commission's report, education appears to be a higher priority with you. Does this mean that you have changed your mind about the importance of a Department of Education?

Government should fund, and some of those programs were already in existence but under other departments of the government -- I felt that this was giving the Federal Government more importance and enabling it to interfere more with what should be education controlled at the local and State level.

There are those in Washington who actually believe that we should change the whole system into a single Federal educational system, not recognizing the great diversity of all of our States. So, our intention never was to eliminate what government was doing, other than eliminate the unnecessary interference.

I think I could sum it up -- Secretary Bell, here, is in sympathy with this. He is the Cabinet officer who's working, trying to eliminate his own department, but not to eliminate some of the necessary Federal functions. But I think I could sum it up for you in telling you that some of the paperwork that administrators in your schools know about, that are forced on them by the Federal Government in return for the 8 percent -- a lot more paperwork than is forced on them by the governments that pay the 92 percent.

But this is the type of excess bureaucracy that we can do without. See, the Federal Government has to learn -- and we're trying to teach them -- the Federal Government has to learn, if it ain't broke, don't fix it.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Darren McCullough, from [inaudible] -- Louisiana. And my question is: Besides the opportunities already available, is there going to be an attempt to broaden the availability of Federal aid, grants, and loans for eligible college students?

Yes, there is, I think, a misperception that in some way we have been trimming back on programs of that kind. What we found when we got to Washington was that some of those programs -- as they spread and as Washington tries to help everybody -- were actually going to people that didn't have a legitimate excuse to be getting help at their fellow taxpayers' expense. Their incomes were such -- and this ranged all the way from school lunches, subsidized school lunches, on up to college loans. And what we did was change the requirements and increase the number of grants and loans and help and even school lunches that were available at the bottom of the earning scale, down for the people who had the least ability to afford this kind of help for their children or their young sons and daughters in college. And this is still our goal and what we're trying to do.

But there has not been -- in the sense of actually reducing the help, no, it has been a shifting of it from people that were above a certain percentage of income as related to the poverty level down to those who truly needed the help.

Q. My name is Jerome Bower, and I'm from Capital Heights, Maryland. And my question is: You recently appointed several persons to the Civil Rights Commission who do not advocate the use of busing to integrate public schools. This, along with your administration's lackluster enforcement of civil rights laws passed in the 1960's, has led many Americans to believe that you are willing to send us back to the times before the Montgomery bus boycott and Dr. King's march on Washington. How would you respond to these critics who say that you're spending more time worrying about the civil rights in El Salvador than worrying about those people who are being discriminated against here in America?

The President. I'm glad you asked that question. I hope sometime, at some press conferences, it will be asked more often. There is a perception that I have to tell you, on my own behalf, is totally false about our approach to anything of that kind.

I can call to your attention that the idea of forced busing, now, is one that the polls show that both minority and the majority in America -- parents -- disapprove of. They don't believe -- that while it started with the most worthwhile of ideas, that it has not achieved the purpose that it should, and that we could find better ways to bring about what we want. I am wholeheartedly in favor of integration -- and was, long before there was a term called ``civil rights,'' back at a time when -- well, some of the things that went on, it's hard to believe now -- but back when I was your age, that we lived in a time in which there was such injustice, such discrimination.

But I, fortunately, was raised by a mother and father who believed that the -- well, the only intolerance they had was they were intolerant of intolerance. And I was raised to believe something else. And when I was a sports announcer in Iowa, not too far from Centerville, announcing major league baseball -- how many of you remember that, within that span of time, major league baseball -- no blacks were allowed to play? It was in the Spaulding Guide. It said, ``Baseball is a game for Caucasian gentlemen.'' And there were some of us at that time that began campaigning that this was wrong, and this was immoral, and it should be changed. And I am proud to say I was one of those.

Now, I think you mentioned our appointment to the Civil Rights Commission. Well, one of them, a Dr. Abram, was the lawyer who defended Martin Luther King when he was arrested for the sit-in in a lunch counter in Atlanta, Georgia. And Bunzel, who was the head of San Jose State University for 8 years, has been involved in civil rights activities for 35 years and was honored by the Board of Supervisors of San Francisco for his work in civil rights in 1974. The other member that I have nominated has an equally solid record in that. And the young Hispanic woman that I have named as Director of the Board, the Executive Director, she is not only of a minority community herself, but she was the assistant to Albert Shanker, the head of the American Federation of Teachers union and also participated in civil rights in education.

I think there's been some misinformation about what we're trying to do and what we've done. As a matter of fact, our Justice Department right now is engaged in more investigations of suspected discrimination in school districts than, I believe, any of the past several administrations have been.

And I can only tell you this: My own feeling and belief is that wherever in this country any individual is being denied his or her constitutional rights, it is the responsibility of the Federal Government, with all the power it possesses, to go to the aid of that single individual.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Christine Thompson, and I'm from New Baltimore, Michigan. You are in a room with 1,400 student leaders. As students, we hear from many of your contemporaries that America does not have as many heroes and leaders as it once did. What is your opinion as to why this has occurred? Who are your heroes, and why?

The President. Heroes. You know, we seem to be in a kind of a cult. And the entertainment world is partly guilty of this, as well as other things. We seem to be obsessed with wanting to tear down our heroes. But you know something? We're a country of heroes. And the greatest unsung heroes in the world go unnoticed. No, they're not out there manning the parapets or riding to the rescue.

We have started a thing called the private sector initiative since we've been there. This is to turn and find out, how many things can the private sector do that government has increasingly insisted that only it could do? I just left Kentucky. And there, in Louisville, Kentucky, I was meeting with a group as big or bigger than you, who are the leaders and the students of vocational education.

And they're there for the Vocational Skills Olympics that will take place tomorrow, in which they will compete with each other in their knowledge and what they can do with high technology, with constructive things, with engineering, and so forth.

But speaking of heroes, there was a group of very top chief executives of major corporations in this country. They have volunteered and are helping and are furnishing the equipment and the training. And they've put up $7 million to finance these Olympics. And all over the country this is going on. Yes, we have heroes. I think the hundred kids in our Marine Corps, stationed in Italy, that sent me a letter the other day and said, if by them doing without a cost-of-living pay raise it would help our country in this time of deficits, count on them, they'll do without the pay raise. I think that's kind of heroic.

Now, today, we have another power in the world that has built the greatest war machine the world has ever seen -- far outnumbers anything that we have. And it can't be described as just purely for defense, because the Soviet Union's military structure is built for offense. We, in turn, have -- we've managed to keep the peace for almost 40 years now since World War II, the longest period, virtually, in European history and certainly in this century. And we've kept it by a deterrent. We're not up to them in strength yet, but we maintain a deterrent that says to them, ``If you try it -- if you try to do this world conquering thing that other dictators have tried in the past, the punishment to you will be unacceptable.'' And this is the only purpose of our arms.

We have a team in Vienna that is negotiating and has been for some time on conventional weapons. We have two teams in Geneva, one negotiating, hopefully and prayerfully, for a reduction in the strategic nuclear weapons -- the long-range, the missiles, that if they push the button would be here in 20 to 30 minutes, exploding all over our land. The other one is in intermediate-range weapons. The Soviet Union has about 1,300 warheads in intermediate-range weapons posted near the NATO front, and which in 5 minutes those could be destroying all the targets and the cities of Europe. We have nothing of the kind on our side. And our NATO allies have asked us to provide a deterrent force there, and we agreed. And before the end of this year, the deployment will start of this deterrent.

But I would like to call to your attention also, on behalf of our country, because a lot of times it doesn't seem as if the reports about our country or what we're doing are what we actually, as a nation, deserve. In 1946, we were the only ones with the weapon, the nuclear weapon. We could have dominated the world. But in 1946, we called a meeting of all the world leaders and said, ``Let us create an international commission to supervise the use of peaceful nuclear power and to totally eliminate all nuclear weapons.'' And think of it, we had the monopoly then. The Soviet Union was the only country that refused to go along.

And so today, we have this arms race, which we're trying to stop now. They say in their military manuals -- and I have read this phrase -- that a nuclear war is winnable. And they've said that it is all right if it furthers the progressive kinds of government and changes that they think should be made. Well, we say that a nuclear war is not winnable. It must never be fought. It can do nothing but destroy people on both sides. And we're going to keep trying --  -- [applause].

Thank you very much. I've got to get out of here. I've stayed here too long for all of you. But let me just say one thing that I like to say to young people like yourselves: No generation in history has ever been treated to as many words as you are. You have our communications, our media now. You can hear them, you can hear and see them, you can read them. And they, people like me stand up here and talk to you on them. Let me just say one thing: I've answered a few questions here with some things that I said were facts and figures. Don't let me get away with it.

High School following remarks and an introduction by Robert Goodling, student chairperson of the National Association of Student Councils. Mr. Goodling presented the President with a souvenir pencil, engraved with the theme of the conference: Student Leaders Building America's Future.

Following his remarks, the President met at the high school with the leadership of the association and the National Association of Student Activity Advisers. He then left Kansas and traveled to California.

Thank you very much, Mr. Secretary. I'm delighted to be here at Pioneer High School. Pioneer is an appropriate name, too, because this school is pioneering a new age of education based on old values, under the leadership of Mr. Eicholtz. How about that, at my age and I'm still calling the principal ``Mister.'' [Laughter] But under his leadership, this school shows what can be accomplished when students, faculty, parents, and the local community work together.

Secondary School Recognition Program. And what I like about Pioneer is its pride. Teachers are proud of students; students are proud of teachers. Both are proud of the principal. And everybody's proud of the school itself.

Principals, teachers, and students all pick up paper in the halls if they find it and throw it in trash cans. [Laughter] Instead of putting up a 10-foot chain-link fence, parents, students, and teachers built a distinguished wrought-iron fence. The community Little League, which uses Pioneer's athletic fields, has invested $11,000 and thousands of hours improving the facilities. And what all this means is that students are more receptive to learning, because they respect the institution known as the school. And this is a base.

The resulting academic benefits are now flowing -- and you'll hear more about those in a few minutes. There has to be an attitude for learning before anything sticks in the student's head. And we've seen that attitude change here at Pioneer. I wish I could load all the students and teachers of this school on a bus and take them around the country with me, showing the Nation what can be done.

Commission on Excellence in Education. The last time education was the focus of such intense public debate was during the 1950's. This Nation then was shaken when the Soviets launched their Sputnik. We responded by making math, science, and engineering education a priority, and that beautiful white space shuttle that we've just recently seen shows how we succeeded.

I believe the Commission's report has shaken the Nation as well. And we need shaking. We needed a respected, bipartisan panel to take a hard look at our educational system and tell us where we'd gone wrong. Now it's up to us to respond as positively as we did in the 1950's.

One of the recommendations of the report was that citizens across the Nation should hold educators and elected officials responsible for providing the leadership necessary to achieve reform. And I agree completely. We Federal officials have the responsibility for identifying the national interest in education and providing leadership. But local officials are the ones who pay most of the bills and govern the school district. And it's at the local level where progress will be made.

Local school boards can set higher standards. They can see that outstanding teachers are rewarded for their efforts. They can provide incentives and recognition for students who work to attain the outer limits of their ability. We need to bring the concept of achievement back into our schools -- achievement for teachers and students alike.

Leadership is so important. We need the best efforts of Governors, legislators, superintendents, school board members, principals, students, and parents. Teachers can't succeed unless all those in leadership positions create conditions supportive of success.

And while I'm at it, I would like to applaud Governor George Deukmejian and his efforts to make education a number one budget priority in his administration. Fifty-one percent of Governor Deukmejian's proposed California budget is dedicated to education -- the first real dollar increase in 7 years. The Governor's plans for California education are consistent with the recommendations of the Commission, and all Californians will benefit from the reforms of the system, and yet, do it with no new taxes.

Of course, the home and family are the foundation on which we build effective schools. It's vital to recognize the very significant role of parents in all of this. That's why I recently went to Albuquerque to address the P.T.A. Schools can't do their job if a child doesn't come to school with a readiness and a willingness to learn, and that begins at home. No success on the school's part can totally compensate for failure in the home.

The time has come for a grassroots campaign for educational renewal that unites parents, teachers, students, local officials, and concerned citizens. We need to restore parents and local government to their rightful role in the educational process. It's going to take the attention of all of us to attain the reform of American education. And this must be one of the highest priorities of America today, and that's why I'm spending so much time trying to spur the debate.

However, before we start our discussion, I want to tell you that during 1983, we have been conducting a search to find some exemplary secondary schools. We need some role models, and we need to point out to the public that in spite of the problems we face in education, there are still some outstanding schools to be found all across the Nation. Through use of a panel of experts, not employees of the Federal Government, a list of winners in a nationwide search has been compiled. And I'm pleased to announce that Pioneer High School has been selected by the panel to be honored for excellence in education.

I agree with the things that you said and what you said about extracurricular activities. They were very near and dear to my heart also. And I agree, there is a great deal of learning in all of those things.

I have a nostalgic feeling right now, and I'm going to just tell something for the benefit of the students here of that and a little confessional. I have a warm spot for principals. I was in the principal's office once in Dixon High School. [Laughter] And he was a remarkable friend who remained, until his death a short time ago in Dixon, we kept close contact and all. But I wasn't in there just to pass the time of day. [Laughter] And at one point in what was going on he said to me, ``You know, I don't care what you think of me now.'' He said, ``I'm only interested in what you'll think of me 15 years from now.'' And it goes with that thing that you just said about the loving care and the feeling on the part of students that those that are teaching them have their interests at heart. Because I didn't have to wait 15 years for him to find out what I then thought of him and what he had meant to me.

The thing here of -- and the recommendation of the Commission about required courses -- and this again, to the students. I know it's very easy to think that what you want and what looks like fun in studying is fine. But none of us ever entered high school with really the knowledge of where we were truly going, what we wanted, because we hadn't had enough experiences to make those choices. And it's in the compulsory courses that you find out.

I found out, for example, that I had to fight like crazy, to just stay eligible for football, in the science classes. But I also saw schoolmates of mine that suddenly just found themselves and couldn't wait till the last bell rang to go back up to the lab and on their own do additional things in those courses. And today, that's the field that they find themselves in. By the same token, believe it or not, I fell in love with English, and so did rather well in that. But in those days, who would have discovered that if we had not had what the Commission recommends -- that you had to take English, you had to take math, you had to take some science -- and this was what gave us our chance to find ourselves and become educated in that way.

But the overall thing again was -- and here, really, the nostalgia runs warm and deep -- and that is that, yes, there was a great security. You might have gotten irritated sometimes as a student at them, and you might have been mad about a grade you got or something else. But you went to school with the knowledge or the belief in your own heart that those people were dedicated to your welfare.

And too many of our schools in the country -- and that's what's caused the Commission -- have gone into a time in which students are passed on from one grade to the next simply because they came to the end of the year.

And the other day, I had the experience of calling a young man in Chicago, Illinois, a basketball star in one of our universities. My mother had taught me that everything always happens for a reason and for the best. In his case, it was a shattering injury to his knee, which certainly was not going to help his basketball career. But in this day and age, he had gone through junior high as a star, in senior high as a star, was playing varsity basketball at one of our universities. And because of the bad knee, he had begun to realize no one had been educating him; they'd just been letting him play basketball. And he went to Chicago to that wonderful teacher who's attracted such national attention, Marva Collins, to sit down with fourth grade students and learn to read and write.

How in the world -- I can't believe in my day that anyone could have ever been passed through and on and be in the university. And he had even learned that in that university the courses they'd given him, like the history of baseball. [Laughter] But they hadn't told him that if he completed all those courses, he could not get a diploma, which was what he honestly wanted. And he told me on the phone that he would be forever indebted. And he said the children -- he said, yes, it was embarrassing, a 6-foot 9-inch fourth grader. [Laughter] But he said they were very kind, and they were wonderful to him and helped him in every way. And now he's going to go back to college to get a diploma, not play basketball. He's not going back to the same college -- [laughter] -- going to another one.

Mr. Garcia. Are we ready? Today we are working on some material that has to do with application forms. And we're doing this to have a personal data sheet so when the students go looking for work they have this information with them -- so that it's readily available when they're seeking a job, or applying for a school, or going to college, or wherever they may be heading in the future. So, that's what we're working on today.

But, no, I'd just like to -- and I won't say too much here before we get into maybe some dialog that I would hope we could have. I know that summertime, and a summer class, is not -- is probably not the happiest experience, and you think that you could find a lot of things you'd rather do than that. But I think that one day you'll find that this was an awfully important thing for you.

You know, we may have all kinds of ambitions -- and this is fine that you're learning what you're learning here and something that would be helpful in work or in a job. And no matter what you want to do or how badly you want to do it, too many people will go single-mindedly at this particular craft or profession that they want, and they won't bother learning the ability to communicate with others. And you stop to think of how many great things that have occurred and great masters of science and engineering who've given us some of the benefits that we enjoy today -- if they hadn't had the ability to sell someone on that idea and convince them this was a good thing, we might not have some of those advantages. And all of that is based on what your class is all about here today: the mastery of the language, the ability to communicate with others. And if you've got something really to sell -- and it could be no more than selling yourself across a desk -- in order to get a job that you want very badly.

The President. Well, I'm very proud and, I have to tell you, very excited. And you weren't inside, so I can tell you that we just presented a flag and a plaque to Pioneer High School as our first selection -- something we're going to be doing throughout the country -- of a school that had been decided, on a group of experts that we've chosen throughout the country to make these decisions -- this flag announces that this school has received the first award for excellence in education.

And I met with your principal and the superintendent of schools in there, and I must say, it was very inspiring. And I'm going to go away from here a lot happier about your generation and education in America as a result of what this school has accomplished.

Whittier. What do you think about it, because, you know, we have a six-period day. But now, we're going to a five-period day, because they're cutting down on funds. And we can't go on a six-day period. And, you know, they're cutting off some of our electives. What do you think of that?

The President. Well, I wasn't aware of that, didn't know about that. But I know that many of the things that the Commission on Excellence in Education is recommending are things that are not going to be affected by budgets or money. As you know, the bulk of budgeting for education comes from local and State governments. And the State government of California, I'm happy to say -- 51 percent of the budget is for education.

The Federal Government, from the beginning, when it first began contributing to education, has only -- only puts up about 8 percent of the money for education. And this is for a number of things -- programs that would not be affected by what you're talking about. And if more money is needed, we also have to recognize at times -- for example, California was in a pretty bad situation just recently. And they're trying to get out of the hole. So, everyone may have to be set back a little bit. But I don't believe that that is going to really cut back on the quality of education that you're getting in this school.

I also just heard Jaime Escalante, a teacher in mathematics here, and his plans for the improvement in that and the increase in classes in that. And he showed me that, when I was Governor of California, he showed me a copy of his teacher's certificate. I signed that certificate when he became a teacher, when I was Governor.

But there's no question about the importance of it. In California the tradition has it that the State splits 50 - 50 with local government on the cost of education. So, 51 percent makes them a little ahead.

But there are things that need implementing, and that is more required courses, fewer snap courses that you can choose for yourself, stiffer requirements for graduating. All of those things, I think your school is engaged in and is doing right now.

The President. Well, I've described it several ways and several different ways. I told them once when I was a kid and my father worked in a store, we lived above the store. It's a little bit that way in the White House. You go to work in an elevator -- [laughter] -- and go home from work in an elevator. No, it's very beautiful, and you're impressed by the history of the building and can't complain about the lack of comfort. It is a most comfortable place to live.

At the same time, there is a little feeling of being a bird in a gilded cage. You're rather restricted and limited in what you can do. Once you get upstairs there, that's about where you are until it's time to go to work again. And that's why I found why so many Presidents, including myself now, on weekends go to Camp David, where you can get back to a normal house and open a front door and walk out in the yard if you want to, take a hike, and do things of that kind. You are restricted there in the heart of the city.

The President. I left Teddy Roosevelt way up in the air. And I was just going to tell that they had seven children, and his wife one day told him that he was going to have to get all those employees of his out of the White House or she couldn't raise seven kids. [Laughter] And that's when they built the Oval Office and all the places where we now have the offices that we go to in an elevator.

Well, listen, I've taken too much of your time. And let me just once again say, really, take seriously what is happening here. This is a course that can be as important as anything in the world to all of you and what your futures -- what you want your futures to be.

The President. Thank you very much. Thank you. Ed, thank you very much. And I thank you all for that wonderful California welcome. I, too, miss those who couldn't be here tonight. But, Bill, you mean they're still doing it on the night before the first of July?

The President. I can remember 8 years of waiting up there until 3 and 4 in the morning. You see, they stop the clock at midnight, so that it won't be the first of July, while they go on doing what they're doing.

You know, George and I go back many years, more than I think either he or I want to count. But by coincidence, our first meeting took place -- and it had to do with Republican politics -- in Long Beach, California. We have much in common, it's true. For one thing, as has just been pointed out tonight, we both have the habit of getting sent to Sacramento to clean up after the Browns.

You know, I was in Mississippi a week or so ago, speaking of Republicans in places -- believe it or not, at a fundraiser -- and speaking to Republicans in Mississippi. And there was a Congressman who had been, I guess, one of the first, if not the first Congressman, now retired, that spent long years in Washington as a Republican Congressman from Mississippi. And, while I was there I learned of a story about him in his first campaign.

But our party is strong, and it's growing, and I'm proud to say we've got a leader in this State doing a tremendous job. And you know I'm talking about our former Lieutenant Governor and your State chairman, Ed Reinecke. We did all right last year at the top of the ticket; we'll do better in 1984. And our losses were due less to Jerry Brown than to gerrymandering. Under the Democratic reapportionment plan, the Democrats took back, by fancy map drawing, the six congressional seats that we'd won in the last two elections. Hopefully, with the qualification of the Sebastiani reapportionment plan, and its passage, Republicans can gain back the seats that we lost so unfairly in 1982.

One reapportionment victim was John Rousselot. John ran a terrific race. His wife even campaigned for him in Spanish, and he almost pulled off a great upset. But let me assure you, your loss is our gain. John Rousselot is now one of my Special Assistants, and I'm mighty pleased to have his help.

He's proving the truth of Andrew Jackson's words that, ``One man with courage makes a majority.'' George wants to make it safe for Californians to walk their streets again without having to be afraid. He said no to Prop. 15 because you won't get gun control by disarming law abiding citizens. There's only one way to get real gun control: Disarm the thugs and the criminals, lock them up, and if you don't actually throw away the key, at least lose it for a long time.

George always wants to help working people keep their earnings safe from all those who would bleed them dry with higher and higher taxes. I note that there have been some complaints about and against Prop. 13 -- anything to get more tax dollars. Maybe you could help George by sending a message: Tell them the people approved Prop. 13, the people still want Prop. 13, and the people will defend Prop. 13.

I think I can sympathize with what George is up against. When I was here a year ago, I said that we were in an epic contest with the proponents of ``No,'' the people who offer the politics of no growth, no take-home pay, no incentives to work or save.

We arrived in Washington to find an economic calamity dumped in our laps -- spending increasing at an annual rate of 17 percent, double-digit inflation, record interest rates, and a tax system pushing working families into higher brackets faster than they could earn and save.

It took us nearly the entire first year to get our program approved and, even then, the tax cut had to be watered down. We had proposed a 30-percent cut; they gave us 25 percent, and they delayed the start of that for several months.

The morning after the tax cut passed, the liberals there in the Congress started announcing that the program had failed. I borrowed their favorite word, ``fairness,'' and said that fairness required that they give us a little more time, like 24 months instead of 24 hours. And they made predictions then, more predictions than the TV weatherman. [Laughter] They said our program would guarantee double-digit inflation. They had left us an inflation rate of 12.4 percent. That has been knocked down to 3.5 percent for the last year, the lowest in 10 years. And for the last 6 months, it's been less than 2 percent. They said the program would push interest rates to a new record.

And then they got mean. They tried to cap the last installment of your tax cut. But yesterday morning, 55 to 45, the Republican Senate voted to give you the full 10-percent cut, beginning tomorrow morning. And it will be followed by indexing in 1985. If they had their way, they'd tax motherhood and apple pie.

You know, I never called it that. That wasn't my choice. I've always thought that what we put in operation there was the people's program, your program. And anyway, Reaganomics, that was better than taxonomics, and the last thing we need is more taxes for more spending. And if they can't get that straight, then I am prepared to veto their budget-busting appropriation bills, again and again and again.

Tax rates affect prices for working, saving, and investment. And when you raise the price of those productive activities, you get less of them and more activity in the underground economy and the tax shelters. And if you're in business, you know you can't force the public to buy products that aren't selling by raising the price. Too many in Washington and across the country still believe that we can raise more revenues from the economy by making it more expensive to work, save, and invest in the economy.

Do you know that since the capital gains tax rate was cut in 1978, Federal revenues from that tax have gone up in spite of the lower rate? And since the top rate of personal income tax was lowered from 70 to 50 percent in 1981, we're collecting more revenues from this consolidated 50-percent tax bracket than we were when it was 70 percent. And that's the secret of good taxes.

Doing what's right includes standing up for a strong national defense, making America second to none. We believe that what occurred during the last decade -- when the Soviets raced ahead militarily and we stood still -- was wrong. We believe it's immoral to ask the sons and daughters of America to protect this land with second-rate equipment and weapons that won't work.

We're not belligerent people. We've always sought peace. We occupy no country, we build no walls to keep our people in, we have no armies of secret police to keep them quiet. But we must understand, and our foes will do everything they can to divide us and to undermine our will. To keep our families safe, to keep our country at peace, the enemies of democracy must know that America has the courage to stay strong.

The security of the country, of course, depends on more than weapons. We must have the will to meet the challenges to our vital interests. What's going on now in Central America, only a few hundred miles from our shores, directly affects the United States' national security.

Panama Canal and the sealanes of the Caribbean, where we see construction in Cuba of a naval base from which Soviet nuclear submarines can now operate, a Soviet capacity for air reconnaissance over our eastern coast from Cuban bases, the building of an enormous war machine in Nicaragua aided by thousands of Cuban military personnel, sophisticated weapons, including Soviet-made tanks and arms from Cuba, the Soviet Union, the Eastern bloc, Libya, and the PLO to name a few.

And the Soviet-Cuban-Nicaraguan war machine is not being built to make Central America safe for democracy. It's not being built to pursue peace there or economic and social reform. It's being built to subvert the peace and impose communism by force, and not just in El Salvador or Nicaragua, but by their own boast, their open declaration, in all of Central America.

We've had a team of Congressmen come back just recently. They'd gone down there, both countries, to see what was going on for themselves. And many of them came to me personally when they got back to tell me they'd gone down with an idea that, maybe, we were wrong. They came back completely converted. They talked to young men, barely boys, in El Salvador, enlisting in the military. And when they said, ``Well, why are you doing this,'' they said, ``To defend our country. We love our country.'' And they talked to leaders on the other side and heard them boast that this was not a revolution in one country; this was a revolution for all of Central America. And they made open threats of where they were going and how they were going to get there.

I agree with those who insist on economic as well as military assistance to Central America. We're giving more than three times as much economic aid as we are military aid. The main point is United States security, the safety of American citizens. And that's why Central America matters so much. Either we pay a modest price now so we can prevent a crisis, or we listen to the do-nothings and risk an explosion of violence that will bring real danger to our own borders.

We must not turn our backs on our friends. We must not permit dictators to ram communism down the throats of innocent people in one country after another. If we're to be successful in helping the forces for democracy, then we must have the full financial package that we requested.

You know, the Soviet paper Pravda recently said something that I actually support. It said that peace in Central America is possible only on the basis of respect for the right of each people to choose itself its way of life. I would only add this: The two perfect places to begin are Cuba and Nicaragua, where free and democratic elections are not permitted.

You know, I've taken up the practice of learning jokes that are being told by the Russian people among themselves which reveal their cynicism about their own system. One of the more recent ones is -- this is the one that they're telling -- that if their government would permit another political party, they'd still be a one party country, because everybody would join the opposition.

But what we have in this country is the most precious gift that God has given to mankind. Our country, more than any other, has been blessed with liberty and abundance. And only a few years ago, some people were counting America out, claiming that our best days were behind us, that our country was in decline. Well, that pessimism is something else that we've turned around. We have an agenda for growth and security, and we can be proud of what we're doing.

Let us tell the people who we are and what we stand for. We're the party that fights for lower taxes, more opportunity, stable prices, a sound dollar, and peace through strength. We believe that standing up for America means also standing up for the God who has so blessed our land.

We're instituting modern business practices that are commonplace in the private sector but revolutionary in government. They will begin to pay off by the billions of dollars in savings over the next few years.

The President. First, I want to thank Il Giornale for its support and for its skillful efforts to explain to Italian readers the significant issues in American politics. Your newspaper has played a vital role in promoting understanding between our two countries.

But to turn to your question, my hopes for a second term must be seen in the light of our administration's accomplishments during this term. When we took office in 1980, the United States was a nation in crisis. Our defenses had grown weak. Our foreign policy lacked direction.

And with inflation well into double digits and interest rates at record highs, our economy was in its worst condition in more than three decades. We took office determined to make a new beginning, and we have managed to do just that.

A successful effort to repair past damage and a return to national strength, courage, and self-confidence -- these are the achievements of the first term. The stage has now been set for a second term that will place America on a firm footing for the future.

In financial policy, our top priority during the second term will be to get the Federal budget under complete control. That will mean attacking unnecessary government spending, passing amendments to the Constitution to require balanced budgets and give Presidents a line-item veto, and it will mean a sweeping reform of the tax code, giving Americans new incentives and simpler, fairer taxes.

America great -- values like faith, family, and freedom. We will support a constitutional amendment for voluntary, vocal prayer in our schools; we will work to pass tuition tax credits and education vouchers to make it easier for hard-working parents to send their children to the schools they believe suit them best; and we will make certain that our tax reform gives families the tax relief they need.

One other issue demands attention: We cannot remain true to values based on the dignity of human life while each year allowing over a million unborn infants to be aborted. Our administration will strive to put aside rancor and bring Americans together to find positive solutions to the tragedy of abortion.

In foreign policy, we will be guided by the twin principles of peace and freedom. Our administration will continue to keep American defense strong. At the same time, we will remain ready to negotiate with the Soviets, seeking not nuclear limitations, but equitable and verifiable nuclear arms reductions.

Under Project Democracy, we will go on teaching nations in the Third World about the benefits of democratic institutions. Communism used to be called the wave of the future. But after decades of experience with communism, the world knows that Communists have nothing to offer but economic stagnation, empty slogans, and arms. The free nations of the world, by contrast, offer rising standards of living and cultural vitality. No, the rising tide in the world today is not communism; it is liberty.

Q. Among the most debated topics in Europe is your economic policy, in particular, the so-called over-valued dollar. Many maintain that this damages the European economy, keeping the prices of primary goods high and attracting to the American market capital which could otherwise be invested in Europe. Will you continue this way or will you do something to help us?

The President. Our administration's economic policies do take account of Europe's and the world's economic problems -- and are contributing to their solution. Because the American economy is so large a part of the world economy, we believe our first responsibility is to get it into healthy shape and keep it that way. In this respect, our record of bringing down inflation and restoring noninflationary growth has been impressive. Today our economy is still advancing. Over the four quarters of 1983, we experienced real growth of 6.2 percent. For the four quarters of 1984, we are projecting 5-percent growth, but our achievement to date has even exceeded that.

The gross national product in the first 3 months of 1984 grew at a rate of 8.8 percent. Solid real growth has been accomplished in an environment of low inflation, improved productivity, and restored business profitability. We expect this economic activity to begin to slow and proceed at a more moderate pace during the year.

Capital is attracted to the United States, and the dollar rises in value for a host of reasons, including the better investment climate in the United States and a ``safe haven'' effect. Of course, a stronger dollar also encourages exports from other countries. The American merchandise trade deficit in 1983 of about $70 billion and a projected trade deficit of around $100 billion in 1984, which has unfortunate effects on our own economy, is providing a tremendous stimulant to European economies. I understand that Italy's economy is beginning to experience some export-led growth, and that is partly due to the American recovery and increased American imports. I believe that our economic policies represent a major contribution to a durable recovery in the United States, Europe, and throughout the world.

This strategy has been successful. There has been a resurgence of private initiative, millions of new jobs, and increased optimism for the future. I know that Italy is a country of extremely resourceful people. My basic advice would be to provide the freedom for private enterprise to flourish.

The President. The idea that we ``failed'' in Lebanon is simply wrong. We knew we were taking a risk when we became involved, but we and our allies thought it was important to give the Lebanese a chance to resolve their differences and begin to rebuild their country. We were right to try, even though things did not work out as we had hoped. Certainly, Italians should be proud of their peacekeeping accomplishments in Lebanon, and of the warmth with which your countrymen were received there.

The final outcome in Lebanon is still unclear. The Lebanese people may still find a way to achieve reconciliation. Meanwhile, the joint efforts of Italy, the United States, and our allied partners in Lebanon accomplished something else. On balance, we proved once more that we can cooperate effectively even in difficult and quickly evolving situations. This experience can only help us when we face future challenges together.

Q. Mr. President, Soviet propaganda has, in the last few years, attempted to divide Europe and the U.S. First, it aimed at European neutralism; more recently, it seems to me, it has aimed at American isolationism, that of the liberal-left. Europe, in spite of everything, has held firm. Are you sure that America, too, will hold fast and will not succumb to another hysterical crisis like that which caused the abandonment of Vietnam?

The President. First let me say how delighted I am that the allies have ignored Soviet efforts to divide them. Allied unity behind the 1979 two-track decision on intermediate-range nuclear weapons represented a dramatic reaffirmation of our common interests and collective strength.

As to whether America will hold fast, let's remember that the two-track decision on INF was originally a European initiative. It was intended to ensure the coupling of European and North American security. We supported that initiative unshakably because of our commitment to the security of Western Europe. That commitment will remain just as firm in years to come as it is today.

American women to provide with new opportunities and to make sure each woman has the freedom to choose her own role for herself. Our Ambassador to the United Nations, Jeane Kirkpatrick, has made an enormous contribution to her country and to our international relations.

And with the economic expansion our policies helped to produce, the unemployment rate among adult women has dropped steeply, businesses owned by women are multiplying, and women are rapidly moving into professional and managerial fields.

Now, I know there were polls that showed a so-called gender gap, but in other polls lately women have rated our administration ahead of my Democratic opponents. It only goes to show that there's just one poll that counts -- the poll taken on election day. During the coming campaign, we'll present our record to the people. And I'm confident that on November 6, American women will give our administration enthusiastic support.

From the early days of the American colonies, prayer in school was practiced and revered as an important way of expressing that faith. Then in 1962, the Supreme Court -- in a decision that many legal scholars and millions of Americans believe was sadly mistaken -- declared school prayer illegal. Once that happened, the only way to reinstate voluntary, vocal school prayer was by passing a constitutional amendment. My administration firmly supports such a step, and although the Senate recently defeated our school prayer amendment, the battle is far from over.

The American people understand that no country can remain strong and free when it has lost basic values like faith. By reinstating school prayer we would be declaring -- to our children, ourselves, and all the world -- that we have reasserted the right to observe fundamental beliefs that make our nation great. The people are making their will known, and I'm confident that one day soon a school prayer amendment will be ratified.

The President. The answer is simple: I don't like to leave a job half done. Despite all the accomplishments of the past 3\1/2\ years, we still have a great deal to do to prepare America for the future. Besides, I have a hunch that at 78, I'll still be young enough to enjoy the ranch for quite a few years to come.

Q. I will ask last, Mr. President, the question that everyone asks first: What can be done to lessen nuclear fear in the world? By unilateral disarmament or throughout the interminable negotiations with the Russians? By reinforcing conventional armaments? By giving free reign to new technologies which take from nuclear arms their current invincibility?

The President. Well, unilateral disarmament is clearly not the answer. History teaches us that wars begin when governments believe that the price of aggression is cheap. So, all of us in the alliance must be strong enough to convince any potential aggressor that attacking would be a disastrous mistake.

But strength and dialog go hand in hand. We're ready right now to resume the talks on strategic and intermediate-range nuclear weapons that the Soviets broke off, and whenever they come back to the table, we'll be ready to meet them halfway.

What we want in all our negotiations is agreements that reduce the risk of war. A big part of that is getting real reductions in nuclear weapons. We have proposed far-reaching cuts in strategic forces. We've put forward the zero option for intermediate-range missiles, but we're ready to accept an interim agreement that is balanced and verifiable. And we have proposed a number of confidence-building measures to reduce the possibility of miscalculation between the two sides.

Someday, I hope, we'll reach the point where nuclear weapons are obsolete. As you know, I've directed that, consistent with our treaty obligations, we step up research on technology that could be used in providing a defense against ballistic missiles. We will consult closely with our allies on this program.

Meanwhile, the Soviets keep increasing their forces, nuclear and conventional. Their conventional buildup, of course, threatens to lower the nuclear threshold. The West can and must use its technological superiority to ensure adequate forces for conventional defense. At the same time, in the Vienna MBFR talks we and our allies have just offered a creative proposal for significant, verifiable reductions to equal levels of all forces in central Europe. And in April, Vice President Bush went to Geneva to propose a draft treaty to outlaw chemical weapons once and for all.

There is no more serious subject in our world today than nuclear weapons, believe me. Americans and Italians, and our other friends and allies, must constantly seek ways to reduce the number of these weapons of mass destruction. I am committed to doing that and to reducing the nuclear tensions in our world. We can have no more compelling priority.

I just wanted to say that I leave with happy news for the economic summit as far as our own situation's concerned. The figures as of 12 minutes ago were released. Unemployment has dropped -- if we include the military -- down to 7.4 percent, which is the level it was when we took office; 7.5 percent if you do not count the military, which I think would be dishonest, because they certainly have jobs. But the other significant thing is that there are far more people working because we have created at the same time, millions of new jobs to take care of the expanding work force.

The President. Well, if you view the deficit by the percentage of gross national product -- I will be talking to people who also have deficits in pretty much the same percentage range of their gross national products as ours. So, they will understand the problems.

The President. Interest rates? Well, they're not connected to the deficit. If you look closely at the statistics, you'll see why, when the interest rates came down by 9 percent, is when the deficit was increasing to its largest point. No, the interest rates are tied to the lack of confidence of so many in the market, as to whether we are determined to hold down inflation. And, believe me, with inflation having been at less than 4 percent for the last 2 years, I think there's evidence that they should have more confidence.

We're beginning a mission to strengthen ties of friendship and cooperation among the world's leading democracies. It's our deepest hope and our earnest conviction that we can make genuine progress together toward a safer world, a more prosperous world, a far better world.

To be able to begin our journey on this isle of wondrous beauty, with a countryside green as no other place seems to be, to be able to stand on the soil of my ancestors among all of you is, for me, a very special gift. I want you to know that for this great-grandson of Ireland, this is a moment of joy.

America has always been a haven of opportunity for those seeking a new life. They, in turn, have given to us, they have shaped us and enriched us. And from the beginning, when that first large party of your ancestors arrived at Newport News in 1621, your Irish blood has enriched America.

With courage and determination, you helped our struggling colony break free. And then day by day, by the sweat of your brow and with an ache in your back, you helped turn our small, undeveloped country into a great and mighty nation. Your hearts and minds shaped our literary and cultural history. Your smiles, mirth, and song lifted our spirits with laughter and music. And always, you reminded us by your deep faith that wisdom and truth, love and beauty, grace and glory begin in Him -- our Father, our Creator, our loving God.

Today, the sons and daughters of our first Irish settlers number 40 million strong. Speaking for them, and even for those not so fortunate, may I say: We're still part of you; we have and will remain true to your values; long live Irish-American friendship.

Well, Ireland today is undertaking important responsibilities in international councils, and through your peacekeeping forces, to help reduce the risks of war. The United States bears a heavy burden for strengthening economic development and preserving peace, and we're deeply grateful for Ireland's contributions.

Americans are people of peace. We've known and suffered the trauma of war, witnessed the fruits of reconciliation. And that is why we pray tolerance and reconciliation will one day unite the Catholics and Protestants in Northern Ireland in a spirit of communion and community. And that is why those who advocate violence or engage in terrorism in North Ireland will never be welcome in the United States.

Looking to the future, I believe there's reason for optimism and confidence. America's economic expansion can and should bring more jobs and opportunities to your people. And the more than 300 United States companies that are based here demonstrate our clear commitment to a future of peace and well-being for all the people of Ireland, North and South.

I very much appreciate the honor that you've done me today. A degree, honorary though it may be, is a recognition of a certain understanding of culture and of the truths that are at the foundation of Western civilization. And a degree from an Irish university, in this respect, is of even greater significance.

College, Galway, Dr. O'hEocha for all that he has done and is doing to overcome the spiral of violence which has plagued Northern Ireland. As chairman of the New Ireland Forum, you helped to open honors -- or doors of opportunity for peace and reconciliation.

Progress will depend on other responsible leaders, in both parts of Ireland and in Great Britain, following your example. As far as the United States is concerned, we applaud all those who strove for constructive political cooperation and who renounce violence. We pray that men and women of good will in all parts of this land can, through mutual consent and consultation, find a way of bringing peace and harmony to this island that means so much to us.

It was here in Ireland that monks and scholars preserved the theological and classical achievements of the Western World during a time of darkness on the continent of Europe. With the triumph of St. Patrick and Christianity, Ireland emerged as one of the most learned countries of Europe, attracting students from distant lands and known for centuries as the Island of Saints and Scholars.

Well, he's a great son of Ireland and America as well, and I can say that, knowing that we have heartfelt differences of opinion. Yet, in free societies, differences are expected, indeed, encouraged. It is this freedom to disagree, to question, to state one's case even when in opposition to those in authority that is the cornerstone of liberty and human progress.

When I arrived in Shannon yesterday, I mentioned that I was not only returning to my own roots but also to those of my country's freedom. Historically, of course, no one can doubt Ireland's enormous contributions to American liberty. Nine of the signers of our Declaration of Independence were of Irish ancestry; four were born in Ireland. Twenty generals in our Revolutionary Army were of Irish ancestry. Generals Montgomery, Sullivan, Wayne, and others were in the thick of the battle. On Washington's personal staff were Generals Moylan and Fitzgerald. And on the high seas, Commodore John Barry, considered by many the father of the United States Navy, was born in County Wexford.

By the time of the American Revolution, Ireland was already a nation steeped in culture and historical traditions, a fact evidenced by your own city of Galway -- now my own city of Galway -- which is celebrating its 500th anniversary. Permit me to congratulate all of your citizens on this august occasion.

I'm afraid we have no communities quite so venerable as Galway in the United States. But what we lack in years we try to make up for and try hard in spirit. From the time of our independence until the present moment, the mainspring of our national identity has been a common dedication to the principles of human liberty. Further, we believe there's a vital link between our freedom and the dramatic progress -- the increase in our material well-being that we've enjoyed during these last 200 years.

Freedom motivates people of courage and creativity to strive, to improve, and to push back the boundaries of knowledge. Here, too, the Irish character has contributed so much. Galway, a city Columbus, as has been said already, is supposed to have visited on his way to the New World, is on a coast which for so long was the western edge, the frontier of the known world.

This is the 1,500th anniversary of the birth of St. Brendan, who, legend tells us, sailed west into uncharted waters and discovered new lands. This man of God, a man of learning whose monasteries were part of Ireland's Golden Age, may, indeed, have been the first tie between Ireland and America. I understand much time and effort has gone into organizing what will be an annual trans-Atlantic yacht race between Ireland and the United States commemorating Brendan's voyage. I commend those making this effort to establish what could prove to be an exciting new link between our two countries.

Whether Brendan reached the American Continent or not, there is no doubt about the Irish role in taming the wilderness of the New World and turning America into an economic dynamo beyond imagination. The Irish came by the millions, seeking refuge from tyranny and deprivation -- from hunger of the body and of the soul. Irish Americans worked in the factories. They built our railroads and, as with my family, settled and farmed the vast stretches of uncultivated prairie in the heartland of America.

The dream of a better life brought these people to our shores and millions of others from every corner of the world. They and their descendants maintain great pride in their ancestry -- but also to say thank you to your nation and to your people for all you contributed to the spirit and well-being of the United States of America.

We have instructed the appropriate agencies to put this into effect as soon as possible. We have a long tradition of academic cooperation; we'll strengthen it. And for our part, we intend to triple the number of students and scholars -- triple them -- in participating in the programs.

America in these last four decades has assumed a heavy burden of responsibility to help preserve peace and promote economic development and human dignity throughout the world. Sometimes, as is to be expected in all human endeavors, mistakes were made. Yet, overall, I believe that we have an admirable record.

There is something very important I want you to know, and then I will hasten on. The American people still hold dear those principles of liberty and justice for which our forefathers sacrificed so much. Visiting America you understand this -- and I hope that each of you will one day be able to do that.

Today the free world faces an enormously powerful adversary. A visit to that country or to its colonies would reveal no public disagreement, no right of assembly, no independent unions. What we face is a strong and aggressive military machine that prohibits fundamental freedoms.

I'll be speaking more on this in my speech to Parliament, but right now I think that I should cut short whatever I was going to say, because I would like to bring up a proclamation in which we are congratulating Galway on its 500th anniversary.

This is our greeting on the quincentennial from our country to your city. Let it hope in our hearts that we will always stand together. Brothers and sisters of Ireland, Dia libh go leir [God be with you all].

Columbus prayed at a church there on his way to the New World. For a thousand years, Ireland was considered the western edge of civilization and a place that continued to revere learning during a time of darkness on the continent of Europe.

That reverence earned Ireland its reputation as the Island of Saints and Scholars. I was pleased to address representatives of University College in Galway to speak to them of Ireland's many contributions to America and to give thanks for those great, great forces of faith and love for liberty and justice that bind our people.

Forum, which has sought to foster a spirit of tolerance and reconciliation in Northern Ireland, so the spiral of violence that has cast so many innocent lives there -- or cost so many, I should say, can be finally ended.

And let me make one thing very plain: A strong NATO is no threat to the Soviet Union. NATO is the world's greatest peace movement. It never threatens; it defends. And we will continue trying to promote a better dialog with the Soviet Union. The Soviets could gain much by helping us make the world safer, particularly through arms reductions. That would free them to devote more resources to their people and economy.

Growth and prosperity will occupy our attention when we return to London for the annual economic summit of the major industrialized countries. And we'll be marking another important anniversary: 50 years ago, America's leaders had the vision to enact legislation known as the Reciprocal Trade Agreements Act of 1934. It helped bring an end to a terrible era of protectionism that nearly destroyed the world's economies.

We'll talk about how best to maintain the recent progress that has lifted hopes for a worldwide recovery for our common prosperity. You can be proud that the strength of the United States economy has led the way. I believe continued progress lies with freer trade and more open markets. Less protectionism will mean more progress, more growth, more jobs, a bigger slice of the pie for everyone.

In the business that I formerly was in, I would have to say this is a very difficult spot -- to be introduced to you who have waited so patiently -- following this wonderful talent that we've seen here. And I should have gone on first, and then you should have followed -- [laughter] -- to close the show. But thank you very much.

Nancy and I are most grateful to be with you here today, and I'll take a chance and say, muintir na hEireann [people of Ireland]. Did I get it right? [Applause] All right. Well, it's difficult to express my appreciation to all of you. I feel like I'm about to drown everyone in a bath of nostalgia. Of all the honors and gifts that have been afforded me as President, this visit is the one that I will cherish dearly. You see, I didn't know much about my family background -- not because of a lack of interest, but because my father was orphaned before he was 6 years old. And now thanks to you and the efforts of good people who have dug into the history of a poor immigrant family, I know at last whence I came. And this has given my soul a new contentment. And it is a joyous feeling.

You see, my father, having been orphaned so young, he knew nothing of his roots also. And, God rest his soul, I told the Father, I think he's here, too, today, and very pleased and happy to know that this is whence he came.

Robert Frost, a renowned American poet, once said, ``Home is the place where, when you have to go there, they have to take you in.'' [Laughter] Well, it's been so long since my great-grandfather set out that you don't have to take me in. So, I'm certainly thankful for this wonderful homecoming today. I can't think of a place on the planet I would rather claim as my roots more than Ballyporeen, County Tipperary.

My great-grandfather left here in a time of stress, seeking to better himself and his family. From what I'm told, we were a poor family. But my ancestors took with them a treasure, an indomitable spirit that was cultivated in the rich soil of this county.

Perhaps this is God's way of reminding us that we must always treat every individual, no matter what his or her station in life, with dignity and respect. And who knows? Someday that person's child or grandchild might grow up to become the Prime Minister of Ireland or President of the United States.

Looking around town today, I was struck by the similarity between Ballyporeen and the small town in Illinois where I was born, Tampico. Of course, there's one thing you have that we didn't have in Tampico. We didn't have a Ronald Reagan Lounge in town. [Laughter] Well, the spirit is the same, this spirit of warmth, friendliness, and openness in Tampico and Ballyporeen, and you make me feel very much at home.

What unites us is our shared heritage and the common values of our two peoples. So many Irish men and women from every walk of life played a role in creating the dream of America. One was Charles Thompson, Secretary of the Continental Congress, and who designed the first Great Seal of the United States. I'm certainly proud to be part of that great Irish American tradition. From the time of our revolution when Irishmen filled the ranks of the Continental Army, to the building of the railroads, to the cultural contributions of individuals like the magnificent tenor John McCormack and the athletic achievements of the great heavyweight boxing champion John L.

Irish men and women can be proud, an organization that this year is celebrating its 100th anniversary: the Gaelic Athletic Association. I understand it was formed a hundred years ago in Tipperary to foster the culture and games of traditional Ireland. Some of you may be aware that I began my career as a sports announcer -- a sports broadcaster, so I had an early appreciation for sporting competition. Well, congratulations to all of you during this GAA centennial celebration.

Kickham. The Irish identity flourished in the United States. Irish men and women proud of their heritage can be found in every walk of life. I even have some of them in my Cabinet. One of them traces his maternal roots to Mitchellstown, just down the road from Ballyporeen. And he and I have almost the same name. I'm talking about Secretary of the Treasury Don Regan.

The bond between our two countries runs deep and strong, and I'm proud to be here in recognition and celebration of our ties that bind. My roots in Ballyporeen, County Tipperary, are little different than millions of other Americans who find their roots in towns and counties all over the Isle of Erin. I just feel exceptionally lucky to have this chance to visit you.

Reagans, having in the meantime failed in a bid for the High Kingship of Ireland -- you made it on a second try, playing on a different field -- had become less powerful. And fortunately for us, because I doubt if my family could have bought themselves out of a Reagan jail at that price.

An independent Irish State has come into existence that is now respected by the nations of the world. Literature in the English language has since been transformed by towering Irish figures such as Shaw and Wilde, Yeats, and Joyce. And the grinding poverty in which our people lived three generations back has been replaced by a modest prosperity, as you will have seen traveling through Mayo and Galway and Tipperary and flying over other counties.

Most significantly for the future, the last decade has seen the growth in Ireland of high technology industry -- the vast bulk of it the fruit of U.S. investment here, now in total amounting to over $4 billion and employing one in six of our manufacturing labor force. Ireland's share of Europe's high technology activity is now totally disproportionate to our size and population. We are well on the way to becoming a Silicon Valley in Europe, as your investors match their inventiveness with the special skills and enthusiasm of our dynamic, well-educated labor force -- the youngest in Europe.

There is, of course, another side to this picture -- one of heavy umemployment as the worldwide recession, now lifting in your country, continues to take its toll in Europe and, particularly, in this island. And we also have our own specific economic and financial problems. We'll have an opportunity to discuss some of these issues together tomorrow.

But worst of all, we have within this island a conflict that threatens the peace and stability of this corner of Europe, one that has brought tragedy to thousands of homes in Northern Ireland and to many here, also, and in Britain. This is a conflict of two traditions, two identities in this island, but first and foremost, within Northern Ireland.

You are aware, Mr. President, of the work of the New Ireland Forum, launched in this great hall, and you have commented supportively on it. The New Ireland Forum made only one set of proposals in its report. It used the word ``proposes'' only once. It proposes, as necessary elements of a framework within which a new Ireland could emerge, a set of requirements, a list of ``musts,'' centered on the need to accommodate each of the two Irish traditions equally satisfactorily in new structures. I'm deliberately availing of this important occasion to emphasize this point, because it has, perhaps, not been fully understood.

The Forum goes on to express the belief -- the belief, not the demand -- of nationalists that unity offers the best solution and our further preference that the particular form of unity we would wish to see established is a unitary state, achieved by agreement and consent. That is our belief, our strong preference; it is not a demand. We set out our best arguments in favor of this preference, but we also set out the arguments in favor of two quite different alternatives that we considered: a federal-confederal state and joint authority. And most significantly of all, we committed ourselves to being open to discuss other views which may contribute to political development. Nothing, I believe, could be more open than that approach.

The report of the New Ireland Forum is, as I have said, an agenda, not a blueprint. We know that you and our European friends want, in an appropriate way, to help to end this tragedy. The people of Northern Ireland have suffered far too much. They deserve and they need our help and yours.

You will forgive me, Mr. President, for having dwelt for some minutes on a problem that is so close to our hearts, so ever-present to our minds. It is, alas, only one of the many problems of violence and threats of violence in the world today -- problems to which you and I will be turning our thoughts together tomorrow morning.

Dominating everything, of course, is the issue of East-West relations, the arms race and, in particular, the nuclear menace that threatens life on this planet. Here, above all, as we have indeed been discussing together the last few minutes, there's an absolute need for dialog between the superpowers, for the reopening of channels of communication that have become clogged, for the creation, if it can be achieved, of the kind of trust and confidence upon which alone world peace can be built. We look forward to hearing you speak on aspects of these problems to the joint session of the Houses of Oireachtas [Parliament] tomorrow.

Ireland is a small country with a nightmare past. More than most people, therefore, we are deeply concerned at the violent tyranny that tears apart small countries like Afghanistan, at the repression that seeks to still the powerful instinct for freedom in Eastern European countries like Poland, and at the deprivation of human rights in so many countries of Latin America. With many of these Latin American countries our people have close emotional ties through the work of our priests and nuns and lay helpers there who seek to relieve the poverty of the people and to give them back their dignity of which they've been deprived by oppressive regimes. Our people's deep concern is that these problems be resolved peacefully by the people of the region themselves -- in Central America, along the lines proposed by the Contadora countries. In this connection, I might add that many people in Ireland have been most heartened by the news of Secretary Shultz's visit to Nicaragua on Friday last and hope that this may lead to the restoration of normal relations between that small state and your great country, thus enhancing the climate for peace and democracy in that troubled region.

Community by admitting Spain and Portugal as members and to complete the negotiations for the new convention between the EEC and the African, Caribbean, Indian Ocean, and Pacific countries. We should also be seeking during this Presidency to secure agreement to a more coherent organization of the economic policies of our member States so as to take fuller advantage of the recovery that has been taking place in the United States. Hopefully, this task may be made somewhat easier by the discussions that you will be having with other major economic powers in London this week.

Community to establish and get working the new system of political consultation between Europe and America that had been decided upon in the previous year, so in this new Irish Presidency we shall endeavor to reconcile economic differences between Europe and America and to secure a greater convergence of views on foreign policy issues.

There are few tasks that the Irish Government could look forward to with as much enthusiasm or commitment. After all, our own relations with your great country are based first on human considerations, on people, rather than on the cold concerns of policy. It is on that human dimension, on such old, enduring, and unquenchable friendships that the hope of our world can best rely today.

The President. Prime Minister and Mrs. FitzGerald, my Irish friends, Nancy and I are delighted to be here in the homeland of my ancestors and delighted to be with all of you this evening. The magnificent green of your hills and meadows, likewise, the warmth and kindredship of your people during our visit has touched us deeply. May I offer in return a heartfelt thank you from both Nancy and me.

We all know the Irish names and the lists of their achievements in our government, going all the way back to our Revolutionary history. Not only have Ireland's own had great impact on America, but the opposite has also been true.

On the other side of the coin, individuals significant to the development of Irish liberty were much affected by what was happening in America. Daniel O'Connell, a nationalist hero and a true humanitarian, was influenced by our great pamphleteer, Thomas Paine. And the great parliamentarian, Charles Stewart Parnell, journeyed to America as a youth, a journey which may well have colored his political views of the world. And, of course, Eamon de Valera, your third President, was actually born in the United States.

And yet, with our countries so close, there are some influences we're not so proud of. And I believe I speak for all Americans of Irish descent who now hold elected office when I join you in condemning any misguided American who supports terrorists in Northern Ireland. I want to offer my thanks to Prime Minister FitzGerald for his strong stand on this issue. When he last visited Washington, he articulated a message of conviction and courage and, by doing so, I'm sure has saved some innocent lives.

The American people overwhelmingly support peaceful efforts to reconcile the differences between the two traditions on this island. We pray there will be a new dawn, that it will come soon, when both Catholics and Protestants in Northern Ireland can live in the sunlight of a peaceful and just society.

We're following, with keen interest, the efforts that your government has been making, and we wish you success. We especially welcome the hard work and thought that went into the New Ireland Forum's report. We hope it will strengthen Anglo-Irish cooperation in resolving the Northern Ireland problem through a peaceful reconciliation.

As peacekeepers, working within the structure of the United Nations, you've taken great risks for peace. Your bilateral development assistance to less fortunate countries is a tribute to your generosity and your humanitarianism, as is the personal dedication of Irish men and women engaged in voluntary service throughout the world.

Ireland has had an active and respected role in the European Community. We look forward to consulting closely with your government during Ireland's forthcoming Presidency of the European Community Commission. Ireland has always promoted an open and meaningful dialog between the United States and the member States of the Community, and I know we can count on a continuation of that fine and very practical tradition.

That Thomas Paine that I mentioned a moment ago said -- and I think that all of us should take this to heart -- he said that the opportunity is ours; we have it in our power to start the world over again. And I think we share another ideal. What is our goal when we talk of ideologies and philosophies? It is one, very simple: the ultimate in individual freedom consistent with an orderly society. That is our goal.

For Americans, the very mention of Ireland holds a magical sense of allure. It brings to mind images of green pastures, rugged highlands, and wide lakes -- like Lough Conn, Corrib, Killarney -- images of a lovely village square in Galway, or the graceful Georgian architecture here in Dublin. Perhaps what strikes Americans most when they visit Ireland is that yours is a land of many faces -- a face of rich and unparalleled beauty, a face of a proud and glorious past, and a face of a young, and bright, and hopeful future.

More than eight centuries before Columbus discovered the New World, Irish monasteries were great centers of faith and learning. Scholars from all over Europe came here to study theology, philosophy, Greek, and Latin. Your ancestors created stunning illuminated manuscripts, including a book many consider the most beautiful ever made, the Book of Kells.

Today, you and your sons and daughters are making Ireland young again -- young in your spirit of hope and faith in the future; young in your determination to create new opportunities and attract new technologies to help your economy along. And you're young in heart, ready to give and forgive, and ready to reach out in goodness and friendship and love.

Now, our own country of course remains a young nation simply because it is a young nation. Only a few centuries have passed since the first settlers landed on our eastern shores. And they and those who followed them came from virtually every nation on Earth. By 1900 nearly 4 million had come from Ireland alone. They cleared the land, built towns, established legislatures. They created a new and distinctly American way of life, and yet they continued to cherish memories of their homelands. Today Ireland and the United States share a living bond: the many Irish people who have cousins in America, and the 40 million Americans of Irish descent who always keep a special place for this island in our hearts.

Our two countries share a second bond -- a bond of fundamental beliefs and enduring values. And as Ireland works to foster international understanding in this troubled world, you'll have the admiration, the respect, and the support of the United States. We pledge our unremitting effort for the cause of peace with freedom and human dignity.

I would like to thank you for your kind words, for your invitation to Maeve and to me to be here, and to thank you and Mrs. Reagan for arranging this very happy occasion. I'm sure everybody here would wish to thank you both personally, if time allowed, because for us it is a really happy occasion.

We will, when you have left, wonder after your all too brief visit -- we'll reflect on the personal and official reasons and aspects of your visit and what made it such a success. And I think I'd start off by saying that you brought to us a cheerful atmosphere, which Europe is badly in want of.

I suppose it's safe to say that if anybody in the free world has cause to look worried and overburdened, it's you, Mr. President. And still you come among us with courageous cheerfulness, showing us the way you're going and assuring and reassuring our people and the people of the world. And I thank you for doing that.

Your search for Irish roots has obviously been an important consideration for you and for us. It goes straight to the heart of the relationship between this country and the United States of America. We have our friends and relations in your country, and you have yours here.

Your visit, Mr. President, has consolidated the special friendship which exists between Ireland and the United States. Your presence among us testifies to that special friendship -- a friendship which has endured and grown and become more, not less important with the passage of time, and moving away from the original links of history. It is based on blood and kinship and reinforced by the bedrock of shared beliefs and ideals.

Ireland shares with the United States of America a profound respect for the rights of the individual, for the abiding worth of democracy and for the dignity of the human person. The tyranny of flying time compels me to omit reference to very many aspects of our friendship and ties at official and unofficial levels. Some, but not all have been referred to and recalled over the past 3 days. Suffice it to say that the bonds which bind us are many and strong and enduring.

The best guarantee of ensuring the permanence of such a happy relationship is in the best tradition of old friends -- is to visit more often. With that in mind, Mr. President, I hope that you and Mrs.

The President. Your warmth has touched our hearts. You've made this traveler feel like one of the family. Now it's time to say goodby, and as I leave, I feel such a tug, and I want to stay with you and laugh and talk some more. There's something in your country that makes the American Irish feel like exiles when they leave as if they're leaving a part of themselves behind.

This is my third visit to your country. I remember my first, 35 years ago. Oh, I was just a lad at the time. [Laughter] I walked the streets of Dublin, and I went by the Abbey Theatre. And I stayed at the Gresham, strolled down O'Connell Street, and saw the bullet marks on the old Post Office. And that night, I followed the sound of music to the entrance of a ballroom there at the hotel. And I peered in and was told that it was a university dance. And all the young men were dressed in white tie and tails, the young women were all in flowing white gowns, and they were doing a whirling waltz. And it was so graceful and so beautiful, it looked like it should have been a scene in some very expensive musical movie. And I wished the world would just slow down a little and make room -- more room for such graciousness.

When I came back to Ireland a few years ago, I went out to the west and saw the ruins of the chapel where they say St. Patrick raised the first cross on Irish soil. And nearby, there was a well fed by underground springs from a hill far away. And they told me then, just as we were looking, our guide said it's a wishing well. Well, I should just say that Nancy and I threw in some coins and made a wish. The truth of the matter is we had been in six other countries before we got there. I had a dime and a penny in my pocket. She threw the dime and I threw the penny, and we went home with empty pockets. But we did make a wish. And a few days ago when we landed in Shannon again, our wish came true.

Washington. By my calculations, that will be in January of 1989. [Laughter] Though I won't make that a promise, because I understand there is some disagreement on whether that should be the date or not. But when I come back, I'll be able to stay longer, and I hope able to see all of you again.

This year, thousands of Americans are returning to the Normandy shores to revisit the scene of that momentous landing 40 years ago. This week hundreds are, like myself, guests in your country as we join in remembering that day. On behalf of all Americans, I thank you for your gracious hospitality.

America bear his name. A beautiful park that I look out upon each day -- directly across the street from the White House in Washington -- is named in honor of him. He was the Marquis de Lafayette, and he served with George Washington as a general in the American Revolutionary Army. Yet despite the importance of Lafayette's military skill, he took a step as a legislator that had perhaps even greater significance for the two centuries of friendship and alliance between your country and mine.

On July 11th, 1789, as a Deputy in the French National Assembly, Lafayette introduced a bill calling for the passage of a Declaration of the Rights of Man. Formally adopted by the assembly 6 weeks later, the Declaration appeared as the Preamble to the French Constitution of 1791. This Declaration of the Rights of Man embodied the same fundamental beliefs about human liberty as those expressed in the American Declaration of Independence and Bill of Rights. Together, those French and American documents proclaim that all men are endowed with equal and sacred rights, that among these, in the words of the American Declaration, are ``Life, Liberty and the pursuit of Happiness.'' It is this shared commitment to human freedom that has formed the bedrock on which our fast friendship has been built. And it was in the name of this human freedom that so many brave men risked their lives on the beaches of Normandy 40 years ago.

Your country and mine belong to an alliance committed to democracy, individual liberty, and the rule of law. Of course, membership in the alliance imposes its burdens. To demonstrate the American commitment to this continent, thousands of American troops are stationed here in Europe, far from their homes and families. France, the United States, and all the alliance nations, must spend more on defense than any of us like to do in peacetime. But the burdens we bear in defending our freedom are far less than the horrors we would have to endure if we lost that freedom.

I believe that the best way we can honor those who gave so much 40 years ago, is by rededicating ourselves today to the cause for which they fought: freedom -- freedom for ourselves, freedom for our children, and freedom for generations yet unborn.

I understand that your group is composed of Members of Parliament who were elected for the first time last June. And please accept my congratulations on the honor you've been accorded in joining the Mother of Parliaments. As younger Members of the House of Commons, you've reached maturity in a divided world. You may have heard that I come from a slightly older generation. Ours lived as adults through the most severe test in history for freedom-loving people.

So, I'm very gratified to see that those vital lessons learned by my generation -- lessons about the wisdom of collective defense and about the need for allied strength and unity to defend free institutions -- have been learned as well by all of you.

Today in Europe, peace through strength is not a slogan; it is a fact of life. There is another important lesson we've learned: While we remain strong, we must always be ready for reconciliation, ready to resolve differences with our adversaries and resolve them peacefully at the negotiating table.

I want you and your fellow citizens in Britain to know the United States is seeking, and we will continue to seek, cooperation with the Soviet Union to make our world a safer place. Continued public support for collective security in all NATO countries is absolutely essential. I thank you for all that you're doing to foster that support. You can be proud that you're members of a fraternity within the free nations who have assumed the heavy burden of working for both peace and liberty.

Just recently in Washington, I met with 16 Foreign Ministers that make up the alliance. And I couldn't help but think, as we sat around the table, there has never in history been such an alliance, dedicated to the preservation of peace and freedom.

Mr. Cronkite. Mr. President, it's quite a day out here. We're observing the fact that American soldiers can do the impossible as represented here at Pointe du Hoc when they're commanded to, but, on the other hand, at a terrible cost, isn't it?

The President. Well, I doubt that any war can be -- if we really describe it, can be popular. No one wants it. But here was a case in which the issues of right and wrong were so clearly defined and delineated before we even got into the war. And then we didn't choose to pull the trigger; the trigger was pulled at us. And we were in a war as of a Sunday morning, December 7th, in the Pacific.

Mr. Cronkite. You know, now we're in the nuclear age, and as terrible as this war was, is it possible in a nuclear age that we would have another war that could be restricted to anything as horrible as this even?

The President. Walter, I have said, and will continue to say, a nuclear war cannot be won. It must never be fought. And this is why the goal must be to rid the world once and for all of those weapons.

But it was never used, because everyone had it. Maybe the same thing would apply in -- with regard to nuclear war. But why take that chance? If everybody is having the weapons as a deterrent to the other, then let's do away with the deterrents.

Mr. Cronkite. Do you -- you had some remarks prepared. I don't think you got a chance to deliver them in a foreshortened speech in Ireland in which you said that you were optimistic that perhaps we could get nuclear limitation talks going again with the Soviets. What gives you cause for that optimism?

The President. I just think common sense. I think right now the Soviet Union is -- well, there was an article in The Economist that sort of described it. They're hibernating. We're so used to thinking that they're always in the midst of some kind of devious plan. I just don't think they have any answers right now, and they're sort of hunkered down trying to decide.

The President. Yes, and the plan is to -- we have maintained contact. We're negotiating other things of mutual interest to the two countries, making some progress on them. But on those talks -- my idea of the goal is if we can once start down the road of achieving reductions in the armaments, I just have to believe that we'll see the common sense in continuing down the road and eliminating them.

Mr. Cronkite. Have you had a chance with your busy schedule on this tour to catch up with the fact that the Soviets on this anniversary, the 40th anniversary of D-day, are making much of the fact that they've cited before -- a fact, I mean, by their token, of the fiction that we deliberately delayed this landing by 2 years in order that the Germans would eat up the Soviets by attrition, and that we came ashore virtually unopposed because of connivance with the Germans. Have you heard that they're repeating that all over Europe?

The President. I wonder sometimes, when they talk about heated rhetoric coming from me, doesn't anyone listen to what they're saying? But how anyone could say that this was an almost unopposed landing, we know better. And the evidence is right here; and the survivors, many of them, are right here.

They had not won the war, and we had not delayed for any reason of that kind. I have some reason for saying that, because my own war service was spent in a unit that was directly under Air Corps Intelligence, and we had access to all the intelligence information about things, even including this. And there was an awful lot of war to be fought.

Greetings to all of you, the officers and men of the U.S.S. Eisenhower. Believe me, all of us up here are inspired by the sight of your magnificent ship and the battle group which accompanied you to the coast of Normandy.

We're returning from a commemoration of the 40th anniversary of the D-day landing -- the heroic operation that was planned and commanded by General Dwight D. Eisenhower. The memory of ``Ike,'' our great allied leader, still inspires heroic efforts on both sides of the Atlantic.

Today, as 40 years ago, our Navy and all of our Armed Forces are advancing the cause of peace and freedom. The dedication of you, our sailors and marines, particularly during your recent deployment in the Eastern Mediterranean, is in the highest tradition of the service.

The American people and our allies in Europe and beyond are all more secure because men of your caliber are on station when and where needed. Admiral Flatley, Captain Clexton, officers and men of the ``Ike'' -- I salute you for your devoted service to the cause of freedom.

He is a member of the National Academy of Engineering and a fellow of the Institute of Electrical and Electronic Engineers. He is on the board of directors of the Semiconductor Industry Association and is chairman of the Semiconductor Research Cooperative.

July 3, 1958, as amended, and my written approval, authorization, and determination concerning the agreement. The joint unclassifed letter submitted to me by the Secretaries of Energy and Defense which provides a summary position on the Amendment is also enclosed. A classified letter and attachments are being transmitted directly to the appropriate Congressional committees.

The Amendment extends for ten years (until December 31, 1994) provisions which permit the transfer of nonnuclear parts, source, by-product, special nuclear materials, and other material and technology for nuclear weapons and military reactors.

In my judgment, the proposed Amendment meets all statutory requirements. The United Kingdom intends to continue to maintain viable nuclear forces. In light of our previous close cooperation and the fact that the United Kingdom has committed its nuclear forces to NATO, I have concluded that it is in our interest to continue to assist them in maintaining a credible nuclear force.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventh day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

We, the Heads of State or Government of seven major industrial democracies with the President of the Commission of the European Communities, assembled in London for the Tenth Economic Summit meeting, affirm our commitment to the values which sustain and bring together our societies.

Governments to set conditions in which there can be the greatest possible range and freedom of choice and personal initiative; in which the ideals of social justice, obligations and rights can be pursued; in which enterprise can flourish and employment opportunities can be available for all; in which all have equal opportunities of sharing in the benefits of growth and there is support for those who suffer or are in need; in which the lives of all can be enriched by the fruits of innovation, imagination and scientific discovery; and in which there can be confidence in the soundness of the currency. Our countries have the resources and will jointly to master the tasks of the new industrial revolution.

Public expenditure has to be kept within the limits of what our national economies can afford. We welcome the increasing attention being given to these problems by national governments and in such international bodies as the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD).

We reaffirm our willingness to conduct our relations with them in a spirit of goodwill and co-operation. To this end we have asked Ministers of Finance to consider the scope for intensified discussion of international financial issues of particular concern to developing countries in the IBRD Development Committee, an appropriate and broadly representative forum for this purpose.

We attach major importance to the special action programme for Africa, which is being prepared by the World Bank and should provide renewed impetus to the joint efforts of the international community to help.

Gulf for the supply of oil. We are satisfied that, given the stocks of oil presently available in the world, the availability of other sources of energy, and the scope for conservation in the use of energy, adequate supplies could be maintained for a substantial period of time by international co-operation and mutually supportive action. We will continue to act together to that end.

Employment created by the Versailles Economic Summit, and the progress made in the eighteen areas of co-operation, and invite the Group to pursue further work and to report to Personal Representatives in time for the next Economic Summit. We also welcome the invitation of the Italian Government to an international conference to be held in Italy in 1985 on the theme of technological innovation and the creation of new jobs.

Declaration. We noted that the world oil market has remained relatively stable. We believe that the international system has both the will and the capacity to cope with any foreseeable problems through the continuation of the prudent and realistic approach that is already being applied.

Greetings from London. As you probably know, Nancy and I have been in Europe for 8 days, visiting Ireland, commemorating the 40th anniversary of D-day at Normandy, and now meeting with the leaders of the major industrialized democracies at the economic summit to strengthen the basis for freedom, prosperity, and peace.

Change comes neither easily nor quickly in foreign affairs. Finding solutions to critical global problems requires lengthy and sustained efforts, the kind we've been making ever since my first economic summit in Ottawa in 1981. Those efforts are now paying off as we reap the benefits of sound policies. Think back 4 years -- America was weak at home and abroad. Remember double-digit inflation, 20-percent interest rates, zero growth, and those never-ending excuses that such misery would be part of our lives for years to come. And remember how our foreign policy invited Soviet aggression and expansion in Afghanistan, Central America, and Africa. Entire countries were lost. Doubts spread about America's leadership in defense of freedom and peace.

Well, a lot has changed. Today America stands taller in the world. At home we've made a fundamental change in direction -- away from bigger and bigger government, toward more power and incentives for people; away from confusion and failure, toward progress through commitment to the enduring values of Western civilization; away from weakness and instability, toward peace through strength and a willingness to negotiate.

Together with our allies, we've tried to adopt a similar strategy for progress abroad -- guided by realism, by common values and interests, and by confidence that we will not remain prisoners of fear and a disappointing past. We can and will move forward to better days.

Later in the year I traveled to Japan and Korea to emphasize the importance we attached to the dynamic Pacific region. Here too, we faced tough problems, particularly in trade with Japan. But Prime Minister Nakasone is a man of vision and strength, who has worked hard with me to iron out our differences, and we've made progress. Japan has opened up its trading and financial markets and moved to increase its defense expenditures, so vital to preserving peace and freedom in the Pacific Basin. This will mean more U.S. jobs and greater security for both our nations.

In April I returned to the Pacific region to visit China. Our relations have steadily improved and our visit capped important agreements that will stimulate U.S. exports to China as we cooperate with them to modernize their economy.

Stronger growth means more jobs with the U.S. economy leading the way. We've created more than 6 million jobs in the last 18 months, and we're venturing into new, promising areas. We've offered our summit partners the opportunity to participate with us in the development of our manned space station. An international space station will stimulate technological development, strengthen our economies, and improve the quality of life into the next century.

I've stressed in London that continued progress will require new determination to carry out our common strategy for prosperity and peace. We must summon courage. We must continue with action to curb inflation by reducing unnecessary spending, spur greater growth by reducing regulation, trade barriers, and personal income tax rates. And, yes, we must be prepared for peace by strengthening NATO's ability to deter war, while making clear we're prepared to reduce nuclear weapons dramatically as soon as the Soviets are ready to work with us on this all-important goal.

This has been a year of progress, a year when we and our friends in Europe and the Pacific set aside differences and united as great democracies should be with shared vision and values. That progress, stretching beyond America from the Pacific Basin to a strengthened Atlantic Alliance, is a source of hope for a more prosperous and safer world.

This has been a productive week and, looking back, a particularly busy year for the Atlantic alliance, and a most successful one. Despite Soviet propaganda and attempts at intimidation, NATO has remained unified and strong. And we can be thankful and proud that NATO's determination to defend Europe, defend our freedom, and, yes, defend the peace.

The summit that we just concluded demonstrates the unity of the Western industrialized nations, the enduring strength of our shared vision and values, and our resolve to advance our common interests. And so, today I leave London; I am leaving with renewed confidence that the future belongs to the free and that our great democracies can meet the challenges before us. Together, we can protect peace with liberty, create greater prospects for growth, move toward more free and open trading markets, and build an era of progress for the eighties, spreading opportunities and benefits to people throughout the world.

Sometimes people become so absorbed in day-to-day problems they forget the big picture. But step back a moment and consider the progress that we've made. In '81, the economies of the seven major industrialized nations represented here at the summit had an average growth rate of 1.8 percent, with an 8\1/2\-percent inflation. Today, our average growth rate has risen to 4 percent, while inflation has been cut in half. And in our own country, we've created more than 6 million jobs in the last 18 months.

Q. Mr. President, in the big picture of our relations with the Soviet Union, you've made a lot of appeals for them to come back to the table; you embraced a new proposal at Stockholm -- but there doesn't seem to be any movement at all. What evidence is there that the Soviets are prepared in any way to negotiate with the United States or with any of the Western powers?

The President. Well, we're so accustomed to viewing the Soviets as engaged in various kinds of machinations and so forth, it's beginning to occur to some of us that maybe the silence is because they don't know what to say right now. So, we'll let them -- after all, you know, this is the third leader in the period that I've been in office here. Let them make up their minds what it is, and we will keep the door open for anytime that they want to come back.

Q. Mr. President, the communique says that you'll go anywhere anytime with no preconditions to negotiate with the Soviet Union. Does that mean you will negotiate underground testing, antisatellite treaties, and the Star Wars shield?

The President. There is one thing we have that we want on the table, and that is also that there will be a recognition of the need for adequate verification. Now, the antisatellite thing is one that is the easiest thing to hide in the world -- and it's going forward in that -- with the possible exception of chemical warfare. So, on our part, they know that we want to be sure that we can come together on some reasonable verifications so we won't live in suspicion of each other. And whatever they want to bring up in these others, we'll be happy to see it.

Q. Mr. President, everywhere you went on this trip there were big crowds supporting you, but there were also tens of thousands of demonstrators opposing your policy on nuclear arms. Why, despite all of your efforts and all of your speeches in recent months, do so many people still oppose your policies in this area?

The President. Well, I don't take credit for all of the demonstrators being there for me. I don't think yesterday picked out any single individual. I think we all felt that we were being -- but isn't that sort of -- doesn't that go with the territory anymore, that wherever we go or governmental people go, figures go, or even if they don't go there, demonstrations have become a fact of life.

And I wasn't too conscious of them -- here and there, yesterday was the major demonstration, of course, but I don't think they're speaking for a majority. And I think sometimes they're unreasoning, in that as yesterday, hadn't any of them stopped to think that no one is demonstrating and they're not demonstrating in the nation that has the most nuclear weapons of all.

Q. Mr. President, the summit leaders, you and the other leaders, confronted three very urgent economic problems -- high American interest rates, the threat of default by debtor countries, and the possibility of an oil cutoff -- and came up with solutions for none of these three. Couldn't the American taxpayers wonder whether this was really worth the time and money you spent?

The President. Oh, I disagree with that, that we didn't come up with answers for any of them. We had very thorough discussions of all of these problems, and we came to great agreement about how you go forward now in dealing with these problems. They aren't problems that you suddenly say, here, we will automatically do this if something else happens. We have a general agreement about the necessity of us all staying together in the event of another oil crisis for two reasons: not only to see that we don't have economic breakdowns in countries because of the lack of energy, but also that we do not see the panic increase in prices, that has occurred before, which could set back the recovery that's taking place in every one of our countries. But all of those things we dealt with.

Q. Well, sir, just to follow -- you said that there was agreement. But there was certainly no agreement on interest rates. You were the only one of the seven who said that they were not linked to budget deficits. Do you feel that possibly you could be wrong about that?

The President. No, because I'm the only one there that with figures proved it. Right now our deficit as a percentage of gross national product is lower than that of three other nations that were present, and one nation alone was lower than ours, and one nation was tied with ours. But if you lump them all together -- and roughly their combined gross national products are about equivalent to ours -- and you would find that their percentage of deficit in toto was greater in regard to gross national product than ours.

What I was able to establish is that the connection between deficit and interest rates cannot be established at all. When we made our greatest cut in interest rates, from 21\1/2\ down to 11, the deficit was going up. But you go on to the next column of inflation in all of those countries, and you find that that's what the interest rates are tied to, is inflation or the fear of inflation. And in our country, because we've been so successful with curbing inflation, I have to say it is the fear that we still are going to let inflation get out of hand.

But, no, I think that there come times when -- since they sort of rule by committee, the Politburo, that there isn't a consensus there on the course that they should be taking right now. And this was presented in a very fine article in the Economist a short time ago that said that maybe the bear is hibernating.

Q. Mr. President, the statement on terrorism that was issued here outlines some proposed actions but, apparently, not a coordinated plan for action. What do you think the significance of that statement is, and what kind of discussions were held on cooperation on preemptive strikes?

The President. I don't think anything came in the nature of thinking in terms of attacking someplace if we believed -- but we did discuss thoroughly the problems of terrorism, the fact that -- actually the greatest defense against it is to try and know in advance what some of the plans are and what they're going to do. And for that reason, we've come to great agreement on the sharing of intelligence information of all kinds between us.

It isn't the kind of problem that you come down with a hard and fast plan, which you then discuss publicly. You come to an agreement about, number one, the necessity of dealing with it; number two, then, what together we can do to better deal with it. But you don't spread the details of that around.

The President. Well, I think what the Secretary was probably referring to is the fact that more and more we are seeing certain countries in the world more or less endorse openly the use of terrorism. And that is a separate problem also to deal with.

The President. Well, on my mother's side, her father came from Scotland. We didn't know much more about his line than we had about my grandparents on my father's side. But then on the maternal side, my mother's family, the family came from Epsom in County Surrey, just south of London here. And we do know something about them, how they got together and baked bread in the backyard in a brick oven that they built and -- to get enough money to come to America.

Ballyporeen was in response to a longstanding invitation from them once they had established and told me what I did not know about my family. And I also had an invitation from the previous Prime Minister of Ireland and from the present Prime Minister of Ireland, and this date was set a long time ago -- [laughter] -- for the summit. And I didn't see why I could fly over Ireland to England without stopping by and accepting those invitations.

The President. Mr. Ambassador and Mrs. Price and members of the Embassy staff, the Navy, and the students from the American school, Nancy and I are grateful that so many of you could be here today. And we would like to express our heartfelt thanks for your warm welcome and for all that you've done to make our visit a success.

Now, you could have stopped short of organizing that crowd that turned up in the streets yesterday, but -- [laughter] -- and if you get too lonely maybe you could find how to put them together again. But somehow your Embassy always rises to the challenge, no matter how many demands you have to contend with. Your good work and cheerful hospitality are legend in Washington, and I'm sure that helps explain why you see so many of us so frequently. And I don't mind telling you that we're also delighted with the job that is being done by Ambassador Charlie Price and his very talented and lovely partner Carol.

I know how much you all must enjoy working and living in this wonderful city. Great Britain and the United States are kindred nations of like-minded people. We defend the same values; we face the same dangers and cherish the same friendships. We look to our British cousins with a very warm and special affection. These bonds must never be broken, and I don't believe they ever will be.

We've had a wonderful and, I think, very productive 10 days -- visiting some of my ancestors' homeland in Ireland, commemorating the 40th anniversary of D-day at Normandy, and then meeting with my fellow leaders at the economic summit here in London. We leave today with renewed confidence that we can and will strengthen the freedoms, prosperity, and peace that we share.

As American diplomats come and go, it's your professionalism that keeps everything running smoothly. All of you make an invaluable contribution to our Anglo-American partnership, and nobody knows that better than Miss Joan Auten. Miss Auten, would you please join me up here for a minute?

Ambassadors to the Court of Saint James. And during World War II, when London was under siege, she helped evacuate children to the safety of our shores in the United States. Since those early days of service, Joan Auten has played a leading role in promoting friendship and dialog between our two democracies.

Well, we return to the States with gratitude for all you've done. We've had a good visit. And for all that you'll continue to do, we thank you. And we'll take with us warm and lasting memories of your friendship.

States. This Treaty contains two major innovations: compulsory testimony in the requesting State in appropriate cases and the immobilization and forfeiture of assets. The former is of great importance in insuring complete trials in an age of rapidly increasing levels of international criminal activity. The latter is of great importance in depriving international criminals of the fruits of their crimes. The Treaty primarily utilizes existing statutory authority, but will require implementing legislation for the provision concerning forfeiture of assets.

The Treaty provides for a broad range of cooperation in criminal matters. Mutual assistance available under the Treaty includes: (1) executing requests relating to criminal matters; (2) taking of testimony or statements of persons; (3) effecting the production and preservation of documents, records, or articles of evidence; (4) serving judicial documents; (5) requiring the appearance of a witness before a court of the requesting Party; (6) locating persons; and (7) providing judicial records, evidence, and information.

The primary purpose of this Treaty is to provide the necessary legal bases for an arrangement under which the City of Seattle, Washington will refrain from raising the Ross Dam on the Skagit River, thus avoiding additional flooding of the Skagit Valley in the Canadian Province of British Columbia, and will receive in return a guaranteed long-term supply of electrical power from British Columbia. Through this arrangement a longstanding dispute between Seattle and British Columbia over the construction of the High Ross Dam has been constructively and ingeniously settled, and a difficult and potentially divisive bilateral problem between the United States and Canada positively resolved. The British Columbia-Seattle Agreement and the United States-Canada Treaty that provides the necessary legal bases for the Agreement represent both a significant substantive achievement in terms of power provision and environmental conservation, and a model for the orderly and amicable settlement of international issues.

Exploited Children, and to tell you that the safety and protection of our children is a top priority on the national agenda. All Americans, and especially our youth, should have the right and the opportunity to walk our streets, to play and to grow and to live their lives without being at risk.

There are too many children like Adam: too many stolen each year from loved ones; too many who feel pain and suffering; too many who fall prey to exploitation and death. We don't know the exact number of victims, but it certainly numbers in the thousands.

Reve Walsh found themselves alone in their crisis. They were thwarted by jurisdictional tangles and foot-dragging, and the heartbreak of the moment became a chilling nightmare of terror and unbelievable frustration.

Our commitment to criminal justice goes far deeper than a desire to punish the guilty. Our laws represent the collective moral voice of a free society. And right now that voice is crying out to protect our children and keep them safe.

I hope we can mark the opening of the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children by redoubling our efforts to do just that. We must and will continue cracking down on career criminals, drugpushers, and the pornographers. We must and will continue working to protect the interests of our children and their families.

The courage of John and Reve Walsh in the face of the most difficult grief imaginable awakened our nation to the tragedy of America's missing children. Thanks to their efforts and those of Senator Paula Hawkins and many others, I was able to sign the Missing Children Act into law in October of 1982. The act established a system allowing parents, under certain circumstances, access to a central computer file to help trace missing children. The act also aids in identifying deceased children and adults and at least eases the pain of not knowing.

And let me take this opportunity to salute a related effort aimed at helping children who become wards of the court. The Court-Appointed Special Advocate program, CASA, as it's called, is a new community-based effort of trained volunteers serving as advocates of abused and neglected children. CASA is already working in several States, giving America's discarded children the protection they need.

And now we're launching an effort to extend the program all across America. But, as you know, these efforts are only the essential first steps, and formidable challenges remain. Meeting them is what the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children is all about.

Division on Missing Children will assist parents and citizens groups in locating and safely returning missing children. It will give technical assistance to law enforcement agencies, and it will help coordinate the efforts of community organizations all across America that are involved in the missing children activities. And later this summer, the Center will open a toll-free 800 telephone number to handle inquiries and accept information on sightings.

The Division on Education, Prevention, and Public Awareness will collect and distribute information on the most effective ways to address and prevent the problem of the estimated 1.8 million children missing from their homes each year.

What we're doing is launching a public-private partnership. Partnerships can take advantage of every opportunity available, and they can use these opportunities in a most efficient and productive way to protect our children and keep them safe.

No single sector of our nation can solve the problem of missing and exploited children alone. But by working together, pooling our resources, and building on our strengths, we can accomplish great things.

Three weeks ago we signed a Missing Children's Day proclamation and urged the private sector to help. And America is responding. Trailways Corporation and the International Association of Chiefs of Police have established Operation Home Free, a program that provides runaway children a ride home. Television stations are broadcasting photographs of missing children. And now it's time to do even more.

Americans, for all that you're doing. America's future is in the hands of our children. Your dedication and hard work will give our children a chance to live well and live full, healthy, and happy lives.

And I want you to know that all of us in the administration stand behind you, eager to assist in any way we can. Together we can turn the tide on these hateful crimes, and, knowing what you have accomplished already, I'm confident we will.

Boston loves and all the world admires. Over the regular season you all lived up to your awesome reputation by compiling a 62 - 20 record, the best in the NBA. And then came victory in the playoffs, finally the ultimate test, the championship series against the superb Los Angeles Lakers.

But the battle for the title turned into a spectacular, stretching over three weekends. Both teams were great, with stars on each side rising to peak performances that dazzled and thrilled the country. And last night the whole season came down to one game.

So many people ask, how do the Celtics do it? How do you keep coming back? How, during that crucial moment of the seventh game of a championship series, do they always manage to reach within, to find that spark that's needed for victory?

As the leaders of your organization changed, as one group of stars was replaced by another group, the Celtics not only survived; they maintained their championship form, because always, the Celtics have been a team of champions, larger and greater than any one player, coach, or manager. And in celebrating your championship, we see how America can be a nation of champions as well.

Red Auerbach, Coach Jones, members of this proud team -- high in the rafters of Boston Garden hang 14 green and white banners proclaiming the Celtics the national champions of 14 seasons past, and sometime this summer, a 15th banner is going to be hoisted into place, as I said. That banner will belong to you, and it'll remind all who see it of the way each of you have lived up to the tradition of the Boston Celtics.

The outpouring of support for our Olympic team -- voluntary and springing up all across our country -- makes us happy and proud. The team, walking behind the banner, our flag, in the opening ceremonies will truly be our team, America's team. And I can't help believing that on that day, July 28th, the members of our team will feel all of us there with them -- all of us behind them.

Ours is a beautiful flag. It always has been, ever since Betsy Ross sewed our first flag with its 13 stars in a perfect circle. But its glory is not just in its colors or design. We salute this banner because it represents the struggle of our forefathers to build a land of freedom and opportunity.

It flew over lonely outposts when pioneers tamed our wilderness. It beckoned with a spirit of hope to the tens of millions who came here from every corner of the world to better their lot and that of their families, and to live together in freedom. Brave men and women risked their lives under this flag whenever our liberty was in peril. And many, whose names we never knew, gave their lives to ensure our country's survival so that freedom, our most precious gift, would be passed on to the next generation.

It's always been there for us. It is always there for us. It's the one symbol of all that we are and all that we hope to be. And I now give it to you, Bill, to take to Los Angeles as proof not only of our thanks to you and to the members of our team but also of our great hopes for you.

The family is the cornerstone of American society. As individuals and as a people, we are nurtured by our families from birth until the ends of our lives. Families link past, present, and future generations. Family members share our joys, comfort us, and help us celebrate life's milestones.

In our mobile society, great distances often separate people from their loved ones, making frequent visits difficult or impossible. Consequently, many families hold periodic reunions. At these special times, they come together to renew and refresh their relationships. They share the accomplishments and changes in their lives. They honor those who have passed on, and they celebrate their continuing renewal through new marriages and the birth of new babies.

Unfortunately, thousands of American families experience sorrow each year because of runaway, missing or estranged members. An estimated 700,000 children between the ages of 11 and 18 are runaway or homeless youth. Many organizations have been formed in recent years to help families and missing family members establish contact with each other while respecting the right of individuals to privacy. Nonetheless, this problem is a very serious and heartbreaking one.

This Nation treasures its families and family life. All Americans should encourage families and missing family members to get in touch with each other and, if possible, to solve the problems which brought about their separation. We should encourage missing family members to make direct contact with their families or to use the organizations which offer their support and assistance. We also should encourage families whose ties are weak to seek out the programs which offer counseling and support to keep families together.

It has been over 40 years since invading Soviet armies, in collusion with the Nazi regime, overran the three independent Baltic Republics of Estonia, Latvia, Lithuania and forceably incorporated them into Moscow's expanding empire. The new regime then ordered the illegal deportation, murder, and imprisonment of tens of thousands of Baltic peoples whose only ``crime'' was to resist foreign tyranny and to defend their liberties and freedoms.

Oppression and persecution continue to this day, but despite this long dark night of injustice, the brave men and women of Estonia, Latvia, and Lithuania have never abandoned the battle for their national independence and God-given rights. Although the full measure of their struggle and sacrifice is screened by the oppression and censorship under which they live, the friends and families of the Baltic peoples all over the world are aware of their heroic endeavors and aspirations.

One week ago today in London, I joined the leaders of six major industrialized democracies for the annual economic summit. And we met to take the pulse of the world economy, to measure the impact of the policies that we've been implementing during the past 3 years, and to continue strengthening the freedom, prosperity, and peace that we share.

Change comes neither easily nor quickly in foreign affairs. But there was recognition in London that, while we continue to face pressing challenges, we are on the right track. By working together, by sticking to our policies, we've made impressive progress since 1981. The Western democracies have been moving from weakness to strength, from disappointment and pessimism to confidence and hope for a better future.

But led by the recovery, and now the expansion in the United States, our average growth today is up to 4 percent, while inflation has been cut in half. There was recognition that the incentives of America's recovery program, which sparked our economic takeoff and the creation of more than 6 million jobs in the last 18 months, have made a major contribution to the improvement in both the performance and the outlook for the world economy.

I reaffirmed to our allies America's bedrock commitment to the NATO alliance and to its mission to protect peace and freedom in the West. Europe and America have enjoyed nearly 40 years of peace. If NATO remains strong and unified -- and I believe NATO is stronger and more unified today than ever before -- then Europe and America will remain free and secure.

We have reestablished strength and confidence stretching beyond America's shores to Europe and the Pacific Basin, and we're trying, as well, to promote a better, more realistic, long-term relationship with the Soviet Union. And that's why we and our allies have made so many initiatives to reduce nuclear arsenals, ban chemical weapons, break the impasse in the East-West conventional force negotiations, curb nuclear proliferation, and reach agreement on proposals for increasing confidence and reducing the risk of surprise attack in Europe. The West is doing its utmost, but to date, we have met with continued Soviet unwillingness to return to the nuclear arms negotiating tables.

America's standing taller in the world today, but if we're to continue on course toward a more prosperous, peaceful world, then we need the full cooperation of the Congress. The Congress must support our strategic modernization program to keep America strong and convince the Soviets it is in their best interest to choose the course of negotiation, not confrontation, so we can safely reduce arms while preserving peace and stability.

The Congress must pass the recommendations of the bipartisan commission on Central America and the two supplemental requests now before it to promote democracy, economic development, and greater security in that vital region to our south. And the Congress must promptly pass our deficit-reduction program to help ensure that our economic recovery remains strong.

Q. Mr. President, no matter what you say you've done so far, two Republican leaders don't think you've done enough, and they are urging you to hold regular summit meetings, for fear we'll blow each other up, with the Soviets without any conditions as to issues or outcome. Both you and the Soviets have said you will go to a summit, if it's carefully prepared. My question is, where do we stand now? Are you willing to go for a summit, start the ball rolling?

The President. Well, Helen, in the first place, with regard to the two Senators -- and I did talk to them -- they were talking about a goal that would be desirable, that I think we all share, and we were agreed on that. And I told them some of the difficulties and problems that we've been having. But, yes, I am willing to meet and talk anytime. So far they have been the ones not responding, but we have kept in communication. There are a number of issues other than arms reductions that we have suggested talking to them about, and we're going to continue in the area of quiet diplomacy to bring that about.

Q. Mr. President, do we understand you to say that you're willing now to drop your long-held view that a summit would have to be carefully prepared in advance and hold the prospect for reasonable success?

The President. Well, it wouldn't really be necessary for me to drop that, since the Russians say that that's exactly what they feel must happen before there can be a meeting, that it must be carefully prepared and -- let me explain, maybe, a little more fully what, when I say that, what I have in mind.

There've been a couple of times in the past in which representatives from the Free World and from our own country have gotten into things simply to get acquainted or say hello. And they have led to great expectations, and they've led to great disappointment. And I don't think that we ought to go into something of that kind.

But at the same time, I'm not talking about, oh, a preconstructed meeting in which you've got a list of points. You can have an agenda in which it is the general area of the things that you think could lead to better understanding. And that's good enough for me.

But right now, we're getting a response from them that they want a very carefully prepared agenda. Now, if they agree with me that there are things we can talk about that might clear the air and create a better understanding between us, that's fine.

There is one thing that I think -- I've said this before, but that I think many of you fail to recognize, and that is, there have been three Russian heads of state since I became President. One of them I knew personally. The second one was, we now know, in ill health because he was virtually incommunicado to anyone during his period. And now this newest one is setting up an administration and so forth. So, it isn't as if we've been sitting here for 3\1/2\ years arguing with someone or not arguing with someone. There have been a lot of changes over there. But we're ready, willing, and able.

Q. Mr. President, nearly a year ago you said that you wanted to get to the bottom of the matter of the so-called briefing papers that went from the Carter White House into your 1980 campaign. I wonder, sir, if, in that year, you have ever talked to Mr. Baker and to Mr. Casey and asked them precisely what their roles were in that matter?

The President. Yes, and I think they're easily understandable. One has no recollection -- and I can understand that -- from a campaign of something that might come through his office and been passed on. That goes on.

I think there is one thing that ought to be cleared up about this whole case. And I did give orders to the FBI to make this investigation thorough, and I made orders -- gave orders to all of our people to cooperate to the fullest extent, and they did. And the Justice Department and the FBI were satisfied that it was no criminal intent of any kind. But the thing that I want to make clear is, we still keep calling it the briefing book. Now, it was established quite a while ago that so-called debate briefing book, the Carter team, never has been in our possession, that all that was uncovered were some position papers, the type of things that were issues during the campaign.

And all of it had been out in the open and made public as the campaign went on, before the debate. But the briefing book, if you will remember, the briefing book, it was pointed out, finally someone located on the other side, and there it was and no one on this side ever saw it, nor was it ever in our hands.

Q. If I may follow up, sir, there still seems, however, to be some conflict in the matter because, although the Justice Department said no crime had been committed, a Democratic-controlled committee on the Hill says -- suggests that there may have been a crime committed. In view of the fact that there is this conflict, the Democrats don't believe your Justice Department and the Republicans don't believe the Democratic committee. Wouldn't it be better to have a special prosecutor to resolve the matter once and for all?

But at the same time, you usually either denounce their system or their actions. Would it be better, in an attempt to get this dialog started again, whether at the summit or back in Geneva, if you simply held out the olive branch without also taking a shot at them?

I've usually pointed to something that is counter to their protestations of wanting peace and cooperation, such as walking away from the arms talks. I don't think that I've said anything that was as fiery as them referring to the funeral service for the unknown soldier as ``a militaristic orgy.'' If we're going to talk about comparisons of rhetoric, they've topped me in spades.

Q. I don't know if everyone else is left as unclear as I am on where we stand with a summit with the Soviets. Are you inviting Mr. Chernenko to come and have a summit with you? And are you willing to have your advisers sit down with his advisers to work out the preplanning that you both say is necessary?

The President. We have been in contact with them on a number of issues that we think -- bilateral issues that should be discussed between us. Of course, there is the matter of the arms talks, also, although we've not been talking about that since they have simply walked away. All I can tell you is that, in what I call quiet diplomacy we are in contact with their people trying to establish a basis for talks.

Q. I'd like to join Lesley in not being quite sure here. There seems to be a change or something that we have at least not known before. Your communication with the Soviet leadership -- has that been with Mr. Chernenko, and has the subject been a summit, a meeting between you and Mr. Chernenko?

Q. Mr. President, you have said recently that you think that U.S.-Soviet relations would improve in a second Reagan term. But several other people who have been in Moscow quote officials there as saying that isn't true, that they're not going to ever deal with you -- they feel you have been too harsh. What hard evidence do you have that relations would improve after the election?

Q. Mr. President, as I recall, one of your previous formulations about a summit was that you would have to have something concrete to show for it. Are you willing to have a summit that does not have a concrete agreement or piece of paper like the new SALT or START treaty or a new initiative toward a SALT or START treaty?

When you don't plan that well, if I could recall -- and I don't mean this to be critical of my predecessors -- but there was a get-acquainted meeting with Lyndon Johnson, and it was nothing more than that. Then there was a meeting with Kennedy and Khrushchev, and it didn't ease tensions or make things any better. This was the meeting in Vienna. It led to even more strains.

The President.  Whenever the conditions that lead to having one would be fine. But one thing -- let me say and make clear -- I'm not going to play political games with this subject and go rushing out for some kind of political advantage to announce that I have asked for a summit meeting. That wouldn't do either one of us any good and certainly wouldn't be fair to them.

Q. Mr. President, some of your advisers are saying privately that the Soviet leadership now is actually so divided and uncertain that there's really not much hope of progress at this time, and you seem to hint that when you say that there've been three leaders since you've been in office. Is that your view? And what are the implications of that?

The President. Well, we don't know. There's been the theory advanced that they're kind of marking time, and, perhaps, in some disagreement about what course they should follow. But there's no way to know that. So, we'll just keep on trying.

Q. Mr. President, if I could get back to political games for a second, former President Carter said earlier this month that despite your statements -- generally in favor of a debate with your opponent -- that he thinks you're going to duck your Democratic opponent and will never face him in a face-to-face debate. Now that former Vice President Walter Mondale is the apparent Democratic nominee, can you now promise that you will participate in a Presidential debate with him?

The President. No, I don't think that at all. I think the Supreme Court was interpreting -- giving an interpretation of what the law actually says. And as a matter of fact, I think, in the discussion, up came the point that back when that was being discussed, Hubert Humphrey, in the debate in the Senate, said that the law did not provide for quotas; the law is to prevent discrimination against individuals. And this was what the Supreme Court has said in that case.

Q. Mr. President, last year you set in action a commission on organized crime. Could you tell me why, as the first part of a two-part question, why this commission refuses to say whether it is investigating Louis Farrakhan despite seven Hanafi Muslims and Malcolm X being shot by Mr.

The President. I would have no way of knowing, but a commission that is engaged in a study, I'm quite sure that they're not going to talk about things that they are currently doing. I think the very nature of that kind of investigation would indicate that they will report when they have everything wrapped up and tied up and all the evidence that they need for any conclusions they come to.

The President. Only if I had assurance that the spending package was coming along. There would be no point in the other. This triad that was worked out, this three-legged stool of domestic spending, defense cuts that we finally agreed to, and some changes, some reforms, in the tax structure that closed some certain loopholes, and so forth -- this has to go together.

Q. Mr. President, you and your campaign organization have spent a lot of time trying to increase your support among Hispanic voters, yet you continue to support the controversial immigration bill on the Hill now. Will that not hurt you with Hispanic voters in the fall?

I think that if we take every precaution we can in that immigration bill to make sure that there is not discrimination simply based on the not wanting to bother as to whether an individual is legal or not, I think we can protect against that.

But the simple truth is that we've lost control of our own borders, and no nation can do that and survive. And I think the thing that they should be looking at, that should be of the greatest appeal to them is the very generous amnesty, that all the way up to 1982, we're ready to give those people permanent residency.

Chernenko has proposed negotiating a ban on antisatellite weapons and other space weapons. Can you tell us why, beyond the fact that you believe there can't be verification, as you said last weekend, why can't verification be negotiated once you sit down with the Soviets to discuss those weapons?

The President. We turned over a 200-page report to the Congress that was classified. We made public a summary of that, declassified in a summary. The other lengthy report is still classified because of the risk of exposing sources. But it was a report on outright violations of many of the treaties in the past, and also some ambiguities in which -- maybe based on language differences or not -- they claim a different interpretation of the treaty and that, therefore, they're not violating it.

Q. Mr. President, before you came along, in recent years, the talk had been between the two governments of parity in force between the United States and the Soviet Union. Your supporters who wrote the 1980 Republican platform called for military superiority over the Soviet Union. It's been a little bit fuzzy since, although you, in a couple of speeches, I think, starting with the Star Wars speech, have gone back to using the parlance of parity. How do you feel the Republican platform this year would handle that issue? And between those two key words, ``superiority'' and ``parity,'' where should that platform go and your administration go?

The President. My own view is that we should maintain the strength and deterrent that is necessary to assure, as much as you can have such assurance, that there won't be a confrontation, because the price would be too high, but, at the same time, emphasizing that we want more than anything else to join with them in reducing the number of weapons.

We've had arms limitation dealings and treaties and so forth, even such as the SALT treaties. All of those simply legalized an arms race. They were limitations or rules and regulations as to how many more weapons you could have. As a matter of fact, the Soviet Union added almost 4,000 warheads after the two sides had signed the SALT II agreement. That's not my idea of what we really need if we're to reduce the tensions in the world. What we need is to reduce, and, hopefully, to eliminate, the strategic nuclear weapons.

Q. If I may follow up, you're on record, and I think at least twice, of saying that we do not seek anything more than parity in the long run. Would not a platform that goes further than that and repeats the call for superiority give a wrong signal to the Soviet Union?

The President. I would prefer that we not ask for superiority now that we've entered into and started this whole area. We are negotiating with them with other countries in two negotiations that are going on that they did not leave or walk away from. And, yes, I believe that it could be counterproductive now to ask for that.

Q. Mr. President, if you win a second term, are you absolutely committed to serving all 4 years? I ask the question only because of a Washington magazine reporting -- I don't know how they knew -- that you and the First Lady had discussed the possibility of, if you win again and if the economy's in good shape, when you're 75 or 76 years old, possibly turning over power. Have you ever thought about that? Have you considered it or discussed with the First Lady that in any case?

Q. Mr. President, the Kerner report said that the United States is moving towards two societies, one black and one white, separate and unequal. Now, with the outcries from blacks, Hispanics, American Indians, and women against your civil rights policies, aren't you moving this country into two separate societies -- one of white males, and the other of blacks, Hispanics, American Indians, and women -- separate and unequal?

There has been no discrimination of any kind in this administration -- nor would I stand for that -- on the part of anyone. And I think that what we have done -- if we will get our information from the horse's mouth, our administration, and not from the political rhetoric that has been so prevalent in the last year, I think we can establish that no administration has done more than we have done with regard to any of these people that you speak of.

With regard to women -- I think our appointments, themselves -- but, I think, more than that, no government, no administration has done what we have done in the cleaning out of laws and eliminating statutes that have discriminatory language; our work with the States on the same thing, the same basis. And the same thing would go with regard to minorities and blacks and their place in the government itself. But everything that we have done -- we haven't done anything that in any way discriminated against any of those people. We have done things that we think are helpful.

Q. I want to follow on that. The leadership conference, which met this past week, said that you are the greatest opponent to civil rights, as a President, in the last two decades. And they gave -- very specific showing -- that your policies are attempting to reverse the civil rights gains. And now these grassroots people believe that you have been blaming the leaders, and Brad Reynolds has been blaming the media. But aren't you underestimating the intelligence of the grassroots people if you think that they don't know what they're suffering from? And this is going to be -- isn't this going to really cause a division in this country rather than a unified country unless you can convince these people, who are the victims of these policies? If you can't convince them that their conditions are better, then you're working toward a disunified country, aren't you?

Capitol Hill all the time that our tax programs benefited the rich -- the figures belie that. The people in the upper-income brackets are paying a greater percentage of the overall income tax than they were paying before our tax program went into effect. The people at the bottom of the scale are paying less, a lower percentage.

But now the other point, the inference that programs of a welfare nature -- social programs and benefits have been reduced to the place that people dependent on them are now suffering -- that is not true. We are helping more people and paying more money than ever in the history of this country in all of those social programs. The Government is providing 95 million meals a day. I could go on with the others.

Some of the things that have led perhaps to confusion -- is taking something like the educational programs. We found out that people were eligible when we came here for college grants and loans for their children, and their income level was too high for this to be warranted. So, yes, we changed the income level, but this allowed us to increase further down to the people with real need and do more for them.

For example, we probably eliminated 850,000 people from food stamps. But we increased the number of people who were getting food stamps, because we transferred this from people who were at a higher level. Our level now of income for most of these programs, if not all, is 130 percent of the poverty level. If you're below that, you're eligible. And most families would find themselves eligible for three or four of the programs at the same time. And it is a falsehood that is being purveyed to people that their problems, whether through unemployment or whatever -- look at what we've done by the increase in unemployment. And, granted, that blacks in this country had a higher rate of unemployment than whites at the time of the recession; their rate of recovery is faster than the rate of recovery for whites.

Tomorrow is Father's Day, so naturally our thoughts turn to them and to the well-being of family life in America. Families have always stood at the center of our society, preserving good and worthy traditions from our past, entrusting those traditions to our children, our greatest hope for the future.

Family life has changed much down through the years. The days when we could expect to live in only one home and hold only one job are probably gone forever. Perhaps we will not go back to the old family ways, but I think we can and should preserve family values -- values of faith, honesty, responsibility, tolerance, kindness, and love. And we'll keep on trying to do better, trying to create a better life for those who follow.

This hasn't been easy to do in the last decade. It's become more difficult to raise children than it once was. For example, the dependency exemption on your income tax: The money you can deduct for raising a child or caring for an elderly relative was $600 in the late forties. That's been increased to a thousand dollars now. But if that deduction has been indexed to keep pace with inflation, today you would be deducting more than $3,000 for every one of your children.

Housing became harder to afford. And the cost of private education also became too expensive for millions of middle-income families. By 1980 American families felt the full shock of runaway taxes, inflation, record interest rates, and soaring prices for housing, education, food, and other necessities of life. They saw the golden promise of the American dream disappearing behind storm clouds of economic misery.

Liberals urged huge government subsidies, paying parents for expenses they used to handle themselves. But big government becoming Big Brother, pushing parents aside, interfering with one parental responsibility after another, is no solution. It only makes bad situations worse, raising prices and taxes for everyone.

We came to Washington with a better idea -- help working parents to better provide for themselves and their children by enabling them to keep more of their earnings and help them by making government do its job so the terrifying specter of runaway price increases never returns.

Our tax rate reductions have helped parents, reducing the tax bill that would have been owed by a typical family by over $900 a year. And we've helped parents by reducing the inflation rate by nearly two-thirds since 1980 and by creating more than 6 million new jobs. Things are getting better for American families, but much remains to be done. That's why the Treasury Department is making greater tax fairness and greater tax incentives for families a central consideration in the tax reform proposals they're developing.

We're trying hard to help fathers and mothers in other ways, too. Many innocent children are exploited by those who traffic in the gutter of drugs, child pornography and prostitution. Last month I signed the Child Protection Act of 1984, a key part of our determination to crack down hard on the smut merchants. And this past week, we opened a National Center for Missing and Exploited Children to help educate parents and authorities on how to protect their loved ones.

We've just launched a nationwide citizen effort to encourage volunteer, court-appointed special advocates in legal cases of neglect and child abuse. Soon, we'll start up a sophisticated detective program to help law enforcement officers identify and capture the so-called serial killers who prey upon women and children. And we've urged the Congress to pass a law that will strengthen and improve child support from absent parents. Children should not be financially abandoned just because they're separated from one of their parents.

We're trying hard to make two other changes. We want to see fewer abandoned, handicapped, or underprivileged children left in perpetual foster care. And we want to see the unborn child given his or her chance to live and to know the joys of life. Adoption is often the best option. Too often, it's been the forgotten option.

We're seeing hopeful signs that our policies are paying off. Family income is improving; infant mortality rates continue to drop. And the crime rate has taken a steep dive. The outlook for families in America is better today than in 1980. And we're determined to make it better still.

Complex features superb facilities for competitors and spectators alike, including one of the finest tracks in the world. Nearby schools like Hofstra University and Nassau Community College are providing sites for a number of competitions and housing hundreds of the athletes. Scores of individuals and businesses have been generous in sponsoring these games. Thousands of volunteers have already been at work for months coordinating events and helping with athletes' travel arrangements.

As the games themselves take place, the volunteers will work even harder, keeping score, looking after equipment, helping to provide medical attention, and translating for competitors who speak a dozen foreign languages. As far as I can see, just about everybody in Nassau County has lent a hand.

Australia, South America, Asia, and North America, you have gathered here, a group of indomitable men and women. During the next 2 weeks, you'll test your endurance in swimming and running. You'll prove your strength in weightlifting. You'll show your speed and agility in basketball and high jumping. And in the equestrian events, you'll show the beautiful teamwork that can take place between man or woman and horse.

I think I can appreciate -- and I know he can, at least a little -- what these games must mean to you. There will be the comradery of teamwork, the thrill of competition, the sheer joy of meeting other athletes who love the sport as much as you do. Roger Bannister, the first runner in history to break the 4-minute mile, once said, ``Running has given me a glimpse of the greatest freedom that a man can ever know, because it results in the simultaneous liberation of both body and mind.'' Exhilaration of mind and body, that's something that all athletes understand. Yet there's something each of you understands that no one else can ever fully appreciate, something that has to do with courage, with willpower, and with the utter refusal to give up that has enabled you to rise above your disabilities and compete.

Each of you is a remarkable person, a person like Canadian Arnie Boldt. Arnie lost one leg above the knee, but when he high jumps, he can take his body farther into the air than most people are tall. Trischa Zorn, of Mission Viejo, California, is legally blind. But that didn't keep her from winning an athletic scholarship to the University of Nebraska and becoming one of the fastest backstroke swimmers in the world. Harri Juahiainew of Finland is an amputee, but he can run 400 meters in less than 50 seconds. And then there's Charlie Reid. Charlie works out twice a week with the New York Knights, a sports group run by United Cerebral Palsy of New York City.

You're proving that a disability doesn't have to stand in the way of a full and active life, and you're showing all of us just how far a man or woman can go if only they have the dedication and the will.

Angeles. Athletes from all over the world will gather for those games just as you've gathered here today. Those athletes may post faster times or lift heavier weights, but sports has less to do with things like times and weights and distances than with something very simple, the human heart.

Although our two countries are on opposite sides of the globe, we share a common bond in the great institution of democracy. Sri Lanka, Mr. President, has a remarkable record among nations which won their independence in the aftermath of World War II. You've held elections at regular intervals, and with almost equal regularity, your own hard-fought reflection -- or reelection in 1982, as a notable exception, your people, through their votes, have removed from power the governing party. And in what distinguishes Sri Lanka as a truly democratic country, losers as well as winners accept the verdict of the people. The true winners are, of course, the people of Sri Lanka.

I'm told, Mr. President, that in your embassy here in Washington, pictures of every Sri Lanka head of government since independence -- those from your own party, as well as the opposition -- are respectfully displayed. This is the kind of democratic spirit essential to the success of human liberty, the hallmark of democratic societies.

Unfortunately, not everyone shares these values. Recently, we were reminded of the menace of those who seek to impose their will by force and terror. Two American citizens were kidnaped in Sri Lanka and threatened with death. I want to take this opportunity, Mr. President, to thank you personally for your diligence and for your resolute handling of this difficult situation. The skill and courage that you demonstrated helped free our countrymen and, at the same time, prevented the terrorists from achieving their goal.

During that time of tension, you wrote to me, and I want you to know how much I appreciated your sharing your thoughts. You wrote, ``I hope that the international community will be able to eradicate terrorism, which has become a major challenge to those of us who believe in the democratic process.'' Well, I speak for all my countrymen -- and after the economic summit I recently attended in London, I know this sentiment is shared by the people of all the democracies -- when I say the free men and women of this planet will never cower before terrorists. Human liberty will prevail and civilization will triumph over this cowardly form of barbarism.

Mr. President, we applaud your determination not to yield to terrorism in your own country, as well as your efforts to find through the democratic process a peaceful resolution of communal strife. There is no legitimate excuse for any political group to resort to violence in Sri Lanka, a country with a strong democratic tradition and peaceful means to resolve conflict.

As a nation of many races, religions, and ethnic groups, we Americans know from experience that there is room for all in a democracy. Dividing your country into separate nations, as some would have you do, is not the solution. Instead of separating people, now is the time to bring them together. In the same spirit you spoke about in San Francisco three decades ago, of love, not hatred, a united, progressive Sri Lanka can flourish and live in peace with itself and the rest of the world.

Mr. President, we wish you every success in your search for reconciliation and a better life for all your people. And their lives are improving. Your leadership has increased productivity and brought down unemployment, has created exciting, new opportunities for your citizens. Sri Lanka is among those enlightened nations that understand incentives hold the key for greater economic growth and personal opportunity. I believe your people and their children will reap rewards for many years to come, thanks to the bold economic steps that you've taken.

This is not our first visit. We came in September 1951 to your west coast to attend the Japanese peace treaty conference held at San Francisco. I came as my country's representative. I received then a full measure of praise and gratitude from members of the United States Government of the day -- Dean Acheson, John Foster Dulles, and others who attended the conference -- for helping to secure the acceptance by the conference of the peace treaty with Japan. The Japanese leaders, Prime Minister Yoshida and others, were equally grateful. Those alive are still so.

I mention that because the thinking of the people of my country, which was expressed by me on that occasion, was that we should not ask for reparations from a fallen foe who had harmed our land and people also; that we should forgive those who were our enemies, quoting the words of the Buddha that ``hatred ceases not by hatred, but by love,'' which you, also, Mr. President, just quoted. I pleaded that we should restore to Japan the freedoms of democracy. Those were the ideals which inspired us then and inspire us now.

We also have, in our country, an unbroken, historical record, extending over the same long period, of a line of heads of state, monarchies of different dynasties from Sri Lanka and abroad, including India and the United Kingdom, of two Presidents, one selected and one, myself, elected by the whole country. I happen to be the 193d in the line of heads of state from 483 B.C. to date.

In our modern history, we cannot forget the contribution made by an American, Colonel Olcott, when he helped the Buddhist leaders of Sri Lanka a hundred years ago to establish a movement for the revival of education, through schools owned and managed by the Buddhists themselves, and thus laid the foundation for the revival of Buddhism and the movement for freedom.

The United States of America, since it was born out of a revolution which freed it from foreign rule, has not been known to be hankering after territory or supporting imperialism. Sri Lanka has been for 53 years a practicing democracy, where the freedoms of speech and writing, of electing governments by universal franchise at regular intervals, and the independence of the judiciary and of the opposition are safeguarded.

America, the whole of Africa, the whole of Asia from the Mediterranean Sea to the seas of China and Japan, there are very few countries which could be called a democracy, such as is your country. Ours is one. That is why the assistance that developing nations of the world receive from the World Bank and the International Monetary Fund is appreciated, though there are many matters on which we feel there should be change to help them to exist as free countries.

We the developing world have problems similar to those who live in the developed world. We have deficit budgets, high interest rates, old valued currencies, and unstable exchange rates. These are the classical examples of the symptoms that affect both the developed and developing nations.

Those who speak so eloquently on behalf of the developing nations have been pressing for the opening of commodity markets of the developed world for their manufacturers without protective laws, stable prices for all products, and rescheduling of debts borrowed for development.

In our own case, with the aid received we have been able to commence and have almost completed the largest development program, which in our long history has ever been attempted by king or president, a program possibly unequalled in magnitude by any development program in any country in the contemporary world or early. This was possible due to the effects of my government, which was elected to office in 1977 in an election conducted by our opponents, the previous government. We obtained 51 percent of the votes and won five-sixths of the seats in the legislature. And subsequently since then, we have won five elections, including the Presidential election, byelections, district council elections, local elections, and a referendum.

Another and a modern problem, and one of universal occurrence today, is terrorism. This happened in the extreme north of our country, where a group of misguided people of Tamil birth, who were favored by the American people in the latter half of the 19th century by the erection of schools and hospitals, seek separation from a united Sri Lanka. There are more Tamils living in the east and among the Sinhalese, the major community, than in the regions that seek separation who do not support them. My party holds 10 out of 12 seats in the eastern province, which separatists seek to join to the north.

The terrorists are a small group who seek by force, including murder, robberies, and other misdeeds, to support the cause of separation, including the creation of a Marxist state in the whole of Sri Lanka and in India, beginning with Tamil Nadu in the south. Since we assumed office in 1977, members of the armed services and police, politicians who leave the ranks of the separatists and join us, and others, and innocent citizens numbering 147 have been murdered in cold blood.

It is vital -- it is essential that the developed world helps us with finances, that we help each other in this sphere, and that all nations cooperate to eliminate the menace of terrorism from the civilized world.

I was very happy when I read your address to the Irish Parliament on June 4th. You made an appeal to nations to reform the principle not to use force in their dealings with each other. You said the democracies could inaugurate a program to promote the growth of democratic institutions throughout the world. You spoke on behalf of hundreds of millions who live on the borderline of starvation while nations will spend next year a trillion dollars on the manufacturing of armaments for destruction of human beings and their products.

Let your great and powerful nation take the lead in implementing these ideals, and the world will remember that the President of the United States of America, Ronald Reagan, preached the laying down of arms not through fear, but by the strength of the conviction that to follow right for right is right, without fear of consequence, is a way for civilized man to adopt. The voice of America will then become the voice of righteousness.

Government, the people of Sri Lanka, Mrs. Jayewardene, and myself, I have great happiness in presenting to President Reagan and Mrs. Reagan and the people of the United States of America, a friendly country, small baby elephant.

I understand now that Jayathu, until now, has lived in the baby elephant orphanage in the pleasant hill country of Sri Lanka. And her survival is testimony to the traditional respect which your people have for their environment and for wildlife. We Americans admire you and your government's dedication to preserve God's gifts of nature.

Now, Jayathu is very young and can look forward to a long and happy life here in Washington where she will have a home in our National Zoo. And she will continue to remind us of the friendship between the people of Sri Lanka and the people of the United States.

Now that school sessions have come to a close and many families are preparing for summer vacations, it is especially appropriate to remind all Americans of the importance of child passenger safety. Children who are not buckled into child safety seats or safety belts are subject to great risks of serious injury in motor vehicle accidents because their less developed bodies afford them little protection.

Fortunately, in the last few months, much has been done to protect young children travelling by car. We know that the proper use of child safety seats reduces the risk of death by up to 90 percent and can prevent up to 67 percent of all injuries. Through the voluntary efforts of many individuals and citizens groups, 47 States and the District of Columbia have recently enacted mandatory child restraint laws. Unfortunately, surveys show that only 40 percent of children under five years old are being protected by child safety seats and that 70 percent of the seats are not being used properly. In order to emphasize the importance of correct installation and use of child safety seats, many private and public organizations alike are initiating educational programs to achieve that end. For example, the National Automobile Dealers Association, the National Child Passenger Safety Association, and the American Academy of Pediatrics are currently sponsoring child safety clinics throughout the Nation to check on and demonstrate the correct use and installation of child restraint systems.

It is particularly vital for parents to understand the special risk which their children face as motor vehicle passengers and to educate their children about the importance of child safety seats each time they ride in the car. As adults, we all should remember that our own use of safety belts in our car can be a particularly good lesson for our children.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 18th day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

This year marks the fiftieth anniversary of the passage of the Federal Credit Union Act of 1934 which enabled credit unions to be organized throughout the United States under charters approved by the Federal government.

Credit unions are uniquely democratic economic organizations, founded on the principle that persons of good character and modest means, joining together in cooperative spirit and action, can promote thrift, create a source of credit for productive purposes, and build a better standard of living for themselves. Because credit unions exemplify the traditional American values of thrift, self-help and voluntarism, they have carved a special place for themselves among the Nation's financial institutions.

Today, Federal credit unions are at their strongest point in history. They enter this, their 50th anniversary year, as the Nation's fastest-growing financial institutions. As member-owned cooperatives, credit unions operate with the credo, ``Not for profit, not for charity -- but for service.'' Credit unions have maintained allegiance to this ideal and as a result have consistently reflected the philosophical tradition and the cooperative spirit of people helping people that prompted passage of the Federal Credit Union Act.

President, have been to our country before. Tonight, however, is the first time that a Sri Lankan chief of state has been an official guest at the White House. It's our honor to have you with us, and Nancy and I hope your visit will be followed by many more.

Our talks this morning reflected the cordial and cooperative relationship which exists between our two democracies. When your government was first elected in 1977, Mr. President, Americans were excited by your bold program for economic development. And you've led your country in a new direction, and by doing so, you've created new opportunities for your people and expanded the potential of every Sri Lankan.

The accelerated Mahaweli River project is part of your effort, as is freeing the Sri Lankan economy from the controls and redtape that stifled progress and economic expansion. One innovation of particular interest to me, Mr. President, is the creation of a free trade zone. This practical approach to development with its open market is attracting investment and unleashing the energy of the private sector. And I hope those over on Capitol Hill who claim enterprise zones won't work here in our country will take notice of the progress that you've made.

Sri Lanka's private enterprise sector. With the incentives that you now offer to investors, your country is attracting business and capturing the attention of American entrepreneurs and investors. And I think we can look forward to growing cooperation between our governments and our people on many levels.

U.S.-Sri Lankan cooperation comes in many forms. Last year the Peace Corps began a program to assist in the upgrading of Sri Lanka's English language teaching skills. And today we signed a science and technology agreement which provides an umbrella for increased collaboration. And we look forward to the early completion of negotiating on a tax treaty and on a bilateral investment treaty. All this reflects the extraordinary relationship that we're building, a relationship of trust and trade that will benefit both our peoples.

Mr. President, we understand Sri Lanka's choice, as a small developing country, to remain nonaligned in matters of foreign policy. We respect genuine nonalignment. Your country consistently has been a forceful voice for reason and moderation in nonaligned councils. Your strong opposition to unprovoked aggression in Afghanistan and Kampuchea has swelled the international chorus calling for restoration of independence for these two brutalized countries. We hope that Sri Lanka will remain a strong moral force in world politics.

And today, Mr. President, we came to know one another better and to understand more fully our objectives and concerns. Your visit has undoubtedly strengthened the bond between our two countries, and it's laid a basis for even closer, more cooperative relations between Sri Lanka and the United States in the future.

And finally, Mr. President, I'd like to thank you again for the elephant -- [laughter] -- a magnificent present that you gave us today. The elephant happens to be the symbol of the President's political party, and by coincidence -- [laughter] -- we happen to be also that smart.

President Reagan telling the public that the gift of the elephant was accidental. [Laughter] But privately I know it's something else. [Laughter] The elephant led my party to victory in 1977. I received 51 percent of the votes. Any party that gets 51 percent of the votes must win an election.

I haven't forgotten about the help your country has given us during the last few years. But I didn't come here to ask for help. That's not my way. I'm waiting to hear Mr. Frank Sinatra sing ``My Way.'' [Laughter] That's one of my favorite songs, but I understand he didn't like it. [Laughter] I used it in part of my election campaign and asked the people to vote for my way, which they did.

Your country is, as far as the Americans go, young. Our country is old, very old. We go back to the fifth century before Christ. We had Ambassadors at the court of Claudius Caesar. You'll find it recorded in Pliny's letters. He even mentions the name of the Ambassadors. We had sent delegations to China in 47 A.D. and I understand the gift sent by our king to the Emperor of China were water buffalos and hump cattle. The great Chinese pilgrims Hsuan-tsang and Fa-Hsien came to our country in the fourth century A.D. and the sixth century A.D. So did Sinbad the Sailor, Marco Polo, and Ibn Batuta.

For the first time, Westerners came in the 16th century and the Portuguese came as tourists but stayed for 150 years. After that came the Dutch and then came the English. And we are now, once again, a free country. We wish to be friendly with all and the enemies of none. That is my policy and the policy of our people.

We would like the people of America to understand us. In the long history of Sri Lanka, there have been difficult periods. There have been murders; there have been assassinations; there have been riots; there have been good deeds and bad deeds. Last July we had one of those bad periods.

I see in one of your newspapers there is an advertisement in which some people are trying to make us remember that day. It was a fatal day; several people were killed. It was not done by the government; it was done by a gang of hooligans, about which we are very, very sorry. I'm trying to forget it. I'm trying to make our people not commit -- some of them -- such incidents again. I hope we will succeed.

Therefore, Mr. President, we're surrounded by friends. We've been very happy the last few days. I have a few more days to spend. I hope to spend some time in the Indian settlements at Santa Fe, not for any other reason but because those were the stories I read in my youth, about Buffalo Bill and the various tribes. I'm fascinated by the fact they were the oldest human settlements, as far as I know, in the continent of America, and a great people. And we must give them a helping hand as we must give every race, every tribe, every human being, whatever his caste, religion, or race, a helping hand.

We're all human beings. We extend our affection, not only to human beings but even to animals; to the little elephant that we have gifted to you. That is the philosophy which we have learned in our country; that is the philosophy which, if I can, I'll spread throughout the world. And I find in you, Mr. President and Madam Reagan, two very good disciples.

Thank you very much for entertaining us. May your country prosper. May, in the morning and in the evening, at nightfall, may the name of President Reagan and Madam Reagan, never be forgotten. Thank you.

But of course, there's also your distinguished board member Lady Bird Johnson. Lady Bird, it's always wonderful to see you and to be able to say in public what is often said in private, that you were a great First Lady of this nation, and your beautification program is a lasting improvement on the American landscape. You can't be thanked enough for your great and good work.

I guess you have some trouble storing your old National Geographics, too. [Laughter] You know, it's something, when you stop to think about it -- we were just talking outside before we came in -- I don't know of anyone I've ever known who could throw away a National Geographic.

In the ceiling outside this room, there's a dome showing the stars as they were that night in the winter of 1888 when a group of public-spirited scholars, scientists, and adventurers came together to start a society aimed at institutionalizing the study of science in this new experiment called America. And it occurs to me that that little firmament is an appropriate symbol for this building.

It reflects the outward reaching, no-boundaries impulse that has shaped your Society. It reflects the great respect that you have for specifics, for exactitude, for recreating things as they were, dot for dot and star for star. And it reflects the spirit of inquiry that has directed your studies up to the stars, out to the continents, and into the heart of man's experience on Earth.

In a world that sometimes seems to have grown sated with all it knows, you still discover; you fund expeditions; you help researchers; you encourage impossible dreams. And then you share the results with all the Society's members in your magazine. I think one of the great reasons for your magazine's success is that it's infused with the romance of discovery, the romance of history, of seeking out the past and discovering places man has never seen before.

Sometimes we think that there are no journeys anymore, that, yes, man goes places, even into space, but it's done with a kind of clockwork perfection, with our technology clicking away and bringing us from Plainfield, New Jersey, to the Himalayas in less than a day of a man's life. But it sometimes seems that there are no journeys anymore, no more great treks.

Remember how in the movies they made when we were young -- well, the movies they made when you were young. [Laughter] Remember how they'd show a map unfolding, and they'd have arrows showing the journey as it progresses; our hero started here, visited there, and now he's just landed in his destination, fade in on hero. And there was the sense of a long journey unfolding.

There is another thing, the special sensitivity you bring to your quest. I'm thinking here of a small item in your May issue, a picture of the frozen remains of a woman who died in the eruption of Mount Vesuvius. An anthropologist [archeologist] who studied the skeleton was quoted as saying, ``She was very homely, but someone cared enough to give her beautiful things, delicate gold bracelets and jewels.'' A small observation, perhaps, but it carries a whole world of inference.

I think it should be noted that the National Geographic Society is the kind of organization that a nation like ours and a world like ours can produce. We provide the fuel upon which societies such as this one grow.

Throughout its history, the National Geographic Society has brought home the profound truth that we are, with all our differences, a human family living together on a tiny blue and green planet. For the past 25 years, our space program has reinforced this perspective of the world, helping us realize that we are all riders of the Earth together. As we dedicate this new home for the Society, I think it fitting that we rededicate ourselves to the pursuit of knowledge and excellence which has so long characterized our space program.

Accordingly, today I am pleased to report that NASA is beginning a new program aimed at achieving that goal. For more than 25 years, NASA has pioneered on the cutting edge of science and technology and has stimulated our young people to strive for excellence in all they do. Now NASA, in cooperation with the private sector, will expand its educational outreach program to our very young people in more than 75,000 elementary schools throughout the country. NASA will be able to share its engineering know-how, scientific discoveries, and sow the seeds of future progress by stimulating our young people to study science and engineering.

We call this new program Operation Liftoff, and it will incorporate such advanced instructional tools as computer software, laser discs, audiovisual materials, and other techniques. It will also involve, as I said, private enterprise. I've asked NASA to reinforce its ties with the aerospace industry and with private citizen's groups to expand this effort to the fullest.

In this connection, I was particularly pleased to learn of the efforts of the National Space Institute to develop and support a new national Young Astronauts Program to involve young Americans more directly in our space program. This new organization will expand their appreciation of space as a place in which people can live and work and learn. I've asked NASA to work directly with the NSI to develop this project in the context of our Private Sector Initiatives Program.

Now, I know as we near the end of this amazing and troubled century that you, as all of us, are looking to the future. And I know that one of your great interests and concerns is the environment -- conservation and ecology. You are worried about what man has done and is doing to this magical planet that God gave us. And I share your concern.

What is a conservative after all but one who conserves, one who is committed to protecting and holding close the things by which we live. Modern conservatives in America want to protect and preserve the values and traditions by which the Nation has flourished for more than two centuries.

We want to protect and conserve the idea that is at the heart of our national experience, an idea that can be reduced to one word: freedom. And we want to protect and conserve the land on which we live -- our countryside, our rivers and mountains, our plains and meadows and forests.

But we also know that we must do this with a fine balance. We want, as men on Earth, to use our resources for the reason God gave them to us -- for the betterment of man. And our challenge is how to use the environment without abusing it, how to take from it riches and yet leave it rich.

But I think the whole idea of conservation has often been obscured these past 20 years by some who've attempted to seize it as an issue, politicize it, and claim it as their own. I think there have been some who use the conservation movement as an excuse for blind and ignorant attacks on the entrepreneurs who help the economy grow -- the farmers who make our food, the businesses that give us heat in winter and coolness in the summer. This kind of antagonism to all things that speak of business has tended to confuse the issue, blur responsibility, and overshadow sincere concern.

Roosevelt led the charge to create the National Park System. From that great beginning step, we have steadily expanded efforts to protect our heritage of land and water. We've been proud to pick up the mantle and move forward in a number of important areas.

We've spent $737 million since 1981 as part of a billion-dollar plan to repair and replace national park facilities that were designed to correct years of neglect. Even as we grapple with getting Federal spending under control, the 1985 budget request proposed that almost $160 million be made available to acquire new lands for our national park and wildlife refuge system.

Together, the Federal Government and Ducks Unlimited have created a new program to ensure the protection of American waterfowl nesting areas. This, by the way, reflects our attempts to work closely with the private sector. The nonprofit Ducks Unlimited will work with the Fish and Wildlife Service and fund the protection of the waterfowl areas.

Now, just this past April, the Prudential Insurance Company donated more than a hundred thousand acres of wetlands and forest areas to the National Wildlife Refuge System. That's a $50 million gift. And we rely on private volunteers in our national parks. Last fiscal year, we had the help of more than 22,000 volunteers who, in all, donated more than a million hours of their own time. And that was a taxpayer savings of about $7 million.

Creating parks and wildlife refuges is only a part of protecting our environment, of course. I'm proud to report that the most recent studies of the Environmental Protection Agency show that we've made great progress in cleaning up the air and water. Hundreds of lakes and streams have joined the Potomac River in being declared open for fishing and swimming, after being closed to a whole generation. EPA tells us that after a national expenditure of $150 billion on air pollution controls, concentrations of all the major pollutants are on a downward trend.

We're moving forward in responding to new challenges as well. In just 3 years, we have tripled funding for the cleanup of abandoned hazardous waste dumps from $210 million in 1983 to $640 million proposed for 1985. We have doubled funding for acid rain research in each of the past 2 years. We're trying to get a clear, scientific understanding of its causes and effects. And what we're aiming at is a policy of common sense.

We have, all of us, over the past 20 years, reached consensus on the need to conserve our environment. Now we must come to agreement on how to do it. And in coming together on that, we must keep in mind the word ``balance'' -- a balance between the desire to conserve and protect, and the desire to grow and develop; a balance between concern for the good earth, and concern for the honest impulse to wrest from the earth the resources that benefit mankind; a balance between the overall demands of society, and the individual demands of the free citizen.

As you know, this is the 20th anniversary of the Presidential Scholars program, a program that has done much to reward initiative and encourage excellence in America's schools. It's also the second opportunity that I've had to host a gathering like this. And I have to confess I'm always a bit uneasy in the midst of all this scholarly achievement. I guess it's because I start thinking back to my own days as a student.

In fact, sometime ago my alma mater, Eureka College, gave me an honorary degree, and I thanked them profusely. But I had to admit that they had compounded a sense of guilt I'd nursed for about 25 years, because I always thought the first one they gave me was honorary.

So, I congratulate all of you today on taking advantage of the tremendous educational opportunities you've been offered and encourage you to keep up the good work. I don't think it's too optimistic to say that you can look forward to an age where a great value will be placed on your obvious capacity for achievement and excellence, an age that will be rife with opportunity.

In many ways, the things that we've been doing here in Washington the last few years have been part of this effort to open up new opportunities for all Americans. As you know, that means cutting back on the size and scope of government, reducing its drag on the private economy.

But I think that our own time is increasingly going to realize this truth. Repelled by the suffering caused by aggressive totalitarianism, our century seems to be awakening to the great prospects of human freedom and the democratic way of life.

That's why I've always believed a truly American foreign policy means more than the pragmatic business of getting along with other nations. It also means standing up for values like human freedom and our own obligation to see that freedom is spread someday to all the nations of the Earth. In a few short years, this will be the task before you, and I think you're preparing yourself well for it.

I'm especially encouraged by some of the fundamental changes that we see in American education today. We're beginning to realize, once again, that education at its core is more than just teaching our young the skills that are needed for a job, however important that is.

It's also about passing on to each new generation the values that serve as the foundation and cornerstone of our free democratic society -- patriotism, loyalty, faithfulness, courage, the ability to make the crucial moral distinctions between right and wrong, the maturity to understand that all that we have and achieve in this world comes first from a beneficent and loving God.

So, we're gathered here to congratulate all of you on your success, on the credit that you've brought to yourselves, to your schools, and to your communities. We're here, too, to congratulate a select group of teachers for the enormous and unselfish dedication that they've shown to your welfare and to the highest standards of their own profession.

I had a teacher one day in a high school and on a visit to the principal's office -- he was also the principal -- make a very wise remark. He said, ``It isn't very important what you think of me now.'' He said, ``What I'm concerned with is what you're going to think of me 15 years from now.'' And even before 15 years was up, I knew I'd been in the hands of a very good friend and a very fine teacher.

But I think we also do well today to reflect on the fact that education and learning, success and power are only relative values; that they must be grounded first in the higher values of right and morality if they're to have any meaning at all.

I've discovered, for example, that people do tend to let you get away with giving them some advice. So, while I want to extend my congratulations to all of you, I hope you'll also permit me a few words of counsel and advice.

And I'm going back to the Oval Office and do what a little girl told me to do who wrote me a letter one day and told me all the problems that she thought I should solve and then said, ``Now, get back to the Oval Office and go to work.'' [Laughter] And I'll do just that.

Well, I'm glad to welcome all of you to the White House. And I know that all of you here today will agree that God has blessed the American people with a vast and beautiful land, a land of mountains and prairies, lakes and forests that reach from sea to shining sea. And no task facing us is more important than preserving the American land.

We've enacted this historic Coastal Barrier Resources Act also. That legislation will help to protect dunes, marshes, and other coastal formations from Maine to Texas, lands that provide irreplaceable feeding and nesting grounds for hundreds of species of fish and waterfowl. And we've made certain that State governments are involved in Federal land management as never before.

We've given our support to legislation that would create some 5 million acres of new wilderness areas. Each of these has been a significant step in the effort to preserve the American land for our children and grandchildren. And today we take another important step forward in this effort.

Each of these areas is intended to be completely natural -- no housing developments, no powerlines, just forest, rock, wind, and sky. And because of this legislation, these wilderness areas will remain just as they are, places of beauty and serenity for hikers, campers, and fishermen.

Generations hence, parents will take their children to these woods to show them how the land must have looked to the first Pilgrims and pioneers. And as Americans wander through these forests, climb these mountains, they will sense the love and majesty of the Creator of all of that.

Everyone here today had a hand in the passage of these bills. And special thanks go to all who -- hard work and dedication made a critical difference. Each of you has my heartfelt thanks. But more important, you have the gratitude, I think, of the American people.

The fulfillment of this challenge has become more realistic today, because of the significant contributions of minority American entrepreneurs to our economy. The Nation's 600,000 minority-owned businesses reveal the true meaning of entrepreneurship. They have emerged as a dynamic force in the marketplace, bringing innovative products and services to our economy, and constituting the principal source for jobs and training for thousands of American workers.

As we enter an era of greatly expanded opportunities in economic growth and development, it is appropriate that we encourage minority business owners by recognizing their tremendous contributions toward the continued economic development of our Nation.

The inflation, the GNP deflator, was 3.9 percent for that first quarter. Now the estimate for the second quarter is growth of 5.7 percent and an inflation rate of 2.8. And all of this is remarkable good news and is evidence that we have a solid recovery that is going forward without a renewal of inflation.

Thank you, Mr. Panico, the principal here; Governor Kean; Congresswoman Roukema; and longtime old friend, Don Newcombe -- it's been too long between meetings. But all the others here -- and this very courageous and fine young man [The President was referring to 19-year-old Hector del Valle, who had spoken to the audience about his automobile accident, caused by drinking, which left him permanently paralyzed below the neck.] -- all the others here, I can't tell you how much I appreciate your warm welcome and how impressed I am by what I have seen here today.

Almost 4 years ago when I accepted the nomination of my party to run for the Presidency, I talked about our nation's future. And I remember saying we need a rebirth of the American tradition of leadership at every level of government and in private life as well. The United States of America is unique in world history, because it has a genius for leaders, many leaders on many levels. Well, today, I'm seeing that genius. I've seen real leaders and real leadership.

You in this audience -- parents and teachers, public officials, students, and local groups -- have fused your creativity and concern to deal with a great national problem. And in doing this, you've become part of a movement that has literally swept this country, the movement against drinking and driving.

This is community leadership and community involvement at its best. And I don't mind saying that it isn't Washington that led the way; it was a grassroots movement. Well, so was the Boston Tea Party; so was the abolitionist movement; so was the tax-cutting movement that swept across this country in the past few years. The history of our country is the history of grassroots movements, because Americans know that the purest form of law is one that springs directly from the desire of the people.

If you'll permit me to tell you a little bit about what we're doing in Washington -- and I know there must be some times when you ask. [Laughter] Two years ago, I appointed a Presidential Commission on Drunk Driving, and the Commission laid out in irrefutable detail the scope and the extent of the problem.

They told us that alcohol-related automobile accidents are the leading cause of teenage deaths in this country. In fact, in the past few decades, more people have died in alcohol-related auto accidents than in any war since World War II. And the Commission strongly urged Federal action to require a 21-year-old drinking age.

Now I want to talk to you about why the age-21 law is good and why we're supporting it. We know that as you've been told so eloquently here, drinking and driving is a killer. And we know that people aged 18 to 20 are more than twice as likely to be involved in an alcohol-related accident as any other age group. Society has a clear stake in seeing that these young lives, so full of promise, are not ended, or crippled. So, we know what the problem is. We know that society has a stake in solving it, and we know of a solution: raising the drinking age to 21.

Now, this isn't some fad or some experiment. It's a demonstrable success. In States in which the drinking age has been raised, teenage driving fatalities have gone down significantly. Here in New Jersey, with the support of my good friend and yours, your Governor, Tom Kean, you raised the drinking age to 21 in 1983. And you know what happened. You had a 26-percent reduction in nighttime, single-vehicle fatalities among 19- and 20-year-olds in the first year alone.

Well, when you're talking about a 26-percent decrease in the number of teenagers needlessly killed on the highways, then you're talking about something that works. And you're talking about something that's needed.

Now, this slaughter hurts us as a people. It tears up the fabric of society by bringing grief to families, guilt to friends, and loss to the community. And we just can't tolerate this anymore. So, I want you to know that I've decided to support legislation to withhold 5 percent of a State's highway funds if it does not enact the 21-year-old drinking age. The carnage must end, and now.

Now, some feel that my decision is at odds with my philosophical viewpoint that State problems should involve State solutions and it isn't up to a big and overwhelming government in Washington to tell the States what to do. And you're partly right. But the thing is, this problem is much more than a State problem. It's a national tragedy involving transit across State borders.

Beyond that, there are some special cases in which overwhelming need can be dealt with by prudent and limited Federal action. And in a case like this, where the problem is so clear-cut and the benefits are so clear-cut, then I have no misgivings about a judicious use of Federal inducements to encourage the States to get moving, raise the drinking age, and save precious lives. The choice remains with the States. I hope they'll act wisely and soon.

Let me remind you there are 23 States that haven't needed this inducement, and New Jersey is a stunning example. Your Governor, Tom Kean, has provided terrific cooperation and leadership so that New Jersey is leading the way on solving the drunk driving problem. [Applause] That applause is for you.

You've raised the penalties against drunk drivers, you've increased arrests and convictions, and you've added tough new legal and financial sanctions against drunk drivers, and you raised the drinking age. And what you got in return is clear and undisputed. Between 1981 and 1983, drunk driving fatalities declined almost 31 percent. You have saved lives. And all of your efforts have qualified your State for almost $800,000 in Alcohol Incentive Grant funds to pay for programs that give your State new tools to combat drunk driving and ensure highway safety. So, you have a lot to be proud of. But the battle isn't over.

I'm going to depart from the main theme here to tell you that Nancy and I discussed what I would be saying here today. And we want you to know that we're aware that the problem we have on our highways isn't just drinking and driving. It's also drinking and drugging.

You know, we know a lot of alcohol-related accidents involve drugs, too. And I know that you're aware -- I'm sure you are -- of Nancy's concern about this. She wanted to be here today, but she's at a big meeting out in Nevada, where she's discussing drug abuse with parents and teachers. I'm rattling around in that big house down there. I don't like it. [Laughter] I know what she's doing is worthwhile.

Our administration has taken many actions to combat drug abuse and drug use among children -- and it occurs to me that drug use is drug abuse, so we might as well just call it that. But we know that no matter how effective we are against the pushers and drug smugglers, it all comes down to you.

You know, I know it's hard for you young people to believe that any of the rest of us remember what it was like or know what you're thinking or feeling. But we do. And one day you're going to be very much surprised to learn how clear your memories will always be of these particular days and how much they mean to you. And, as you were told by the chief, we also remember that when we were sitting where you're sitting, we didn't think anything bad could happen to us. Death was always for someone else -- and all the bad things of that kind.

And you may not think about it now, but many of the things that you do now will affect how well you're going to be able to get around in later years, and whether you're going to be able to enjoy life as you're presently enjoying it. And I just have to tell you -- believe me, it is worthwhile to take care of that particular set of machinery. Don't put any sugar in the gastank. Remember to do all the things that keep it fine-tuned. And you'll find that it really pays off.

Now, don't fall for the line that drug use is daring and fun and fearless. It's stupid. It's flirting with addiction, flirting with sickness, and a waste of your own life. Don't fall for that stuff about ``life in the fast lane.'' That's where all the accidents take place.

Many of us who are older have lost friends to one addiction or another. And some of you have lost or will lose friends to drugs, to the addictions that will squeeze them to death, or the impairment that will make them make the wrong move in a fast car. Your generation has lost some of its favorites, like John Belushi and so many others.

But I don't want to end on a sad note. For every person who falls in this country, there are a hundred people there to pick him up. And that's one fact that's at the heart of the American experience. And I want to say to all of you, to M.A.D.D. and to C.A.A.R.D. and the others that are involved in this great national effort against drunk driving, you are all the grassroots. You are the people who change this country and always have. You're the makers of change, the improvers of our national life. And you deserve an awful lot of credit.

And so, let me say to you as I leave here today, I tip my hat. You're terrific. God bless you, and may your good work continue. And just look at who you'll be working for up here in these stands, these young people.

You know, in America's frontier days the sheriff's badge was the symbol of our nation's quest for law and justice. And today that badge still stands for commitment to the law and dedication to justice. Those of you in the Sheriff's Association are in the forefront of America's law enforcement community. All of you have firsthand experience with the problem of crime and lawlessness in our society. And the jobs you hold are dangerous and difficult ones. And believe me, I know.

I mean no irreverence when I mention that back in those days when I was doing television, I once played a sheriff, a western sheriff, in a TV drama. And the gist of the story was that the sheriff thought he could do the job without a gun. It was a 30-minute show. I was dead in 27 minutes.

Thank you for standing against those who would transform that dream into a nightmare of wrongdoing and lawlessness. And thank you for your service to your communities, to your country, and to the cause of law and justice.

Now, I know that many of you at this conference have served the public interest for lengthy periods of time, and that you lived through the grim years of the sixties and the seventies, when crime became an epidemic in America. In those decades, serious crime more than tripled. By the start of the eighties, crime was costing more than $10 billion in financial losses, touching 30 percent of America's homes, and taking the lives of almost 25,000 Americans a year.

Along with the rise in crime came a dangerous, widespread loss of faith by the American people in their criminal justice system. Eighty-five percent of Americans were saying the courts in their home areas weren't tough enough on criminals, and 75 percent were saying our criminal justice system just wasn't deterring crime.

While our justice system was weighed down with excessive litigation and the courts were becoming arbiters of disputes they were never intended to deal with or to handle, the criminal justice system wasn't carrying out its most important function, the punishment of the guilty and protection of the innocent. In some jurisdictions and major cities, 3 percent or less of reported crimes were ending in prison terms for offenders. A small percentage of repeat offenders were responsible for a large percentage of crimes committed. One study showed that 23 percent of all male offenders accounted for 61 percent of all violent felony crimes.

This rise in crime, caused by a hardened criminal class, was fostered partly from a liberal social philosophy that too often called for lenient treatment of criminals. Because this misguided social philosophy saw man as primarily the creature of his material environment, it thought that through expensive government social programs it could change that environment and usher in a great new egalitarian utopia. And yet even while government was launching a rash of social engineering schemes in a vain attempt to remake man and society, it wasn't dealing with the most elementary social problems like rising crime.

Individual wrongdoing, they told us, was always caused by a lack of material goods, and underprivileged background, or poor socioeconomic conditions. And somehow, and I know you've heard it said -- I heard it many times when I was Governor of California -- it was society, not the individual, that was at fault when an act of violence or a crime was committed. Somehow, it wasn't the wrongdoer but all of us who were to blame.

Is it any wonder, then, that a new privileged class emerged in America, a class of repeat offenders and career criminals who thought they had the right to victimize their fellow citizens with impunity. And today we still pay the price for those years of liberal leniency -- I mean the growth in the ranks of career criminals, criminals who are contemptuous of our way of justice, who do not believe they can be caught and, if they are caught, are confident that once the cases against them enter our legal system, the charges will be dropped, postponed, plea-bargained away, or lost in a maze of legal technicalities that make a mockery of our society's longstanding and commendable respect for civil liberties.

Well, at last we're making progress against these criminal predators in our midst. Reported crime dropped 4.3 percent in 1982. That was the first decline since 1977. And reported crimes for last year showed an even more remarkable 7-percent decrease, and this was the sharpest decrease since 1950. Indeed, it was the first time since 1950 that the serious crime index declined for 2 years in a row.

Now, I know there are a few people who want to attribute the encouraging downward trend in crime to a statistic -- the fact that fewer members of the population are now in the crime-prone age group. Well, a coincidence isn't a correlation. The truth is that crime sometimes has risen with population growth and sometimes not; there's nothing historically inevitable about it. For example, between 1970 and 1982, the numbers in the crime-prone age group did drop slightly by about 1 percent, but serious crime went up 40 percent.

To tell you the truth, that explanation is right here in front of me today. I don't think there's any question that America's law enforcement community and her courts are now carrying out a new mandate from the American people. Throughout the Nation, there's a new consensus on the crime issue, which you've helped form. It's a consensus that utterly rejects the counsels of leniency toward criminals and the liberal philosophy that fostered it.

Watch programs, spearheaded by the Sheriff's Association; the tough, new State statutes directed at repeat offenders; the widespread public outcry against leniency in our court system; and the sweeping new steps we've taken at the Federal level show that the years of the pseudo-intellectual apologies for crime are now over.

This morning in New Jersey I witnessed a grassroots movement against drunk driving, and I said to the group that the history of our country is a history of such movements, because Americans know that the purest form of law is one that springs directly from the people. It is this surge of public opinion that has brought us initiatives like those I've just described, which were long overdue. The American people today insist that judges and government officials recognize what common sense has always taught: that right and wrong matters; that individuals are responsible for their actions; that retribution must be swift and sure for those who prey on the innocent.

Choosing a career in crime is not the result of poverty or of an unhappy childhood or of a misunderstood adolescence; it's the result of a conscious, willful, selfish choice made by some who consider themselves above the law, who seek to exploit the hard work and, sometimes, the very lives of their fellow citizens.

One very important reason for the decrease in crime, then, is tied directly to this growing toughness toward criminal offenders. In the sixties, the probability of being arrested for a crime fell off dramatically. And in the sixties and most of the seventies, the probability of being sent to jail for a crime also fell off dramatically. But in the eighties, these two critical trends have been reversed. For the last few years, both the probability of arrest and the probability of incarceration have been increasing. So, crime is coming down because -- and thank heaven for this -- the public's demands for justice are finally being heeded. More criminals are being arrested; more career criminals are being put behind bars. And let's not forget that taking these career criminals off the streets doesn't just mean they're prevented from committing other crimes; it also means that their punishment acts as a strong deterrent to others who might choose a life of crime.

Now, obviously, those statistics are hardly worth celebrating. None of us likes the idea that our prison population is increasing. But we can and we must take legitimate satisfaction in the fact that more wrongdoers are being brought to justice -- not out of a sense of vindictiveness or revenge, but because incarcerating these criminals means that fewer and fewer innocent Americans are being victimized by criminal wrongdoing.

I'm talking about judges who will not only uphold the rights of the accused but the rights of the innocent and the right of society to protect itself from criminal wrongdoers. I know all of us have been pleased by recent court decisions that show common sense once again returning to legal deliberations on criminal justice matters.

In addition to helping bring sanity back to the courtroom by appointing sound judges, we've also moved to strengthen cooperation with local and State law enforcement agencies. Our U.S. attorneys have set up law enforcement coordination committees in every Federal district. And I'm proud that some of you are now serving on them. Through our surplus Federal property program, we've helped States and localities in expanding prison space. We've strengthened and broadened training for State and local law enforcement agents, both at the FBI Academy and at a Federal facility in Glynco, Georgia.

Violent Crime, whose mission will be to work with law enforcement agencies to identify and track repeat killers, the so-called serial killers who prey on innocent citizens. This means the latest computerized technology for detective work is moving from the research phase to the operational phase.

And second, in order to help eliminate a threat to the lives of America's sheriffs and policemen, legislation was introduced last week to ban the manufacture and importation of bullets designed to penetrate the soft-body armor worn by law enforcement officers. We worked hard on that one, and in the end, we produced a bill which has broad bipartisan and increasing support. I expect to be signing a cop-killer bullet bill before this Congress adjourns.

For the first time, we brought the FBI into this fight. We've increased our law enforcement budget by 50 percent and added 1,768 new investigators and prosecutors, most of this as a result of our efforts in drug-related fields. Our highly successful South Florida Interdiction Task Force has led to the establishment of investigative task forces in 12 other regions throughout the country. And those 12 task forces have already initiated some 620 cases and indicted more than 2,600 individuals. And 140 of these indictments have been under the new ``Drug Kingpin'' law, which carries a maximum penalty of life imprisonment without the possibility of parole.

And fourth, we've declared war on organized crime in America. I'm proud to tell you that organized crime convictions are up from 515 in fiscal '81 to 1,331 in 1983. We're getting longer prison sentences and, for the first time, making a serious effort to confiscate the financial assets of the mobsters. Our new organized crime commission has begun its investigation of the structure of the mob today in America, its money-laundering techniques. And its work will be greatly broadened when it receives subpoena powers in this session of the Congress.

I repeat what I've said before: We have it within our power to shatter the regional and national syndicates that make up organized crime in America. This administration seeks no negotiated settlement, no detente with the mob. Our goal is to cripple their organization, dry up their profits, and put their members behind bars where they belong. In this effort, State and local law enforcement must play a critical role. For only when the mob is being hurt at the local level, when the revenue from illegal gambling, pornography, drug pushing, and other kinds of racketeering is dried up will the mob be permanently put out of business.

And fifth, through a series of Presidential task forces, we've brought much needed attention to critical law enforcement problems. Our task force on violent crime in 1981 led to a widespread series of proposed reforms, most of which have now been implemented. Similarly, we've appointed a Task Force on Family Violence, a problem that's been badly in need of full national airing for many years.

And sixth, this administration has brought long-overdue attention to the plight of the victims of crime. I was sure -- I know that this is an area of special interest to all of you, and I commend you on the special attention you've been paying this week to ways of aiding victims of crime. Many of you have seen our Victims of Crime Task Force report, and you've heard Assistant Attorney General Lois Herrington report on how our administration has implemented many of the commission's recommendations. Well, we're especially proud that our victims of crime assistance act is now approaching passage in the Senate. This is an act that will assist the States in helping compensate the victims of crime, but -- and this is very important -- this assistance will be paid for by criminal fines, not by hard-earned tax dollars.

The mention of this legislation brings me to the seventh and final point about this administration's crime program, our all-out legislative effort to get those in Federal law enforcement the tools they need to deal with the criminal threat. We've already scored some important breakthroughs. We've succeeded in modifying tax laws that made it difficult for the IRS to assist in organized crime and drug trafficking investigations. We've changed the posse comitatus law to permit the military to assist us in cracking down on the drug smuggling. And, as I just mentioned, we're pushing ahead with victims of crime legislation.

Well, forgive me, but those who are holding this up in the House are out of touch with reality, and they're out of touch with the American people. This is a perfect example of how Americans are forced to suffer ill effects of crime because too many of our political leaders stick to old, discredited, liberal illusions about crime.

Americans overwhelmingly favor changes in the exclusionary rule, the insanity defense, the reinstitution of capital punishment, and the tightening up of parole and bail procedures. And of all places the people's voice deserves to be heard, it is in the House of Representatives. So, today I'm asking you to continue to use your influence with your elected representatives. Let them know that you're tired of waiting and that, at a very minimum, the liberal leadership in the House owes the American people a floor debate and vote out in the open on this crime package.

Now, if the Members of the House feel our package is unwise legislation, let them have the courage to stop hiding behind parliamentary maneuvers and say so publicly. Let them vote against these measures in full view of the people, and let them explain what gives them the right to ignore the will of the people. This they should have the courage to do.

And now, ladies and gentlemen, during the last 3\1/2\ years this administration has faced the serious problems of rebuilding America's economic strength here at home and restoring our prestige and stature abroad. Today we're in the midst of a sound and strong economic expansion, and America's national security has been restored and enhanced. But I also believe that the record I've just presented to you shows that, while this administration was coping with the crises of our economy and our national security, we were also making great efforts to help you and all our fellow citizens deal with the problem of crime in American society.

American politics -- a consensus that said government had involved itself in areas where it was neither competent nor needed, while it had wrongly ignored its traditional and most fundamental obligation: the maintenance of public order and the preservation of public tranquillity.

Today the fight against crime continues, but for the first time in years, we can say that we're starting to make headway. There's still a long way to go; there still is much to do. But on behalf of all America, I want to thank all of you again for all that you are doing to make possible a safer society. And I pledge to you my continued support, even as I seek your assistance in continuing to eradicate the drug menace, fight organized crime, make our streets and homes safe again, and return America to the days of respect for the law and the rights of the innocent.

In fiscal year 1983, Federal advisory committees contributed significant expertise to the discussion of important issues facing our Nation. With the assistance of these committees major initiatives were undertaken in areas such as social security reform, national security, and government efficiency. Other committees furnished valuable advice to Federal agencies concerned with scientific research, health programs, environmental issues, international diplomacy, as well as economic, social and cultural affairs.

Since 1981, Federal agencies have achieved substantial overall savings in advisory committee program costs while continuing to make active use of committees in the government decision-making process. These savings have been achieved without the sacrifice of the quality advice the agencies have required. The participation of the best possible members on a voluntary basis where possible, but on a compensatory basis where appropriate, must continue to be the goal. I plan to issue shortly a memorandum to Executive branch agencies providing further guidance to sustain and improve upon these accomplishments.

Congress in enacting the Federal Advisory Committee Act. I am particularly concerned that advisory committees be established only when they are necessary, that they be carefully supported and monitored during their existence, and that they be promptly terminated when their mission is completed.

I commend the members who have served on advisory committees and thank them for sharing their experience, knowledge and advice. Advisory committees can and have demonstrated the value of a continuing partnership between citizens and their government.

Section 1. Establishment of Board. There is established, effective June 20, 1984, a board of three members to be appointed by the President to investigate this dispute. No member shall be pecuniarily or otherwise interested in any organization of railroad employees or any carrier. The board shall perform its functions subject to the availability of funds.

Sec. 3. Maintaining Conditions. As provided by Section 9A(c) of the Act, as amended, from the date of the creation of the board, and for 120 days thereafter, no change, except by agreement of the parties, shall be made by the carrier or the employees in the conditions out of which the dispute arose.

The emergency board procedures of the Railway Labor Act applicable to commuter railroads provide that the Boards will report their findings and recommendations for settlement to the President within 30 days. The parties must then consider the recommendations of the Emergency Boards and endeavor to resolve their differences without engaging in self-help during a subsequent 90-day period.

In addition, despite large increases in drivers, vehicles and traffic, the Federal standards and programs for motor vehicle and highway safety instituted since 1966 have contributed to a significant reduction in the fatality rate per 100 million miles of travel. The rate has decreased from 5.5 in the mid-60's to the present level of 3.18. This means that motorists can drive more miles today with less risk. If the 1966 fatality rate had been experienced in 1981, more than 85,000 persons would have lost their lives in traffic accidents.

Although we can be proud of these accomplishments, the number of people meeting violent deaths in traffic accidents each year remains unnecessarily high. In 1981, an average of 135 lives were lost every day. Compounding the tragedy is the fact that most of the victims were young people, killed at a time when they had the most to contribute to society and the most to gain from life.

The overall regulatory framework established since 1966 has clearly enhanced motor vehicle safety in this country. At a minimum, Federal motor vehicle safety standards have accelerated the introduction of needed safety improvements. However, we must take care to see that new regulations enhance traffic safety without producing unnecessary costs for consumers and manufacturers. Where the marketplace can be made to work to provide improved automobile safety, such approaches must be sought and developed. In any case, we are convinced that needed reform can be achieved without jeopardizing the safety and consumer goals and policies established by the Congress.

In the highway safety area, we will continue to work closely with the States on priorities such as safety belts and child safety seats, alcohol safety, motorcycle safety, police traffic enforcement, traffic records and emergency medical services. Highway safety grant programs will be simplified and Federal aid directed to activities that achieve verifiable results in terms of reduced deaths and injuries, and to ones that are truly national in scope.

Continued reductions in the annual traffic death toll will not be easy. Motorists today are better informed and driving in safer vehicles and on safer roads. But they are still victims of habit and of human nature. They choose not to wear a safety belt because they do not expect to be in an accident. They drink and drive because alcohol is part of our social mores. And they sometimes speed and take unnecessary chances because being in a hurry is an unfortunate fact of modern life.

We will continue to pursue a variety of approaches to increasing highway safety, including widespread public education efforts and a national traffic safety commitment that involves government, industry and the public. We are convinced that significant progress can be made and that American motorists and pedestrians will ultimately enjoy a greater level of personal safety as a result.

The President. It's a privilege to welcome such a distinguished group of -- I was going to say high school students, but they're governors and chief justices, all of them, right now -- and to welcome all of you to the White House, and the Rose Garden in particular. I know you must be very proud of the offices you've been elected to, and we're proud of you.

Several weeks ago, there was a very famous young man -- visited the White House. Considering the reception that he received, I was tempted to wear a white glove this morning. [Laughter] But it's obvious that you and I both have some things in common. We both like Michael Jackson, and we've been involved now in the political process.

But after I looked over your Washington schedule and the questionnaire listing your interests, I decided to talk about an issue that seems to be on many of your minds, and with good reason. I know you and young people generally are interested in United States relations with the Soviet Union.

We all recognize that there is no more important foreign policy goal than the building of a more peaceful world in which liberty and prosperity can flourish. And we want to develop a more realistic working relationship with the Soviet Union, one marked by greater cooperation and understanding and by progress in arms reductions.

START and the INF talks were underway, we proposed seven different initiatives. None were offered on a take-it-or-leave-it basis. Indeed, they were the result of many adjustments to respond to the concerns of the Soviet side. But the Soviet Union insisted on preserving their monopoly on medium-range missiles in Europe. I'd proposed zero-zero, that we eliminate all such missiles in Europe -- zero on their side, zero on our side. Well, they met me halfway. They were willing to have it be zero on our side. Then when the nations of the West made it clear that a Soviet monopoly was not acceptable, that's when they walked away from the negotiating table.

But despite this disappointment, we shouldn't lose sight of the bigger picture. In a quiet way, we're trying to talk and negotiate with the Soviet Union on many fronts. Just 2 months ago in Vienna, we and our Western partners put forward new proposals on reducing the levels of conventional military forces in Europe. And those MBFR talks, as we call them, are continuing.

In the same week, at the 40-nation Conference on Disarmament in Geneva, Vice President Bush offered a draft agreement on a worldwide ban on chemical weapons. And as I'm sure you all know, chemical weapons now is the euphemism for poison gas. And at the Conference on Disarmament in Europe in Stockholm, we're pursuing a series of proposals that will help reduce the chance of conflict in Europe.

We're also trying to move forward on bilateral relations. And the latest round of negotiations on upgrading the hotline ended less than 2 months ago. In the economic field, we're making a number of steps -- or taking a number of steps, to increase exchanges in nonstrategic goods. We've extended our very useful incidents-at-sea agreement for another term. And we've also proposed discussions to expand and multiply contacts of benefit to both our peoples.

So, if you look at the big picture, it's clear that we in the West are doing our utmost to establish a cooperative, stable, and peaceful relationship. But it's also clear that the Soviet Union has not yet made the decision to join us in that effort. We'll keep trying, and we'll keep hoping that they'll realize it's in their best interests to join with us and the rest of the world community to build a more peaceful world. We're ready, willing, and able.

And I know you've been hearing and many people insist on saying that these are the most dangerous of times that we've ever known, that there's the greater tension and the greater hostility and danger between our two nations than any time since the Cuban missile crisis. Well, actually, these are not the most dangerous times. As a matter of fact, quite to the contrary.

I think with regard to the fact that they're being a little hard to talk to at the moment -- there have been many worse times in recent years, and there is less of a threat simply for the reason that the United States, for the first time in a number of years, has enough deterrent capability that the Soviet Union, I don't think, would decide that it would be in their best interests to take any action.

And if you really want to get some history on this, so that I won't have to keep you standing here while I talk about it, when you leave here, get a copy of the Los Angeles -- Los Angeles, the Washington Times. In the commentary section today there happens to be two columns. One is by William Rusher, who is the publisher of the conservative magazine National Review, and the other is by Morton Kondracke, who is the executive editor of the quite liberal publication the New Republic. And those two men, coming from those two opposite viewpoints, are on that page together, because each of them has done a column on disabusing our minds of this very idea that we're living in the most dangerous of times. And there's some -- you'll find some very interesting reading, and at the same time, you'll have a complete knowledge of what the history of our attempts have been down through the years. So, I'm grateful to both of them.

You know, you can be on one side or the other, but you know you really must be close to right when you're standing against a cellophane wall and you're getting thrown rocks at from both sides. [Laughter] But here they weren't throwing rocks; they were on our side.

Well, in the meantime, we're going to continue our commitment to peace with freedom. And, believe me, because we're prepared with the strength of our allies to deter aggression, as I said, and pursue all possible avenues for arms reductions; and because we're prepared with our economic strength to achieve greater stability throughout the world; and because we have the spiritual strength and self-confidence to reach out to the Soviet Union, we're prepared to sustain peace with freedom -- and, my young friends, we will.

Well, I've gone on long enough, but I do want to congratulate all the governors and chief justices for your noteworthy achievements. I am a firm believer, and I hope you'll continue to believe, that this nation is strongest when it realizes that it is a federation of sovereign States and that Washington is not the fount of all wisdom and authority in the Nation.

We represent 25,000 youths all over America combined, but you represent 230 million, so it's quite a difference. But we would like to tell you that we appreciate having you spend your time, your effort, and your ideas with us. And we know that time is a precious commodity that you can give out.

But we would like to say -- is that we are all here in Washington to learn about government. And you are everything that we are hoping to see. You represent what we believe in, in democracy and freedom. And we hope you the best of luck in September.

And he didn't get back quite up to the head of the parade in time. And there I was, waving that baton. I knew that the music was sounding further and further away. He had come in time to turn the band, but not me. [Laughter] And I was walking down the street all by myself, and the band had turned the corner. [Laughter] I had to cut across lots.

And this isn't the first benefit he's done. [Laughter] He has made his talent available for worthy causes, including the fact that he has been heard by an audience estimated at a hundred million people on the Voice of America in which his music has been played.

But it's been a pleasure to have all of you as our guests. And, once again, I want to thank the one and only Charlie Daniels for giving of his time to come here and entertain us as royally as he has and to thank these gentlemen from the Navy for what they have contributed also.

Well, I do thank you. And first, I want to welcome you and thank you for taking the time to come to Washington to begin the activities for our national celebration of International Youth Year, 1985. I believe you all know -- or you wouldn't be here -- the importance of our youth to the future peace, security, and well-being of our nation and the world. And I'm certain that by working together, the youth organizations represented here today, our government, and America's private sector, Youth Year, 1985, will be a resounding success.

There's a spark in all of us which, if struck early enough, can light up our lives, elevate our ideals, and deepen our tolerance and strengthen our determination to make this world a better place. You couldn't make a better investment in America's future.

I've always believed that a lot of the problems in the world come from people talking past each other instead of to each other. And during Youth Year, 1985, we'll be making a special effort to help our young people reach out to each other and to their counterparts all over the world. And they will be able to build new bridges of understanding.

Understanding begins with the knowledge that the most powerful force for progress in this world comes not from government bureaucracies, nor public programs, nor even valuable resources like gold or oil. True wealth, and the real hope for the future comes from the heart -- from the treasure of ideas and spirit, from free people with a vision of the future, trust in their fellow men, and faith in God. The better future that we all yearn for will not be built by skeptics who spend their lives admiring the complexity of the problems. It'll be built by free men and women who believe in themselves.

History shows that progress takes its greatest strides when people are free to worship, create, and build -- when they can decide their own destiny and benefit from their own risks. The dream of human progress through freedom is still the most revolutionary idea in the world today. And it's also the most successful.

Democratic Values at the London Economic Summit, and it concluded with these words: Strong in our beliefs, and endowed with great diversity and creative vigor, we look forward to the future with confidence. Well, we should be confident. The summit demonstrated the enduring strength of our shared vision and values, our resolve to sustain peace with freedom, and our desire to assist those who are seeking a better life.

You, too, should be confident -- confident that if you prepare for International Youth Year, 1985, with wisdom and responsibility, you can shape a future of freedom, peace, and prosperity that can be shared by the whole world.

Conference of Democratic Youth during 1985. We believe that his conference, the first meeting of its kind, merits strong support of freedom-loving people everywhere. It will give young people all over the world a chance to examine and share their democratic values and principles, and to speak out for human rights and the three themes of International Youth Year: participation, development, and peace.

I hope that some of the young people from other countries have a chance to visit us as well and see our spiritual and economic vitality so that they will understand America better. And we, in turn, will learn much of value from them.

I think one of the most wonderful and rewarding experiences I had in all the trip to China recently, was one day -- the day before we were to leave -- in Shanghai, visiting Fudan University and going into one classroom where I was assured that all of those Chinese students could speak English. So, we didn't require translation.

And I opened it up to questions and answers. And I was amazed at the questions from those young Chinese students about you, the young people who are here in this audience, and young people all over America -- really a deep and sincere interest and a curiosity in what I could tell them about how you were approaching life, and what your thoughts and dreams were. And it was a great pleasure to answer to the best of my ability. Sometimes I had to call on memory, but I thought I'd spoken to enough of you here that I was pretty much speaking your views. But it was so wonderful to see their honest and sincere desire to know you -- and know you better.

The U.S. Youth Year Commission has accepted a worthy and important challenge, and you have our support. Our task force on Youth Year, under the leadership of Greg Newell, will do everything it can to help. And together, I'm certain that we will achieve great success in reaching out to America's young people and, through them, to the youth of the world.

Well, I have to tell you that not through some of the demonstrations that are going on. And some of those things are so sincerely meant, but they don't realize that the two so-called superpowers in the world today must come to a meeting of the minds and an understanding that there is a better way than a continued arms race on down through the years. And this is why we have tried to open negotiations.

I still am optimistic that we're going to succeed. But we must sit down with the Soviet Union and make them understand that we mean them no harm. And then it is up to them to give some proof in line of some of the many statements they've made over the years that they mean no harm to us or to the rest of the peace-loving in the Western World.

But in order to do that, we have to have some tools. And when I can quote one Russian leader of a few years ago who said of detente -- when we were all saying, ``Well, we're pleased we have detente'' -- and his declaration to his own people as to what benefited them from detente was, that, he said, the most they got was our letting our strength erode and decline. They have to sit at the table and know that as far as strength is concerned we're nearly enough equal that we'd better discuss how we can go down.

Well, thank you all very much. I know I've got some people in there that are looking at their clocks now and worrying about my schedule for the rest of the afternoon, but there was one more hand. I'll take this one more, and then I must go.

The President. Thank you very much. Well, that wasn't a question, but I thank you for that statement. And let me just say in return: If there is anything that is the real responsibility of people in public life and holding office in this country, it is to realize and recognize the obligation to, if at all possible, when the time comes, to hand over to you -- to hand you over maybe a little bit better world than was handed over to us. And I pledge to you we're going to try awfully hard to do that.

For over 3 years, the members of our commission -- reflecting the pluralistic diversity of our nation -- have been discussing what we mean by the three U.N.-designated IYY themes of participation, development, and peace -- subjects which we know are of particular interest to you.

I am happy to say that we have reached a consensus. We believe -- and I think that you would agree -- that these concepts, these values, are interdependent -- that true peace requires democratic participation and democratic development. And that democratic participation requires lasting peace. These objectives and their attainment serve as a cornerstone of all our IYY activities.

Mr. President, on behalf of the U.S. IYY Commission, I'm most honored to present to you our definition of the IYY themes. We very much hope that we will have an opportunity in the coming months to discuss these themes with you in more detail and that these themes will play an important role in the development of any international conferences or domestic programs that will come out of this year.

The President. No, I don't. And I think one of the most dangerous things in the world is for anyone to get in their -- fixed in their mind the inevitability theory, because then, that very thing being in their minds, can bring about that. My theory is that there doesn't have to be a war. We're going to do everything we can to see that it doesn't.

Inadequate education, training, and rehabilitation for those who are deaf and blind may prevent these Americans from becoming independent and self-sufficient, thereby greatly limiting their life potential and imposing a high economic and social cost on the Nation.

We must prevent such problems among our deaf-blind citizens by fostering their independence, creating employment opportunities, and encouraging their contributions to our society. Crucial to fulfilling this urgent national need is research on the disorders that cause deafness and blindness.

Toward this end, the National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke and the National Eye Institute as well as a number of voluntary health agencies are supporting a wide range of investigative projects that one day may provide the clues to curing and preventing these devastating disorders.

On June 27 we commemorate the 104th anniversary of the birth of Helen Keller, America's most renowned and respected deaf-blind person. Her accomplishments serve as a beacon of courage and hope for our Nation, symbolizing what deaf-blind people can achieve.

In Witness Whereof,  I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-second day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Dr. Hammer acquired the Occidental Petroleum Corp. in 1957 and currently serves as chairman of the board and chief executive officer. Previously Dr. Hammer was involved in the distilling and cattle businesses.

He is active in community and civic affairs and has been a strong supporter of cancer research. He serves on the board of directors of the Eleanor Roosevelt Cancer Foundation and is a trustee of the Eleanor Roosevelt Memorial Foundation. In 1969 he established the Armand Hammer Center for Cancer Biology at the Salk Institute in California. He is an art patron and founded the Hammer Galleries, Inc., in New York City, and continues to be a major supporter of the Los Angeles County Museum of Art.

This week, we had some more good economic news. The economy grew by a revised 9.7 percent in real terms for the first quarter and an estimated 5.7 percent for this quarter. Both figures are better than had been predicted.

The strength of our expansion continues to surprise experts and outperform past recoveries. The curious thing is that some experts treat this good news -- strong economic growth -- as a cause for worry. Well, the commonsense reaction is right. Good news is not bad, it's good.

Stronger growth has enabled more people to find work and bring home paychecks, and it's improved the job outlook for the future. More people are working in America today than ever before. And the United States is creating more jobs at a faster rate than any other major industrialized country in the world, well over 6 million jobs in the last 18 months. In fact, we created more jobs in the month of May alone than all the Common Market countries created in the last 10 years.

Recently, the National Federation of Independent Business said that among its small business membership, the percentage planning to hire new workers is the highest in 4 years. Since most new jobs are created by firms with a hundred employees or less, that small business survey bodes well for continued job gains in the future. So, economic growth is stronger than before, stronger than anyone expected, and jobs are being created at record rates.

But something else makes this expansion different. Inflation is staying down, and we mean to keep it down. It was up only two-tenths of 1 percent in May and only 4.2 percent over the last 12 months, barely a third of 1980's 12.4-percent rate. We've reduced inflationary pressures by reducing government spending growth, by promoting greater production through lower tax rates, and by spurring greater competition through the deregulation of key industries. Nor do we see signs that runaway price increases will reappear. This is the first time since the 1960's that we'll be able to enjoy strong and steady growth without high inflation.

Investment by U.S. businesses in new plants and equipment, so crucial to helping workers be more productive and to helping our industries better compete in world markets, has been rising at the fastest rate since 1949. We're witnessing an historic surge of innovation, risk taking, technological development, and productivity growth. American economic leadership is back.

America began a fundamental change in direction in 1981; a change from a policy of government promises, a change from taxing you more no matter how hard you tried, to rewarding you for working harder and producing more than before. Personal incentives are changing America, restoring our spirit, strengthening our economy, giving us the opportunity and confidence to shape our future and make it work for us.

And that's why I'm determined to finish the job we've begun by simplifying our tax system and broadening the base so we can bring personal income tax rates down further. If we can do that while keeping Federal spending under control, there'll be no stopping the United States.

We all have a job to do to protect this expansion and keep the lid on inflation, which is the best guarantee against rising interest rates. The Congress must cooperate and restrain spending by passing the downpayment deficit reduction package. The Federal Reserve must assure enough liquidity to finance the expansion without raising expectations of new inflation. And we must all work to make government live within its means.

Special thanks goes to my friend Mel Bradley [Special Assistant to the President for Policy Development] for organizing this event. Mel was with us in the California Governor's office, and he's doing a fine job here in the White House.

You serve in positions of genuine importance in every branch of this government, from Secretary of Housing and Urban Development Sam Pierce, to Ambassador Alan Keyes, a member of our delegation to the United Nations, to Assistant Secretary of the Navy David Spurlock, to Mary Bush, one of our representatives at the International Monetary Fund, and to all of you who are here today.

Your jobs aren't easy. Long hours and constant criticism -- some of it from the very people we're trying to help -- are the rule, not the exception. But I know we all agree that the sacrifices and the trials are worth the rewards. Together, we're putting America back on the high road of progress, and in doing that, we're assembling a record that we can take to all Americans with pride.

First, education: This is the crucial tool that black Americans need to make progress. In the years before we took office, our nation's schools had begun to show unmistakable signs of crisis. From 1963 to '83 -- or to '81, college entrance examination scores underwent a virtually unbroken decline. Science achievement scores of 17-year-olds showed a similar drop. And most shocking, the National Commission on Excellence in Education reported that more than one-tenth of our 17-year-olds can be considered functionally illiterate.

We took office determined to change that. And since our administration put education at the top of the national agenda, we've seen a dramatic turnaround. In 1980 only a handful of States had statewide task forces on education. Today they all do. In addition, 47 States are considering new graduation requirements; 47 are studying improvements in teacher certification; and 17 are exploring merit pay for teachers. It all adds up to the most far-reaching education reform and renewal movement since the turn of the century.

In large part, because of our efforts, black children are beginning to get the educations they need to participate fully in American life. And as we go forward, let me assure you that we will remain committed to the future of our historically black colleges and universities.

These schools were very much on my mind when we started here, because they meant so much at a time when it would have otherwise been very difficult for so many to get higher education. And I was determined that they should not be left withering on a vine.

Research and development grants and contracts have increased $282 million. And last fall we amended title III of the Higher Education Act so we can provide matching funds to help build college and university endowments. And I want you to know that we're working right now with Fisk University to help it find a way through its current economic difficulties.

In the enforcement of criminal, civil rights statutes, the Justice Department has filed 149 cases, including 24 against perpetrators of racial violence. We're energetically enforcing fair housing provisions and have proposed legislation to strengthen enforcement still further. Under our administration the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission is collecting record amounts of back pay. And since we took office, the percentage of minorities and women serving as military officers or holding white-collar jobs has risen.

I believe these figures demonstrate a commitment to civil rights that is firm and far-reaching. But let me go beyond statistics to speak from my heart. I still believe in a simple principle I learned from my mother and father: Black or white, young or old, every human being is a sacred child of God, a person of infinite dignity and worth.

And last, I want to mention the economy. Here, again, we in this administration are acting with energy and determination. We've helped disadvantaged and dislocated workers by enacting the Job Training Partnership Act. Indeed, in our last budget, I requested $3.6 billion for the JTPA, money that during 1985 will serve some 2.2 million individuals. We've supported minority businesses, establishing a program that over the next 10 years will call for the purchase of $22 billion in goods and services by the Government from minority firms. For the truly needy, we've enlarged the safety net, increasing spending for such items as medicare and medicaid and food stamps and housing.

To bring jobs to economically troubled places like inner cities, we've proposed a fresh idea. It's called enterprise zones. But some Democrats are blocking this proposal in the Congress, even though many State and local governments have established their own enterprise zones after they saw us trying for 2 years or more to get this program through the present Congress. Now, these zones have created thousands of new jobs. They've shown what a big success our own enterprise zones can and will be if only those do-nothing Democrats in Congress will step aside and let us get on with the job. They may have successfully blocked us so far, but we're not going to give up.

To reduce teenage unemployment, especially black teenage unemployment, which is the highest segment of unemployment in the country, we've proposed a youth employment opportunity wage for the summer months. When I think back to my own boyhood, I remember how each summer I used to look for a job and get a job, and starting when I was 14 years old. And there wasn't anyone around to tell them that if I was willing to accept the pay that was offered that I couldn't take the job. Of course, I didn't earn as much as a full-time working man, but it was good money to me. And I was providing genuine service to my employers.

I'm convinced that it's only common sense to enact this opportunity wage and help young people get summer jobs, needed discipline, and experience. And they won't be taking jobs away from permanent, adult workers. But they will be, as unskilled and new in the job market, working at a rate that I think would be commensurate and fair for their position in the work force. Today they're unemployed because many of the jobs that would be available do not afford the minimum wage and what it has risen to. After all, why should the Federal Government stand in the way of a young man or a woman who is finding their first job? I might add that at their recent conference, America's black mayors gave our opportunity wage proposal a firm endorsement.

Despite the importance of all these efforts, one change our administration has brought about is doing more to help black Americans than all of the programs put together, and I'm talking about economic expansion. Today, inflation is less than half. As a matter of fact, it's down to about a third of what it was when we took office. Retail sales and factory orders are up. Since the expansion began, the unemployment rate has shown the steepest drop in 30 years, and over 6 million Americans have found jobs. And more Americans are working now than ever before in our history, and more jobs are being created at a faster rate here than in any other major industrialized nation.

Yes, black employment is still -- or unemployment is still too high. But as I pledged last year to the National Council of Negro Women, I intend to see to it that every American regardless of race, religion, or gender benefits from this recovery. Today black unemployment is dropping even more quickly, I'm glad to say, than white unemployment. And our economic program will go on creating jobs if we control government spending and if we keep taxes where they belong, which is down.

Well, no, we cannot walk alone. And that's why you and I are working to improve the destiny of all Americans -- to make it possible for our people to walk together into a glorious future of freedom and prosperity. I'm convinced that if each of us gives this great cause our best efforts, then our dream will come true, and in Dr. King's words, ``All of God's children will be able to sing with new meaning, `Land where my fathers died, Land of the pilgrims' pride, From every mountain-side Let freedom ring.''' [Applause] Thank you very much.

First of all, I thank you for all you're doing for the country. God bless all of you. And if you didn't mind taking a few more minutes, I'm going into the Blue Room there, and then you can come through, and I can get to say hello to each one of you individually, and we can have our picture taken. All right.

When ratified, the Convention with its Additional Protocol will comprise the first multilateral agreement among the United States and other members of the Organization of American States (OAS) in the field of international judicial cooperation. The provisions of the Convention and Additional Protocol are explained in the report of the Department of State that accompanies this letter. In broad terms, the purpose of the Convention is to facilitate the service in the territory of one Contracting State of documents emanating from civil and commercial proceedings in another Contracting State.

The Convention will, in effect, establish a level of international judicial cooperation among the contracting OAS States analogous to that which now exists among the 24 Contracting States to the Hague Convention on the Service Abroad of Judicial and Extrajudicial Documents in Civil or Commercial Matters. Although the latter convention entered into force for the United States on February 10, 1969, following Senate advice and consent to ratification, only one other OAS member State has become a party to it. Ratification of the Inter-American Convention on Letters Rogatory and the Additional Protocol will thus constitute a significant step in filling the void that now exists in the area of judicial cooperation with other OAS countries. Henceforth, litigants before United States courts or other adjudicatory bodies will be able to avail themselves of a number of improved and simplified procedures for the service of process in OAS countries, with consequent savings of time, effort and expense.

I recommend that the Senate of the United States promptly give its advice and consent to the ratification of this Convention and Additional Protocol, subject to two reservations which are described in the accompanying report of the Department of State and which should be made at the time of the deposit by the United States of the instruments of ratification.

Agriculture has always been a sharing society. Pioneers helped each other cross uncharted lands and establish homesteads. In time of need a neighbor was always willing to step in and give a helping hand, and America's farmers and ranchers have never lost that wonderful spirit. You're carrying it forward.

Through you, farmers and ranchers share know-how and business concepts. You concentrate on what is right with agriculture and how to make it better. You're problemsolvers, community builders, and information sharers. And the accent is on the positive, on success. I don't mind telling you you're my kind of communicators.

You're helping to increase yields, develop new marketing strategies, improve agricultural services, and make genetic improvements in plants and livestock. In fact, you did it so well that the American agricultural community has a record of productivity and efficiency unmatched by any other in the world. Agriculture is a driving force in our nation's economy, and you can be very proud of what your industry has accomplished.

Our administration will continue doing all we can to help the farm community recover from past policy mistakes and economic difficulties. One of my first actions, as you know, in this job was to lift the Soviet grain embargo. And last August, we signed a new 5-year grain agreement with the Soviet Union. The Soviet Union has agreed to purchase 9 million tons annually and can purchase up to 12 million tons without consultation. That's a 50-percent increase over the previous agreement. And this year, we've offered to sell them at least 22 million tons. As long as I'm President, our farmers will never again be asked to bear alone the brunt of our foreign policy.

What we're doing, and what we'll continue to do, is to pursue new export markets and work to remove export barriers. To promote exports, our administration, in the first 2 years, has authorized the largest credit guarantees in our history -- over $9 billion. Export trade leads are being sent electronically to U.S. exporters.

Our trade teams have been continuously on the go in search of new markets. Jack Block has been knocking on doors all over the world, and he's going to keep on knocking. And I know that all of you join me in wishing Jack a very speedy and complete recovery and that he'll be soon -- either here or back out there on the road again.

But I believe these efforts are paying off. We've negotiated new import quotas with Japan that will lead to a near doubling of citrus and beef exports over the next 4 years. And just last month, we reached agreement on internationalization of the yen, an accord that should make our exports more competitively priced.

Last year we demonstrated our determination to counter export subsidies and recovered a 1 million ton wheat flour market in Egypt. As a result, the European Community has joined us in serious discussions in an effort to solve some of the problems caused by their subsidized exports.

And, as you know, I signed contract sanctity legislation that gives farmers additional assurances that existing export contracts will not be abrogated. Let me assure you, now that we've regained our reputation as a reliable supplier, we intend to maintain that reputation.

At home we tackled the price-depressing surplus of 1981 and '82 that could have hung over the market for years by quickly stepping in with that Payment-in-Kind Program. We've moved closer to the point where the market, not the government, will be sending production signals to our producers.

On another front, we've doubled the funds provided for the Farmers Home Administration operating loans and have helped some 270,000 farm borrowers who couldn't get credit through commercial sources. Our Federal Crop Insurance Program dealt with 1983's severe weather problems by paying out $580 million -- that's an all-time high. And the Farmers Home Administration also provided emergency disaster loans at low interest rates and extended filing application deadlines. And we're determined to do all we can for the farmers hit hard by recent flooding in the Midwest. In fact, Secretary Block sent a team out this morning to assess the damage, and they're on site, right now, even as we meet here today.

And today we're hard at work on the 1985 farm bill. The Department of Agriculture is, and will continue, to actively solicit farmers' views on this bill. So far, they've accepted hundreds of pages of written recommendations and held listening sessions in Chicago, Atlanta, Syracuse, and Riverside, California. And I'm pleased to announce that the next session will be held on July 19th in Dallas, Texas.

But considering that a fifth of farmers' cash outlays are for interest expenses -- that 21-percent rate that we inherited when we took office was a devastating blow. And inflation was just as cruel. In the 3 years before 1981, farm costs jumped an outrageous 45 percent. That was at $39.7 billion, and that was the largest 3-year increase in our history. And today the prime interest rate has fallen by nearly half; and we've knocked inflation down to around 4 percent -- well, as a matter of fact, for the last 3 months, it's been 3.6 percent.

But don't get me wrong, interest rates are still higher than you and I would like, and we're going to continue. And I think that to get them down, they just have to finally realize that we're serious about keeping inflation under control. There is no excuse for the interest rates being at the level they are right now, other than just fear of the future.

But we've restored our nation's basic economic health. And if we continue to pursue a sound monetary policy and work to put the Federal budgeting process in order, interest rates will drop more, and inflation will stay down. We all have a stake in making sure that government spending is brought down in line with government revenues. And that's why I strongly favor constitutional reforms to give the President a line-item veto and to mandate, by the Constitution, a balanced Federal budget.

Am I optimistic? Well, you bet I am. I believe our best days are yet to come. With faith, freedom, courage, there's no limit to what the American people can do and will accomplish. And that's always been the way of the American farmer.

So, once again, I want to congratulate you on your Congress and to thank you for what you're doing. I may beat this one [referring to the noise from another airplane taking off from the airport]. [Laughter] By sharing ideas with farm audiences, you're helping to keep our great nation and our farm community strong, prosperous, and free. And as I recently told the National Council of Farmer Cooperatives, America's farmers have my pledge to see to it that the dream of a successful family farm remains a living part of the American dream.

The President. My greetings to all of you -- octogenarians, nonagenarians, and, of course, the kids and my fellow septuagenarians. [Laughter] It's a pleasure to welcome you all here to the East Room, some of the most important members of the American family, the senior citizen volunteers.

I've been taking a look at some of the things that you have been doing, and I can tell you from your accomplishments that your attitude toward life is just like Bernard Baruch's, who once said, ``Old age is always 15 years older than I am.'' [Laughter] I like that attitude. I think the thing about getting older is that you'll never grow old as long as you're still interested in the world and still eager to help it.

And I'm aware of all your great volunteer efforts, not only of the people in this audience but of senior citizens as a whole. There has been, for some time, a stereotype abroad in the land that senior citizens don't do much to contribute to society, don't do much to improve the quality of American life. Well, nothing could be further from the truth. No stereotype is as ill-deserved as that one. The truth is, volunteer work is the most prevalent outside-the-home activity for Americans 65 and over. The vast majority of older people are ready to serve.

Thousands of senior citizen companions are helping the elderly, their fellow citizens, and the handicapped. And across the country, over 350,000 senior citizens work about half a day a week as members of the Retired Senior Volunteer programs. They deliver meals to those who can't leave their homes and provide transportation and friendship for the incapacitated.

The fact is that more and more senior citizens in America are becoming part of a big, unsung, unknown army that is dedicated to making life better for all of us. And in doing this, they and all of you have learned the secret of everlasting youth: Stay involved. Keep taking your place at the table of life. Keep going out there into the world, making new friends, and helping people out.

They always talk about Presidents aging in office, and of course, like everyone else we do. But I also think that if you enjoy this office and the great debates of the day, then you'll always stay pretty young. That's the key, I think, loving your work -- either the work you do for a living or the work you choose to do when you've retired. But I know I have nothing to tell you about that, because I know that in this group there are some great contributors, some great givers and takers from life.

Now, I'm aware that the aged in our society have some special problems. The world moves so fast these days, and so much of our society is geared to the young that the aged sometimes can feel left out, as if they're no longer in style, and as if they should feel some shame about having grown old. And the greater scourge of old age -- the greatest of all -- is loneliness. And that's why we in this administration have been trying to work closely with national, regional, and local private sector programs and civic and religious groups to help out where and when we can, and to let you know you're deeply appreciated.

I refuse to be apologetic about our generation. There are few generations in the history of mankind who have lived through great transition periods. These young people today will see marvelous things that we've not seen and will not see. But, few generations have ever spanned a great transition period in history. And ours is one of those few generations.

We have literally gone from the horse and buggy to travel to the Moon and in outer space. And we have survived four wars in our lifetime; one of the greatest depressions that has ever hit -- that makes this recent recession look like child's play, compared to what we went through. And we have nothing to apologize for -- for what we have done.

But the incident I wanted to remind -- was back when I was Governor of California. And you know the riotous days on the campuses. And one day a group of student leaders demanded a meeting with me -- the nine campuses of the University of California. Well, I was delighted to meet with them, because if I went to the campus, I'd start a riot. [Laughter] So, they came in -- some of them were barefoot, torn T-shirts, the jeans, the -- that was the uniform of the day -- and they sat down, and one spokesman immediately teed off.

So, all of you in this audience deserve our thanks, our appreciation, and our attention. You're burying old stereotypes, and you're contributing to the world at a time in life when you've earned the right to just sit back and let someone else do it. Well, you're not sitting back, you're leading, and we owe you our thanks.

And now I want to mention someone, Clarence Nash. Ducky is a wonderful man. He's been the voice of Donald Duck at the Walt studios -- Disney studios, for a long time. In fact, this is his 50th anniversary as Donald's voice. And I want to congratulate him and wish him many years of good work.

Mr. Nash. Thank you, Mr. President. It's really a great pleasure to be here today among all of us senior citizens. It's just great to come here for many reasons, too. I like to share some of my experiences in my work with children.

It's less than a year since his death, but already we can define with confidence the lasting nature of his contribution. Henry Jackson was a protector of the Nation, a protector of its freedoms and values. There are always a few such people in each generation. Let others push each chic new belief or become distracted by the latest fashionable reading of history. The protectors listen and nod and go about seeing to it that the ideals that shaped this nation are allowed to survive and flourish. They defend the permanent against the merely prevalent. They have few illusions.

Scoop came to the Congress in 1941, a year when the locomotive of history seemed wrenched from its tracks. In Europe, the ideals of the West were under siege; in America, isolationists warned against involvement. Scoop watched history unfold. He watched Norway, the country of his immigrant parents, fall to Hitler. He came to see [some] conclusions about the world. And from then until the day he died, he rejected isolationism as an acceptable way for a great democracy to comport itself in the world. This view sprang from the heart of the F.D.R. tradition of foreign policy: We accept our responsibilities in the world; we do not flee them.

Henry Jackson absorbed within himself the three great strains of thought that go to the making of a noble foreign policy: a love of freedom; a will to defend it; and the knowledge that America could not and must not attempt to float along alone, a blissful island of democracy in a sea of totalitarianism.

He used to say, ``In matters of national security, the best politics is no politics.'' His sense of bipartisanship was not only natural and complete; it was courageous. He wanted to be President, but I think he must have known that his outspoken ideas on the security of the Nation would deprive him of the chance to be his party's nominee in 1972 and '76. Still, he would not cut his convictions to fit the prevailing style.

Scoop Jackson believed in a strong defense for only one reason: because it would help preserve the peace by deterring military violence. He believed in arms control, because he wanted a more secure world. But he refused to support any arms control initiative that would not, in his judgment, serve the security interests of the Nation and ensure the survival of the West. His command of the facts and his ability to grasp detail were legendary. At congressional hearings, people often learned more from his questions than they did from anyone else's answers.

It was very much like Scoop to see that there was a growing problem in Central America -- and to see that the challenge of protecting freedom and independence there would require the commitment of Democrats and Republicans alike. He conceived the Bipartisan Commission on Central America and became one of its most active leaders. He knew that stable, democratic institutions cannot be achieved in that region without the security that American assistance can provide. He saw the Commission's work completed, and if he were alive today, he would be working tirelessly to get its recommendations accepted by the Congress.

Scoop helped shape national policy on dozens of complex issues -- on strategic planning and arms control, on the Soviet Union and Central America, on human rights and Israel, and the cause of Soviet Jewry.

His support for Israel grew out of his knowledge that political decisions must spring from moral convictions. It wasn't some grand geopolitical abstraction that made him back the creation of Israel; it was seeing the concentration camps firsthand at the end of the war. At Buchenwald he saw the evil, as he said, ``written on the sky,'' and he never forgot.

He said the Jews of Europe must have a homeland. He did everything he could to strengthen the alliance between the United States and Israel, recognizing that we are two great democracies, two great cultures, standing together. Today both nations are safer because of his efforts.

He conceived and fought for the Jackson amendment to the Trade Act of 1974. There's hardly a soul among the hundreds of thousands of Soviet Jews who later found freedom in the West who was not sustained in the struggle to emigrate by the certain knowledge that Scoop was at his side.

Scoop was always at the side of the weak and forgotten. With some people, all you have to do to win their friendship is to be strong and powerful. With Scoop, all you had to do was be vulnerable and alone. And so when Simas Kudirka was in jail in Moscow, it was Scoop who helped mobilize the Congress to demand his release. When Baptists in the Soviet Union were persecuted, it was Scoop who went again and again to the floor of the Senate to plead their cause. When free trade unionists were under attack in Poland, Scoop worked with the American labor movement to help them.

Scoop Jackson was a serious man -- not somber or self-important, but steady and solemn. He didn't think much of the cosmetics of politics. He wasn't interested in image. He was a practitioner of the art of politics, and he was a personage in the affairs of the world. But there was no cause too great or too small for his attention.

When he wasn't on the floor of the Senate or talking to the leaders of the world, he was usually in his office on the phone -- consoling a constituent in a moment of grief, tracking down a lost social security check, congratulating an honor student, or helping a small businessman who was caught up in redtape.

The principles which guided his public life guided his private life. By the time he died, dozens of young men and women had been helped through school by a scholarship fund that he established and sustained. No one knew the money came from Scoop, until a change in the financial disclosure laws many years later forced him to 'fess up. He had never told the voters; he'd never even told his own staff.

A few days later, in a eulogy for Scoop, it was pointed out that there's a room in the Senate where members of the public are greeted. And on the walls of that room are the portraits of five of the greatest U.S. Senators, men chosen by the members of the Senate to reflect the best that chamber ever knew. There's Robert Taft, who, like Scoop, was Mr. Integrity, and LaFollette, who, like Scoop, often swam against the tide. There's Calhoun, who loved the South as Scoop loved the West, and Webster, who tried, like Scoop, to be a force to hold the Nation together, in spite of its differences. And there's Henry Clay, a gifted man, who, like Scoop, would have been a great president.

I'm joining those who would suggest to the majority leader that the Senate make room and commission a portrait so that Scoop Jackson can be with his peers. And when it's all done and in place, I'd be very proud to be among those who would go to the Senate and unveil it, Republicans and Democrats alike, a bipartisan effort in memory of the great bipartisan patriot of our time.

Representative and Senator for more than four decades, Henry Martin Jackson was one of the greatest lawmakers of our century. He helped to build the community of democracies and worked tirelessly to keep it vigorous and secure. He pioneered in the preservation of the Nation's natural heritage, and he embodied integrity and decency in the profession of politics. For those who make freedom their cause Henry Jackson will always inspire honor, courage, and hope.

Well, Drs. Billington, Hamburg, Ellison, and Johnson, thank you for bringing your distinguished group to the White House. When I heard that you would be meeting at the Smithsonian to discuss U.S.-Soviet exchanges, I was eager to share my thoughts with you on this timely and important topic.

For many months, I have encouraged the Soviet Union to join with us in a major effort to see if we could make progress in these broad problem areas: reducing the threat and use of force in solving international disputes, reducing armaments in the world, and establishing a better working relationship with each other.

I have explained our efforts to reduce arms, particularly nuclear arms, and to establish a useful dialog on regional issues. Let me describe to you some of the many efforts that we're making to establish a better working relationship with the Soviet Union.

We've informed the Soviet Government that we're prepared to initiate negotiations on a new exchanges agreement, and we've completed our preparations for these negotiations. We've proposed to resume preparations to open consulates in New York and Kiev. We've taken steps to revive our agreements for cooperation in environmental protection, housing, health, and agriculture. Activities under these agreements have waned in recent years, because there've been no meetings of their joint committees to plan projects. We've proposed that preparations begin for such meetings in order to increase the number of active projects.

We're in the process of renewing several bilateral agreements that otherwise would have expired this year. And we've agreed to extend our fishing agreement for 18 months, and we're looking at possibilities to increase cooperation under the terms of the agreement.

We've proposed that our Agreement to Facilitate Economic, Industrial and Technical Cooperation be renewed for another 10 years and that preparations begin for a meeting of our Joint Commercial Commission.

The U.S. Navy delegation held talks last month with their Soviet counterparts in accord with our agreement on avoiding incidents at sea. And we've agreed to extend this useful agreement for another 3 years.

We're reviewing the World Oceans Agreement, which has been useful in promoting joint oceanographic research, and we'll give careful thought to renewing the agreement prior to its expiration. And we've made proposals in several other areas to improve dialog, foster cooperation, and solve problems.

Alaska. We've proposed a joint simulated space rescue mission in which astronauts and cosmonauts would carry out a combined exercise in space to develop techniques to rescue people from malfunctions in space vehicles. And we're currently conducting another round of talks on consular matters, trying to improve visa procedures and facilitate travel between our two countries.

Marine on search and rescue procedures to assist citizens of all countries lost at sea. And we've made progress in our talks on upgrading the hotline, proposing discussions on potential nuclear terrorist incidents, on establishing a joint military communications line, and on upgrading embassy communications in both countries. We've also suggested regular high-level contacts between military personnel of our two countries.

Meaningful contact with a closed society will never be easy. And I'm as disturbed as you are by recent reports of new measures taken by Soviet authorities to restrict contacts between Soviet citizens and foreigners. These restrictions come on top of intensified repression of those brave Soviet citizens who've dared to express views contrary to those of the Soviet political elite.

The people of the Soviet Union pay a heavy price for the actions of their government. In fact, we all pay a price. When the Soviet Government takes repressive actions against its people and attempts to seal them off from the outside world, their own intellectual and cultural life suffers. At the same time, the rest of the world is deprived of the cultural riches of the Soviet people. What would classical music be without a Tchaikovsky or literature without a Tolstoi or chemistry without a Mendeleev.

Civilized people everywhere have a stake in keeping contacts, communication, and creativity as broad, deep, and free as possible. The Soviet insistence on sealing their people off and on filtering and controlling contacts and the flow of information remains the central problem.

When Soviet actions threaten the peace or violate a solemn agreement or trample on standards fundamental to a civilized world, we cannot and will not be silent. We cannot -- well, to do so would betray our deepest values. It would violate our conscience and ultimately undermine world stability and our ability to keep the peace. We must have ways short of military threats that make it absolutely clear that Soviet actions do matter and that some actions inevitably affect the quality of the relationship.

These reactions do lead to a decrease in contacts with the people of the Soviet Union, and this is a dilemma. However, our quarrel is not with the Russian people, with the Ukrainian people, or any of the other proud nationalities in that multinational state. So, we must be careful in reacting to actions by the Soviet Government not to take out our indignations on those not responsible. And that's why I feel that we should broaden opportunities for Americans and Soviet citizens to get to know each other better.

But our proposals to do that are not a signal that we have forgotten Afghanistan. We'll continue to demonstrate our sympathy and strong support for the Afghan people. The United States will support their struggle to end the Soviet occupation and to reestablish an independent and neutral Afghanistan.

Andrei Sakharov, Yelena Bonner, Anatoly Shcharanskiy, Yuriy Orlov, and so many others. The persecution of these courageous, noble people weighs very heavily on our hearts. It would be wrong to believe that their treatment and their fate will not affect our ability to increase cooperation. It will, because our conscience and that of the American people and freedom-loving people everywhere will have it no other way.

You know, I don't think there's anything we're encouraging the Soviet leaders to do that is not as much in their interest as it is in ours. If they're as committed to peace as they say, they should join us and work with us. If they sincerely want to reduce arms, there's no excuse for refusing to talk, and if they sincerely want to deal with us as equals, they shouldn't try to avoid a frank discussion of real problems.

Some say for the Soviet leaders peace is not the real issue; rather, the issue is the attempt to spread their dominance by using military power as a means of intimidation, and there is much evidence to support this view. But it should be clear by now that such a strategy will not work.

The way governments can best promote contacts among people is by not standing in the way. Our administration will do all we can to stay out of the way and to persuade the Soviet Government to do likewise. Now, we know this won't happen overnight, but if we're to succeed, you must stay involved and get more Americans into wider and more meaningful contact with many more Soviet citizens.

It may seem an impossible dream to think there could be a time when Americans and Soviet citizens of all walks of life travel freely back and forth, visit each other's homes, look up friends and professional colleagues, work together in all sorts of problems, and, if they feel like it, sit up all night talking about the meaning of life and the different ways to look at the world.

In most countries of the world, people take those contacts for granted. We should never accept the idea that American and Soviet citizens cannot enjoy the same contacts and communication. I don't believe it's an impossible dream, and I don't think you believe that, either.

The President. Well, John Cruz, Jim Chandler, Dewey Thomas, Raymon Dones, and all of you very distinguished ladies and gentlemen, good afternoon and a warm welcome to you. Believe me, I extend that welcome with a very special pleasure, because when it comes to lifting human hearts with the spirit of hope and hard work, when it comes to building progress with a spirit of enterprise, and when it comes to building America by serving the Nation with pride, then, yes, we're talking about members of the National Association of Minority Contractors.

You understand so well a central truth of human progress: The struggle by all Americans for freedom from discrimination must be a spiritual struggle for brotherhood, must be a political struggle for full participation at the ballot box; but just as important, it must be an economic struggle for opportunity in a growth economy that creates jobs, not welfare; wealth, not poverty; and freedom, not dependency. And this is a lesson America has been taking too long a time to learn.

We know that prior to the 1960's it was an accepted and sometimes legal practice to discriminate in housing, education, public accommodations, and in employment. Then, in the wake of the Kennedy tax cuts, the economy began growing rapidly, but still minorities did not benefit as fully as they should have. Yet we will always remember the historic achievements of great Americans who have managed to overcome such discrimination -- Americans like Andrew Brimmer, the first black ever to be appointed as a Governor of the Federal Reserve System; Ralph Bunche, the first American black to win the Nobel Peace Prize; and Benjamin Banneker, who contributed to the original design and great beauty of our Nation's Capital.

The civil rights movement of the 1960's helped start the repeal of the unjust system of discrimination. But beginning in 1966, on the very heels of the breakdown of these legal barriers, the economy entered a period of disappointing performance that lasted through the decade of the seventies. Black Americans had seen the economic train moving and had fought for and won the right to purchase a ticket. But as they came aboard, the train began to slow down, and then it stopped altogether.

Many of those big government programs had compassionate, indeed, noble intentions, but they also had serious adverse consequences. They marked a departure from creating wealth to creating dependency. I believe what black Americans need more, or most, is more opportunity, more enterprise, a bigger cash box, and economic emancipation. And to paraphrase, Thomas Wolfe, to every man and woman, regardless of their birth, their shining, golden opportunity to live, to work, to be themselves and to become whatever their vision can combine to make them -- that is the promise of America. And that promise is what we came to Washington to restore.

When we arrived here we found the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression. And I know to many of you the Great Depression is just something you've read about. But take it from one who lived through it as an adult -- [laughter] -- trying to get a job and working, the most recent recession, bad as it was, there was just no comparison with that Great Depression. And we must never have anything like that happen again in our land.

Double-digit inflation though, 4 years ago, was destroying people's savings and brutally attacking the elderly and others on fixed incomes. Overregulation, high taxes, and record interest rates were destroying a dream of minority business ownership and home ownership for all but a select few.

So, we went to work to make a fundamental change in direction -- a change from control by government to control of government; a change from taxing you more, no matter how hard you tried, to rewarding you for your work and for your working harder and producing more than ever before.

We said we couldn't change more than a decade of mistakes overnight, that our progress would come in inches and feet, rather than miles, but that progress would come. And now I know the concerns expressed about this administration's programs, and, frankly, if I believed the things that I've heard and read, I'd be concerned, too. But when we look at America, I think we can see a much different picture.

We can see an American economic expansion, led by a surge of productivity, innovation, the fastest rising rate of business investment since 1949, and a record number of business incorporations. And that's progress.

The overall black unemployment rate has fallen more sharply than the white unemployment rate; but it's still much too high, and it's needlessly high. For 2 years, a cruel charade has been perpetuated by some in the Congress on people at the bottom of the income scale, the very people who most desperately need opportunities to better themselves, to develop their skills, and to become productive, self-reliant members of the American mainstream.

As you know, we've proposed an innovative idea that's called enterprise zones to begin providing opportunities in some of the most destitute areas of the country and in our inner cities. But today, areas that could have become new sites for development and economic growth, pockets of enterprise, jobs, and a bright and hopeful future, remain vacant, neglected, and impoverished.

And let me just say to them today: Please spare us their sermons on fairness and compassion. If they want minority Americans to have more opportunity, doing nothing isn't doing enough. Give enterprise zones a fair debate out there on the floor and then a chance for the representatives in government to vote on it. In the name of growth, let's stop talking billions for dependency and start creating opportunity [enterprise] zones for opportunity. And in the name of America, let's stop spreading bondage and start spreading freedom.

Now, we hope to have a vote today -- but certainly before the Congress goes home -- on another important issue which could provide opportunities, experience, discipline, and greater self-esteem for teenagers. I'm talking about our youth employment opportunity wage proposal, which I'm sure you support -- and we're very grateful for your support.

We've seen that one of the greatest barriers to more jobs for youth, and especially for minority young people, is the single minimum wage system. The truth is, while everyone must be assured a fair wage, there's no sense in mandating $3.35 an hour for startup jobs that simply aren't worth that much in the marketplace, the kind of jobs that young people can get in the vacation months of the summer or after school and weekend jobs. All that does is guarantee that fewer jobs for teenagers will be created and fewer people will be hired. So, in the time remaining, we hope you'll help persuade the Congress to pass our youth unemployment [employment] opportunity wage [bill].

We can create more than 400,000 new summer jobs for American youth. We can do it without displacing existing workers, and that should be a goal everyone supports, Republicans and Democrats alike. It is a lower minimum wage for young people who are still getting an education and who'll be going out there looking for their first jobs.

And let's be clear on one thing; those measures are only a part of what the Congress must achieve in spending restraint. We'll be watching the appropriations process with an eagle eye, and I stand ready to use my veto pen to make sure that spending growth by government continues to come down.

The major points of that initiative were a program to form 6,000 new minority businesses a year for the next 10 years; a commitment to expand, with Federal help, at least 60,000 existing minority business enterprises; and a commitment by which the Federal Government intends to procure some $15 billion in minority business goods and services over the 3 fiscal years.

To get things rolling, Federal agency MBE procurement objectives were to be increased by at least 10 percent over fiscal year '82 levels, and I'm delighted to report that we succeeded. We've also been successful in our efforts to increase minority vending by recipients of Federal grants and cooperative agreements, increase credit assistance, and maintain the level of management and technical assistance.

About a year ago, on July 14th, 1983, I signed an Executive order to improve Federal planning for minority business programs. Department and agency heads were directed to develop and implement incentives to encourage greater minority business subcontracting by Federal prime contractors. I directed SBA, the Small Business Administration, to make special efforts to expand the number of minority firms participating in Federal procurement programs. And I'm delighted to report that from March of '83 to March of this year, SBA added 588 firms to their programs.

We encouraged American business leaders to expand their business transactions with minority firms. And the Surface Transportation Assistance Act has resulted in an additional $1 billion in new minority contracting opportunities for both this year and last year.

Now, here's what meeting our goal will mean to you. Nearly $3 billion more in contracting will be provided for minority businesses in 3 years than was provided in all the 12 years during the last three administrations. And just so no one forgets these commitments and the need for continued growth, we've started a new tradition: Beginning last year, and from now on, the first full week in October has been designated Minority Enterprise Development Week.

County. Well, the Justice Department's position in that case resulted from the technical wording of that particular ordinance, which allowed bids by only one minority group to the exclusion of all others.

And this administration has strongly supported programs to provide special assistance to minority businesses, as evidenced by our active minority procurement program. And I assure you today, we're going to continue to do so.

Given opportunities, we know that minority firms can prevail in fair and open competition. And we will keep supporting, at every level of government, a broad range of programs to reach out to disadvantaged sectors of the community and to increase their opportunities to participate in government contracting.

We're trying to provide the broadest possible range of opportunities to all Americans without regard to race, creed, color, or sex. And sometimes it makes your day when you hear from people that understand this and agree.

I received a letter from a 39-year-old black man who said, ``Your policies are not in the least bit anti-black or anti-poor. As a matter of fact,'' he said, ``it's my opinion that your fight against inflation, your war on the drug traffic, your tough stand against street crime, your effort in revitalizing the nation's economy, are all of great importance to us poor people and us black people in America.'' Well, he brightened my day. To people like him and to all of you, I can only say thank you for what you give to America. Thank you for keeping her strong, for keeping her free, and for keeping our dream alive.

Together we can make our beloved land the source of all dreams and opportunities that she was placed on this good Earth to provide. I can't help but believe that we are on the good path and that if we continue on that path, our children will walk together into a glorious future and prosperity.

Let me just say one thing, that you're contributing -- perhaps it hasn't struck you yet -- but the contribution you're making. One of the contributing factors to poverty is, in a community or a neighborhood, dollars that come in there. How many times do they revolve before they move out of that community to do business elsewhere? And for too long a time your neighborhoods have been ones where the dollars didn't even rotate once before they went out into the other communities.

But you, by creating the businesses that you have, you are going to change that factor, and prosperity for all people will come more and more as you see that those dollars are spent within the neighborhood several times before they find their way out to somebody in the outside.

Mr. Cruz. Mr. President, on behalf of the National Association of Minority Contractors, its board of directors, and its membership, we'd like to present you with, first, a memento of our association's national convention that's taking place here and, secondly, a symbolic NAMC hardhat, which symbolizes the contributions that minority contractors have made in the past and will continue to make in the future to building and making America great, strong, and free.

Ms. Clarke. I just want to take this opportunity to shake your hand. I am a black businesswoman here in the United States and a proud American and proud that you are our President and are helping us to do what is right, for leading us in the right direction.

The theme of the world's fair is the ``Age of Discovery.'' The exposition will showcase the immense social, economic, scientific and cultural achievements which have changed the world since 1492 and will preview the discoveries anticipated in the century to come. The event also will serve to symbolize the indomitable nature of the human spirit which fired Columbus to pursue his dream of a New World and which continues to inspire us as Americans in pursuit of our dream of democracy and freedom.

The 1992 Chicago-Seville International Exposition thus promises to become a symbol of international peace and process, illuminating our past and our future. With its many splendid opportunities for the stimulation of trade and for cultural and technological exchange, the exposition has the enthusiastic support of the United States Government. This Administration will extend the fullest possible recognition to the event in accordance with the Paris Convention of November 22, 1928, as modified, and United States law.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-seventh day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

The President. Good afternoon, and welcome. And it's always good to see so many old friends and have the chance to make new ones. And it's always a pleasure for me to be joined by two of the most important women in my life, Nancy and Maureen.

In addition, here at lunch we've been joined by two other outstanding women in our administration, the Under Secretary for Travel and Tourism at the Department of Commerce, Donna Tuttle, and the Department of Education's General Counsel, Maureen Corcoran. And I see we've been joined -- you've probably noticed that there were some here that seemed out of place -- [laughter] -- a few of the men in the administration. And in this crowd they do sort of stand out.

But permit me to begin by giving each of you high praise and heartfelt thanks for all you've done for our Republican cause. Politics has its share of fun and glamour, but in the end it's sheer, unrelenting hard work from people like you that makes it possible for us to put our beliefs into practice. And the role you play is especially important, because you demonstrate the Republican commitment to American women.

The GOP commitment to women runs deep. Some people have tried to keep that a secret. First, the GOP gave its backing to women's suffrage. Then our party became the first to elect a woman to the United States Congress and the only party ever to elect women to the United States Congress and the only party ever to elect women to the United States Senate who were not first filling unexpired terms. And today the two women in the Senate, my friends Nancy Kassebaum and Paula Hawkins, are Republicans. And we have nine outstanding Republican women in the House of Representatives. Now, I think you'll agree with me; it's time to give them more company.

I should say, in public office outside Washington. Recently, Maureen gave me some impressive figures about Republican women candidates. In the 23 State primaries that have been held this year to select candidates for State and Federal offices, in addition to incumbents, the Grand Old Party fielded over 200 women. And more than 150 of you came out of your primaries victorious.

Now, those of you that are in or are running for State legislatures and other State and local offices, you're on the front lines of democracy. You have the chance to put your beliefs into practice close to the people, and Washington can't match that. We look on you as the eyes and ears, the leaders who truly know what the American people think and need. And just as we're eager to see the number of Republican women officeholders grow at the national level, we're determined to see these numbers grow in every American town, city, and State.

I want to be very clear on this: There's no place in the Republican Party for those who would discriminate against women. And let me say there is no place in the Republican Party for those who would exhibit prejudice against anyone. There's no place in our party for the kind of bigotry and ugly rhetoric that we've been hearing outside our party recently. We have no room for hate here, and we have no place for the haters.

We Republicans are working to reshape America's destiny. Everyone who takes part -- from stuffing envelopes to running for a position on the town council to holding national office -- is making history.

Now, I know you're having briefings all day, but if I could just take a moment, I'd like to give you an overview of what we've been trying to do. I may be plowing some ground that's been well plowed already.

But on the legislative front, we've made proposals to toughen child support enforcement significantly. These proposals would improve State collection of child support payments and require the adoption of proven, effective enforcement techniques. One version passed the House in November, and in April, the Senate passed a similar bill. And we trust that a conference now to resolve any differences will meet very soon.

Recently, I heard about a 62-year-old woman in Rhode Island whose husband, unbeknownst to her, dropped the survivor coverage in his company's pension plan. So, when he died, she was left with virtually nothing. Now, that's the kind of tragedy our pension reform will prevent.

Tax equity for women is another vital field. Many of our tax equity proposals are contained in the deficit reduction act that the Congress passed just this week. Of course, we're disappointed that the Congress dropped our proposal to raise the spousal IRA limit from $2,250 to $4,000, and we intend to go on pushing for its adoption. But the Congress did adopt a number of our proposals, including one that will permit contributions to thousands of nonprofit dependent care organizations like day-care centers to be treated as tax exempt. Another will remove current restrictions which keep women from treating taxable alimony as compensation in determining IRA contributions.

These measures represent a significant advance for American women. And despite the importance of these efforts, however, one step we've made possible has done more to give American women opportunity and independence than all the others combined. It's called economic expansion.

Just 3\1/2\ years ago, you remember, we inherited an economic disaster -- soaring inflation and interest rates with declining productivity. The month that I stood on the steps of the Capitol to take my oath of office, inflation was in double digits, growth was disappearing, and the prime interest rate had hit the highest peak since the Civil War.

The economic crisis struck women particularly hard. Most elderly Americans living on fixed incomes are women, and they found their purchasing power eaten up by inflation. Women saw jobs become more and more scarce. They found that 12\1/2\-percent inflation made it a nightmare to buy groceries and pay the bills. And the thousands of women who wanted to start their own businesses saw a 21-percent prime interest rate slam shut the doors of opportunity.

Federal spending; we pruned needless regulation; we reduced personal income tax rates and passed an historic reform called tax indexing, a reform that means government can never again use inflation to profit at your expense. We reduced the marriage tax penalty, almost doubled the maximum child-care credit, increased the limits for IRA and Keogh contributions, and eliminated estate taxes on family farms and businesses for surviving spouses.

Today, from Maine to California a powerful economic expansion is taking place. Inflation has plummeted by more than two-thirds since we took office to under 3.6 percent for the last 3 months. Retail sales are up. The American worker's real wages are rising. Investment by U.S. businesses in new plants and equipment -- that has risen at the fastest rate since 1949.

The best news of all: Since the expansion began, more than 6 million Americans have found jobs, making for the steepest drop in unemployment rate in more than 30 years. Just as the economic crisis hit women hard, today's expansion is giving them new opportunities. The unemployment rate among adult women has dropped from 9.1 to 6.8 percent, and today, more women have jobs than ever before in our nation's history -- more than 50 percent -- and that has never occurred before.

And we can see that the jobs the women hold are getting better and better. In 1983 women filled almost three-quarters of all the new jobs in managerial, professional, and technical fields. And the number of women-owned businesses is growing four times faster than the number of those owned by men.

Just as we've acted decisively here at home, in foreign relations, I think, the United States is demonstrating new firmness and a new sense of purpose. From the Pacific Basin to Western Europe to Central America to an island called Grenada, we're working to defend freedom and peace.

In our dealings with the Soviets, we're strengthening our defenses while proving our willingness to negotiate in good faith. Because we've been doing this, the prospects for world peace stand on a new and firm footing. It isn't true, as you've heard in the demagoguery that is being uttered today, that we are in greater danger than we've ever been. No, we aren't, because we're stronger than we've been in a great many years.

I believe our trip to Japan and Korea and our visit to China markedly improved our relations with those important nations in Asia. And our recent trip to Europe showed all the world that 40 years after so many gave their lives on the beaches of Normandy, the West remains unshakably committed to the defense of human freedom.

We Republicans have more than a good record; we have a vision. We see an America forever free from the evils of inflation. To make that dream a reality, we must enact structural reforms like the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment. We see an America with a simple and fairer tax code that provides the American people with new incentives to work, save, and invest. And we intend to design a major tax reform in which we broaden the tax base and lower personal income tax rates for all who work and earn, and that will be a great step forward for America.

The Republican message is simple: Our country's best days are still to come, and with faith and courage, we can build a genuine opportunity society, a nation where all women and men have the chance to go forward just as far as their dreams and talents will take them. I just have to believe that if we did everything in our own power to carry our message to the voters, then November 6th they'll respond by keeping Republicans where we belong, on the job.

The President. I think the message -- and you're right, many of the things that we've done and that we believe in are very deeply held secrets. But I do believe that we've got the facts. And you can -- we've got to see that you get the information that counters the arguments of whether we're fair or unfair.

For example, our tax program, the tax cut that we put in, which was the basic stimulant for the present economic recovery. And we're supposed to have -- we're not the friends of the poor, we benefited the rich. Well, let them explain then why the people with incomes above $50,000 a year are paying a higher percentage of the total income tax burden than they have ever paid before and the people below $20,000 a year are paying a smaller percentage of the tax than they ever paid before.

There wasn't anything unfair in our tax. But there was something unfair about giving, for example, people on Aid to Dependent Children, on welfare, giving them three raises in just a brief period of a few years before we got here. And at the end of the three raises, because of their inflation, those people had purchasing power that was $43 a month less than they'd had before they got the raises because inflation was raised far faster than they were raising the taxes.

The President. It would affect it dramatically and drastically, and we're not going to give up on that fight. We have a totalitarian government in Nicaragua that took power out of the barrel of a gun, then did what Castro did in Cuba when he won the revolution -- kicked out of the revolution all the people who honestly wanted true democracy.

Most of the contras we were trying to support are people who were once part of the revolution, but who were ousted, and the Communist element took over. And there is a totalitarian government now in Nicaragua. And the Nicaraguan Government is supporting and providing ammunition and weapons to the guerrillas in El Salvador who are trying to overthrow a government that was duly elected by the people, and it's had three elections since that is democratic and not totalitarian at all.

And we're just going to have to keep fighting and convince the people of this country that to listen to those who would shut off Nicaragua is to listen to people -- the same people who criticize and say that we're willing to support rightwing dictatorships, but never do we see anything from the left. Well, we're supporting people who are fighting for democracy and freedom. And those people who shut off that aid are supporting a totalitarian dictatorship in Nicaragua.

Thomases who refused to believe you when you promised to turn our economy around, to beat inflation, reduce unemployment and taxes, to put new millions of workers to work, and restore a widely felt sense of national security. You have kept your promises, and it borders on being miraculous. Now, we all know you have a wonderfully engaging personality, and everybody loves you. But you certainly didn't accomplish this with your charisma. Now, what is your secret?

No, it is giving more back to the people. And if there's one thing that, again, has not been treated as widely as it should with regard to credit -- when we started our private sector initiative and encouraged people at the private level to find areas where they could be of help that, for many years, we've assumed now were government's functions, that government should take care of these. This has been so widespread -- every major charity is collecting, even in the depths of the recession, was collecting more money than they ever had before. But the programs -- we have over 3,000 programs computed over here in the West Wing in the private sector initiative place, where people all over the country can call in with some problem, and we can tell them how some community, some private group has found an answer, has put together a package at the private level with no government involvement to take care of this. And we can give them the phone numbers and the addresses of the people to get in touch with and find out how it was done.

An example, if I could -- and I know I've got to run, I'm way past time here. But down in Texas, one town in Texas had a thing called ``Christmas in April.'' And all year long, in that town, they kind of keep their eyes open. They spot the homes of people that are poor or elderly or disabled, and so forth. They see things that need doing, whether it's new plumbing or painting or a new roof, or whatever it might be. And then come April, these volunteers -- and this includes the professional people, doctors and lawyers and judges and merchants and people of that kind -- they put on their old clothes and out they go. And they've all been assigned to a task. They put on new roofs for these people, they do all these things.

And here I was with all of this private sector thing. And to show you how fast it all happened, I'm looking at television one day up there while I was getting dressed, upstairs, and I saw a television program and a fellow there with a painter's cap and a paint brush in his hand. And, yes, he was a judge. And what was he doing? Well, this ``Christmas in April'' and so forth. And I started to yell to Nancy that, ``Hey, they've got that town in Texas on the air.'' I found out it was Washington, DC. [Laughter] They've adopted the program here, too, and all over the country.

But, as I said, the main thing, I think, that's been wrong -- we've had seven recessions before this last one since World War II. All of them have been cured by the Government artificially stimulating the money supply, bringing on more inflation and bringing on, within 2 or 3 years, another recession. And I have believed that we have had our business troubles and our recessions because the Government is taking too high a percentage from the gross national product for Government functions and not leaving it out there at the private sector.

So, by way of the tax cut, by George Bush heading up a task force to reduce and eliminate needless regulations -- they eliminated enough regulations to reduce the paperwork burden on the American people by 300 million man-hours -- and doing that so that it was a real stimulant to the economy, all of a sudden, we find we're getting more money at the lower tax rates than we were getting at the higher tax rates. And the economy is showing the result.

The United States Government has taken note of the statement by the Soviet Government proposing a meeting of delegations in September to begin negotiations on ``preventing the militarization of outer space.'' The militarization of space began when the first ballistic missiles were tested and when such missiles and other weapons systems using outer space began to be deployed. The United States Government therefore draws attention to the pressing need for the resumption of negotiations aimed at a radical reduction of nuclear weapons on a balanced and verifiable basis.

The President. My fellow Americans, this week the Congress passed, and I will soon sign, a series of measures to reduce budget deficits by about $63 billion over the next 3 fiscal years. My approval of these measures should not by any means be considered the final action on deficits this year. The Congress still has much work to do to achieve spending restraint and help our economic expansion continue. I stand ready to use my veto to make sure it fulfills that responsibility.

Spending restraint and personal incentives for growth are the two greatest deficit reduction weapons we have. That's why the ultimate solution to budget deficits must be a mandatory restriction on the Congress' ability to spend and a simplification of the entire tax system, enabling us to broaden the tax base and lower personal income tax rates for all of you who work and earn.

But today I don't intend to go on talking about the economy. I have a special guest. Nancy is here with me, and she'd like to speak to you about the problem of drugs and what, together, all of us can do about the problem.

During the past 2 years, I've traveled throughout our country, and what I've seen happening to our children is terribly frightening. In fact, sometimes it seems as if we could lose a whole next generation to drug abuse.

Cocaine, PCP, marijuana, alcohol, speed -- these are the enemies of our children. They're cunning and treacherous and, oh, so very patient. As one former teenage alcoholic put it, ``Alcohol will wait forever. It's always going to be there.'' And that child was right; which is why we must be there as well.

And this enemy shows no mercy. It still sends a chill through me to recall a visit I made sometime ago to an elementary school in Atlanta. I asked the class of third graders how many had been offered drugs, and almost every hand went up.

Her letter isn't unusual. Other children have talked frankly to me about how young they were when they began to experiment with drugs and how school became little more than a place to buy dope and get high.

Again, the wall of denial. But there may be a light at the end of the tunnel -- something that fills me with hope about our children's future and about our country's future. We're finally becoming aware of the terrible problem of drugs.

These are parents who have learned -- some the hard way -- that the most effective answer to the tragedy of drugs is involvement and knowledge. And, too, now they know that discipline is something you do for a child, not to him.

Ronnie, I know you join me in the belief that if we all work together, become more involved in our children's lives and more knowledgeable, we can help save a generation and help preserve its promise and hope.

It's been a busy week here in Washingtion. We've made a proposal for merging tax reforms. It's also been a week in which we tried to bring a little Quaker wisdom here, too. And let me explain why the two go together.

You see, Washington doesn't take to change very well. Special interest groups set up offices here, hire some energetic staff members, make it a point to get to know the right people, and then use their influence to win special treatment. The accumulation of all these special privileges -- and the tax code is the best example -- frequently leads to a tangle of confusing laws and chaotic regulations. It's the public interest that suffers. And the ones who have to try and make sense of all the rules and regulations, not to mention footing the bill for the special privileges, are Americans like you who can't afford to hire a lobbyist in Washington.

You see, the President and the Vice President are the only ones in Washington elected by all the people. In a way then, the President should be the people's lobbyist, your lobbyist. And any President who wants to succeed should remember his first obligation is to the people. They elected him, and only they can give him the support he needs to get things done.

Well, that's certainly been the case in the last 4 years. The victories we've won belong to the people. You made them happen by writing, telegramming, or speaking personally to your Representatives and Senators. You made your voice heard here in Washington, a voice strong enough to make the politicians do what was right, not for the special interests but for America.

So, this week, once again, I've been trying to do my job by giving you the facts and asking for your help. I won't spend a lot of time right now telling you about the current problems with our tax code. Each of you has had to face that nightmare every April 15th. So, that's why I proposed a sweeping new reform that will reduce the 14 tax brackets we now have to only 3 -- a reform that will reduce the many special tax privileges. If our plan goes through, making out your taxes each year will be more simple, and it will reduce all those feelings of unfairness and injustice that so many Americans rightly harbor about our current tax code.

In addition to bringing simplicity and fairness, our plan is also profamily. By raising your standard deduction, boosting exemptions to $2,000 for each taxpayer and dependent, and by expanding the IRA's to include spouses staying at home, our plan is progrowth. And, too, most people would pay lower taxes.

And should you decide to work overtime or put more into your savings, the Government would take less away than it does now. And needy families -- those at the poverty line or near it -- would no longer have to pay Federal income taxes at all. New incentives in the tax code would help them rely less on welfare and public assistance. We'd also be giving small business a hand, the companies largely responsible for providing most of the new jobs in America.

Our tax reform package has many other advantages. Believe me, I could go on. There isn't time for that because I need to get back to that Quaker and his cow. You see, here in Washington the special interests are trying to pick apart our tax reform package. Just as it has opposed so many of the other good things we've tried to do for the American people, much of official Washington is going to oppose this tax reform, too.

That's where all of you and a little Quaker wisdom come in. Just like that Quaker's cow, many in official Washington make a habit of kicking over the American people's milkpail. And as my chief of staff Don Regan said recently, we're going to need the people to go talk to the cow and maybe ask him a few questions about how he or she likes it here on the farm.

So, yes, we very much need your support, especially those of you who've never written before to your Representatives or Senators. Please make your views known, and remind official Washington that you expect to be listened to. Tell them the time for America's tax plan is long overdue. And tell them it's time they stopped letting the entrenched interests and special privileges kick over the milkpail.

Mrs. Teas is a member of the Kent Waldrep International Spinal Cord Research Foundation. She serves on the executive committee of Texans for the Republic and as a member of the Dallas Historical Society.

Hungary. -- Hungary has continued to take a relatively positive and constructive approach to emigration matters. Although three new emigration cases were recorded during the past year, all of them are on the way to being resolved. The number of Hungarian citizens who apply to leave Hungary remains small, and emigration permission is granted without undue difficulty. No sanctions are imposed on those who seek to emigrate, nor do emigration procedures appear excessive.

While many problems remain in the emigration area, Romania's performance has continued to improve over the last year in respect to the numbers of people receiving exit documentation and time required to process their applications. On the basis of Romania's performance and the progress it has made in the area of emigration since last year, I believe that continuation of the waiver applicable to Romania will substantially promote the objectives of the Act.

He has been a member of the Overseas Private Investment Corporation since 1971. He taught at the International Cooperative Training Center at the University of Wisconsin and was an associate professor of agricultural economics at Hampton Institute. He spent 13 years in India as a consultant to the American International Association and for the Cooperative League of the U.S.A.

The President. Well, I can handle what Jim has just said. I know that you've been up on the Hill testifying, and I'd like to add my thanks, and my thanks for your coming down here. Maybe you haven't had time to study our tax reform proposal, but I'm sure you have familiarized yourself to quite an extent with it.

It isn't perfect, as Jim has said, but we believe that it'll work and that we can surpass it. I add to that, having been out on the road for a few days in addition to the polls that we have seen, the people obviously do support this, and I'll be on my way again tomorrow morning.

We all know the shortcomings of the present system. It's unfair; it's hindered technological investment; it impedes economic growth; it does all the things that we've been blaming it for. You supported our efforts in '81 when we reduced taxes. And while we didn't reverse the spending increase of the government, at least we cut back on the rate of increase in spending, and certainly we reduced considerably the paperwork and the regulations that government was imposing on everyone. And the results speak for themselves.

For over 30 months now, at the present rate of growth in the economy, we've had a higher percentage of the working pool employed than any time in our previous history, low inflation rates, interest rates falling. And all our trading partners and their allies and even some of our unfriendly types out there have become envious of what we've done.

And now, thanks to your efforts, maybe we'll have an opportunity to finish the job of providing and securing economic good health for America. But there's an army of lobbyists -- maybe you saw some of them up there on the Hill -- and special interests that are dug in, and they're firing every weapon they own. But I think maybe you've shown them that there are loyal soldiers on the right side who can fire a few salvos themselves.

Together we can brighten the future for our children and our grandchildren. And I'm glad and proud that the American business community has statesmen like yourselves who are willing to come up here and do what you've done in support of this.

And now, as I said, I'm supposed to leave you and turn you back over to Jim and to Don Regan and discuss some, well, the specific provisions that directly concern you. And again, I'll say thanks to you for coming up here.

The President. Well, I think that that would simply mean that we did what we could at that particular time, knowing that there was more really that should be done. And this just shows that we're continuing to improve.

During the past 20 years, the suicide rate has tripled among young people aged 15 - 24. In fact, suicide has become the third leading cause of death in this age group. Last year alone, over 5,000 young Americans took their own lives, and many more attempted to do so.

When a young person commits suicide, it is a personal tragedy as well as a source of deep anguish for family, friends, and neighbors. But it is also a tragedy for society, which must cope not only with the loss of human potential that is the result of the death of any individual, but also with its responsibility to identify the causes of suicide and develop strategies to reduce its incidence.

Although the issues involved in each case are complex and unique, we can draw encouragement from the fact that suicide is no longer a silent subject but a recognized public health problem that can and must be addressed.

Because the root causes of suicide involve so many different psychological, physical, social, and spiritual dimensions, successful preventive action requires the combined efforts of individuals, families, communities, organizations, and governments at all levels. Young people and families who have a member who may be contemplating suicide need to know that there are indeed places to turn for advice and assistance. People who come into contact with youth -- educators, counselors, coaches, ministers, health care providers -- can play a key role in helping a despondent young person by identifying the existence of a problem or contributing factors like drug abuse and family break-up. Government can assist through research and policies which strengthen the family unit and foster a sense of individual self-worth. In short, all of us have the opportunity and responsibility to help deal with this growing problem.

In recognition of the increase in suicide among America's youth and its consequences for our society, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 53, has designated the month of June 1985 as ``Youth Suicide Prevention Month'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this month.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourth day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

Well, I'm proud to be in the home of your champions, the Oklahoma City 89'ers. I'm proud to stand with all of you here on the grounds of this showcase industry for American technology; here on the frontlines where America is charging forward in the battle for international competitive success.

On the business side, the present tax code has a top corporate tax rate of 46 percent. That's too high. But it also provides loopholes that are big enough for a 747 to slide through. Well, you know, in recent years some of our biggest corporations paid no taxes whatsoever, while everyday working people have been taxed up to their eyeballs.

We would also clear the way for more jobs, new products, and technologies by reducing the corporate tax rate from 46 percent to 33 percent. We would cut the maximum tax on capital gains from 20 percent to 17\1/2\ percent, because when we cut capital gains in 1978 and again in 1981, venture capital increased a hundredfold, producing new jobs, higher incomes, and more and more opportunities for Americans.

Now, good as that is, it still isn't good enough. Just like your company shot ahead of the pack, we won't be satisfied until the United States of America can outproduce, outcompete, and outsell anybody anywhere in the world.

Now, I'm delighted to see so many families here today, because when it comes to the income tax you pay, our plan represents the most important profamily proposal in postwar history. We would replace the present system of 14 different brackets with a simple 3-bracket system that will allow you to keep more of each additional dollar you earn. Right now, individual tax rates go all the way up to 50 percent. And you know what that means when you work overtime, right? Yes, it's like Uncle Sam holding a giant stop sign, putting the brakes on your initiative and on progress.

Well, under America's tax plan, the three new rates would be 15, 25, and 35 percent, period. It'll give you the freedom to get ahead, to move up, to succeed. If you work overtime or get a raise, if you're promoted to a better job, if you're able to save some money and invest it, then few of those dollars -- or fewer will go to line Uncle Sam's pockets and more will end up in your wallets, where they belong.

Sixty-nine percent of all taxpayers will pay the lowest rate of 15 percent; 28 percent will pay the middle rate of 25 percent; and only 3 percent of American taxpayers will pay the 35 percent top rate. And we're going to make the tax system so simple, so straightforward that at least half of all Americans, if they choose, won't even have to fill out a tax form.

There's more help on the way for families here in Oklahoma City and throughout America. To give your families the tax relief they deserve, we intend to raise the standard deduction for joint returns to $4,000. We would nearly double the personal exemption for every taxpayer and dependent to $2,000. And we would do this right away on January 1st, 1986.

Now, just in case you couldn't hear me all the way in the back there, I'm going to say it again. We intend to nearly double your personal exemption all the way up to $2,000 effective next year. I said that again; I know you heard me. I said it because I just like saying it. And that $2,000 would be indexed to protect against inflation.

We want to help your family save by expanding the limits also for individual retirement accounts, the things we call IRA's. Our present tax system limits IRA's to $2,250 when one spouse works in the home. You know, that means you can put the money in a retirement account, and you don't have to pay tax on it. I don't think this makes any sense to you, and we didn't think it makes any sense. We happen to think that the homemakers should have the same rights to IRA's as wage earners. After all, our homemakers produce goods and services that, even in strictly economic terms, are invaluable. And by nurturing our children, caring for our ill, and looking after our elderly, homemakers give America its strength and heart.

Now, as we put more resources into your hands, we intend to close the loopholes that benefit the few at the expense of the many. It's about time that we do away with tax breaks for windmills and so-called educational cruises on oceanliners and tax dodges like Cayman Island trusts. It's about time we pulled our money out of foreign tax havens and put it back into investments for you and the future of America.

The President. Thank you. Deductions for State and local taxes will also be dropped. Two-thirds of Americans don't even itemize, so they receive no benefit from the State and local tax deduction. Yet it is this majority that is now subsidizing a handful of the high-tax States.

My friends, some State governments outside Oklahoma have not yet learned to say no to special interest groups and higher taxes. I just don't believe the good people of Oklahoma or other low-tax States like Texas, Montana, or New Hampshire should be forced to pay for their lack of resolve. Do you?

The President. Now, every State has its right to manage its own affairs. But they do not have the right to make all of you carry the burden of their decisions. They do not have the right to make you pay the freight. We could, however, suggest another option to them -- restrain spending and go for growth by enacting tax cuts of your own.

And as we eliminate some deductions for a favored few, we're going to keep others that are important to all of you. The home mortgage interest deduction, for example, reflects America's historic commitment to the value of home ownership. For principal homes, it's a deduction that we intend to keep. You'll also be able to deduct up to $5,000 in other interest payments that you may make, which could be used for a second residence, if you so chose. Those military allowances and veterans' disability payments that are exempt from Federal tax will remain so.

And I think you can begin to see how much easier our new tax plan will make it for families, here in Oklahoma City and across the country, to make ends meet. Consider an Oklahoma family of four struggling near the poverty level with an income of $12,000. By raising the level at which people begin to pay taxes, by doubling the personal exemption, and increasing the standard deduction, our plan would ensure that the family would pay no income tax at all on those earnings -- none.

Now, all the way up and down the income scale, American families would have more resources to devote to their children, to pay for your homes, to put away for retirement, and perhaps here in Oklahoma to buy a boat to use on Grand Lake or Lake Eufaula.

What we're talking about is revolutionary change -- a plan that is progrowth, profairness, profamily, and profuture. This is your plan, and you can make it happen this year if you'll just tell those in Washington to get on board. And if they refuse, please tell them something else -- tell them to stand aside and get out of the way.

The President. We see heroes every day. They're the ones getting up every morning, they get the kids off to school, go to work 5 days a week -- many right here in the Oklahoma City Works -- support our churches and schools. On weekends, they spend extra time with the kids and teach them the enduring values of work, faith, freedom, and love.

And for too long, our tax code has discouraged us, not helped us. It's undermined work and cut into savings. Its unfairness has made our people sick at heart. The time's come for a second American revolution, a revolution in the name of our families and of you, the true American heroes. We can do it, and with your help, we will do it this year.

You know, I just have to interject something here. Back when I was Governor of California and we had a big surplus one year. And my finance director wanted to know what plan did I have for spending that. And I said, ``I've got a plan. Let's give it back.'' It amounted to $850 million. And we figured out you could just give that back to the people by way of a reduction in their income tax for that year; we'd make it up with the surplus.

But to tell you what happens to some people if they're around government too long -- after I made the announcement we were going to do this, one State senator stomped into my office one day and said, ``I consider that an unnecessary expenditure of public funds.'' [Laughter] He'd forgotten where that money comes from. [Laughter] You haven't.

Bill Alexander heard me make a speech, and he then told me the story of his first sermon. And I always figured it was a connection between my speech and his story. He said that he worked for weeks on that sermon. And the first sermon he was to preach, he'd been asked to preach at a little country church out there in the countryside. And he went out for an evening service, stood up on the pulpit, and the church was empty except for one lone little man sitting out there.

The President. Senator, Mrs. Nickles, Congressman Mickey Edwards, and all of you very distinguished ladies and gentlemen. I was hoping I would hear the finish of that story about Bartlesville. [Laughter] But I thank you for a very warm welcome, and thank you for welcoming me to one of the most industrious, energetic, best all-around success stories in America today.

Well, there's one cowboy who has been around almost as long as your State. [Laughter] It's a privilege to come and speak for a fellow member of the youth generation -- [laughter] -- the youngest Member of the United States Senate, your own Don Nickles. When I mention that Don is the youngest, let me add he's also one of the brightest and the best. That's why I ask you right now, please send Don Nickles back to the United States Senate for 6 more years.

I enjoy your accent here in the Southwest -- your accent on opportunity. And I have to believe that your young Senator and this State -- still brand new, with plenty of heart and plenty of hope -- were a match made for each other.

He has a keen understanding of the great truths of our age. He understands that freedom is among the greatest of all blessings and that freedom is a gift of God. He understands that communism poses a grave and mortal threat to human liberty. And he understands that we can't preserve peace by appeasing the Communist bloc; we must preserve peace by blocking communism.

Don is one of the strongest advocates for energy independence in the United States Congress. So, when I say that you've earned your Oklahoma support, I don't mind adding you have my support for the deregulation of natural gas.

The President. That posse I mentioned not only helped rescue us from economic danger, they're leading us on a fast gallop toward a wide-open future of opportunity, progress, and strength for America. We must hold on to our Republican majority.

Your Senator and I agree on a good many things. We agreed that the Federal Government is not our greatest national resource; it's no great gusher of black gold. The Federal Government is the single greatest obstacle to our success. And the last thing we need is another politician telling us we have big deficits because you're not taxed enough. Those deficits ballooned from 50 years of government taxing and spending too much.

You know, I've become convinced over the years that the distinguish between right and left -- the distinction, I should say, is false. There is no real right or left. There's only an up or down -- up to the ultimate in individual freedom consistent with an orderly society or down through statism and the welfare state to the darkness of totalitarian tyranny and human misery.

Adolph Hitler. Follow them. Follow to the right -- they're given as the examples of the extreme right and the extreme left. Well, follow that extreme right and that extreme left, and you come full circle to where the two join, and there isn't any difference, not a dime's worth, between them. The answer is to resist the invasion of our freedoms even though they tell us it's in a worthy cause to give up a freedom for this or that program. And as I say, to keep going up where the Founding Fathers intended we should go -- the ultimate in human freedom.

The tax system is perhaps our most acute barometer of how free we are -- the degree to which society rewards or suppresses our thrift and risk-taking and hard work. For too many years, we sat back and allowed the hand of Goliath to sweep away more and more from our national table, leaving us with crumbs from the food we ourselves produced.

But as our tax system grew worse, we began to change -- cheating became commonplace, industries retreated from frontiers of competition to safe havens of subsidies, and a fever of envy, suspicion, and strife arose among a once united people.

Don Nickles and I went to Washington to try to begin changing all that -- to build with you a new future of freedom, fairness, and hope. We took our first step in 1981 by lowering tax rates for every individual. And still, we're not home yet. I may be getting up there in years -- as a matter of fact, I've been 39 for 35 years now -- [laughter] -- but I promise you today, I'm not turning back until we can pass on to Don's generation, and hopefully, he and his generation will pass on to the next, a government and tax system of, by, and for the people, and not the other way around.

America's future. And that's what America's tax plan is -- fairness, opportunity, and hope for our future for every person and every family. And make no mistake, a plan that changes a 14-bracket system into a 3-bracket system; drops the personal rate to 35 percent from 70 percent just 5 years ago; cuts tax burdens for every income group; cuts corporate rates from 46 to 33 percent, with lower rates than that for many small corporations; cuts the top capital gains rate to 17\1/2\ percent; provides relief from double taxation of dividends; nearly doubles the personal exemption; nearly doubles the limits on IRA's for many couples; removes or curtails some 65 categories of preferential tax treatment; and insists that every individual in business pay their fair share -- that plan will be a second American revolution that changes this nation for the better and changes it forever.

A revolution for fairness, because everybody will have to put their shoulder to the wheel; for opportunity, because lower tax rates will encourage capital formation, overtime work, savings, and risk-taking in new ventures; and yes, a revolution for hope, because a more productive, competitive, dynamic economy will mean lower inflation, stronger growth, and more jobs for all Americans in the 1990's and on into the 21st century.

I want to see America's economy breaking free. I want to see American technology win that race into the 21st century. And that's why I want to see our tax plan pass this year. Can we count on your support? [Applause] Thank you. I kind of figured that that's how you'd respond. But mark my words, if we pass this plan, America's tax plan, we can ignite this economy. And yes, we can outproduce, outcompete, and outsell anybody, anywhere in the world.

I had a big kick at the recent economic summit when some of our good friends and allies from those other countries -- they haven't caught up with us yet. And they were kind of asking how we did it. Some of our press had said that they were going to constantly assail me about our high interest rates and so forth -- they didn't at all. And I was able to point out, they've all got higher taxes than we have, and they've all got more restrictions on free enterprise than we have. And when I heard one President of a European country talking about they had to get busy and have some more entrepreneurship in their countries, I thought, well, we've got some disciples.

As we work together to strengthen our economic future, we're determined to move forward with our defense rebuilding program. A weaker America will not be a safer America; our program is peace through strength.

Peace through strength rests on a secure foundation of values. Don't let anyone tell you that we're morally equivalent to the Soviet Union. This is a democratic country of free people. A democratic country where all of us enjoy the right to speak, to worship God as we please, and to live without fear. We're not equivalent -- we're far superior to any totalitarian regime, and we should be darn proud of it.

Soviet-sponsored subversion and aggression. I'm happy to report that Don Nickles is one Senator who didn't have to wait until the dictator of Nicaragua went to Moscow before he knew he was a Communist.

Congress can no longer ignore the obvious: The Soviet-bloc nations and their terrorist allies are pouring in weapons and ammunition to establish a beachhead on our own doorstep. Top defectors from the El Salvadoran guerrillas have given us detailed information about the guidance, the training, the funds, and the ammunition that they receive from the Communists in Nicaragua to overthrow the El Salvadoran democratic government that they have finally achieved. It was a dark day for freedom when, after the Soviet Union spent $500 million to impose communism in Nicaragua, the United States Congress could not support a meager $14 million for the freedom fighters in Nicaragua who were opposed to that totalitarian government.

Well, everything we do is a fragment of history, a passing moment in time. The time is now to understand that history will not wait upon a passive America. The time is now to understand that communism has already made its choice. It's an aggressive, implacable foe of freedom. The little dictator who went to Moscow in his green fatigues to receive a bear hug didn't foresake the doctrine of Lenin when he returned to the West and appeared in a two-piece suit. He made his choice long ago.

History will not wait on us. Soon, the United States Congress must also make a crucial choice for our future, and we'd better hope that this time they choose wisely. We'd better hope they remember one simple truth: Freedom isn't free, and if freedom is taken from our neighbors, freedom will be taken from you and from me.

Little or none of what we've accomplished in these 4\1/2\ years would have been possible if we had not had a majority in the United States Senate. We must hold that majority. So, you send Don Nickles back to the Senate for all our sakes.

I'm just going to interject something here before I close. A few moments ago, I mentioned strength and the need for our defense and so forth. I know that today there is a great misconception held by a great many people in this country as the result of a drumbeat of propaganda that would have us believe that the Defense Department is engaged in loading the guns with money, and we hear about $400 hammers and so forth and so on. I don't know how many years that sort of thing had been going on, but I just want you to know -- and we're trying to find a way to let all America know -- we're not buying those $400 hammers, we're the ones that are finding them and doing away with that kind of thing.

So, I hope you won't mind if I take a moment to give you a news flash, because it's a strong vote of confidence in America's future. We've just learned -- and I have just been informed before I came down here -- that interest rates have dropped to their lowest level since 1978, and the stock market today closed at its highest level ever, a little over 1,320.

Well, now to get on with the business at hand. It's always a pleasure for me to lend my support to elected officials who've done a good job and have been helpful in accomplishing administration goals. But I've come to do more than that today. Today I'm here to tell you that Mack Mattingly is not just a good Senator, he's a great Senator. He's not just helpful; he's been indispensable in our efforts to invigorate the economy, get Federal spending and taxing under control, and to strengthen America's defenses. And I want to thank all of you for sending him to Washington.

I have a special place in my heart for Mack. We both came to Washington in 1981, so you might say we're both in the same class, we were freshmen together. And we both came for the same purpose: Our country was plagued by serious problems and government, as usual, was not the answer. The type of fundamental changes needed to turn the situation around required a team effort. And Mack's not just been a member of the team, he'd been a star player.

On our way here in Air Force One, I was looking down over your countryside out here because most of the way from Oklahoma I was looking down at clouds. And I could say that it reminded me of a story, but actually, I wanted to tell the story whether anything reminded me or not.

Well, seriously, since coming to Washington, as Mack told you, we've made some changes, and unlike that farmer who raised the three-legged chicken, we are getting the benefit, and the American people are getting the benefit of the things that we changed. And I hope you'll remind all your fellow Georgians that Senator Mack Mattingly was a star player on the team that licked inflation. We can't let people forget those bad old days when prices were shooting through the roof. They say that money talks. Well, a few years ago the only thing it said was goodbye.

Together we represent a new force in this country. I think what we're witnessing is a realignment of southern politics. A new coalition is being built, a coalition dedicated to the ideals of individual freedom, family values, free enterprise, and a strong America. And we're reaching out to Americans of every race and religion. The doors are open, the welcome mat is out, our agenda is opportunity and freedom for all.

More and more of our Democrat friends and neighbors are recognizing that old political labels no longer apply. I think it's a sign of the times when a political pro like State Senator Frank Albert from Augusta can switch labels and be backed up by the voters. We have to reach out to all people who share our vision of the future.

And today we're on the cutting edge of change. Joined by concerned members of the other party, we're laying the foundation for a new era of prosperity and good will. Now, getting there's going to take some doing.

Our taxes are too high, unfair, and overly complicated. The tax code works against the best interests of working people, families, and a healthy economy. It distorts the decisions of businessmen and investors, often encouraging them to direct resources into useless tax dodges rather than encouraging them to invest in the future. It stifles incentive and promotes nonproductive investment. It is time for a change, and as I said the other night, I think America should go for it.

Now, our proposal would cut down -- or cut out complications and bring down the rates. And the core of the idea is to reduce the number of tax rates from 14 to 3 -- 15 percent, 25 percent, and 35 percent. The majority of Americans would be paying at a lower tax rate than they do now. The complex system of itemized deductions, exclusions, and special credits would go through a major simplification and reform. Average Americans will end up with a lower tax burden. And in the new system, they won't have to hire a tax lawyer to do it.

We're not judging those who've used every legal means to reduce their tax obligation, but we are plugging up some of the holes. The days of the free ride are over. But let me say, however, it's only right to do this if, at the same time, we eliminate the unfair punishment the tax has been imposing on all of us.

We've included in our plan elements designed to help the American family and our less fortunate citizens as well. It lowers the top rate on capital gains from 20 to 17\1/2\ percent to encourage investment. It contains incentives for new businesses to get off the ground and create jobs.

It's a plan to help all of us better our lives and our future, and that's why we call it America's tax plan. Now, there are cynics, as Mack said, who suggest that democracy has become so partisan that such fundamental reform is impossible. Well, we've all heard that before. Pardon me for bringing back a line, but I have a message for those naysayers: You ain't seen nothin' yet.

One reform that would help is that change that he's been long advocating: The Chief Executive of the United States should have the same tool to control spending as 43 Governors have today in this land. It'll provide leverage against pork-barreling at the taxpayers' expense. The only ones threatened by it are the big spenders and the special interests. The line-item veto is long overdue.

While we're at it -- and I know Mack supports this as well -- let's pass a constitutional amendment requiring the government to do exactly what each and every family in America has to do -- balance its budget.

What we are doing will determine the kind of land that our children will inherit. A major commitment of this administration, which again has had more than full support from Mack, has been our war against drug abuse. I'd like to thank Mack for what he's done and also his wife, Carolyn, for her marvelous support. Nancy's taken such an active role in the fight against drug abuse, and she tells me that Carolyn is a real trooper.

In 1984, with a Republican majority in the Senate, we passed legislation that will go a long way to help in the battle against drug peddlers and other criminals. The Comprehensive Crime Control Act was a big step in the right direction. It's about time our criminal justice system returns to serving as a pathway to justice instead of a roadblock to removing criminals from our streets.

Now, these are not Republican issues or Democrat issues. The security of the family and the security of our country should not be the focus of partisan debate. I'd like to thank Mack and other responsible elected representatives that you've sent to Washington, from both parties, who've supported our efforts to rebuild America's defenses and keep our country strong, safe, and at peace.

If our country's not secure, nothing else has any meaning. Today, we as a nation face a challenge to our south. If we have the courage to do what is right, we can avoid a crisis. Inaction and lack of resolve are not the answer. The Soviet Union has poured hundreds of millions of dollars in military arms and equipment down there. We must assist those friendly governments under attack and help them defend themselves. And we must lend our support to those freedom fighters struggling for democracy in Nicaragua.

People all over the world look to us for leadership. If we falter, they know there's no hope. Five years ago America seemed to be faltering. People were believing those naysayers that I spoke about a few minutes ago. For the first time in my life, I heard people talking about our country as if we were a nation in decline.

I and the other members of the team understand the puzzle palace on the Potomac a bit more now than we did, but we're just as optimistic about what can be accomplished. Once America's made up its mind, there's nothing we can't do. I told the people of Europe during my recent visit -- and I firmly believe -- the future is on the side of the free. And with God's help and the support of good people like yourselves, we'll keep America the land of the free and the home of the brave.

I just want to interject something here that I said this morning in Oklahoma, I want to say it again to you. I have mentioned keeping us strong; I have mentioned strengthening our defenses. I know that throughout the country today, there is a great deal of concern -- there's been a drumbeat of propaganda, you've heard it all -- $400 hammers, $700 wrenches or whatever, and so forth -- and a great feeling that maybe the Defense Department is just standing there throwing money down the gunbarrel.

Your tax dollars have brought us a defense that -- I can quote the words of a general of the Chiefs of Staff who was given, in World War II on the beach at Anzio, a battlefield commission and rose to become Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff. And he says that the military we have now is the best that he has seen in 45 years.

Thank you, Pamela, and thank you, Billy Densmore, for that fine show, and thank all of you. It's wonderful to be here. May I interject something right now and tell you that I will feel very comfortable with those gifts that you have given me, particularly that jersey, because a few years ago, playing football for Dixon High School, I, too, wore a purple and white jersey.

I guess I should tell you how all this came about. For some time, I've been hearing about a school in Atlanta that's made a big comeback. About 10 years ago it was in academic trouble. But now the SAT scores of its students keep going up and up; in fact, they've been going up for 8 years.

And allow me to thank you for the kindness with which you greeted a very special lady in my life when she visited here last October. Nancy told me all about you, and I heard she got into a little trouble. Someone asked her if she came to Atlanta for political reasons, and she said, ``No, I'm here for drugs.'' [Laughter] I can't tell you what confusion that caused. [Laughter] But Nancy was very impressed by what you've done to combat drug abuse, to get the word out that using drugs is dumb and dangerous. And I want you to know that when she came back to the White House, she told me about your school band and the chorus and the troupe of dancers. And then she showed me what she was proudest of -- the permanent hall pass. [Laughter] Can I have one too?

You make us all very proud. And the most impressive thing about what you've done to turn around Northside High is that you did it. You and an American hero named Bill Rudolph. You know, in some schools you're taking a chance when you invite students to applaud their principal.

You are a triumphant example of private sector initiative, a triumph of community spirit, and you're proof that no force on Earth can stop individuals from achieving great goals when they have the will and the heart to pull together and work together.

All around the country, we're seeing a massive movement at the grassroots level where the private sector and schools are forming partnerships in education. At the White House we've adopted a school, the Martin Luther King, Jr. School, in Washington. I even got to take part with my pen pal, who's a second grader there.

And remarkable things are happening everywhere. During the last few years, we've seen how a school in Chicago, called Providence-St. Mel's, prevented their doors from closing because of the private donations that came to their aid.

We've already come a long way. Just 5 years ago, when some of you were in junior high, America was in bad shape, mostly bad economic shape. Rising prices were making it harder for your parents to buy essentials like food and clothing, and unemployment was rising; there were no jobs for seniors in high school and college to graduate into. It was as if opportunity had just dried up, and people weren't feeling the old hope Americans had always felt. And that was terrible because hope was always the fuel that kept America going and kept our society together.

Just a few years later everything's changed. You and your parents are finally getting a breather from inflation. And if you graduate and go out into the work force in June, there will be jobs waiting for you. Hope has returned, and America's working again.

Now, you know how all this came about, how we cut tax rates and trimmed Federal spending and got interest rates down. But what's really important is what inspired us to do these things. What's really important is the philosophy that guided us. The whole thing could be boiled down to a few words -- freedom, freedom, and more freedom. It's a philosophy that isn't limited to guiding government policy. It's a philosophy you can live by; in fact, I hope you do.

I mentioned in that paragraph there about interest rates coming down. Just yesterday we got an announcement that government short-term bonds -- the interest rates for the first time since 1978 have dropped below 7 percent.

Now, someone might say it's odd to talk about tax policy with young people in their teens. But I don't think so. You not only understand what taxes are, what effect they have in the average person's life, but if you don't understand, you will pretty soon when you get your first job. I know some of you already have part-time jobs, and I know you keep your eye on the part of the check that shows what Uncle Sam is taking out.

What we're trying to do is change some of those numbers. We want the part of your check that shows Federal withholding to have fewer digits on it. And we want the part that shows your salary to have more digits on it. We're trying to take less money from you and less from your parents.

And whatever you and they do with this additional money will not only help you, it will help the whole country by making our entire economy stronger. Maybe you'll take some of the money and put it in the bank. Fine. You'll earn interest on your savings, and you'll also make more money available for others to borrow, to expand their business, or improve their home. Maybe you'll spend it. And that's fine, too, although I hope you don't spend it all. But what you spend will increase demand for various products. And that will help create jobs. But whatever you do with it, you'll be the one who's doing the doing. You'll make the decisions. You'll have the autonomy.

When taxes are lowered, economic growth follows. And economic growth is good for just about everyone, especially the poor. It gives them a ladder they can use to climb out of poverty. And for those who aren't poor, but who are by no means rich -- and that's most of the people in America -- economic growth gives them options they never had before. When you and your parents and friends are allowed to keep more of the fruits of your labors, a whole new world of options will open up for you.

You'll be better situated to pay for college. You'll be able to save and pool your money with friends and maybe even start a small local business. I knew a fellow who once bought into a little hamburger stand out west. He was just a regular guy, but he worked hard and advertised, and the little stand prospered. You may have heard of it. It's called McDonald's. I was thinking about Ray Kroc recently and how the jingle that he uses applies to our tax program: ``You deserve a break today.'' And tomorrow, too, and for the rest of your life.

I'll tell you how strange America's current tax laws are. They allow a deduction of only slightly more than $1,000 for every dependent person in your family. Now, if you think about what it costs for your parents to put food on the table and buy you everything from books to braces, you know that $1,000 doesn't even make a dent in it. We're going to virtually double that exemption to $2,000 with increases if inflation occurs. But it'll go a long way toward encouraging families again and giving your parents the break they deserve.

We're going to close the unproductive tax loopholes that have allowed some of the truly wealthy to avoid paying their fair share. In theory, some of those loopholes were understandable, but in practice they sometimes made it possible for millionaires to pay nothing, while a bus driver was paying 10 percent of his salary, and that's crazy. It's time we stopped it.

What we're trying to move against is institutionalized unfairness. We want to see that everyone pays their fair share, and no one gets a free ride. Our reasons? It's good for society when we all know that no one is manipulating the system to their advantage because they're rich and powerful.

After all, we're all citizens, equal in the eyes of the law, and equal in the eyes of God. You're given a lot of benefits when you're born in the U.S.A, but you're given a responsibility, too, a responsibility to do your part and become a contributing member of the American family and an equal partner in America, Incorporated. When you pay your taxes, you buy your shares. And every year you get to vote on who should be on the board of directors.

Well, not a bad way of expressing our hopes for you -- Go for it! Reach those heights, excel, push yourself to the limits, strive for excellence. Enjoy your freedom, breathe it in, use it to create the most important and moving thing a man or woman can create -- a decent and meaningful life.

I look at all of you, and I think: You're free to be anything. You're free to be whatever you want to be with no one and nothing stopping you. In a free society, you're free to invent yourself -- to turn yourself into a great teacher, a racecar driver, a minister, or a movie star, or a grower and seller of flowers. You can be anything. It's your invention. And there's nothing to stop you.

We want an America that's economically strong and economically free. But a caution here -- that's the nice thing about getting older, you know, you get to caution people. Not that I'm getting older but -- [laughter]. We want to remember that while the creation of wealth is good -- wealth, after all, generates jobs and prosperity -- we must not let the creation of wealth become a preoccupation with material things.

The people you're sitting with right now, they're your brothers and sisters. Someday you'll have a home or an apartment, and your neighbors will be your brothers and sisters then. And it's up to us, as members of the American family, to take care of each other and love each other.

There's an old American tradition called houseraising, the pioneers out West would get together and build each other's houses. That was a long time ago, but it's still going on. Every time someone helps a lonely old man or woman in a shelter for the poor, that's a houseraising. Every time someone volunteers their time or money to raise funds for the local library, that's a houseraising. Every time a community gets together and says something like, ``We're going to turn Northside High into one of the greatest schools in Georgia,'' that's houseraising.

I wish you a nation of strength and wealth and power. But more than that, I wish you a nation where the houseraising continues. And somehow, looking out at all of you, I suspect we have nothing to worry about. I have this feeling the helping and houseraising will continue.

I thank you all, all of you, for this wonderful day. And I thank you in behalf of Nancy, too. They had her scheduled someplace else or she'd have been here with me. And she remembers you and speaks of you often with great pride and great enthusiasm.

You know, listening to Jerry, I was reminded of what a great general of ours said when he was asked about any secret weapons we might possess in World War II. And he said that our secret weapon was just the best darned kids in the world. Well, whenever I'm with Jerry, I see that one of the best darned kids grew up into one of the best darned officers and now is one of the best darned Senators in the United States Congress.

He's more than one voice and one vote in the Senate. He's one of the most persuasive leaders on the Hill. And he's also one of the most effective spokesmen I know for the interests of his State, this proud and growing State of Alabama, which, as he says so well, is marching confidently into the future.

Folmar, who also did a tremendous job for us as his finance chairman in the campaign, and from the Republican National Committee, Perry Hooper and Jean Sullivan. I also want to recognize the job that's being done by Congressman Bill Dickinson and Sonny Callahan. I don't know if Sonny claims any relation to Harry Callahan, but after all he's done, he really makes my day.

Republican. I also know that there comes a time when you look in your heart and realize that it may be hard to change, but it's just something that you've got to do. Party loyalty can be mighty fierce, though.

A lot of Democrats supported Senator Denton and me in 1980, and we're very grateful. And we just want to say to any registered Democrats out there who might not be so happy about the direction their party is heading: If you're looking for a new home the Republican Party has a welcome mat out, and the doors are wide open. Come on over. And I can tell you, if you really look back -- and I look back to that first vote that I cast in 1932 as a Democrat and others that I cast subsequently -- and I remember what I voted for, not who. And then the time came when I realized that what I had voted for there -- reduction of the Federal Government in cost, elimination of useless boards and commissions, States rights -- not protectionism, but free trade.

The leadership of the Democratic Party today does not represent those things, but millions of rank-and-file patriotic Democrats throughout the Nation represent those things, and I believe that we're trying to represent them in the leadership of the Republican Party. So, you're welcome.

That coincidence kind of makes you think how closely intertwined our families, our faith, and our communities are with the freedom that we cherish. The family is the guardian of our most treasured possessions -- our values of loyalty, chastity, and love and our belief in human dignity and the incalculable worth of each individual life -- and through the family, each generation passes these values on to the next as a sacred inheritance. It's the family that civilizes us, that keeps us human, and ensures that our future will be humane.

Totalitarian ideologies, in their drive to subvert human nature, will always be hostile to the family and its transcendent loyalties. We have seen that today in Russian totalitarianism; the taking over of the children by the state, the virtual elimination of family control. But free and democratic nations must be sure to honor, protect, and nourish their families as if their very survival depended on it, because in truth it does.

Jerry established and chairs the Senate Caucus on the Family. He's been a leader in the fight against child abuse, and his adolescent family life act has been on the books since 1981, helping to combat the tragedy of adolescent pregnancy. And Jerry knows that families don't hand over to the State all rights to their children when they walk through the front door on their way to school. I know there's been a strong push here in Birmingham to help restore voluntary prayer in public schools. As this week's Supreme Court decision shows, we still have an uphill battle before us.

Last year with the passage of the Equal Access Act, Jerry made sure that student religious groups have the same rights as other student groups. Thomas Jefferson said, ``The God who gave us life gave us liberty.'' Well, thanks to Jerry's determined efforts, Alabama schoolchildren now have a little more liberty to thank their God for both these great gifts.

Last week I announced our plan to completely overhaul our nation's tax structure and replace it with one that's fairer, simpler, more compassionate, and most importantly, one that gives the American family a long-overdue break. As I said then, our proposal is the strongest profamily initiative in postwar history. First, it will take the tax lid off our economy and make America an engine of economic growth and job creation. We've called it America's tax plan, and I'm convinced that it is quite simply the most effective jobs creation bill that ever came before the United States Congress. We're not going to rest until every American who wants a job has a job, until the doors of opportunity are open so wide that everyone from the inner cities to the countryside can walk right on through.

We're also going to give immediate tax relief to America's families by nearly doubling the personal exemption, raising the standard deduction, lowering income tax rates, and making tax-deductible IRA accounts fully available to homemakers, so that spouses that choose to stay home and take care of the children are no longer penalized. Through our plan, a family of four wouldn't pay a cent in Federal income tax on the first $12,000 of income and only 15 cents on the dollar up to $29,000 of taxable income.

Jeremiah Denton knows from experience what communism means. He wrote about it graphically in a book called, ``When Hell was in Session.'' And we're all seeing that communism has become synonymous with starvation, terror, brutality, and prison camps.

Some would like to ignore the incontrovertible evidence of the Communist religious persecution of Catholics, Jews, and fundamentalists; of their campaign of virtual genocide against the Miskito Indians; of their attempted subversion of their free, democratic neighbors.

When it comes to the Communists in Nicaragua, some have adopted a see no, hear no evil, speak no evil attitude. But as the refugees come flooding out of Nicaragua, it becomes harder and harder not to hear their cries of anguish, not to see the suffering of their shattered lives. And it becomes all but impossible not to speak out against the tragedy the Communists are inflicting on their country.

I remember in Washington a few weeks back meeting a young man who was a fundamentalist preacher in Nicaragua. His face was simply a gargoyle. He had prayed, and they came in the night, the military, with the Sandinistas, and took him out, tied him to a pillar of the house where he was sleeping and then threw gasoline in the house and set it on fire. Well, fortunately, the fires burned the ropes before they could kill him. But he, with his clothing in flames and his body in flames, fled. Campesinos found him, took him to a hospital. He had to hide who he was and how this had happened, or they would have caught him again. And he was in Washington, there, still speaking out for what he believes in. And what was his sin in the eyes of the Sandinista government? He'd prayed and prayed with some of the people, the citizens there who still wanted to have religion.

When it comes to the Communists and what they're doing to their country, well, Daniel Ortega's money-run to the Soviet Union should have come as no surprise. Still, for many, it took this last trip to dispel their final illusions and to make it clear that the Nicaraguan Communists are no more and no less than agents of Soviet expansionism and the sworn enemies of freedom.

But still, in spite of what some keep saying, we remain committed to a peaceful solution. And so do the democratic opposition in Nicaragua. But while they're waiting for their own government to talk to them, they must survive. And that's what our assistance is designed to do -- to give peace a chance and to keep alive the goal of freedom in Nicaragua.

Congress is now reconsidering its aid cutoff to the freedom fighters. In fact, the Senate vote comes up today. So, I'm afraid Jerry and I are going to have to do a quick disappearing act after my speech to get him up there in time to cast his vote to give freedom a chance in Nicaragua.

Democratically controlled House to show the Sandinista Communists that they're not fooling anybody; that when it comes to supporting freedom and reconciliation in Nicaragua, the United States can be counted on. America stands as one.

This, as I mentioned, is a day of anniversaries, proud and happy ones. But a few weeks ago on the other side of the globe, another terrible and bitter anniversary was noted -- the 10th anniversary of the fall of South Vietnam to the Communists. Today the Vietnamese Communists can celebrate the transformation of their nation into one of the poorest countries on Earth. They can celebrate the creation of new Vietnamese gulags, 10 years of torture and forced relocations, and the flight of nearly a million refugees and boat people.

Well, 10 years later, after a prolonged season in hell, the memory of freedom still survives. The young children may have known only the darkness of Communist tyranny, but even they have parents and older relatives who tell them of South Vietnam before the fall and bring a ray of hope into their lives. The Vietnamese people say that America is number one because America tried to give freedom a chance in Vietnam. And 10 years later, the people for whom our brave American soldiers fought and died and sacrificed are still profoundly grateful.

The Vietnamese Government says they also want us back. They want to normalize relations with the United States. But we have made it clear there is only one way this can take place. The American people demand the fullest possible accounting for our POW's and MIA's. This and a peaceful resolution of their brutal occupation of Cambodia would help bring Vietnam out of international isolation.

The President. I know that Secretary Baker has already briefed you, and Don Regan will be talking to you after I finish. These CEO's always want to have the last word. [Laughter] But I'm going to speak for a few minutes and then take some questions, time permitting.

People all across the country are embracing our tax plan, America's tax plan, because they rightly see it as fairer and simpler -- something they've been waiting for for a long, long time. All the indications are favorable. Polls show a ground swell of popular support, and a rising stock market and dropping interest rates suggest that the financial markets are very comfortable with America's tax plan.

Our tax overhaul will begin with major tax relief for families who've seen their personal exemptions whittled away by inflation and who've shouldered a huge increase in the tax load. Our family relief plan would raise the standard deduction, practically double the personal exemption, lower marginal income tax rates significantly, and give homemakers equal access to tax deductible IRA's.

Opportunity is key to the promise to the American dream, but high tax rates have transformed that difficult but rewarding climb up the ladder of success into a bitter and exhausting enslavement on the tax treadmill, and that's all going to change.

First, we're cutting marginal income tax rates by an average of 19 percent; there's no surer way of getting more economic growth. We saw it happen in Germany after World War II, when Ludwig Erhard's tax cuts helped revitalize their economy; in Japan, when 20 years of continuous tax cutting was instrumental in catapulting that nation into the front ranks of the world's economic leaders.

Andrew Mellon's tax cuts in the twenties, John Kennedy's in the sixties, and our almost 25-percent across-the-board tax cut that helped lift the American economy out of malaise and into a surging economic growth in 1981.

Some, I know, are concerned about the elimination of the investment tax credit and the restructured depreciation system. We feel our plan would stimulate new economic growth. One of the important ways our proposed depreciation system would be superior to the accelerated system that we had is that it would be indexed to inflation. So, businesses wouldn't have to worry about a decline in the real value of their writeoffs. It would also reduce the distortions in economic efficiency caused by the investment tax credit and other provisions so that the market, not the Government, would determine the flow of capital.

As part of our growth agenda, we're also cutting the capital gains tax. The two previous capital gains cuts in 1978 and '81 probably saved the life of the American economy. Excessively high capital gains had almost strangled the technological revolution at its birth. Venture capital, the high-powered money to finance the riskiest and most daring projects, had all but dried up to a mere $39 million in commitments in 1977. But after cutting capital gains, venture capital shot to all-time high, increasing over a hundredfold to $4.2 billion in 1984 alone.

We're pulling ahead of the competition. Cutting capital gains again, we'll make sure that we stay there. We're closing the door on unjustifiable tax shelters so that we can open the door for innovation, opportunity, and growth. It's time that we pulled our investment money out of the tax shelters and reinvested it in America's future.

We've also pared down deductions for business entertainment expenses. It just doesn't seem right for a wage earner carrying his tuna fish sandwich to work to subsidize exorbitant business lunches at luxury restaurants.

We`re keeping the provision for writeoffs of intangible drilling costs. Today we import more than a fourth of our oil from abroad. And the money we spent on those imports last year represented half our total trade deficit -- scuttling the IDC deductions, which slow oil exploration in this country and reduce our output by as much as half a billion barrels a day. I don't believe we want to increase our energy dependence on foreign imports or give the ailing OPEC cartel a shot in the arm. We must ensure reliable, secure energy sources here at home.

Also key to a fairer, simpler tax code is elimination of the deduction for State and local taxes. The current deduction benefits wealthy citizens at the expense of those less fortunate. About two-thirds of all Americans and an even greater majority of low- and middle-income taxpayers do not itemize and get no benefit from the State and local tax deduction. The simple fact is low- and middle-income taxpayers are being cheated, because whatever State they're in, high or low tax, the present system forces them to pay the bill for the wealthy few who use the State and local deduction. And that's the injustice. Perhaps if the high-tax States didn't have this Federal crutch to prop up their big spending, they might have to cut taxes to stay competitive.

Some of the elected representatives from the high-tax States don't seem to like that idea much, but maybe they should take a poll of their constituents to see if their people think a tax cut is such a bad idea.

We should get out of the habit of thinking of our economy as static and frozen in place. Our tax proposal is a dynamic model for the future. Any change of such scope and magnitude's going to require some adjustments. For the great majority of Americans, it'll be a very pleasant adjustment to lower rates and new and more plentiful opportunities -- a growing, expanding, superenergized economy, an economy of hope and opportunity that just won't quit. I don't think we should settle for less.

The President. I believe that what we've done with regard to corporations is aimed more at corporations that, in all good faith, have taken advantage of the present tax structure to make a profit, and at the same time, many of them avoid paying any tax whatsoever or certainly reducing it greatly.

What we think we've done -- and by reducing the rate from 46 percent to 33 percent -- is actually make the tax structure more fair for business and industry. But also, we have plugged that loophole or series of loopholes by which a number were not paying at all. And that's where the increase would come.

Q. Can we follow up? It also would be knocking the supports out from under some of the basic industries that have enjoyed those benefits -- steel -- heavy type of capital intensives industries. Is that your aim?

The President. No. But we also don't think that the compensating factor of the reduction in the rates, from 46 to 33, and then some of the other advantages that will be as a part of this plan, we don't believe that we're knocking the props out from under anyone.

I feel like I'm standing against a cellophane wall getting shot at from both sides, because there are also some people up there on the Hill that want to reduce that top tax from 35 to 30. So, the 40-percenters will be shooting and so will the 30-percenters, and we think that the bracket we've chosen is a fair one.

Q. I'm not -- not now either. [Laughter] And of course that's been around a long time, and you want to get rid of it. So, the question obviously is, considering what's happening on the Hill: Just how open to negotiation are you on this tax program?

The President. Well, we think that we've worked out a pretty good plan. We've made some changes from the Treasury One proposal that we think were justified and should be made. We think that this one is balanced.

But if they start nibbling at some of the specific proposals there on the Hill, as they undoubtedly will, there's one thing that they're going to have to be able to answer for any change they want to make. And that is: Where are they going to get the replacement revenue? For example, the deductibility of State and local taxes is a tremendous part of the revenue proposal, and I don't know where they would get the money that would be eliminated if they did away with that.

Q. Mr. President, you have always been an advocate of federalism and of having decisions on taxes and spending made as close to the local taxpayer as possible. Aren't you in this proposal trying to force certain States to cut their taxes and thereby cut their programs also?

The President. We just said that if this kind of subsidy is taken away from them, they might take a look to see if they haven't just been sort of inspired to raise their taxes because of the deductibility feature. And no one, no level of government should be taxing more than is absolutely necessary.

And we think that the overall tax reduction that we're giving the people in a way does something that I also have advocated for a great many years and that is that the Federal Government, beginning back in the Depression days, gradually preempted so much taxing authority that local and State governments found it impossible to go to the people for a tax increase that they might actually need for something necessary.

And by doing what we did in '81 and doing what we're now doing with this proposal, we are reducing the share that the Federal Government is taking and opening up the fact that some local level of government or State level with a real need now can find that there's more leeway out there.

Back when I was casting my first vote, the total amount of money that governments were taking in this country was about 10 cents out of every dollar earned and of that two-thirds was going to local and State governments, only less than one-third to the Federal Government. Now we're taking up there somewhere around 35 cents for all -- total governments. And of that amount, three-fifths is taken by the Federal Government and only two-fifths left for the State and local. So, we're in a sense redressing this back to where there'll be more availability out there in the earnings of the people.

The President. Well, I don't know that the figures are completely accurate on this other, but I do know that the brackets and the percentages -- it is still a progressive tax, and we have not come down to proportionate tax, as some of the flat tax people would have us do.

I think we have to recognize that that tiny percentage of people up there at that top level, roughly about 3 percent of the taxpayers -- yes, if you go dollar-wise, they're going to get tremendous amounts of dollars back. But they're also going to be paying a tremendously greater, much greater tax out of those earnings.

But when you start talking about people -- like now, some of the salaries that are so loosely thrown around of a million dollars or more a year, obviously, they're going to get a bigger bundle of dollars, as I've said. But at the same time, proportionately, they're going to be paying hundreds of times more tax than the individuals that you mentioned. But I believe that that middle-income group is also going to be doing better than that tax that's been proposed.

May I ask, what is the proposal in the tax plan at the moment to maintain such programs to help these people to be able to find employment and so relieve the Government of the tax burden of supporting them?

The President. I think that what we're talking about is the whole general thing in the educational funds of the Federal Government. And I think that they have been misread, also, and are not taking into consideration a number of programs in which we have changed from a specific program -- where we found the administrative overhead when the Federal Government dictated it was very high -- that we have switched to incorporate things in block grants, where the local entity can utilize that in the way that they think meets their priorities, because they're not the same wherever we go. And I think you'll find that we have provided -- that we're not actually cutting into those funds.

I can just give you one example. We have in 1 block grant, we reduced -- or one series of 10 block grants -- we incorporated some 62 categorical grants, Federal grants, and in so doing found that we had reduced the regulations and the redtape on local levels of government from 801 pages of regulations down to 30 pages of regulations, by incorporating it into the block grant.

Today I want to give you some encouraging news about the opportunities for liberty, democracy, and peace in Central America, particularly in Nicaragua. This hope is based on a renewed chance for the United States to provide support to those who struggle against totalitarian communism on the mainland of this hemisphere.

April 4th, I met here in Washington with Adolfo Calero, Arturo Cruz, and Alfonso Robelo, the three principal leaders of the Nicaraguan democratic opposition. I asked these three brave men to extend their offer of a cease-fire and a church-mediated dialog with the Sandinista regime in Managua.

Those exiled patriots and their followers made this proposal in San Jose, Costa Rica, on March 1 in a declaration of unity, common cause, and democratic purpose. Unfortunately, their proposal was immediately rejected by the Sandinista Communists who similarly rebuffed our April 4th endorsement of this realistic peace proposal.

Nicaraguan freedom fighters. The Sandinistas and their cohorts believed the way was clear for the consolidation of their Communist regime. Nicaragua's dictator raced to Moscow and the bloc capitals of Eastern Europe to seal closer relations with these Communist tyrannies.

And now the Nicaraguans are not only continuing to import offensive weapons, they have stepped up their attacks on neighboring Honduras and unarmed Costa Rica. But as I said, we have a second chance to do what is right. On Thursday the United States Senate, in a show of bipartisan support, voted to aid the freedom fighters struggling for liberty and democracy in Nicaragua. The Senate has seen that their struggle is ours, that they need and deserve our help.

Well, no such plan exists. That charge is simply a distraction from the two paramount questions that must be faced by every Member: Will you support those struggling for democracy? Will you resist the Soviets' brazen attempt to impose communism on our doorstep or won't you?

McDade of Pennsylvania and Democrat Dave McCurdy of Oklahoma. It is essential that this bipartisan amendment be passed without any weakening of its provisions in order for us to have a hope for peace, democracy, and reconciliation in Nicaragua.

The legislation will provide $27 million worth of assistance to the freedom fighters, and that's not much compared to the hundreds of millions the Communists are spending to prop up their Nicaraguan dictatorship.

Salvador -- liberty, democracy, and reconciliation. In El Salvador we've worked with Congress and stood firmly behind President Duarte and the democratic forces. We seek the same goals in Nicaragua. As in El Salvador, the United States stands with the democratic Senator -- Senate, I should say, against the enemies of liberty on both left and right. And the freedom fighters share our goals for democracy.

To seize this opportunity before us, to seize this second chance now offered, the Congress and the executive branch must embark on a bipartisan course for a negotiated political settlement, national reconciliation, democracy, and genuine self-determination for the people of Nicaragua.

Communists. We must not sit by while the Nicaraguan people are saddled with a Communist dictatorship that threatens this entire hemisphere. A House vote for humanitarian aid to the freedom fighters will send a strong bipartisan message that we will not tolerate the evolution of Nicaragua into another Cuba nor will we remain with our heads in the sand while Nicaragua becomes a Soviet client state with military installations constructed for use by the Soviet bloc.

America's proudest moments have come when Democrats and Republicans united for the cause of democracy. That is the path which is succeeding in El Salvador, and that is the path that will succeed in Nicaragua, too, if we support the bipartisan proposal to aid the freedom fighters.

Many of you hold public office, and you were longtime Democrats, and you changed parties at considerable risk. It was an act of courage and an act of conscience. When Winston Churchill did what you did in his country, he said, ``Some men change principle for party, and some change party for principle.'' He was one of the latter, as you are. And you have our thanks.

You know what you've left and why, and I'm not going to use this forum to run down the other party. They have enough troubles -- [laughter] -- and we don't want to add to them, well, maybe later. [Laughter] But as a fellow convert, let me tell you what, in my view, you've joined. You've joined the party of ideas, a party that has positive and coherent programs to deal with the great problems of our time. You've joined the party of the working man and woman.

Let the other party have the entrenched interests and the powerbrokers and special interest politics; we don't have any of that. We just have the people -- and more and more people who won't be held down by any government plans but who are going to break free to follow their dreams -- and that's the great opportunity party that we're building together.

American culture because it believes in those traditions and that culture. You've joined a party that looks at our vast and imperfect nation and sees that it's precious and to be protected, a party that still feels the old tug of the immigrants' love for America -- the pure, unalloyed love of those who have experienced less free places and who adored America for giving them freedom and opportunity.

You've joined a party that was once rather sedate. That party was -- or that was until the current leaders and shapers of the GOP started lobbing around intellectual handgrenades and insisting that America stop talking about economic justice and start creating the conditions that make it possible and stopped ignoring or just talking about ways to deal with the greater foreign policy challenge of our time -- the militarist, expansionist intentions of communism -- and start doing something about it.

You're not joining a perfect party. We began in greatness more than 100 years ago, and we've known considerable greatness since. And, yes, we've made our mistakes. There've been good ideas that we embraced too slowly and movements that we rejected outright when, at their core, there was really some good.

But more often than not, we've been on the right side and fought the good fight, and it's wonderful to see our new recruits. And it's wonderful to be fighting for a second American revolution of hope and opportunity for all the American people.

Now, members of the press in the back there and many others are interested to know who the new Republicans are. Well, they're Judge Berlaind Brashear, a lifelong Democrat who switched parties, because in his words, ``I feel many black leaders have lost faith in our two-party system, but I have faith in the people.'' The judge is one of the first black Texas Republican elected officials since Reconstruction.

Democrats in both houses of the legislature, and then through a couple of special elections and coincidences we wound up with a one-vote majority in the legislature, and in that year, with that one vote in each house which allowed us to put the majority on the committees and appoint the chairman of the committees, we passed 41 anticrime bills, every one of which had been in the legislature for quite a period of time and buried in the committees until they became Republican committees.

Well, these that I've named are just a few. You're not isolated cases. You're part of a great national change, a national movement that is sweeping the electorate. You're representative of something that's going on across the country -- the millions of grassroot Democrats and Independents who have been voting for the Republican Party because they feel it represents what they believe about America and the future.

You and people such as Andy Ireland, Bob Stump, and Phil Gramm are part of a change that is sweeping the country. You're familiar with all the polls; the most recent was in the New York Times last Wednesday. I don't normally read the New York Times for fun -- [laughter] -- but there it was on the front page: ``About the same number of people now identify themselves as Republicans as call themselves Democrats.'' Remember when they called us the minority party?

Americans are a faithful people. But the thing is, all of you have demonstrated when the party you were born into changes, when the party you were born into no longer represents the hopes and aspirations of the people you came from, well, then that party left you -- you didn't leave it. And that has happened.

I cast my first vote as a Democrat in 1932. And the Democratic Party platform in that year called for a 25-percent reduction in government spending; it called for the elimination of needless bureaus and agencies and departments of government; it called for a return to States and local communities the authority and autonomy they said had been unjustly seized by the Federal Government. And I think you're evidence today that there is a different party today that runs on that platform, and that is the Republican Party.

You went to a new party, becoming a faithful member of that party, and doing that as a reaffirmation of what you are and where you're from. As I've said, it's a reaffirmation of the dreams that your parents and grandparents dreamed. It's a reaffirmation of your tradition, your culture, your ethnic loyalties, and your Americanism. And let me add that if we ever let you down, you don't owe us your undying loyalty. If we ever leave you, you'll be right to leave us.

We're richer for your presence, and the future of this party is in your hands and the hands of your friends and relatives and fellow Republicans, which leaves me, as I look at you, very optimistic about the future of the GOP and very optimistic about the future of America.

It was a great pleasure to welcome all of you to the White House. Your entire championship series down to yesterday's great win was an inspiration. And all of you showed America what pride, determination, and guts can accomplish when they're combined with some of the best talent on the floor.

Some may have thought the Celtics' title was an immovable object, but yesterday they came up against an irresistible force by the name of James Worthy. I don't know what all those sirens are doing; we're all here. [Laughter] But the Celtics' head coach said that one of the reasons his team lost was they just couldn't stop James Worthy. And, James, if you're ever thinking of a career after basketball, we've got some lobbying work up on Capitol Hill -- [laughter] -- that we could use you for.

Though you've got your full complement of stars, it's teamplay that made you great. And for that, for the training, the strategy, and the never-say-die encouragement that went into making you number one, we have your great coach, Pat Riley, to thank.

And I understand that the Lakers' family has not only been an example for young people on the court but also off the court. Lakers' wives have taken on drug abuse prevention as their special project. And I want you to know how grateful both Nancy and I are for your important work in this area.

The NBA championship series confirmed that description, Mr. President -- a diverse group of players and coaches from all parts of this great country once again demonstrated that sacrifice, hard work, and team-play lead to success.

Magic Johnson. I guess I'm next. [Laughter] This is just another one of our gifts to say thank you for having us here and -- what more can I say? I think Kareem said it all. And this is just great being here, being with the President and all you good people. So, here it is, to you.

Coach Riley. Mr. President, on behalf of the players and the entire Laker organization, we would like to express our appreciation and gratitude for this honor, for being able to come to the White House, because we know that there's only one other place other than Los Angeles that there's a winner, and that's here. So, we appreciate that, Mr. President.

And we also know that, occasionally, you like to head west and -- the ranch out there -- and when you hit that Arizona-California border, we want you to be a little casual with the 1985 championship hat and a championship shirt.

I just have to explain something. The reason that they had to bend over to reach the microphone was because if I'd put it up at their height, there's no way I could stretch that high, but they could always bend down a little bit. I appreciate your doing that.

States would not undercut the expired SALT I agreement or the unratified SALT II agreement as long as the Soviet Union exercised equal restraint. Despite my serious reservations about the inequities of the SALT I agreement and the serious flaws of the SALT II agreement, I took this action in order to foster an atmosphere of mutual restraint conducive to serious negotiation as we entered START.

Since then the United States has not taken any actions which would undercut existing arms control agreements. The United States has fully kept its part of the bargain, however, the Soviets have not. They have failed to comply with several provisions of SALT II, and we have serious concerns regarding their compliance with the provisions of other accords.

The pattern of Soviet violations, if left uncorrected, undercuts the integrity and viability of arms control as an instrument to assist in ensuring a secure and stable future world. The United States will continue to pursue vigorously with the Soviet Union the resolution of our concerns over Soviet noncompliance. We cannot impose upon ourselves a double standard that amounts to unilateral treaty compliance.

We remain determined to pursue a productive dialog with the Soviet Union aimed at reducing the risk of war through the adoption of meaningful measures which improve security, stability, and predictability. Therefore, I have reached the judgment that, despite the Soviet record over the last years, it remains in our interest to establish an interim framework of truly mutual restraint on strategic offensive arms as we pursue with renewed vigor our goal of real reductions in the size of existing nuclear arsenals in the ongoing negotiations in Geneva. Obtaining such reductions remains my highest priority.

The U.S. cannot establish such a framework alone. It will require the Soviet Union to take the positive, concrete steps to correct its noncompliance, resolve our other compliance concerns, and reverse its unparalleled and unwarranted military buildup. So far, the Soviet Union has not chosen to move in this direction. However, in the interest of ensuring that every opportunity to establish the secure, stable future we seek is fully explored, I am prepared to go the extra mile in seeking an interim framework of truly mutual restraint.

Therefore, to provide the Soviets the opportunity to join us in establishing such a framework which could support ongoing negotiations, I have decided that the United States will continue to refrain from undercutting existing strategic arms agreements to the extent that the Soviet Union exercises comparable restraint and provided that the Soviet Union actively pursues arms reduction agreements in the currently ongoing nuclear and space talks in Geneva.

Appropriate and proportionate responses to Soviet noncompliance are called for to ensure our security, to provide incentives to the Soviets to correct their noncompliance, and to make it clear to Moscow that violations of arms control obligations entail real costs.

Soviet Union's flight-testing and steps towards deployment of the SS - X - 25 missile, a second new type of ICBM prohibited by the unratified SALT II agreement. Since the noncompliance associated with the development of this missile cannot be corrected by the Soviet Union, the United States reserves the right to respond in a proportionate manner at the appropriate time. The Midgetman small ICBM program is particularly relevant in this regard.

Other Soviet activities involving noncompliance may be reversible and can be corrected by Soviet action. In these instances, we will provide the Soviet Union additional time to take such required corrective action. As we monitor Soviet actions for evidence of the positive, concrete steps needed on their part to correct these activities, I have directed the Department of Defense to conduct a comprehensive assessment aimed at identifying specific actions which the United States could take to augment as necessary the U.S. strategic modernization program as a proportionate response to, and as a hedge against the military consequences of, those Soviet violations of existing arms agreements which the Soviets fail to correct.

To provide adequate time for the Soviets to demonstrate by their actions a commitment to join us in an interim framework of true mutual restraint, we will plan to deactivate and dismantle according to agreed procedures an existing Poseidon SSBN as the seventh U.S. Ohio-class submarine puts to sea later this year. However, the United States will keep open all programmatic options for handling such milestones as they occur in the future. As these later milestones are reached, I will assess the overall situation in light of Soviet actions correcting their noncompliance and promoting progress in Geneva and make a final determination of the U.S. course of action on a case-by-case basis.

I firmly believe that if we are to put the arms reduction process on a firm and lasting foundation and obtain real reductions, our focus must remain on making best use of the promise provided by the currently ongoing negotiations in Geneva. Our policy, involving the establishment of an interim framework for truly mutual restraint and proportionate U.S. response to uncorrected Soviet noncompliance, is specifically designed to go the extra mile in giving the Soviet Union the opportunity to join us in this endeavor.

My hope is that if the Soviets will do so, we will be able jointly to make progress in framing equitable and verifiable agreements involving real reductions in the size of existing nuclear arsenals in the Geneva negotiations. Such an achievement would not only provide the best and most permanent constraint on the growth of nuclear arsenals, but it would take a major step towards reducing the size of these arsenals and creating a safer future for all nations.

In accordance with our prior interim restraint policy, the United States has scrupulously lived within the SALT I and II agreements governing strategic offensive arms. The United States has fully kept its part of the bargain. By contrast, we have found and reported to the Congress that the Soviet Union has violated major arms control obligations, as fully documented in comprehensive reports to the Congress on this subject in January 1984 and February 1985.

The basic United States strategic goals remain unchanged. In the years ahead, the United States objective is a radical reduction in the levels and the power of existing and planned offensive nuclear arms, as well as on stabilization of the relationship between nuclear offensive and defensive arms, whether on earth or in space.

Energy Agency in Paris as special assistant to the Executive Director and was responsible for overall coordination of International Energy Agency ministerial meetings. Before that he was a program officer of the Workshop on Alternative Energy Strategies based at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.

Israeli Prime Minister Shamir and I agreed to begin discussions toward the establishment of a bilateral free trade area between our countries. On October 30, 1984, I signed into law the Trade and Tariff Act of 1984 that, among other things, authorized the negotiation of an agreement with Israel. On April 22, 1985, after completion of negotiations, the Agreement on the Establishment of a Free Trade Area between the Government of the United States of America and the Government of Israel was signed in Washington by Ambassador William E. Brock and Minister of Industry and Trade Ariel Sharon. Today this act provides congressional approval of that agreement and provides the necessary legal authority to implement all of its terms.

First, the establishment of the U.S.-Israel Free Trade Area will stand as a model of the close cooperation between the administration and the Congress that can bring about a result benefiting all Americans. This was a bipartisan accomplishment. I especially wish to recommend the leadership of Senate Majority Leader Dole, Chairman Packwood and Senator Danforth of the Senate Committee on Finance, and Chairman Rostenkowski and Representatives Sam Gibbons and Bill Frenzel of the House Committee on Ways and Means for their efforts in making the U.S.-Israel free trade area a reality.

Second, the new free trade area between the United States and Israel represents an important milestone in this administration's efforts to liberalize trade. We hope that it will also serve to encourage greater liberalization of the multilateral trading system and that it will help us move ahead in our continued attempts to expand world trade.

Third, and finally, I believe this new economic relationship with our friends in Israel will further our historic friendship, strengthen both of our economies, and provide for new opportunities between our peoples for communication and commerce. Nothing better demonstrates the shared community of aspirations between our nations than our promotion of free and harmonious trade for our mutual benefit.

The President. My initiative, which I outlined in my speech of September 1, 1982, is still on the table, and we continue to believe it represents the most promising proposal for progress toward peace yet presented. We have not hesitated to urge the parties to the conflict to work on ways to move the peace process forward. There is now momentum within the region, and we will do what is appropriate to sustain it, but we must recognize that peace can only be achieved when the parties are willing to negotiate directly.

The President. I think we understand each other very well, and I admire the King's courage and sincerity. The recent steps by King Hussein and others in the region have given a new impetus to the process of peacemaking. King Hussein in Washington made clear his desire and that of his Palestinian partners for a peaceful settlement through negotiations, with a Jordanian-Palestinian delegation on one side and Israel on the other, in a supportive international context. The King seeks a peaceful settlement on the basis of United Nations Security Council Resolutions 242 and 338. The visit afforded us an opportunity to reaffirm our view that a just and durable peace must address the legitimate rights of the Palestinian people as well as the security of all states in the region.

The King confirmed our joint commitment to move promptly ``this year,'' as he said, toward direct negotiations among the parties. We hope to be able to help the parties build upon the outcome of these meetings. I am convinced events are moving in the right direction.

The President. I think a new and increasingly realistic attitude toward peace is developing. It is based on a number of contributions, including the ones you have cited. U.N. Security Council Resolution 242 remains the essential foundation for negotiations. I am not going to predict the final outcome, but I am confident that when peace is achieved you will be able to look back and say many of these contributions played an important role.

It is also important to recognize that my own proposals were an outline of the positions the U.S. would support in negotiations. We have not asked others to subscribe to our positions. Each of the parties is free to bring its own views to the table, and we would expect them to do so. The important thing is to begin direct negotiations since it is through the process of such give and take that differences will be worked out and a just and lasting peace can be achieved.

The President. We are trying to keep away from anything that sounds like we are imposing solutions to the problems here. All that we are trying to do is help get them together. It seems that solutions are going to involve one side giving up territory in return for defensible borders where peace is guaranteed. The Arab States must recognize that Israel does have the right to exist as a nation and that peace will provide security for the Arabs as well.

Does this lack of interest, coupled with the devastation of Lebanon, not warrant a superpower such as the U.S. to get hold of all parties in the Middle East conflict and dictate to them a solution which is just for all concerned?

Nothing could be further from the truth. The United States has a deep and lasting interest in seeing a comprehensive peace settlement in the Middle East, and we have consistently communicated that fact to all our friends in the region.

I do not believe, however, that a settlement imposed by any outside power is possible or even desired by the parties. The reality is that peace can only be achieved through a willingness of the parties to sit down and negotiate their differences. My September 1 initiative outlined the positions the U.S. would support in such negotiations, but a real peace can only be achieved by the parties themselves through direct negotiation.

Middle East brought about through the many conflicts existing in that region. The effort to seek solutions to those problems has remained among the highest priorities of the past eight administrations, and it is worth noting that the cost in American lives, effort, and resources has also been high. We will not flag in this effort, but the reality remains that solutions will only be found when the parties to the conflicts have made their own decision to seek a peaceful way to resolve their differences. Negotiations bring results. Egypt and Israel have clearly demonstrated this, and we are actively working to support the process of negotiations in resolving other disputes in the region.

It is important to remember that Americans and the peoples of the Middle East share a great reservoir of common interests and values. This is a reservoir which is being added to every day through trade relations, scholarly activities, and joint scientific endeavors. The participation of a Saudi astronaut in the launching of ARABSAT is an event which illustrates the great Arab scientific and mathematical strides made long before the New World was discovered. And it will remind us all how closely our futures are linked.

The President. As you know, this year Sudan, like its neighbors, is in the grip of the worst drought in a hundred years. The failure of the rains has resulted in a huge deficit of grains and millions of hungry people. The U.S. has responded to this catastrophe by shipping more than 1 million tons of food. This assistance involves a massive effort to overcome distances and transportation problems. I understand that one out of six Sudanese is dependent on U.S. food aid.

The U.S. has responded generously to various appeals issued by the Sudanese Government and the United Nations to assist these refugees, which now number more than 1 million. Despite the ravages of drought, we fully recognize Sudan's long-term agricultural potential. Our development assistance emphasizes the promotion of technology and institutions to make better use of the many millions of arable acres which now lie idle. Along with other donors and international agencies, we are turning to the problem of rehabilitation of agriculture from the drought. This will require a great effort by Sudan, and we stand ready to help.

The President. I believe the Soviet Union's influence in the Middle East should be commensurate with its willingness to play a constructive role in solving the problems of the region. But the Soviets have been anything but constructive, a fact often noted by the leaders of the region.

The President. Both the Western Hemisphere and the Mediterranean are critical areas for the security of the United States. Turkey and Greece are important partners in NATO and are essential to preserving stability in that strategic part of the world. We also have a close and friendly relationship with the Government of Cyprus.

The President. The Government of Morocco and we have had a number of intense and thorough discussions regarding the effect of the Morocco-Libyan treaty of union on U.S.-Moroccan relations. Morocco realizes our opposition to the treaty, but we are satisfied that the treaty has not been implemented in such a way as to affect our bilateral relations with Morocco. We will, however, continue to monitor the implementation.

The U.S. values highly our relations with Morocco, and we expect our relationship to remain strong. King Hassan has reiterated the reasons for this treaty, indicating that it is directed at Libya's previous support for the Polisario. Our view of the reprehensible nature of the Libyan regime is well known. We will not alter our position with regard to Libya unless and until Colonel Qadhafi's support for international terrorism and his subversion of governments ceases.

The President. The United States supports efforts to achieve a negotiated settlement through a cease-fire and subsequent referendum. The U.S. believes that a political solution is the only way to end the conflict.

The President. There is no easy answer to your question. We see the Middle East as a greatly diverse region with many commonalities. We deal with it as a region, but also note the individual countries have separate problems and interests. There are clearly some instances of interaction between separate events and problems, but not in all cases. Depending on the issue, we approach subjects both bilaterally and multilaterally.

The President. Our relationship is minimal. In fact, we have no official representation in Libya, and we will not have any until Libya changes its behavior. Again, we are prepared to improve our relationship with Libya if and only if there is a complete and lasting reversal of Qadhafi's support for international terrorism and his subversion of governments.

Q. Former administrations came very close, at least, to an attempt at resolving the Middle East dilemma. Now that you are secure in office, could you not bring the conflicting groups to your ranch at Santa Barbara as Carter did at Camp David?

The President. The parallel with arms negotiations is interesting. I sincerely wish that the parties to the conflict in the Middle East would sit down together at a table and negotiate, and I believe that we are moving in that direction. The most important point in your parallel is that both we and the Soviets agreed that arms control negotiations should be face to face. We know that we don't agree in our positions, and we are not sure of the outcome, but we are convinced of the value in trying to work toward an agreement by talking directly. The need in the Middle East is for the parties to decide for themselves that they wish to pursue a just and lasting peace through direct negotiations.

The President. This is really two separate questions. The first is: Why do we feel an international conference will not contribute to a peaceful settlement? Our view is that, as a practical matter, an international conference will result only in political theater and would not contribute to solutions.

Only direct negotiations can achieve real results. We understand Jordan's need for a supportive international context in which to begin direct negotiations. We will continue our discussions with both Jordan and Israel in order to ascertain how such a context can best be provided.

The second question relates to the willingness of the Soviets to contribute to solutions to problems in the Middle East. We have indicated on any number of occasions that we would welcome a constructive approach by the Soviet Union to the problems of the region. We have also made clear what kind of activities we believe would be constructive. So far, however, their approach has been anything but helpful, and we see no indications their approach will change.

The President. That is a question for Mr. Gorbachev to answer. For our part, we believe that our two countries should seek to contribute to the peaceful resolution of disputes in crucial regions rather than making them more dangerous. We also believe that we should seek to avoid confrontations over these issues. That is why I proposed periodic consultations between our respective experts on some of these problems. Our hope is that such talks can help prevent misunderstandings that might result in confrontation. We have had such discussions on southern Africa and the Middle East. While these talks have been useful, they have not yet revealed any greater willingness on the Soviets' part to promote rather than impede peaceful solutions.

Q. How do you see the end of the Iraq-Iran war? Once again, are we to believe that those regional wars are necessary for Western economies as we were taught in our economics classes in Western universities?

We have a compelling humanitarian interest in the earliest end to the bloodshed. Moreover, the security and economic interests of the U.S., our Western allies, and friends in the region also would be best served by an immediate end to the war that leaves both countries independent and able to continue national development.

The President. Yes, I do, and this is an issue of great concern. The world cannot ignore the consequences of instability in any part of the globe, and we must all join together in the effort to achieve solutions to regional problems.

The President. No, I am not satisfied with the current situation. As long as the Iran-Iraq war continues, and as long as Iran pursues its policy of supporting terrorism and declines to resume a responsible role in the family of nations, the stability and security of the Gulf States will be at risk.

The United States has a vital interest in maintaining freedom of navigation in the Gulf and stability in the region generally, and we have worked with our friends in the area, including Saudi Arabia and the other members of the Gulf Cooperation Council, to support their legitimate defensive needs and to encourage their collective security efforts. These countries are now in a better position to defend, with their own resources, their sovereignty and territorial integrity against potential adversaries, but more remains to be done. We agree with the Gulf States that the only way to end the Iran-Iraq war is through peaceful negotiations, and we have supported their efforts in the U.N. and elsewhere to bring this about. We also support the position of Kuwait and other Gulf States that the only way to eradicate terrorism is to refuse to give in to demands and provocations and to work with other concerned members of the international community to find ways to end this scourge once and for all.

The President. The war in Afghanistan is the result of the presence of over 115,000 Soviet troops who are trying to subjugate the Afghan people. There is only one solution to the problem -- the complete withdrawal of Soviet troops. A negotiated political settlement remains the goal of U.S. policy.

The Soviet forces at their present levels cannot defeat the Afghan resistance, but the resistance cannot hope to expel the Soviet Army from Afghanistan. What is needed is to move from the battlefield to the negotiating table. We fully support the Government of Pakistan's strong resistance to cross-border intimidation.

We are encouraged that the United Nations has announced another round of indirect or proximity talks on Afghanistan for late June in Geneva. It is our hope that progress can be made there toward a settlement although the recent increase in Soviet military activity does not lead to optimism. In contacts with the Soviets at various levels, we have stressed our support for a negotiated political settlement. We will certainly continue to make the point in our future discussions with Soviet officials.

The President. Forgetting my position as President of the United States is not something I am permitted to do under the U.S. Constitution. Nevertheless, I do believe that the positions I outlined on September 1, 1982, represent the most viable approach to taking the next step to resolve the Arab-Israeli conflict. It is important to note, however, that I gave them as the positions the U.S. would support in negotiations. We do not ask others to subscribe to them in advance; in fact, we fully expect others to bring their own positions to the table. That is what negotiations are all about -- reconciling opposing positions. The important thing is to get those negotiations underway and for the parties to work out their differences directly in a peaceful fashion.

Q. Allow me to thank you again, Mr. President, as a great man of peace. We are all transit passengers in this life, and what counts is the good memory and the historical judgment afterwards. History will judge you as a great crusader for peace and justice. God bless you.

In 1949 your grandfather, Prime Minister Nehru, visited the United States on what he termed a voyage of discovery. He said that, ``Though we may know the history and something of the culture of our respective countries, what is required is a true understanding and appreciation of each other.'' Well, Prime Minister, your visit marks a continuation of that process of mutual discovery.

Today we celebrate the depth and vitality of the ties between our nations. We Americans place great value on India's friendship. Our shared democratic ideals serve as a bridge between us. Our cultural differences enrich our relationship. Our mutual commitment to the freedom and dignity of man set us on a different road, a higher road than governments which deny the human rights so cherished by our peoples.

Mr. Prime Minister, on this, your own voyage of discovery, you will find a deep well of affection and respect for India and its people. You will sense America's admiration for India's strength in overcoming adversities and a heartfelt sympathy for the tragedy that you've personally suffered.

Mr. Prime Minister, you'll find that we respect India's nonalignment and recognize the pivotal role your country plays in south Asia. We're supportive of your efforts and those of others in south Asia to overcome past animosities in seeking stability, security, and cooperation in the region.

Mr. Prime Minister, our peoples have much to gain from one another. Enthusiasm for the growing potential of our commercial and economic relations is evident here. Expanding cultural, scientific, and educational exchanges will also be a great boon to both our peoples.

Our countries have areas of disagreement, yet these are opportunities to prove our mutual good will by discussing our differences forthrightly. We do so with confidence because we're convinced that our fundamental areas of agreement far outweigh the differences of the moment.

This understanding gives us reason for optimism about the future of our relations. Your stay with us will also provide us a better understanding of you, Mr. Prime Minister. Americans are impressed with what they've seen; your leadership and your idealism are inspiring. We're eager to learn more of your vision for India's future.

I've been impressed with your efforts to invigorate India's economy. In much of the developing world, people are moving away from redistribution and state control -- methods that have brought only a scarcity and suffering. New and more successful models for development focus on incentives rather than controls; on production rather than redistribution. And here in the United States, we found that reducing tax rates has been the most important factor in the progress we've made. And we have every reason to look to the future with confidence and optimism.

Just as current technology overcame past problems, new technologies will provide solutions to maladies which today seem insurmountable. Free people, free minds, and free markets will develop innovations which will ensure a more prosperous and peaceful tomorrow. The people of the United States look forward to working with India in building a better tomorrow.

Festival of India would advance America's knowledge of India's heritage and achievements. You will inaugurate that festival, now dedicated to your mother's memory, during your visit here this week. This is an auspicious year for such a festival. As you know, it has been dubbed the Year of India in recognition of a resurgent American interest in India's culture and history.

I look forward to our talks, for I'm sure that, as with our predecessors, we, too, will be enriched by the exchange. This is an opportunity to broaden the understanding and deepen the cooperation between our countries and to advance the cause of peace in your region and in the world.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, Sonia and I are honored and delighted to be here. I bring you, to Mrs. Reagan, and to the warm-hearted people of the United States the Indian peoples' greetings and friendship. Millions of Indian eyes are focused on this spot today, leaping over oceans and continents.

Three years ago, welcoming Indira Gandhi, my predecessor, my mother, on this very stretch of green, you remarked so truly that our two people, with all their differences, have much in common. Yes, there are differences, but rising above them are the beliefs we share in common -- in the supremacy of freedom, in the necessity of equality, in the sovereignty of the people's will.

As I flew in here I saw, in passing, the memorial to Thomas Jefferson, who proclaimed in simple and stirring words that all men are created equal and independent. Behind me is a house which has been the home of eminent men who have symbolized your nation's dreams and its drive to greatness. One of them, Abraham Lincoln, said that a nation cannot be half slave and half free and that a house divided against itself cannot stand. The best minds of our age tell us that a world divided against itself cannot endure.

It should be the task of all of us who hold responsibility for other people's lives to recognize what life and its continuance demand in this hate-filled, violence-prone world of ours. The inevitability of coexistence must propel us towards the imperative of cooperation.

The United States and India have been developing a tradition of working together. If my visit strengthens that tradition, it will have given further substance to what is in any case one of the most important and one of the most pleasantly rewarding of journeys. I look forward, in particular, to my talks with you, Mr. President. We know of your lifelong feeling for India and look forward to welcoming you there.

From this week, a Festival of India opens here in Washington; several other cities will soon join in it. The Festival portrays India's aspirations, achievements, and ancient living heritage. I hope that it will enable the people of the United States to understand what we are, why we are so, and how the Indian civilization has endured for 5,000 years. The purpose of the Festival is to secure greater understanding and, with it, greater friendship from the American people, who have, themselves, built a dynamic civilization.

It was a great act of imagination and constructiveness when you and our late Prime Minister decided we should try to develop a better grasp of each other through the medium of culture. I am sure it will provide a story for developing an understanding and cooperation in other fields.

Up until now the Communist Sandinistas, backed by Havana and Moscow, have stridently rejected national reconciliation through a church-mediated dialog as proposed by the unified Nicaraguan opposition. Today's vote in the House complements the Senate's vote last week to support, with humanitarian assistance, those risking their lives for democracy. Both houses and both sides of the aisle have now demonstrated American resolve to safeguard our own national interests and to advance the rights of the people of Central America. This vote will strengthen the democratic center in Nicaragua against the extremes of the left and the right -- just as has occurred in El Salvador.

It is my hope that, in this same spirit, the House and Senate will now act quickly to send me a bill making effective support available through appropriate mechanisms to those who so critically need it.

Prime Minister and Mrs. Gandhi and other distinguished guests from India, it's a pleasure to have you here. Yours is among the most ancient of cultures and ours is one of the youngest. Ours is, however, the oldest constitutional democracy and yours is relatively new -- 38 years of age.

And, Mr. Prime Minister, I'm happy to report to all present this evening that although a few years separate us -- just a few -- [laughter] -- we hit it off, and just as with relations between our countries, I predict good things ahead.

Mr. Prime Minister, you were recently quoted as saying about our two countries that basically we stand for the same things -- freedom, democracy, independence. And I'm sure that our meetings today reinforce that observation. To paraphrase Tolstoy, undemocratic societies are all undemocratic in their own way, but democratic societies are all alike. And so it is with India and the United States; we are ultimately so similar. And yet like family members, we often find it hard to communicate. Today we opened up personal channels of communication that will serve our countries well.

India and the United States, Mr. Prime Minister, have enormous strengths on which we can draw in seeking to improve our relations. Democracies have valuable experience in reconciling differing points of view within their own national societies. This is particularly true in our great nations, both mosaics of diverse cultures, religions, and languages. And the key to our success domestically is dialog -- the quality of careful listening and serious speaking one to another.

As the magnificent Festival of India will illuminate, you have enriched the world with beauty, culture, science, and philosophy. Perhaps your most precious gift to us has been the many Indians who have become proud citizens of our country. Some are here tonight, and they embody the human bond that is between us.

Being the Year of India in America, your visit and the Festival of India couldn't have been better timed. We have today set out an agenda for deepening our cooperation across a broad spectrum of issues ranging from political to economic and scientific.

This afternoon our two nations agreed to extend by an additional 3 years the very successful science and technology initiative launched as a result of my meetings with the late Prime Minister Indira Gandhi in 1982. This is one example, an important example, of the kind of cooperation that bodes well for the future of Indo-U.S. relations.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, First Lady, ladies and gentlemen, I feel privileged to be in this historic house once again. My wife and I are grateful for the warm and generous words you have spoken about India and about your meeting with my mother.

I recall the esteem that she had for you. I recall, also, the last time she was here, a wish that you had then expressed about holding a Festival of India has come true. It is good of you to dedicate that festival to Indira Gandhi's memory. We appreciate the special interest Mrs. Reagan has taken in it as patron of the U.S. national committee.

It provides an opportunity for the reaffirmation of our commitment to personal liberty, to the rule of law, and to free expression. We both are rather outspoken people, not known for keeping quiet about what we feel and what we believe. But being candid with each other is a measure of the stability of our relationship. Both of us are animated by that capricious tolerance which marks the democratic spirit. It is one of the reasons why, in spite of some differences on policies and particulars, a firm people-to-people relationship endures between us.

It is in that spirit that we had our conversation today, at which we discussed our assessments and concerns; you have referred to some. I mentioned to you about our apprehensions at the growing militarism around the region around India, which is increasing our burdens. We have always been against outside presences and pressures, which can lead to instability. To reduce tensions in south Asia, India has taken several initiatives with its neighbors. But the success of our efforts depends very much upon what the big powers do in our region in pursuit of interests. A stable, united, peaceful India, I should think is in everyone's interest.

That is the India we are engaged in developing. For that purpose, we need peace in our neighborhood; we need peace in the world. We desire a global partnership for socioeconomic development, for the satisfaction of human needs, for the promotion of mutual understanding, and for the prevention of war.

Development and peace are closely linked. If disarmament is important for developed countries, it is even more relevant for the developing. We are appalled at the destructive fire that men have built over the years. We are concerned about the new dimensions in the arms race. The very survival of mankind today rests in the hands of a very few countries, leaving mankind to wait in fear and hope.

Six nations, including India, recently issued an appeal for disarmament. Any positive steps taken towards disarmament will be acclaimed and supported by India, the nonaligned community, and by peoples all over the world.

We welcome the negotiations between the United States and the Soviet Union at Geneva and hope that their deliberations will lead to positive results. Nonalignment has been a positive force for peace; it stands for friendship and cooperation with all. Any nation's independence must include the option to steer clear of bloc identification. One friendship need not be at the cost of another. We want to enlarge cooperation between our two countries in numerous fields.

India today is poised for greater growth. We have taken up plans and policies to generate new employment in our rural areas and to harness the productive energies of our young. We want the nation to benefit from the enterprise latent in our people. Growth has to be carefully calibrated so that in enlarging national production, it redresses regional imbalances and ensures social justice.

We have narrowed the industrial and technological gap. Our seventh plan envisages an investment of $150 billion. We need new technology in a big way. A good part of it we will develop ourselves, but we must necessarily acquire the most advanced knowledge wherever it is generated.

The United States is preeminently the land of high technology. Recently, our two countries have reached an understanding on transfer of high technology; these arrangements must be worked out with great speed.

Mr. President, one of your great predecessors, Franklin Roosevelt, had said, ``The only limit to our realization of tomorrow will be our doubts of today.'' These words bring out the spirit of striving which marks America. Each generation must reestablish freedom and justice; each generation must respond to new situations. There is just enough time to dip in time's refreshing river. Situations change, peoples change, good ideas become dull and unexciting; sometimes they undergo distortion.

I now request you to join me in a toast to the health of President and Mrs. Reagan, to the prosperity of the American people, and to growing cooperation between our two countries in the interest of our two peoples and in the cause of a better world.

Thank you, Governor Tom Kean, and thank you Mayor Kinder. You know, I think New Jersey is very lucky to have Tom Kean as its Governor. He is one of the ablest State executives in the country; he happens to be one of my favorite Governors.

You know, I've been traveling across the country the past few weeks talking about tax reform -- why we need it, what it is, and how it will affect us all. And I brought my message here today because we cannot make a change this great without the help of all the people in America. We especially need the help of the most committed and hardest working citizens in the country, which means we need the support of the people of the Garden State.

Now occasionally, I get into a sort of a dialog with the audience when I'm speaking. It's kind of my way of gauging public opinion. I call it the Reagan poll. Well, frequently, I do it somewhere near the end of my talk, but today I'm going to do it at the beginning.

And here goes. Now, listen carefully. If you really, truly love our current Federal tax system, the one we have now that you just had to deal with a couple of months ago, how about a big cheer for it?

All right now. It wasn't completely silence, but the sounds you did make was as good as silence. I think it demonstrates a fact with which we're all familiar: Our current Federal tax system is neither admired nor respected. It encourages cheating; it is inherently unjust; it has created a vast and unproductive underground economy; it is tottering on an unsound foundation; and it's time we simply tore it down and built a better one.

Our current tax system is ready for the ash heap of history. And having decided that, now comes the difficult business of creating a new tax system that is fair and easy to comprehend. A new tax system that will allow people to get ahead, that won't keep holding them down, a new tax system that will finally put the family at center stage and the special interests way high up in the back of the balcony where they belong.

I know you're familiar with the particulars. You've been reading about them in the magazines and the newspapers and listening to debates, and I hope you've had some time to sit down at the kitchen table and figure out what you would pay under our proposals. Because if you have, then, you know that our proposals will very likely speed tax relief for you and your family.

And for the first time in years in our country, the man and woman at the head of the family will be able to work overtime or take a second job without seeing those new wages eaten up by high marginal tax rates as you go up in those 14 brackets that we presently have.

The poor will benefit from our tax proposals because most of them won't pay any Federal income tax at all. Middle-income earners will benefit from lower tax rates and the increases in the personal exemption, the standard deduction, and in the IRA's. In fact, 58 percent of all American families will pay lower taxes under our plan. Over 21 -- or another 21 percent, I should say, will probably pay the same as they pay now -- no more. And all of us will benefit from the economic growth that will follow the lowering of taxes, just as you found it brought about the lowering of taxes here in your State brought about increased economic recovery and prosperity and productivity in this State.

But tax reform is not without its foes. There are those who won't oppose it outright, but who'll try to nickel and dime it to death. Others will use any false argument they can, any scare tactic to cloud the truth and raise confusion.

There are those who say that our tax plan will benefit some States and hurt others. They say that when we eliminate the deduction for State and local taxes, we'll hurt the people who pay those taxes in the high-tax States. Well, again, it's simply not true.

Finally, our third point: Because our tax plan will encourage economic growth, it will broaden the tax base in every city, town, and State in the country. Now, Bloomfield has a vibrant local economy. When the people of this town are allowed to keep more of their hard-earned money and are allowed to spend it, save it, and invest it; well, then the business community of Bloomfield will really bloom.

Now, we're not favoring one State over another. We're favoring every taxpayer in America by creating greater fairness, greater justice, and lower tax rates. Our tax plan will close the loopholes that are manipulated by some to avoid paying taxes. The truth is everyone should pay their fair share.

And no one, no matter how powerful or privileged, should be able to use tax shelters to keep from paying taxes when the middle class, with no place to hide and no protection from clever accountants, bear more than their share of the load.

Now, our plan will not increase the deficit nor will it be used to raise revenue. You know, some people are talking about turning tax reform into a tax increase. Well, let me tell you, anyone who tries that, I have a veto pen ready for them.

Our tax program is designed to ensure the growth of the American economy in our time and in our children's time. It's aimed at creating investment and jobs and personal wealth. We're not just talking about a better deal for now -- we're talking about the future. And we're not just predicting economic growth, we're promising it. We know it will happen.

So much is ahead of us; more important, so much is ahead for our children. You know, it's the oldest cliche, only because it's true: The fuel that has kept America going, that made every tired breadwinner get up every morning and go to work, the thing that's made every one of our families hold together and pull at the same oar, the fuel that kept all that going was the hope that the kids in their day would have it better.

It was the hope that our children would have more than we did, that they'd live richer lives in terms of experience, opportunity, and wealth. We're a nation that got up every morning for the children, and we still do. And when I talk about economic growth, I don't mean more wealth for now -- we're doing all right. I mean creating a whole world of real and tangible opportunities and possibilities for our children.

If I could jog your memory a little bit, there was a time not too long ago -- just a few years ago -- when America was being told that we were living in an age of limits; that things had changed; that we'd gone about as far as we could go, and from here on it was going to be all downhill, and we'll just have to get used to being second rate. You remember those words about a malaise that we were suffering. And America, being an openminded and realistic country listened and pondered and considered, and then America made a decision. It told the pessimists to take a hike.

I'm not optimistic about the future of America because I have a sunny disposition. I'm not optimistic because I don't know the realities. I'm optimistic because I do know them. I'm optimistic because I have witnessed the American experience for more than seven decades, and I know that the American people can do anything.

American revolution. And I need your help. The sharks are circling our tax plan and trying to take a bite. We happen to have a foolproof shark repellent in the will of the American people. But your voice must be heard.

The President. All right. Will you write your Representatives? You don't have to write the two here, they've already heard you. [Laughter] Write your Representatives, your Senators, and tell them how you feel. It really does mean something in Washington to hear from you -- the mail and the telegrams and the phone calls. Tell them how you feel. And that's great because without you, nothing can be accomplished; but with you, everything is possible.

And if you get pessimistic or think your contribution won't make a difference, just think of those young soldiers that you were told about of two centuries ago, who, during another revolution, trained on the Green, held together, and marched New Jersey and America into freedom.

You know, speaking of this, I just want to say one last thing, too. If you feel like adding a P.S. to your letter, I've talked about tax reform, but there's another vital thing lying before the Congress today. Add a P.S. that yes, let's go forward with that budget we've proposed that will reduce the total of government spending.

Commission on January 28, 1985. Eight distinguished citizens have served on the Commission. It met for two months and heard testimony from more than 75 persons in developing its report. The Commissioners have traveled to Europe to talk with our commanders and Allies there and to examine our defenses against chemical attack at first hand.

The Commission has now reached a consensus on the points it was asked to consider and has submitted its findings. I am conveying these in the attached report for the consideration of the Congress as it deliberates the question of this Nation's posture for deterrence of chemical warfare.

The Commission has found that the United States must have a credible retaliatory capability to deter attack, that the present United States stockpile of agents and munitions does not constitute an effective retaliatory capability, and that the projected binary munitions program offers a much safer and more credible deterrent. Also, this program, far from impeding arms control, will provide an essential assist to our negotiating efforts.

The report of this distinguished Commission has strengthened my own very real concern for our country's chemical deterrence posture. I urge the Congress to authorize funding for the binary munitions program as expeditiously as possible.

In honoring fathers, we honor families. Families are the bedrock of our Nation's strength, and fathers play an indispensable role in forming vital, whole families. They serve as models and guides for their sons and daughters and help to pass on to the next generation the heritage of our civilization.

Being a good father is an art that cannot be taught in schools. The main ingredient for success is simply a caring attitude. Fathers who love their families can never completely fail, and children will always remember the influence of a father who tries to do his best. For many children, the memory of a loving father will be the most important influence in their lives.

The love a father feels for his children can take many forms. The only constant is that he shares their lives in a special and irreplaceable way. He feels their hurts as well as their joys, their pains as well as their triumphs. In this way, he plays an indispensable role in their moral development, and they return to him a love and satisfaction that cannot be found anywhere else.

On Father's Day, we pay tribute to all in our society who have taken on the responsibilities and joys of fatherhood. Whether our fathers are near at hand or a continent away, with their families or watching from the light of eternity, we take this day to remember them, to say our thanks for the years they have given us, and to ask that they receive God's blessings.

The President today announced his intention to appoint David C. Fischer to be Commissioner on the part of the United States on the International Boundary Commission, United States and Canada. He would succeed Frank A. Whetstone.

And I want to begin by expressing my deep personal gratitude to each of you for being a part of this tremendously important, history-making event. And a special word of thanks is in order to Bob Galvin, the Advisory Council Chairman; to Bill Taylor and the citation program sponsors who made these awards -- or this awards program possible; and to John Phelan from the New York Stock Exchange.

Some of you've heard me talk about de Tocqueville's reflections on 19th century America and his astonishment at the extent to which Americans made their society work -- not by relying on government but by helping each other. You all know that this tradition -- one of the driving engines of social progress in our country -- was in serious jeopardy some years ago when the idea took hold that the only way to handle a social problem was a huge new Federal spending program, an army of functionaries and consultants to administer it.

But any modern-day de Tocqueville looking over America would see a return now to that tradition and a revival of the idea, which all of you embody, that compassion with ingenuity works, that the American people are anxious and ready to help each other. They just need to be asked.

I hope you'll forgive me if I tell a little story that I think has a special pertinence about some of these things. Back in my early days in radio, every studio had a sound-effects man. And he had a kind of a wagon there on wheels he'd bring in for dramatic presentations and so forth.

And he had experimented with all the things that you could do to make sounds that otherwise you couldn't get on radio. For example, he had, I know, in our own studio half coconut shells with which he would beat on his chest, and you would have a horse galloping. [Laughter] And, then, he had plenty of cellophane that he could crackle and crinkle, and that was a raging fire while the things were going on.

Well, one day we had a play that called for water falling on a board, and he got to work, the headphones on, and to listen and all during the rehearsals, he was working. He tried rice on a drum; he tried dried peas on a piece of cardboard; I recall. He tried everything, and nothing would give him the sound of water on a board.

And then, you know what? He tried water on a board -- [laughter] -- and it sounded just like water on a board. [Laughter] Well, in a way, then, that's what all of you have done -- the simple and obvious thing that somehow had been forgotten. You just went to people; you asked them to lend a hand. And you discovered that that's just the question they needed to hear. And because you did, you've helped change America.

There is a grassroots movement out there that just can't be stopped. Earlier this week, Tom Evans and his education committee sponsored a symposium on partnerships in education. Close to 500 people came to Washington to talk about creative ways for business and schools to work together. And because of your efforts, the New York Stock Exchange has identified private sector initiatives as an issue of great importance to corporate America and cohosted this morning's symposium on excellence in private sector initiatives.

And the list goes on. I wish there were time to mention the contributions of everyone. I couldn't possibly do that, but what I can do is thank you, not just for myself, but as President for the millions of Americans who, if they had the chance, would want to personally express their gratitude to you.

You have made a difference for your country and for millions of your countrymen. You have helped renew and enrich America by awakening one of her oldest and most noble traditions. And now, given this marvelous start, I cannot help but feel that our work has just begun. The challenge is before us to make better use of all our resources. We can only do this by working together. No one sector can do it alone.

The crystal tetrahedrons that I am awarding today symbolize how the fusion on the private, public, and nonprivate sectors can form a solid base. Only by working together and finding some private solutions to public problems can we restore the strong balance needed for the future health of our Nation.

Our country is great because it is built on principles of self-reliance, opportunity, innovation, and compassion for the others. Private sector initiatives embody this spirit and are a vital part of the Nation's character.

United States and Canada. Both Governments recognized the substantial benefits that would ensue from broadened crude oil transfers and exchanges between these two historic trading partners and allies. These benefits would include the increased availability of reliable energy sources, economic efficiencies, and material enhancements to the energy security of both countries. Following this Declaration, Canada declared that it would permit Canadian crude oil to be freely exported to the United States effective June 1, 1985.

These findings and determinations shall be published in the Federal Register. I direct the Secretary of Commerce to take all other necessary and proper action to expeditiously implement this decision.

Family reunions are occasions that renew the feelings of love, pride, and support that nurture our lives. There is no more joyous and poignant family reunion than the return to the family of a child who has run away from home.

The number of young people between the ages of 10 and 17 who ran away from home last year is estimated at more than one million. The heartache of such a breakdown in family relationships is incalculable. But for many thousands of families, the joy of reunion was realized with the return of a son or daughter and a resolution of the conditions that precipitated the flight of the child.

In all likelihood, the return was aided by one of the professionals and volunteers who staff runaway shelters throughout the country. Last year alone, some 200,000 young Americans and their families received counseling aimed at resolving family conflicts and pressures. Almost half the young people who sought help were returned safely to their homes.

Much remains to be done, and all of us can play a role. Volunteers are needed to help staff crisis intervention programs. Parents themselves must recognize the importance of keeping open lines of communications with their children and strive to strengthen family relationships.

Families are the cornerstone of America. All of America's families should be encouraged to continue strengthening their ties through gatherings and activities such as family reunions that involve as many members as possible.

The atrocious character of the Soviet oppression was shockingly illustrated by the imprisonment, deportation, and murder of close to 100,000 Balts during a four-day reign of terror June 14 - 17, 1941. The suffering of this brutal period was made even worse when Nazi forces struck back through these three states at the beginning of the Nazi-Soviet war and instituted a civil administration under control of the nefarious Gestapo. Due to Soviet and Nazi tyranny, by the end of World War II, the Baltic nations had lost twenty percent of their total population.

Today, suppression and persecution are the daily burdens of the Estonian, Latvian, and Lithuanian people. Soviet policies are specifically targeted toward the very ethnic life and historical heritage of the Baltic nations. Russification takes place under many guises: forced relocation, expanded colonization by Russian immigrants, and heavy pressure against the indigenous religious, cultural, and social traditions.

Yet despite this crushing system, the Baltic peoples courageously continue to resist amalgamation by pressing for their national, political, and religious rights. Peaceful expression of demands through the underground press, petitions to government officials, demonstrations, the activities of the Catholic Church and other religious denominations, Helsinki monitoring groups, and committees to defend the rights of religious believers command the admiration of everyone who loves and honors freedom.

All the people of the United States of America share the aspirations of the Baltic nations for national independence. The United States upholds their rights to determine their own national destiny, free of foreign interference. For 45 years, the United States has not recognized the forcible incorporation of the Baltic States into the Soviet Union, and it will not do so in the future.

Since 1777, the flag of our Nation has been redesigned periodically to reflect the admission of new States. It has flown over our public buildings, our town squares, and many private homes. It has been carried proudly into battle, and our national anthem gives a dramatic account of the hope and inspiration it has given to many Americans. Today, it is the leading symbol of the Nation we love and an emblem recognized around the world as a sign of our unity and devotion to freedom.

Allegiance, and I hope that everyone here will join us and Americans all across the country when we pause for that pledge tonight. You've been given the time in which we will all do that across the Nation -- reaffirm our thankfulness, our love, and our loyalty to our blessed and beautiful land.

This flag that we salute today is a replica of one that flew through the night, as you know, 171 years ago during the bombardment of Fort McHenry signaling defiance to the British and hope and inspiration to Francis Scott Key. Some historians have called the War of 1812 the second war of independence, the crucial test of our young republic as it fought for its life against what was then the strongest nation on Earth. By the end of the summer of 1814, the British had already taken our capital and burned the White House as the Senator told you. Baltimore was the next target in their grand design to divide our forces and crush this newly independent nation of upstart colonies. All that stood between the British and Baltimore, all that stood between America and defeat, was this fort and its guns blocking their entry into Baltimore Harbor.

The British fleet of warships moved within 2 miles of the fort and began a bombardment that was to last for 25 hours. Through the dark hours of the night, the rockets fired and the bombs exploded and a young American patriot named Key, held captive aboard a British ship, watched anxiously for some proof, some sign, that liberty would prevail.

You can imagine his joy when the next morning, in the dawn's early light, he looked out and saw the banner still flying -- a little tattered and torn and worse for wear, but still flying proudly above the ramparts. Fort McHenry and the brave men manning it had withstood the assault. Baltimore was saved. The United States, this great experiment in human freedom, as George Washington described it, would endure.

It truly was a perilous night for our new nation. But our forefathers were motivated by something bigger than themselves. From the harsh winter of Valley Forge to the blazing night above Fort McHenry, those patriot soldiers were sustained by the ideal of human freedom.

Through the hardships and the setbacks, they kept their eyes on that ideal and that purpose, just as through the smoke of battle they kept a lookout for the flag. But with the birth of our nation, the cause of human freedom had become forever tied to that flag and its survival.

As the American Republic grew and prospered and new stars were added to the flag, the ideal of freedom grew and prospered. As our country spread across the continent, millions of the dispossessed, the persecuted, the tired, the hungry, and poor flocked to our shores. And the human energies unleashed in this land of liberty were like those never before seen in this world.

Moon, our pioneers carried our flag before them, a symbol of the indomitable spirit of a free people. And let us never forget that in honoring our flag, we honor the American men and women who have courageously fought and died for it over the last 200 years -- patriots who set an ideal above any consideration of self and who suffered for it the greatest hardships. Our flag flies free today because of their sacrifice.

And today we mark the 100th anniversary of the first Flag Day ceremony. It was a small and modest ceremony honoring the anniversary of the creation of our flag, a ``Flag Birthday,'' as they called it, conducted by a young schoolteacher and his students at the Stony Hill School in Wisconsin. The teacher's name was Bernard Cigrand, and through his subsequent efforts, he helped establish the national observance of Flag Day. His granddaughter, Mrs. Elroya Cigrand Brown, is with us today to help us celebrate. Congratulations, Mrs. Brown.

Mrs. Wainwright, it's been many years since your ancestor wrote the stirring poem that's become our national anthem. Now, with that same spirit of self-reliance, a private sector initiative called the Patriots of Fort McHenry has been formed to refurbish this historic monument. I commend the ingenuity and patriotism of the business and civic leaders that are undertaking this important event.

As we mark the 100th ``Flag Birthday,'' the ideals for which our flag stands still challenge our nation. And today, as before, we strive to reach the full potential of freedom, to put things right, and open wide the door of the American opportunity society so that all of our citizens can walk through.

These anniversaries remind us that freedom is not a resting place, but a constant goal spurring us on to ever-greater achievements. America has always recognized our historic responsibility to lead the march of freedom. Since our revolution, the first democratic revolution, and the founding of our republic, America has been a hope and inspiration to the oppressed and tyrannized the world over.

In the storm-tossed history of our globe, the United States has been a strong and steady rudder, holding the world fast to the course of democratic progress. That progress hasn't always been easy, and there have been many setbacks along the way. In my lifetime, the world has suffered the agony of the twin inhuman ideologies of nazism and communism. But today freedom is rising.

Around the globe, freedom is taking root and growing strong. Over 90 percent of the people in the countries to our south now live in democracies or countries that are confidently moving in that direction. El Salvador, beset by terrorists, supportive of the Communist regime in Nicaragua, has come securely through its own perilous night, and its democratic flag still flies proudly over a free land.

In those countries around the world where the tyrants still hold sway, new resistance movements are gaining momentum. In Nicaragua, Angola, Afghanistan, and Cambodia, the freedom fighters now fight for their freedom and for human rights. They fight for the same ideals that inspired our forefathers, though the tyrants they battle are incomparably more ruthless. Still, the power and justice of their cause is such that, even despite sometimes overwhelming odds, many of the rebel movements continue to gain recruits and grow in strength.

So, freedom's story is still being written. The brave defense of Fort McHenry by our patriot army was one of its first chapters. But the story will continue as long as there are tyrants and dictators who would deny their people their unalienable rights to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happines.

I would interject here, right now -- I have a letter which I treasure very much. It is a full letter. It is on a slip of paper only 2\1/2\ inches long and just under an inch in height. But on that is penned a letter, which can only be read with a magnifying glass, and then, in my case, had to be translated, and there are 10 names affixed in signature to that tiny letter. It was smuggled out of a labor camp in the Soviet Union. It was signed by 10 women in that camp who have gone through hunger strikes in their desire for freedom. And the reason they wrote me was to tell me that we, in the United States, represented to them the hope that one day there would be freedom throughout the world. I'm going to keep that letter for as long as I live.

You know, the story, as I say, will continue. Every time we place our hand over our heart and pledge allegiance to the flag, we'll be reminded that our most precious inheritance is freedom and that history has bestowed on our nation the unique responsibility for its protection.

That declaration inspired our nation to reach new heights of human freedom, but its promise wasn't complete until we abolished the shame of slavery from our land and, in the lifetime of many of us, wrote the civil rights statutes that outlawed discrimination by race, religion, gender, or national origin.

Discrimination is still not yet a thing of the past, unfortunately; and for the last 4\1/2\ years, this administration has acted vigorously to defend and extend every American's fundamental right to equal treatment.

The Justice Department has worked energetically to end discrimination in employment, voting, housing -- in all the areas covered by law. Our record on enforcing minority voting rights is at the top of the list. And we've increased to an all-time high the number of criminal civil rights cases filed. We have a proud record on civil rights.

The principle that guides us and the principle embodied in the law is one of nondiscrimination. I'm sure that you have all seen the statue representing justice that presides in many of our courtrooms -- the woman with the blindfold covering her eyes. Her eyes are covered because true justice should never depend on whether you're rich or poor, or black or white, or if you're Hispanic or Asian, or if your ancestors came from Italy, Poland, Latvia, or any other country, including Ireland, where some of my family's from.

Equal treatment and equality before the law -- these are the foundations on which a just and free society is built. But there are some today who, in the name of equality, would have us practice discrimination. They have turned our civil rights laws on their head, claiming they mean exactly the opposite of what they say. These people tell us that the Government should enforce discrimination in favor of some groups through hiring quotas, under which people get or lose particular jobs or promotions solely because of their race or sex. Some bluntly assert that our civil rights laws only apply to special groups and were never intended to protect every American.

Congress, Senator Hubert Humphrey, one of its leading advocates, said he'd start eating the pages of the act if it contained any language which provides that an employer will have to hire on the basis of percentage or quota. But I think if Senator Humphrey saw how some people today are interpreting that act, he'd get a severe case of indigestion.

The truth is, quotas deny jobs to many who would have gotten them otherwise, but who weren't born a specified race or sex. That's discrimination pure and simple and is exactly what the civil rights laws were designed to stop. Quotas also cast a shadow on the real achievements of minorities, which makes quotas a double tragedy.

In 1980 and 1984 I ran for President and told you I was opposed to quotas. In response to your mandate, our administration has worked to return the civil rights laws to their original meaning -- to prevent discrimination against any and all Americans.

William Bradford Reynolds, the Assistant Attorney General for Civil Rights, has played a key role in that effort. Brad Reynolds is not only a tireless fighter against discrimination, he's a brilliant and dedicated lawyer. Recently, I nominated Brad Reynolds to be Associate Attorney General -- the number three job in the Justice Department. He deserves that promotion, but his nomination is being opposed by some who don't agree with us about civil rights, by some who favor the discrimination of quotas.

Reynolds is a man of integrity and strong ideals, that he's firmly committed to the same vision of a just society that I am. I've nominated Brad Reynolds to carry out my policies, the policies for which you elected me, the policies that reflect our best principles as a nation. I'm confident that the Senate will confirm him.

Twenty-two years ago Martin Luther King proclaimed his dream of a society rid of discrimination and prejudice, a society where people would be judged on the content of their character, not by the color of their skin. That's the vision our entire administration is committed to -- a society that keeps faith with the promise of our Declaration of Independence, a proud society in which all men and women truly are created free and equal under God.

Q. What do you know about the rumors or the -- not rumors, but the fact that they've taken several hostages off in Beirut, six hostages, we believe -- people with what they said were Jewish-sounding names.

The President. This is a decision for them to make, and the decision isn't so simple as just trading prisoners. The decision is at what point can you pay off the terrorists without endangering people from here on out once they find out that their tactics succeed.

The President. No, I can't comment. I think that we're going to continue doing the things that we're doing and just hope that they themselves will see that -- for their own safety -- that they'd better turn these people loose.

Ladies and gentlemen, during the past 4 years we have made great progress in rebuilding our national defense and in confronting the challenge of effective defense management. Credit rightly goes to our civilian defense leadership, particularly Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger. It also goes to our men and women in uniform and to the American people for their support in our efforts.

We've accomplished a great deal, and we have much to be proud of, but there's still a great deal left to do. When our administration began its activities, the problem of defense management we knew would be demanding and difficult, almost as difficult as I had getting that sentence out.

But a public misconception has developed from all of this, a misconception born, at least in part, of a drumbeat of propaganda and demagoguery that denies the real accomplishment of these last 4 years. The situation reminds me of the old saying, ``Don't clean the skeletons out of the closet.

Defense Department he pledged, with my full and continuing support, to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of defense management. And he went straight for the skeletons in the closet, and there were many. Cap has put in place many management reforms, and more proposals are being considered, both by the Department and Congress.

I think all of the reforms and all of the new proposals should at this time be evaluated and reviewed. And, so, today I've decided, at the recommendation of Secretary Weinberger and in consultations with Congress, to appoint an independent, bipartisan, Blue Ribbon Commission on Defense Management. They will review the progress already made in improving management and procurement. And we've also asked them to look at the organization and decisionmaking procedures at Defense and give us their recommendations.

In addition, the Commission will study and report on the congressional oversight process as it relates to the Defense Department. It's my expectation that the Commission will send us an eventual blueprint for action that will provide for continuing improvement in the Department of Defense's peacetime and combative effectiveness.

Commission. He is a former Deputy Secretary of Defense, as you know, with an impeccable record that includes wide experience in and knowledge of our defense system, the defense industry, and government. I will soon ask a number of other leaders in the business, legal, and academic communities to join us in this effort.

And may I point out here that few things are more important to me than the work that this commission will do. Waste and fraud by corporate contractors are more than a ripoff of the taxpayer -- they're a blow to the security of our nation. And this the American people cannot and should not tolerate.

I want to thank Bill Dickinson of Alabama and Bill Roth of Delaware, who have been working on this issue in the House and Senate. They and many other Members of the Congress have given us sound advice on the creation of this commission.

I hope that Congress as a whole will support this effort and that together all of us -- the administration, the Commission, the Congress -- will be able to establish the bipartisan support needed to ensure a strong defense for America and its allies.

President Bourguiba of Tunisia is a statesman whose influence extends far beyond the boundaries of his own country, a man of dignity and honor. And today he and I discussed issues of particular concern to our two governments and peoples, including developments in the Maghreb and the situation in the Middle East.

The United States and Tunisia share common interests and common values, including a belief that international relations should be based on mutual respect, reason, and cooperation, not subversion and coersion.

The United States remains firmly committed to the sanctity of Tunisia's territorial integrity and to the principle of noninterference in its internal affairs. We welcome the evolution of closer relations between the states of the Maghreb within such a framework.

Historically, Mr. President, you have supported a constructive approach to ending the turmoil that has plagued the region for decades. We hope you will again use your influence to support those who are taking the steps necessary for direct negotiations based on United Nations Security Council Resolutions 242 and 338.

As you know, the goal of this administration remains a just, lasting, and comprehensive peace which will address the legitimate rights of the Palestinian people and provide for the security of all states in the region, including Israel.

Mr. President, your visit reaffirms the underlying strength of the bond between us and the warmth of our friendship. It has been a great pleasure to review with you our past exemplary ties. We're confident that the good will between us will flourish in the years to come. Tunisia can rely on the continuing support and friendship of the United States of America.

My visit, at the invitation of President Reagan, has deep significance for me since it stresses, once again, the exemplary nature of the friendly relations between Tunisia and the United States that have been between us for so long.

I should like to express my heartfelt thanks to President Reagan, as well as to his administration of the American people, for the extremely warm and friendly welcome extended to myself and to my delegation since we arrived in Washington. I am deeply touched by this exceptionally friendly greeting and welcome, and I am very impressed, also, to find the President so fit. I am also very impressed by his very sharp and acute analyses and perceptions.

Together we carried out a review of bilateral relations between us. We are gratified by the positive trend of those relations. We are agreed upon the ways and means to give them more impetus and greater diversification.

Together, also, we have carried out a survey of international and regional problems of interest to our two countries; more specifically, we have looked into the situation in the Maghreb, the Middle East, Africa, and the Mediterranean area. More specifically, President Reagan and I took up the evolution of the Israel-Palestinian conflict.

Nations legal framework as a basis for settlement, 20 years later I remain convinced that this approach remains the only honorable one for all, and 20 years later the Arabs are sorry that they did not accept this approach. At the Fez summit, the Arab community had the great merit to give its support to this approach, and now it remains for the other party -- Israel -- to resolve to choosing a realistic and peaceful policy.

It remains, nevertheless, that true to our policy of noninterference in the internal affairs of other countries and respectful of the free choice of the Palestinian people, Tunisia will bring her support to any initiative of peace that the Palestinians themselves will deem the most appropriate to recover their legitimate rights and set into motion a just and durable peace in the region.

I also use this opportunity to recall to President Reagan what are the essential and permanent principles of the foreign policy of Tunisia -- based upon dialog and peaceful coexistence among states, strengthening of peace and stability in the world, and supporting all just causes.

And finally, I should like to express to President Reagan my best wishes for his personal happiness and health and ask him to convey to the American people a message of friendship and esteem from the Tunisian people.

His murder and the fate of the other American hostages still being held in Beirut underscore an inescapable fact: The United States is tonight a nation being attacked by international terrorists who wantonly kill and who seize our innocent citizens as their prisoners.

Secretary of Transportation, in cooperation with the Secretary of State, to explore immediately an expansion of our armed sky marshal program aboard international flights of U.S. air carriers for better protection of passengers.

This warning shall remain in effect until the Greek Government has improved the security situation there and until it has demonstrated a willingness to comply with the security provisions of the U.S.-Greek civil aviation agreement and the Tokyo, Montreal, and Hague conventions regarding prosecution and punishment of air pirates.

I've asked for a full explanation of the events surrounding the takeover of the aircraft in Athens. I have appealed through the Department of Transportation and the Federal Aviation Administration for all U.S. air carriers to review the wisdom of continuing any flights into Athens until the security situation there improves.

And further, I have asked Secretaries Shultz and Dole to report to me on whether we should terminate the service of foreign air carriers whose governments do not honor appropriate international conventions or provide adequate security at their airports.

I will also be asking them to take steps to prevent travel to places where lawlessness is rampant and innocent passengers are unprotected. And I'm urging that no American enter any Middle Eastern country that does not publicly condemn and disassociate itself from this atrocity and call for the immediate safe release of our citizens.

Let me further make it plain to the assassins in Beirut and their accomplices, wherever they may be, that America will never make concessions to terrorists -- to do so would only invite more terrorism -- nor will we ask nor pressure any other government to do so. Once we head down that path there would be no end to it, no end to the suffering of innocent people, no end to the bloody ransom all civilized nations must pay.

This act of terrorism is a stain on Lebanon and particularly on those Lebanese in whose name it has been done. Those in Lebanon who commit these acts damage their country and their cause, and we hold them accountable.

Lebanon, political and religious, to meet their responsibilities and to do all that is necessary to end this crime now in the name of the God they worship. And I call on other governments to speak out and use their influence as well.

This attack is an attack on all citizens of the world who seek to live free from the fear and scourge of terrorism. My thoughts and prayers are, as are those of all Americans, with the prisoners now being held in Lebanon and with their families.

Consequently, there are many questions to which I should not and cannot respond. I think I have, in this statement, covered virtually all the points that I can safely discuss, and I'm sure that you would understand the reason for that.

The President. We certainly include those in every conversation we have with regard to our people there. And this has gone on -- the instance of one of them -- for a considerable period of time. And we have used every effort to see if we can locate who has them, where they are, whether they're together or separated, and where they might be, because we cannot give up on them. And I hope that they have confidence in that.

And yet, as you can imagine, it is an extremely difficult, seemingly impossible task in that area, with all the factions there, to know whether they are being moved about and what we can do. But no, we haven't given up on them, and we include them in all of our conversations about the present hijack victims.

The President. Well, when I was speaking about that I was talking about a situation in which a government on the other side was involved -- so there was a direct source there for the evil. I would have to tell you -- and I can't go farther than this in telling you -- that the problem is the who in perpetrating these deeds -- who their accomplices are, where they are located -- because retaliation in some peoples' minds might just entail striking a blow in a general direction, and the result would be a terrorist act in itself and the killing and victimizing of innocent people.

Now, as far as I can go is to tell you that we have used our utmost capacity and intelligence gathering to try and find these people and these places that I'm talking about. And I can only say that we have gathered a considerable body of evidence, but I'm not going beyond that.

The President. Helen [Helen Thomas, United Press International], no, I don't believe that we have. Possibly when we had a peacekeeping force there in connection with our allies -- the other countries that had forces in there -- we realize that as they began to succeed in keeping some semblance of order in that turmoil, terrorism rose up to strike at all of us that were there in an effort to make our job impossible. And that's why the international force withdrew.

We seem to be a target, also, I'm quite sure, because of our friendship and support of Israel. It just seems there is an anti-Americanism that is rampant there on the part of those who don't want peace with Israel and who have consistently over the years committed terrorist acts against the Israelis.

The President. Helen, because the linkage that has been created makes it impossible for them and for us. There was no question but that they were going to in stages; they already had started releasing. But it has now been tied to where such a movement would be, in effect, giving in to the terrorists. And then, as I say, who is safe? That's all terrorists have to know is that they can succeed and get what they want. It's the same as the customs in single kidnapings -- crimes in our country here in which we know that, if possible, you try to resolve the situation without paying the ransom.

Q. Mr. President, many Americans are very frustrated tonight and feel powerless and feel that they want to strike back somehow at these people who have kidnaped our citizens, murdered some of our citizens. What do you say to those who feel that there's somehow a perception that America is weakened by these acts of terrorism and that we can no longer protect our citizens abroad?

The President. Those people, I think, that do are jumping to conclusions and don't realize what the situation is. But I'm as frustrated as anyone. I've pounded a few walls myself, when I'm alone, about this. It is frustrating. But as I say, you have to be able to pinpoint the enemy. You can't just start shooting without having someone in your gunsights.

Q. Well, sir, have there been things that you've learned about the limits of American power in these sorts of situations, things that you've learned since 4 years, 5 years ago that have perhaps changed your mind about the criticism during the 1980 campaign?

The President. No. Again, I have to say that when you think in terms of, for example, immediate force, you have to say, ``Wait a minute. The people we're dealing with have no hesitation about murder.'' As a matter of fact, most of them even approve of suicide. How do you attack without finding that, yes, you may have punished, before you're through, the guilty; but in the meantime, the victims are dead. And that's the great hazard in this. How, for example, in the several times that the plane was in Algeria and subsequently then in Beirut, with a dozen hijackers onboard armed with submachine guns -- how could you possibly attempt anything without knowing that those guns would be turned first on the victims within the plane, the so-called hostages.

The President. I would still have to think of the safety of all of them. Strangely enough, I just heard someone on one of your networks tonight asking the same question of Al Haig.  [Former Secretary of State and Supreme Allied Commander in Europe.]  It would be a horrible situation, yes, and yet it isn't any more horrible just because it would be me than it is for those people that are presently waiting for some reply. But you can't, as I say, give in to the terrorists without knowing that you're then sentencing someone else to go through the same agony and other people to also be victimized.

The President. Now, you're getting beyond that point. So far these questions you've asked have been questions that I thought it was safe to answer. You're now getting into that area that I said -- and I hope you understand -- that I can't talk about.

Q. Mr. President, is the safe return of the hostages your primary goal, and how does that fit in with the other considerations that you as President -- some of which you've talked about tonight -- are going to have to take into account?

The President. That is the goal -- the safe return. And yet, as I say, in a manner that does not reward the hostages for the crime that they have committed, because that gang would be out next week for another try. And this is the thing we must recognize, that it is a cowardly crime in that they hold all the cards once they have these people in their power. And we have to consider their safety. Yes, I could get mad enough now to think of a couple of things we could do to retaliate, but I would probably be sentencing a number of Americans to death if I did it.

The President. The thing that I always felt about that one, as I say, it was much different than what we have here; you had a government committing that crime. I don't know what measures were looked at as to what you could do with regard to another government. But there it was not this crime of unidentified people -- no connection that you can pin on them as to someone in charge, that you can go to that person. That was a different situation than what we're having now with carbombs and hijackings, and this kind of crime. Remember, for example, in the carbombings, the perpetrator of that crime is no longer with us; they are willing to go up themselves.

Mr. Gorbachev to meet you in Washington. And 6 weeks ago you were asked about the invitation. You said, ``The ball is in his court.'' Have there been any developments since then? Do you think there will be a summit this year?

The President. I have to be optimistic and think there will. All I know is that I, feeling that it was our turn, issued the invitation for such a meeting. And there has been, evidently, expressions that -- willing to have such a meeting, and discussions are going on with regard to time and place. But I can't give you any report on where those negotiations have taken us.

Q. Mr. President, if I can come back to the situation in Lebanon -- you've made a distinction between unidentified terrorists and the state terrorism. Is not Mr. Berri representing the Government of Lebanon? And does that not create a situation where he is, in fact, identifiable?

The President. Well, now, he's in the position of supposedly having taken the hostages away from the hijackers. But to say that because he holds a post, a so-called Cabinet post, in the Government of Lebanon, that this now involves the Government of Lebanon, I think, is to give the Government of Lebanon a cohesiveness it doesn't have. He is acting as an individual, and he's acting less as a Minister in the Cabinet and acting in his own position as the head of the Amal, one of the factions of the Shiite Muslims there. He has his own militia, and he has his own army. So, it isn't that simple that you can say this is the Government of Lebanon.

Q. Mr. President, so far this evening you've given us a rather somber assessment of what's going on in Lebanon. What is your own estimate as to how long this crisis may go on? Do you expect a fairly short resolution, or could this drag on for awhile?

The President. I can't recall in my lifetime any time when it's been used to such an extent as it is now. And the very fact that the terrorists are not all from one source. If they could be linked to a country, if you knew the source and what they were trying to do -- but we've got a variety of terrorist organizations. And sometimes, recently, we've found that here and there a couple of them claim that they've cooperated in some terrorist act.

Q. Mr. President, if I could get back to an earlier question. In the speech in which you talked about swift and effective retribution in 1981, you also said, let it be known that there are limits to our patience. Are there limits to your patience on this issue, or are you willing to wait it out for as long as it takes?

The President. I have to wait it out as long as those people are there and threatened and alive, and we have a possibility of bringing them home -- I'm going to say a probability of bringing them home.

Q. If I could follow up, sir. I wonder if you think that perhaps that's how former President Carter felt about the Iranian hostages and what the difference is here, that he said many times that he wanted to bring them home safe and that was his goal.

The President. Well, as I say, I did not openly criticize him, and as a matter of fact, in the closing days of the campaign when it appeared that we were getting them home, I didn't say any word or make any comment on the situation because I didn't want to endanger what was going on.

I just felt, as I say, that there were two governments, and it just seems to me that you have a great many more opportunities then to find vulnerabilities in another government and things that you can say in return, that you can offer as a trade.

Q. Mr. President, do you think that the Israelis are holding the 700 to 800 Shiite prisoners in violation of international law, as the State Department said on April 4th? And if so, have you got any assurances from them that they would release those prisoners if we got the hostages back?

The President. We have not dealt with him on that. As I say, we have not interfered in any way with them and what they're doing. With regard to the international law, it's my understanding that taking them across a border from their own country and into another country is a violation of the Geneva accords and -- what?

The President. I will have to tell you, Lester [Lester Kinsolving, Globe Syndicate], that this is the first that I've heard about it, and so you've given me a question to ask when I leave here tonight, to find out about that.

Q. To change the subject again, Mr. President. Yesterday South Africans saw the new government in Namibia, which the United Nations condemned. Last week South Africa raided neighboring Botswana, killing 12 people. And last month a South African commando unit tried to blow up oil tanks partly owned by a U.S. company. In view of these events, do you plan any changes, alterations, modifications in your policy of constructive engagement with South Africa?

The President. Well, as you know, we brought our Ambassador home for consultations. All I can tell you is that we think we have been successful in getting some concessions there and some changes in their policy of apartheid, which we all find repugnant. And we're going to continue doing that.

The raid across the border was perhaps the kind of incident that I've just been talking about here in our own situation. There is no question about the violence of the ANC [African National Congress] and their striking and their attacks on people and their murdering and so forth. But again, was the strike back at the people that were guilty, or was it just a retaliation in a general direction? So, we don't know about that, but we are very concerned about it.

The President. Well, you've asked one here that I think we'd have to look at that very seriously to see whether there was an advantage in that or not or whether even their giving that money could accelerate the Midgetman program. I don't know that it could. But I do know that the debates that are going on about the MX, I think are a lot of wasted rhetoric, and we ought to get on with it.

It is most vital to us that we modernize our land-based missiles, and that is the missile that is on hand and available now. It has a hard-target capacity and an accuracy that is virtually unequaled anywhere. We need it.

Q. Mr. President, you've said repeatedly during your administration, as you've said tonight, that you can't give in to terrorism. But each time that we've had one of these incidents, such as the case of the marines who died in Beirut, there had been a lot of talk from the administration but no action. Is there any danger that terrorists in the Middle East might get the feeling that the U.S. bark is worse than its bite and that they can do these things with impunity knowing we won't retaliate?

This is one of the horrifying things of some of these terrorist acts is you have a group of people who think their ticket to heaven is to do this and to take some others with them. So, when it was over, the truck and the people in it -- or person in it -- were gone, and the same was true of the Embassy bombing.

Now, how do you establish a connection between them and someone else? Was there someone else that set them on their way -- you have no way of knowing. So, again, as I say, you're left with only one form of retaliation and that is if you just aim in the general direction and kill some people, well, then, you're a terrorist, too.

The President. One thing right now, we do know from the research that we've done and the experimenting that we've done, we can vastly harden a silo to the extent that we think that it would take a very direct hit to do away with those -- or to eliminate those missiles.

Q. Mr. President, you've been spending a lot of time monitoring the situation in Beirut on the hijacking. I was wondering, how much time are you devoting to domestic issues during your day, particularly the tax effort on the Hill?

The President. That's one thing I have to tell you, you can't just aim yourself at this tragedy, great as it is. I don't think that I neglect it in any way, because there is a limit to what you can do or what can be reported in the times between. Yes, we're very serious about both the budget and tomorrow morning I will be making another appearance in connection with the tax reform.

Q. [Inaudible] from Yugoslav Television. Do you think that this tragic accident might in any way influence the ongoing process of solving the Middle East problem through Palestinian-Jordan-Israeli talks?

The President. I don't really see that they have been -- they're certainly not a setback to us with regard to the peace talks. And I know that King Hussein, when he was here, made it plain that he is not retreating from the effort that he is making. And I have to commend him for his courage and his willingness to do what he's doing in trying to bring about direct negotiations between the Arab States and Israel and the Palestinians to try to get a peace, a lasting peace, in the Middle East. So, we are doing everything we can, also, to be of help to him.

Q. Mr. President, so far this year, you've seen your defense budget request slashed on the Hill, you've had very difficult battles on the Hill with the MX and with a number of other issues, you've had to endure the Bitburg controversy, and now this hostage crisis. Do you feel that the Teflon that's covered your Presidency has slipped off? Is your luck running out?

The President. I never thought there was any Teflon on me anyplace. But we seem to have reversed the course with regard to the contras. And with regard to Bitburg, in spite of the efforts of some of you, from the very first, I felt it was the morally right thing to do. And I'm pleased that I did it. And it was a worthwhile experience over there. And I began to get my reward when I spoke to 10,000 young teenage Germans and at the end of that heard 10,000 young Germans sing our national anthem in our language. I think it was a recognition.

Those that indicated that in some way I might be suggesting that we forget the Holocaust -- no, in no way. Nor are the Germans trying to forget the Holocaust. I was amazed -- in this 40 years now of friendship that has followed all of that hatred and the evil of the Holocaust and of nazism -- to learn that the Germans, not only have they preserved the horrible camps and maintained museums with the photos all blown up of the worst and most despicable things that happened there, but they bring their schoolchildren every year and show them and say that this must never happen again.

I have never suggested in going there that this was a forgive-and-forget thing. It's up to someone else to forgive -- not us -- if there is any forgiveness, and certainly we must never forget. And so, if there is any Teflon, I didn't think that I lost any on doing that. But now, as I say, we've reversed the thing on the contra aid.

We only have a conference to go, and either way it turns out I think is going to be a plus and be more than we originally asked for. The MX battle is on. And of course, now, in the budgeting battle, I do believe that one version of a budget that has been proposed is no way to eliminate the deficit. I think that the Senate plan, with its $56 billion savings in the first year, is the answer to eliminating the deficit and eventually going to work on the national debt.

The President. You may have heard about our proposal to overhaul the tax code, make it fairer and simpler and more compassionate. And I wanted to bring the message directly to you in America's heartland. I've been traveling all over the country; the enthusiasm, I must say, for America's tax plan is overwhelming.

I call it America's tax plan because it will take the load off the back of the long-suffering American taxpayer. It'll take the low-income wage earner and the retired elderly off the tax rolls entirely, and it'll remove the tax distortions that I think are holding the American economy back from reaching its full potential.

Mac's Restaurant sums up our message in two words when they say, ``Treat yourself.'' Our proposal makes the system fairer. By closing loopholes and ensuring that all big businesses and individuals pay their fair share, we think we can lower the tax burden on everyone. And one of the best things about our tax proposal is the boost it'll give to America's mainstream.

We're cutting tax rates for small and entrepreneurial businesses. We're cutting top rate on personal income tax to 35 percent, on corporations from 46 to 33 percent, while keeping the graduated scale for small corporations. The tax rate -- or the capital gains tax rate again will be cut, this time to 17\1/2\ percent. The objective is to create a small business renaissance in America, to make this decade the age of the entrepreneur.

I read in the news that Bill Seashols said one of the strengths of Mooresville is that people still believe in the work ethic here and they emphasize the importance of family. Well, that's what America's tax plan is all about, too. It'll set our economy humming and be the best jobs creation bill, we think, that we've ever had.

And, second, it will give families and wage earners some long-overdue relief by increasing the standard deduction and practically doubling the personal exemption to $2,000. By lowering marginal rates, we'll allow the people to keep more of each extra dollar they earn. If you work overtime or get a raise or save some money and invest it, more of that extra income will end where it belongs: in your cash registers and pockets and not in Uncle Sam's wallet. By removing low-income earners from tax rolls, the climb up the ladder of success I think will be easier for everyone.

I'm excited about all the good things this plan will do for America. And if you're excited, too, and if you all think that our plan is good for America, maybe you could let those people there in the back of the room know.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. My name is Bruce Marine, and my question is: Does the proposed tax reform shift the tax burden from the individuals to the business or from middle income to higher income?

The President. No, as a matter of fact it just, I think, treats everyone squarely. The one thing that is being done in business -- now, we're lowering the rate in the corporations. But also, we're taking away some so-called loopholes and some things that some businesses, based on the nature of their business, could take advantage of the present tax system to the point that even making a substantial profit, major corporations have not paid any tax at all because of some of the provisions of the present tax code.

We're changing that; we think that everybody ought to share and pay a fair share. As I pointed out, in small corporations, some of your businesses have incorporated. Well, in those the maximum tax, of course, is 33 percent, but for the smaller businesses, it'll be graduated. It'll be a progressive tax, so that before you get to the 33-percent bracket, there will be a lower tax that will be beneficial there.

Now, most of you, however, in small business pay on a personal income tax rate. So, you'll be benefiting also in that. And incidentally, while I'm here let me -- you said thanks to me -- let me say thanks to you. Do you know that in the last 2\1/2\ years, we have created some 8 million new jobs in the United States. We have averaged for these 2\1/2\ years 300,000 people a month finding work and going to work in this country. And the bulk of those are produced by small business not by the major corporations.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Tim Currens. My question to you is: What effect do you believe the proposed tax plan will have on business growth, and are there any built-in incentives for business within the proposed tax plan?

The President. Yes, I believe the incentives that we have there are -- the whole thing is aimed toward growth and encouraging growth. Part of that is the reduction, again, of the capital gains tax, which we found -- you know, the capital gains tax is -- there's been some demagoguery around that that's a tax for rich people that can sell something for a profit and so forth. We found that with the two reductions in recent years -- the one in 1978 in the rate of that tax and then the reduction that we made in 1981 -- in both instances, the revenue from capital gains for the Government went up tremendously.

Incidentally, in answering both yours and the other question, too, I should have mentioned that I think that the very fact that we're going to be putting -- that the average individual is going to have more money in their pockets and take away from some of what they're giving to government -- it's going to make them better customers for all of you and be a stimulant to business just in that way alone.

Q. Bill Cherry, Mr. President, Plainfield Chamber of Commerce. I'd like to ask you, besides the deduction and the number of tax brackets, how else -- what other parts of your plan is going to simplify the system for most of us?

The President. In the simplifying of it? Yes, I believe we have -- in return for these grants coming down -- we have eliminated a number of deductions. And yet, for example, the deduction that has been taken and now will be eliminated -- of deducting local and State taxes from your income tax -- we discovered that two-thirds or more of the people in this country do not itemize, so they weren't getting that deduction anyway. And you only got that deduction when you got into the upper brackets. But we've also found out that -- as against the reduction in rates -- everybody still gets a tax cut even without that deduction.

We think it can be simplified at this extent -- and Don, you just interrupt me if I miss something here. We believe we're going to try something else in this that will be optional with the people and the nonitemizers -- that a person, if they decide to, can provide to their employer what things they have like interest on a home mortgage and so forth, and then the employer will simply direct to the IRS in Washington. Instead of sending you the form that tells you how much salary you got, they will simply send that plus your other figures to Washington, and you will receive direct from Washington without filling out any kind of a form -- you'll either receive a bill for tax if you owe some, or you'll receive the refund if, out of your withholding, you have a refund coming. You won't have to even fill out or sign a tax form, just send in the check or get the check.

And this we think -- now, again, as I say, that is optional. If someone mistrusts IRS and decides they want to take a look themselves, they're free to do that. The nonitemizers, of course, that will be very simple for them. We have left -- even though a recommendation was made earlier that we should eliminate the deduction for charitable contributions. We believe that in this country, which is so unique in all the world in voluntarism -- this country supports many worthwhile cultural activities by private contributions -- like symphony orchestras and so forth -- than all the rest of the world put together. And we thought we don't want to discourage in any way something that is so typically American.

It's believed there are some 95 million adult Americans today that are actually engaged in some kind of volunteer work, whether in their church or their community or the school board or whatever, in this country. And we think that's a much greater force for good than even government. So, we've left that.

But the number of reductions -- or deductions that have been eliminated, the increasing of the personal exemption -- almost doubling that -- then almost doubling the -- for each dependent, increasing the earned income tax credit, those things -- and then pretty much it's just a simple goal from there.

The President. The only people that we can see that will pay more taxes are those that presently are unfairly not paying their share, those that have been taking advantage of so-called tax shelters and those, as I said, for example, at the major corporate level where they have found that they can earn a profit and escape paying any tax whatsoever.

But I tried one because, you know, some people have been throwing around the fact that this favors the rich. You might be interested to know that only 3 percent of the earners in America will be in the 35-percent bracket -- the top bracket. They will pay 14 percent of the total amount of tax revenue that the Government receives. So, it is not benefiting them, and yet they, too, will get a reduction -- the very fact that the more they earn, they get 65 cents out of every dollar. I remember back in those ``if'' days in Hollywood when I was only getting 10 cents out of every dollar. [Laughter] And I said no to a lot of parts I'd have liked to played, but I just wasn't about to work for a dime -- [laughter] -- on the dollar.

So, I was very interested, with my figures, to take this family here, and then take this one over here that earned 10 times as much, and this one over here would be paying 30 times as much in tax as this middle class family here. So, that worked out pretty well.

Q. Thank you very much, Mr. President. We appreciate -- this community filled and bursting with voluntarism -- before you go, I want to give you two gifts. And the first -- Mooresville is the home of the Indiana State flag. And Mooresville goes back to 1824. And Paul Hadley designed this flag, and we would like to give this to you on behalf of visiting Mooresville as the home of the State flag.

Q. And, secondly, this is a gift. And I think probably I can probably begin by saying that on behalf of the 8 million new jobs -- this is made by the 35 people that are in new jobs created because of Indiana Uniform. They wanted to give you a work shirt -- [laughter] -- which is a symbol of industry. [Laughter] And on the back, we want to tell you about your tax plan.

The President. Not since last night, no. There have been few if any changes. There have been some reports, unconfirmed as yet, to the fact that something to do with how the hijackers got on the plane, and we haven't been able to confirm those yet.

We also know -- from one strange interview that was done this morning that was allowed by the hijackers -- that the answer to who is still in the plane is the crew -- the three-member crew is still on the plane, and the captain was allowed to do an interview through the pilot's window this morning.

The President. Well, I hope we answered all of your questions on the tax bill. And if you feel like writing letters to people in Congress to tell them how you feel about the bill, it'd sure be helpful -- or a wire, mailgram.

Well, I'm happy to be with you here today, for my heart is with you every day of the year. I remember addressing a group just about 4 years ago at this time, down in San Antonio, Texas, and I asked for their help to put the pieces of a broken economy back together. They were and are a very special group of people. They're heroes who live in the frontiers of American life. They're people who behold in the dawn each day a dream far away, to strive for and win. They're men and women who laugh at folly and fear and who see setbacks not as excuses to quit but as spurs to struggle and sweat even harder to carry on. They are the Jaycees. They stand for opportunity, and they're leading the economic comeback of the United States of America.

But before I go on with my remarks for today, let me speak to a concern that I know is on all your minds -- our American prisoners in Beirut. We're continuing to do everything that we can to bring all credible influence to bear, to get our people freed and returned home safe and sound. But let me say we must not yield to the terrorist demands that invite more terrorism. We cannot reward their grisly deeds. We will not cave in.

Four years ago, I came before you to say, If you think you're better off with the high taxes and runaway monster government of the past, then go ahead and oppose our new program, but if you're ready to try something new, if you're ready to tell Washington, DC, ``No more business as usual, because we're going to make America great again,'' then lend us your help and commit your lives, and you did that.

You joined us and gave your all because we believe in America, not the America of special interests, bureaucrats, or the elite, powerful, and well connected, but the America of hard-working families who sustain their communities, who abide by the law, who not only pay their own bills but every cent spent by government as well. Jefferson's vision of unalienable rights of life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness, of government's responsibility to grow, not for its own sake but to provide the ultimate in individual freedom -- that is the commitment of this administration.

My friends, thanks to you, a no-hit, no-run, no-win team is working its way back to championship form. And you know something? Winning is just the beginning, because momentum creates more momentum. We're not turning back to that failed, unhappy past. This is the moment to push forward together, to get the job done right, to change our lives for the better and change America forever.

I hope you agree that a Congress serious about cutting deficits will pass the budget savings that we've asked for and will give this President the same authority that 43 Governors already have -- authority to line-item veto budget-busting items in appropriation bills.

And if we're ever going to handcuff the big-spenders, we can't stop with a line-item veto; we must go all the way and pass a constitutional amendment mandating government may spend no more than government takes in.

Now, I've come today to speak to you on another subject; I've come to speak about our tax system. I pray that this won't send shudders through the hall. But then I wouldn't be surprised. A system with 14 different tax brackets that stifle hard work and success; a system that has singled out families for cruel and unusual punishment; a system that caters to the powerful few with loopholes galore, but lets working people take it on the chin -- that system is unfair at its core. It has become public enemy number one. It's earned a revolt, and it's time we tore it down.

We would get rid of the current 14-bracket system and replace it with a simple 3-bracket system of 15, 25, and 35 percent. Those brackets would apply to your taxable income, not to your gross income. And these lower rates would mean you could keep more of each additional dollar that you earn or save. We call it America's tax plan because it will mean fairness and tax relief for the majority of families, individuals, and businesses in every region of the country.

Families are the bedrock of our society, and they're going to receive long-overdue relief. It's a national scandal that Washington sat back for over three decades and let the value of the personal exemption collapse. Well, we're putting an end to benign neglect. Of immense importance to working and middle class families, we will nearly double -- to $2,000 -- the personal exemption for every taxpayer and dependent. The exemption will be indexed to inflation to prevent any erosion.

We would raise the standard reduction [deduction] for joint returns to $4,000. And to end unjust discrimination against homemakers, we would nearly double -- to $4,000 -- the amount every couple can put into individual retirement accounts and deduct from their taxable income. We're not promoting one kind of family over another; we just want all families treated the same.

I think you know who gets the lion's share of the credit for creating nearly 8 million new jobs in the last 2\1/2\ years. When it comes to producing jobs, American small business is king, and small businesses will remain king because America's tax plan is the biggest jobs creation bill in history.

Reducing personal tax rates will give a shot in the arm to small businesses which aren't incorporated; so will reducing the maximum corporate tax rate -- now 46 percent -- to 33 percent, with most small corporations paying lower corporate tax rates which will be progressive from 15 percent to 33 percent. And reducing the top tax rate on capital gains will fuel the high-risk ventures that can pay off with great leaps in productivity and new jobs and technologies.

We want every man and woman to have their chance to stand among the new heroes of our age -- the American entrepreneurs. Entrepreneur -- you know, that's such a nice word. That's a French word -- it means Jaycees.

As we open the windows of opportunity for all, we're going to start shutting the doors on special privileges that enable some to avoid paying their fair share. I don't think we need to keep subsidizing $100 lunches to stay competitive in world markets. I don't think the great majority of taxpayers should have to subsidize the State and local deduction for the wealthy few in a handful of high-tax States. And I don't think the loopholes like jojoba bean shelters, windmills, racehorse writeoffs, and Cayman Island trusts are the foundation for a lean and mean America in the eighties and nineties and 21st century.

These shelters aren't justified. They cheat the great majority of unsheltered taxpayers who must make up the difference with higher tax rates. And it's about time that we pulled our investment money out of unfair subsidies, out of shelters, out of foreign tax havens, and invested that money in America's future. It's time that we all pulled on the same oar so we could all go forward together, and nobody gets left behind.

I know the special interests and their lobbyists are regrouping. They're already swarming like ants into every nook and cranny in Congress. But the American people have their lobbyist, too -- you're looking at him.

Our plan will not increase the deficit. It is not a tax increase nor will I ever permit it to become a tax increase. I will veto any tax increase the Congress sends me, and I don't usually threaten vetoes. I say I'll wait until I see what comes before me on my desk. As for a tax increase -- I know what that is, I'll veto it already.

But America's tax plan will mean that every income group's tax burden will fall. Every group in every region will be better off. And I predict that after all is said and done, the Congress will pass this historic plan because it is profairness, profamily, progrowth, and most important, it is profuture.

Too many pundits haven't calculated what America's tax plan will mean for our future. In a word, lower tax rates mean new opportunity, a whole world of opportunity for people. If you earn more, if you're promoted to a better job, if you're able to save some money and invest it, then fewer of those dollars will go to line Uncle Sam's pockets and more will end up in your wallets where they belong. That's the key difference from the tax system we have now. And when you see that bright green light telling you, go ahead, take a risk, shoot for your dreams and do more with your lives, it'll be America that gains the most, America that becomes more competitive, and yes, America that lights up the sky with economic fireworks that spell ``U.S.A. Number One.'' I've often said and believe it must always remain our goal: We cannot be satisfied until the United States can outproduce, outcompete, and outsell anybody, anywhere in the world.

Well, America's tax plan will enable us to do just that. Tax rates are like prices for producing, saving, and investment. And history shows that in the case of two countries, A and B, and the tax rates are cut in B, then capital will flow from A to B. By bringing down our prices, by making them cheaper, well, than virtually anywhere in the world, we're going to create powerful incentives for people to invest, produce, and save in America. We're going to create powerful incentives for people all over the world to do their shopping and create jobs in America's stores ahead of any other store.

We're going to contribute to another surge of venture capital and entrepreneurial activity. We're going to make it possible for tomorrow's industrial giants to be born in America, born in a small business that may begin in the dream of one Jaycee.

This is the future that we can invent and create together. And we shouldn't settle for less; our dreams can be real. I'm convinced that getting this program passed will be the best thing we can ever do for ourselves. Help us get it passed by Thanksgiving, and then we'll give America the best Christmas present we've ever had.

There's something else they forget. Nearly 15 million small businesses pay their taxes by the personal rates, so raising the top tax rate is a tax-increase-in-waiting for every one of them. I think the Congress should hear what you think about this, but you're going to have to speak up because they're 600 miles away.

There's no limit to the good we can do, for there's no limit to the goodness in America's heart and spirit. You know this; you're the ones who show us every day in places like Anderson, South Carolina, where Jaycees built a Vietnam war memorial to the 28 young men who gave their last full measure of devotion in that war; in Stevens Point, Wisconsin, where they've bought a computer that is helping cerebral palsy victim Don Zivney to speak after 22 years of silence.

You remind us what I recently told a talented group of students in Atlanta, Georgia. As important as the creation of wealth is to generate jobs and a brighter future, we don't want our children to grow up believing wealth and material comforts should be their main goals in life. It isn't looking out for number one that counts most; it's loving our neighbor, and we have that on pretty good authority.

Every time someone helps a friend down and out, helps a lonely stranger hungry and cold, that's a houseraising. Every time someone gives time or money to support their local police, help the handicapped, or improve their library or school, that's a houseraising, too. And every time a group of people get together and vow, don't tell us how big the problem is, the Jaycees can solve it, that's a houseraising.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Gov. Theodore Schwinden, of Montana, to be a member of the Advisory Commission on Intergovernmental Relations for a term of 2 years. He would succeed Scott M. Matheson.

As a result of this investigation, we have found that since the 1960's, the EEC has levied a higher duty on imports of citrus from the United States than that levied on imports from certain Mediterranean countries. The level of discrimination is significant. In some cases the United States pays a duty five times greater than that paid by other suppliers. This discriminatory tariff treatment has impaired the ability of U.S. citrus exporters to market their fruits in the EEC and is, in the view of the United States, inconsistent with the EEC's obligations under the GATT.

The United States also tried to resolve this issue in the context of tariff concessions granted during the Tokyo Round of Multilateral Trade Negotiations. With the exception of a few minor tariff reductions resulting from the Tokyo Round, these efforts were without success. Following the conclusion of the Tokyo Round, the United States initiated consultations under the provisions of the GATT, but the EEC again rebuffed all efforts to reach a compromise solution.

With any possibility of a negotiated settlement thus ruled out, the United States invoked the dispute settlement procedures of the GATT as the only alternative means of seeking a redress of our complaint. In 1983, a panel was established to review the U.S. complaint. Throughout this procedure, the United States has continued to demonstrate its willingness to seek a mutually acceptable solution to this problem. For example, the United States agreed to the unusual step of allowing the Director-General of GATT to attempt to arbitrate the dispute before pressing its request for formation of a dispute settlement panel. Unfortunately, the attempt failed. The EEC rejected all efforts at compromise.

Although the panel did not rule on this issue, the United States continues to believe that the EEC citrus preferences are inconsistent with the most-favored-nation principle of the GATT, and thus nullify or impair U.S. benefits with respect to exports of the other citrus items as well as lemons and oranges. Nevertheless, the United States has been willing to accept the panel's more limited recommendation for the following reasons. The sole interest of the United States in bringing this issue to the GATT has been to obtain the elimination or reduction of a barrier to U.S. citrus exports. While the panel's recommendation does not call for the elimination of the barriers, we believe its implementation by the EEC would significantly increase access for key U.S. citrus exports to that market. Moreover, the panel's recommendation does not require the EEC to take action inconsistent with its preferential trading arrangements; indeed it would result in lower tariffs for the preference receiving countries as well.

The EEC, however, has been unwilling to accept either the panel's findings or recommendation and has effectively prevented a resolution of this issue in the GATT. Thus, U.S. attempts to resolve this problem at the bilateral or multilateral level have not succeeded.

In light of the results of the USTR's investigation, I believe we must recognize that the level of trade concessions between the United States and EEC is no longer in balance. We estimate that the value of annual U.S. exports of oranges and lemons would increase by more than $48 million if the EEC had implemented the panel's recommendation.

The EEC's unwillingness to implement the panel's finding or to otherwise provide adequate compensation to the United States requires us to re-balance the level of concessions in U.S.-EEC trade. Increasing the duty on pasta imports from the EEC is a reasonable and appropriate means by which to achieve this.

In 1964 President Johnson established awards to honor academic excellence among our high school students, and in 1979 the program was expanded to include achievements in the arts. This year, as always, the Commission on Presidential Scholars has worked hard to make the final choices.

Chairman Beverly White, I want to thank you and all of the Commission members for your fine efforts. Twenty students have been selected for superior achievements in the arts. In the academic category, fifteen scholars have been selected at large, while one young man and one young woman have been chosen from each of the 50 States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, and American families living abroad. It all adds up to 141 of our country's finest students -- young Americans who can inspire us all.

But we still have more to do, much more. Secretary Bennett has done a great deal to direct our efforts by focusing on what he calls the three C's: content, character, and choice. Just as we're guided by those faithful old three R's -- reading, 'riting, and 'rithmetic -- the three C's can help us understand the fundamental aspects of good education.

The first C is content, and in recent years many of our schools have placed too little emphasis on the actual knowledge that our students acquire. Well, today we must go forward with the basics, making certain that all American students learn to read, write, and speak clearly, develop an ability to work with numbers, acquaint themselves with the fundamentals of American history, and come to understand the core values of Western civilization. Content, in other words, means seeing to it that every American student masters a specific body of knowledge.

Each of you has done just that. Kenneth Berryman, for example, will spend this summer working the jet propulsion laboratory in Pasadena studying orbital mechanics. Now, I'm not a scientist myself, but I believe that means that Kenneth knows a thing or two about mathematics. Or consider ballerina Yolanda Jordan. Yolanda has mastered the arduous and demanding technique of classical ballet.

As for the second C, in achieving these awards, each of you has demonstrated one crucial element of character -- the ability to work hard and to stick with it. Greg Johnson of Kentucky grew up in a housing project, the son of a single mother who works at a second job cleaning a bank at night to support her family. He started school in a readiness class for children not quite prepared for first grade. This spring Greg graduated as the first black valedictorian in the history of his high school.

Others among you have demonstrated that you understand the importance of giving of yourselves to others. Hannah Joyner, of South Carolina, for instance, will spend this summer working with children who have learning disabilities. Then there's Shannon Holliday, of Alabama, who's long been active in her community's drug abuse program. Together, you show that education is not a matter of knowledge alone but of things like honesty, kindness, and loyalty.

And the final C is choice. A large part of the problem today is that too often schools cannot be held accountable. Accountability is improved when parents are able to choose between a variety of schools, and again this principle is evident here today. Many of the artists among you attended schools designed for talented young performers. One of you, Monty Greek, of Nebraska, spent his early years in the kind of school that, until today, I thought only people my age remembered -- a one room schoolhouse.

In case after case, your group demonstrates that schools that are in some way unique, that offer parents a different choice, can help to foster excellence. And there we have it -- the three C's of content, character, and choice as illustrated by 141 remarkable young Americans.

Many of your teachers are also present, and they deserve special gratitude. Their efforts have given you the greatest gift that one person can give to another -- a well-trained and perceptive mind. I know you'll -- well, you already have joined me in thanks to your teachers.

But the main honors go to you. You've given your studies your best efforts for so many years, and you've set a wonderful example for all American students to follow. So, on behalf of a grateful nation, I commend you.

You know, sometimes there are pleasant tasks in this job of mine, like this one this morning. But sometimes, also, there are responsibilities that get very irksome, like the one that I now face in which, without getting a chance to meet each of you individually, I have to turn you over to Secretary Bennett, and I have to hasten back to the Oval Office.

And I have that on good authority that that's what I need to do because early in my administration, a metropolitan newspaper asked children -- young people -- to write in and tell them what advice they would give to the newly elected President -- me. And I have never forgotten one of them -- from an 11-year-old girl. She told me a number of things that I should do, and then she wrote, ``Now, get back to the Oval Office and get to work.'' [Laughter] So, I'll do that.

Last night senseless terrorism again took its toll on Americans, this time in El Salvador. Of the 15 killed and 13 wounded, 2 were U.S. businessmen and 4 were unarmed, off-duty marines not in uniform. They also killed 9 and injured 13 other innocent Salvadoran and Guatemalan men and women. This atrocity, like the bombing earlier yesterday in Frankfurt, Germany, is further evidence that the war which terrorists are waging is not only directed against the United States, it is a war against all of civilized society. This is a war in which innocent civilians are targets. This is a war in which innocent civilians are intentional victims, and our servicemen have become specific targets. This cannot continue.

We must act against those who have so little regard for human life and the values we cherish. And we must do so in concert with other nations who share our democratic institutions and basic disdain for violence and the use of force. We of the Western World must act together, as we once did over a century ago to wipe piracy from the seas and as we did 45 years ago against the threat of tyranny.

Secretary of State and Secretary of Defense, with the help of our intelligence services, to immediately provide whatever assistance is necessary to President Duarte's government in order to find and punish the terrorists who perpetrated this act.

To this end, I have today directed that we expedite the delivery of security assistance items on order by the Salvadoran Government and am prepared to use my emergency authorities to furnish the Salvadoran Armed Forces with additional military assets which will help them prosecute their campaign against the Communist guerrillas. Their hope that terrorism will weaken our resolve or support for the revitalization of democracy in El Salvador is futile. If other U.S. military assets can be effective in this regard, then I shall provide them.

I expect our Congress to support these measures and will be consulting with the appropriate legislative committees of the Congress on what additional steps can be taken in El Salvador and elsewhere to end the external support the Salvadoran terrorists receive from Nicaragua and the Communist bloc.

I have also today appointed Vice President Bush to take the lead within the U.S. Government and with our allies to determine what actions, military and otherwise, we and our similarly threatened friends can take to end this increasingly violent and indiscriminate but purposeful affront to humanity. As a first priority, I have asked the Vice President to focus on this matter during his visit to European capitals next week. Upon his return, he is to convene a governmentwide task force to develop recommendations for my decision on how all available U.S. resources can best be brought to bear in dealing with this problem.

Finally, I want you, the American people, to know that what we do in these circumstances must not be done in pointless anger. These events call for reasoned responses to lawless actions by those who do not abide by the norms of civilized society. As your President, I believe that our actions must be appropriate and proportionate to the criminal acts which have been taken against our citizens. Those who are responsible for such lawlessness and those who support it must know that the consequences of their actions will never be capitulation to terrorist demands.

We are both a nation of peace and a people of justice. By our very nature, we are slow to anger and magnanimous in helping those in less fortunate circumstances. No nation on Earth has been more generous to others in need, but we also have our limits -- and our limits have been reached.

The President. This great house receives many great visitors, but none more special or more revered than our beloved guest today. A month ago, we awarded the Medal of Freedom to 13 heroes who have done their country proud. Only one of the recipients could not attend because she had work to do -- not special work, not unusual work for her, but everyday work which is both special and urgent in its own right. Mother Teresa was busy, as usual, saving the world. And I mean that quite literally. And so we rather appreciated her priorities, and we're very happy, indeed, that she could come to America this week.

Now, a moment ago, I said we'd awarded the Medal of Freedom to heroes who've done our country proud. And I believe Mother Teresa might point out here that she is most certainly not an American but a daughter of Yugoslavia, and she has not spent her adult life in this country but in India. However, it simply occurred to us when we wanted to honor her that the goodness in some hearts transcends all borders and all narrow nationalistic considerations.

Some people, some very few people are, in the truest sense, citizens of the world; Mother Teresa is. And we love her so much we asked her to accept our tribute, and she graciously accepted. And I will now read the citation.

Most of us talk about kindness and compassion, but Mother Teresa, the saint of the gutters, lives it. As a teenager, she went to India to teach young girls. In time, Mother Teresa began to work among the poor and the dying of Calcutta. Her order of the Missionaries of Charity has spread throughout the world, serving the poorest of the poor.

And I want to thank you for something, Mother Teresa. Your great work and your life have inspired so many Americans to become personally involved, themselves, in helping the poor. So many men and women in every area of life, in government and the private sector, have been led by the light of your love, and they have given greatly of themselves. And we thank you for your radiant example.

Mother Teresa. I am most unworthy of this generous gift of our President, Mr. Reagan, and his wife and you people of United States. But I accept it for the greater glory of God and in the name of the millions of poor people that this gift, in spirit and in love, will penetrate the hearts of the people. For in giving it to me, you are giving it to them, to my hands, with your great love and concern.

Mother, do something.'' And the only person that came in my mind while she was talking, it was the President. And immediately I wrote to him, and I said, ``I don't know, but this is what happened to me.'' And next day it was that immediately he arranged to bring food to our people.

I also want to thank the families here in United States for their continual and delicate love that they have given, and they have shown, by leaving their children to become sisters and to serve the poor throughout the world. We are now over the world and trying to bring the tenderness and the love of Jesus.

And you, you cannot go where we go. You cannot do what we do. But together, we are doing something beautiful for God. And my gratitude to you, President, and your family and to your people. It's my prayer for you that you may grow in holiness to this tender love for the poorest of the poor. But this love begins at home, in your own family, and it begins by praying together.

So, my sisters, brothers, and fathers, you are going -- and all our poor people, thousands and thousands and thouands of people that we deal with, I bring their gratitude to you. And keep the joy of loving. Love them, and begin in your own family first. And that love will penetrate right through the furthest place where no one has ever been -- there is that tenderness and love of Christ.

What a wonderful opportunity for each one of us to be 24 hours with Jesus. And in doing what we are doing, as he said, if you receive a little child in my name, you receive me. If you give a glass of water in my name, you give it to me. What a wonderful and beautiful tenderness and love of Christ for each one of us.

Texas-sized heart, and I'd like to welcome especially those many Lions who are here from other countries. All I can tell you is that, as Lions, you are associated with some of the best darn Americans this country has to offer.

There are few citizens who so well reflect the heart and soul of our country as do the Lions. Our forefathers and mothers were fiercely independent and proud of their freedom. Yet the spirit of neighbor helping neighbor is an essential part of the legacy they left us.

The idea of a humanitarian service organization that Melvin Jones set in motion in 1917 was totally consistent with the American character. His dream quickly spread throughout this country, was carried to distant lands, and you are now, as Bert told you, the largest service club organization on the face of the Earth. Who says that one individual can't make a difference?

Melvin Jones knew that good deeds benefit the giver and the receiver, that one who gives of himself is spiritually enriched. Today we also understand that government cannot assume the responsibility for all good works without destroying the spirit of benevolence and sense of community so important to the well-being of any free society.

Government, even with the best of intentions, sometimes does more harm than good. But, you know, sometimes these government programs are a bit like the story of the country preacher who called on a town about a hundred miles away. He'd been invited there to speak; went there for this revival meeting. And on the way to church, he noticed on the main street of that town, sitting on the porch of a little country store, was a man from his own hometown, an individual who happened to be known for his excessive drinking.

Excessive government spending, taxing, and regulating -- no matter how well intended -- is a formula for disaster. And that's exactly where this country was headed and why we changed course 4\1/2\ years ago. The American people decided once again to give freedom a chance. It was time to put this country back on the path to lower taxes, individual responsibility, and economic growth. I'm proud of what we accomplished during our first term. We started rebuilding our defensive strength, we beat down inflation, and we got our country moving again.

The foundation was laid during the first term. Now it's time to finish the job. And the first order of business is a complete overhaul of America's antiquated, unfair, and overly complicated tax system. The current tax code is the Federal Government's version of Rubik's Cube. [Laughter] It's a game that most of us never figure out and few of us win.

I like to think of our proposal as a fair share tax, because it will mean greater fairness and new opportunity for every income group in every region of America. It will, when enacted, cut out complications and bring down the rates. It'll reduce the number of rates from 14 to 3 -- 15, 25, and 35 percent. The mind-boggling system of itemized deductions, special credits, and exclusions will go through a major simplification and reform. The result will be a simpler and fairer system that will enable out economy to grow more competitive and our people to prosper.

Now, today the tax code is so voluminous and complex even the Internal Revenue Service has trouble understanding it. Do you remember not too long ago they had to warn taxpayers not to depend too much on their own employees because they didn't understand it either? Well, fairly enforcing such a mishmash of ever-changing rules and regulations is a Herculean effort. And if you get the feeling that some people aren't paying their fair share, while others are getting soaked, you're right. And that's got to stop.

Let me just add in here -- when the income tax amendment was passed back in 1913, it consisted of 16 words. Today I've been told that over at the Treasury Department, the books of regulations and rules and explanations of the income tax make a line of books 57 feet long. The simpler system we're proposing will be easier to enforce. It also will be more difficult for special interests without the cover of an incomprehensible tax code to have tailormade tax breaks written into the system. It's about time a tax code is written for the general interest instead of the special interests.

Some people, generally those who've legally manipulated the current system, will pay more. But in the end, everyone will benefit because our tax program is designed to keep our economy vigorous and growing -- the key to a better tomorrow.

The old system has been a drag on the most productive members of our society. Our plan is future oriented, a blueprint for progress and better times. Today the Government taxes away one of every two dollars of those in the top bracket. Well, our plan will take only about one in three dollars. Today the Government takes away one of every three dollars of millions of middle-income families. Our plan will make that only one in four dollars. Today those who want to take more money home spend their time trying to find tax dodges and shelters. Our system will encourage them to be more efficient, to increase their investments, to work harder, which benefits everyone.

And just as for individuals, by bringing down the rates and reducing the number of deductions and complications, we will ensure that American business remains a shining light of enterprise and productivity that can and will lead the world to better times.

By lowering the tax rates, cutting regulation, getting control of spending, we broke out of the quagmire of inflation and recession. The growth we've enjoyed has astounded our friends abroad and confounded our adversaries. I'll never forget sitting down with our allies at the last three international economic summits and being asked by my colleagues from those other countries how our economy was producing so many new jobs. In the last 30 months nearly 8 million new jobs were created in America. In virtually all of Europe they told me not one new job has been created in the last 10 years.

Americans began spending and investing money in other countries. Our own prosperity has been and continues to be a mighty engine for economic progress, pulling along even stagnant, over-regulated, and over-taxed economies.

I hope those of you who are here from other countries will carry this message back to your people: Americans want you to succeed and to prosper. We have no desire to live as an island of plenty. We don't want jobs and higher standards of living just for our people. We don't want prosperity just at home. We'll be satisfied with nothing less than a worldwide recovery.

Now, we fully recognize that all free people, with their diverse cultures and customs, must choose their own course, their own way. Nevertheless, we hope that our friends will learn from our experience.

Free men, free minds, and free markets can and will make this a better world. It's only when people are free to challenge what exists and offer something new that mankind is able to step forward; only when people are free to dream and discuss untried ideas that a society remains vibrant; only when people are free in the marketplace to meet the needs of others as best they can that innovation and opportunity can become the order of the day.

Such freedom serves as a ladder of social and economic advancement for all people, step by step improving the lot of every individual from top to bottom. Ingenuity, imagination, and creativity -- these are the forces unleashed by human freedom; these are the forces that built America. And if given a chance, they can reshape the face of this planet.

Today there's a new recognition of the principles advocated by Melvin Jones. Individual commitment is alive and well. The latest statistics on private sector initiatives show that 92 million people in the United States volunteer a portion of their time -- this is an increase of 8 million between 1981 and 1983. Most volunteers donate 1 to 3 hours a week; the next largest percentage donates more than 5 hours weekly.

And in 1984 there was a record rise in giving to charitable causes, up 11.1 percent over 1983. The amount given voluntarily by Americans is greater than the entire national budgets of two-thirds of the nations of the world, more than $74 billion last year. Now, that is just the assets donated.

These are the kind of statistics that underscore the true strength of our country. And much of this philanthropy, in keeping with our traditions, is aimed at helping the less fortunate in other countries. When famine raised its ugly head in Ethiopia, Americans rushed to aid those in need.

Seriously though, the outpouring of love and support by the free people of the world to the hungry of the world is something we can all be proud of. And as usual, Lions are doing their share as we see in your efforts to get food and supplies into remote areas in Ethiopia. I also am aware of your campaign against blindness in the industrialized and developing countries. And you deserve everyone's deepest admiration for these projects and for your many other humanitarian endeavors.

And I'd like to take this opportunity to thank you for all you're doing to fight drug abuse. Nancy told me all about your convention last year. And she was gratified to be honored by you, but when she got home, she said she felt like she should have been giving you the award and not the other way around.

Your efforts and those of other concerned Americans outside the structure of government are absolutely vital to the success of this all-important campaign. With the help of the Quest National Center and [entertainer] Bill Cosby, you're teaching kids to say no to drugs. We're trying to deter young people from getting involved and to help those using drugs to stop. And we'll be satisfied with nothing less than a drug-free America. Together we're going to cut the legs out from under the drug dealers, by eliminating the demand for their goods. It's the Lions versus the drug dealers, and I'm betting on the Lions.

The other half of the law -- or the war, I should say, is a strong law enforcement and drug interdiction campaign to stop the flow of illegal drugs before it reaches the customers. Now, this is a complicated and frustrating job, but it lets every youngster in this country know we're serious.

I'm pleased to report that the message is getting through. Young people are turning away from drugs. Today fewer young people are smoking marijuana, cocaine use is leveling off. A new sense of responsibility is emerging in the entertainment industry. The trends are in the right direction, and this is cause for rejoicing. But please, don't let up.

Illegal drugs, of course, are only one part of a crime epidemic that spread across our country in the sixties and seventies. Well-intentioned liberals cut the muscle out of our criminal justice system and then acted surprised when the criminal element took the offensive. Law enforcers have been operating under bizarre rules that serve as roadblocks to the conviction of the guilty, but do little to protect the innocent.

Well, last year we passed a Comprehensive Crime Control Act, a first step toward reestablishing a balance to the criminal justice system. Let me assure you Attorney General Meese is going to keep pushing for further reforms until every American neighborhood is safe. I hope we can count on your support, because we're taking the streets back for the good and decent people of this country.

In the last few days, it has become even more clear that the criminal threat to civilization is no mere domestic problem. Wednesday night in El Salvador four young marines in civilian clothes, along with civilians from America and several other countries, were gunned down in a sidewalk cafe. This event was preceded by the wanton bombing of an air terminal in Frankfurt, Germany; the hijacking of one of our airliners; and the seizure of a Jordanian aircraft. The killers in El Salvador are no different than those other perpetrators of inhumane acts.

Well, like our forefathers, we have the courage to protect our rights, and we're proud of our freedom. We're working hard to improve our own lot, to contribute to the less fortunate, and to improve our communities and neighborhoods.

The truth is, it is only under freedom that a true fellowship of the spirit can exist. Love is not something that can be mandated by law or enforced by bureaucracy. It is when people voluntarily help one another, giving of themselves freely, that they receive the blessings of the soul which God has promised. This is an important part of freedom, the shining light which is a beacon to all who live in the darkness in tyranny -- the fundamental truth that free people do indeed love and care for one another.

Mr. Tripp is currently an attorney in the private practice of law in Columbus, OH. He is also owner-founder, Black Sheep Enterprises, and a political consultant and campaign manager for candidates for public office in Ohio, Minnesota, Illinois, and Pennsylvania.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 21st day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

Later today, Nancy and I will be going to Andrews Air Force Base to be with the families and friends of four American marines, four young men whose bodies are being returned after they were murdered by Communist guerrillas in El Salvador last Wednesday night. We will carry with us all of the grief and sorrow and rising anger of a nation whose patience has been stretched to its limit.

We've made considerable progress this year in achieving the spending reductions needed to bring down the budget deficit and keep our economy growing and producing new jobs. The Senate has passed a plan for $56 billion of budget savings, which would also allow us to keep most of our defense-rebuilding program on track. We all owe a debt of gratitude to the Senate for their courage.

Unfortunately, we cannot say the same about the plan passed by the House. It is not a true budget savings plan. Many of its so-called savings are simply phantom cuts. Further, the House makes no meaningful effort to shrink this gargantuan Federal spending machine that gobbles up your taxes and divvies them out to a multitude of special interests.

House budgeteers are not enough and certainly not permanent. The freezes and other one-time measures the House proposes are not solutions that would permit us to get a handle on Federal overspending, they would only postpone the inevitable. And what's even worse in these perilous times, the House budget would send a signal of weakness by cutting purchasing power for vital defense needs.

All of us know that there's been waste in defense spending. But after years of others closing their eyes to this problem, it's our administration that has begun uncovering and rooting out that waste and going after the defense contractors who shamelessly cheat America. And this is why we've taken an additional step.

This week I appointed a special bipartisan blue ribbon commission to review defense management and procurement. So, yes, we can and must eliminate waste. But it is sheer folly to blindly weaken ourselves when our adversaries are conspiring and working so hard to bleed and cripple America.

For the past 2 weeks, the House and Senate have been meeting in a conference committee trying to come up with a final budget for the next fiscal year. I'm sorry to report that they haven't made much progress. So far, the House has turned away from realism on defense and refused to accept the many program reforms and permanent savings in domestic spending that are proposed in the Senate version.

And, as is predictable, whenever sufficient will is lacking to make the tough decisions on spending, calls are raised for tax increases. Well, if I must, I'll repeat it until I'm blue in the face: I will veto any tax increase the Congress sends me. And I'm pleased to say I have been promised the votes to sustain that veto.

All of us have a great deal at stake in the outcome of these Senate-House negotiations for the sake of both our national security and our economic well-being. If the conference committee reports a budget that achieves substantial and permanent changes, it will pave the way for continuing the low inflation and falling interest rates that will keep our economy growing and keep Americans working.

If, on the other hand, the process breaks down and the Congress can't do what's right on defense or on controlling domestic spending, then the consequences will be very bad. America will be seen as too weak to respond to threats, and all the progress we've made in our economy will be placed at risk.

I'm asking for your support to make Congress understand this is a moment in our history when all of us should pull together and put our national interest above partisan politics. The challenges we face are big, but not too big if we Republicans and Democrats unite for a stronger and safer America. We still have time. So, let's get started.

Ladies and gentlemen, we are here today to receive, in the name of our country, the remains of four United States marines killed in the line of duty in a country far away. They were victims of vicious evil. And we grieve for their loss and for the other innocent victims of that vicious attack.

When a nation is a family, and ours is, no death is impersonal, no death is discreet, no death is in and of itself. Each death is a tear in the fabric, a break in the whole. But when a serviceman dies, we feel a special anguish. A serviceman's life is a hard life, a life of sacrifice and risk. And we're never good enough to them. We're never as good as we should be, because that's not possible. No one can treat such men and women as they deserve, because what they give us is beyond our powers to repay.

And so, when they're taken from us, when they're taken because they wore our uniform with love and pride, when they're killed because they put themselves in harm's way for our sake, then we feel an anguish that cuts at the heart and cannot forget.

Thomas Handwork was 24 and a 5-year veteran of the corps. It wasn't a job to him; it was a calling. He'd wanted to be a marine from the first days he could walk and talk. He dreamt about the corps. It was all he wanted.

They were all volunteers. They were four young men who chose to follow an honored and ancestral path. And so they swung the bag over their shoulders, kissed their parents goodby, and went off to serve their country. They chose to follow the life of service and selflessness and courage. They did it for love and honor -- Semper Fi.

They say the men who murdered these sons of America escaped and disappeared into the city streets. But I pledge to you today, they will not evade justice on Earth any more than they can escape the judgment of God. We and the Salvadoran leaders will move any mountain and ford any river to find the jackals and bring them and their colleagues in terror to justice.

And now, today, we grieve for four young men taken from us too soon. And we receive them in death as they were on the last night of their lives, together and following a radiant light -- following it toward heaven, toward home. And if we reach -- or when we reach heaven's scenes, we truly will find it guarded by United States marines.

The President. Well, Berri seems to be the only one, then, that is making a linkage between that and our hostages. That is not a linkage; that is a matter of Israeli law. It is a problem of their own, and under their law those 31 people are being released. It has nothing to do with our hostages.

Act, as amended, with respect to the preparation and submission of reports to the Congress concerning offsets shall be performed by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget (OMB). The Director may further delegate to the heads of Executive departments and agencies responsibility for preparing and submitting for his review particular sections of such reports. The heads of Executive departments and agencies shall, to the extent provided by law, provide the Director with such information as may be necessary for the effective performance of these functions.

I was very pleased a few months ago when Caroline and John came to see me and to ask for our support in helping the library. I thought afterwards what fine young people they are and what a fine testament they are to their mother and father.

They're right, of course. History has its claims, and there's nothing so invigorating as the truth. In this case, a good deal of truth resides in a strikingly sculpted library that contains the accumulated documents, recollections, diaries, and oral histories of the New Frontier. But I must confess that ever since Caroline and John came by, I've found myself thinking not so much about the John F.

It always seemed to me that he was a man of the most interesting contradictions, very American contradictions. We know from his many friends and colleagues, we know in part from the testimony available at the library, that he was self-deprecating yet proud, ironic yet easily moved, highly literary yet utterly at home with the common speech of the ordinary man. He was a writer who could expound with ease on the moral forces that shaped John Calhoun's political philosophy. On the other hand, he possessed a most delicate and refined appreciation for Boston's political wards and the characters who inhabited it. He could cuss a blue streak -- but then, he'd been a sailor.

And he could sum up a current statesman with an earthy epithet that would leave his audience weak with laughter. One sensed that he loved mankind as it was, in spite of itself, and that he had little patience with those who would perfect what was not really meant to be perfect.

As a leader, as a President, he seemed to have a good, hard, unillusioned understanding of man and his political choices. He had written a book as a very young man about why the world slept as Hitler marched on. And he understood the tension between good and evil in the history of man; understood, indeed, that much of the history of man can be seen in the constant working out of that tension. He knew that the United States had adversaries, real adversaries, and they weren't about to be put off by soft reason and good intentions. He tried always to be strong with them and shrewd. He wanted our defense system to be unsurpassed. He cared that his country could be safe.

He was a patriot who summoned patriotism from the heart of a sated country. It is a matter of pride to me that so many men and women who were inspired by his bracing vision and moved by his call to ``ask not,'' serve now in the White House doing the business of government. Which is not to say I supported John Kennedy when he ran for President; I didn't. I was for the other fellow. But you know, it's true, when the battle's over and the ground is cooled, well, it's then that you see the opposing general's valor.

Everything we saw him do seemed to betray a huge enjoyment of life. He seemed to grasp from the beginning that life is one fast-moving train, and you have to jump aboard and hold on to your hat and relish the sweep of the wind as it rushes by. You have to enjoy the journey; it's unthankful not to.

I think that's how his country remembers him, in his joy -- and it was a joy he knew how to communicate. He knew that life is rich with possibilities, and he believed in opportunity, growth, and action.

And when he died, when that comet disappeared over the continent, a whole nation grieved and would not forget. A tailor in New York put up a sign on the door: ``Closed because of a death in the family.'' The sadness was not confined to us. ``They cried the rain down that night,'' said a journalist in Europe. They put his picture up in huts in Brazil and tents in the Congo, in offices in Dublin and Warsaw. That was some of what he did for his country, for when they honored him they were honoring someone essentially, quintessentially, completely American. When they honored John Kennedy, they honored the Nation whose virtues, genius, and contradictions he so fully reflected.

Many men are great, but few capture the imagination and the spirit of the times. The ones who do are unforgettable. Four administrations have passed since John Kennedy's death; five Presidents have occupied the Oval Office, and I feel sure that each of them thought of John Kennedy now and then and his thousand days in the White House.

I've even been told that late at night when the clouds are still and the Moon is high, you can just about hear the sound of certain memories brushing by. You can almost hear, if you listen close, the whir of a wheelchair rolling by and the sound of a voice calling out, ``And another thing, Eleanor!'' Turn down a hall and you hear the brisk strut of a fellow saying, ``Bully! Absolutely ripping!'' Walk softly, now, and you're drawn to the soft notes of a piano and a brilliant gathering in the East Room where a crowd surrounds a bright young President who is full of hope and laughter.

I don't know if this is true, but it's a story I've been told. And it's not a bad one because it reminds us that history is a living thing that never dies. A life given in service to one's country is a living thing that never dies -- a life given in service, yes.

Convention to work on the Reagan-Bush reelection campaign. At Reagan-Bush he acted as director of advance for Presidential appearances. He rejoined the White House staff following the November election and was detailed to the 50th American Presidential Inauguration, where he was appointed group director for Presidential events. In this position, he was responsible for inaugural activities involving the President and Mrs. Reagan, as well as the youth-related events.

He has been working for Ronald Reagan since May 1978, serving as an advanceman and organization consultant until the 1980 election. Prior to that time he had served in several national and statewide campaigns as a political consultant.

The amendment, if approved by two-thirds of the members of the Agency, will increase from nine to ten the members of the Agency designated for a seat on the Board of Governors by virtue of their status as most advanced in the technology of atomic energy without regard to geographical distribution. This expansion will accommodate the entry of the People's Republic of China into the organization, which occurred on January 1, 1984. Under the amendment, the People's Republic of China will be able to occupy a seat on the Board of Governors without displacing any of the other designated members (currently these are Australia, Belgium, Brazil, Canada, Egypt, France, the Federal Republic of Germany, India, Japan, the USSR, the United Kingdom, and the United States).

I recommend that the Senate give early and favorable consideration to this matter, and give advice and consent to acceptance by the United States of the amendment to Article VI, paragraph A.1 of the Statute, as amended.

Washington in the War of 1812, Dolly Madison had time only to save a few precious personal possessions and one portrait of George Washington. Right there. A few hours after she escaped by wagon, the British looted and burned the White House, destroying everything but that one portrait of the father of our country that Dolly Madison saved from the flames.

Every new year for the schoolteacher is like a new age of enlightenment in which young minds become awakened to the truths that we hold to be self-evident. You teach your students math and science and literature and history -- a variety of subjects. You give them many facts and much knowledge. But your task is greater than that because with the facts, you must impart the values that give them meaning and context -- our most sacred values of human dignity and the worth of the individual. You teach an understanding of liberty with respect for the law and help show the way of freedom under God while guiding our youth into the constructive paths of self-fulfillment.

All Americans who strive to excel, not because they are in competition with anyone else, but because they're in competition with their own imagination to be the very best possible in whatever job they have.

I have some warm memories of another teacher, too, in Dixon, Illinois -- this time at high school level -- B.J. Frazier. I remember one day, he not only taught English, but -- and I don't know whether principals still do this today or not -- but he taught English, but was also principal. And I was in his office -- [laughter] -- it wasn't exactly a social call -- [laughter] -- and I remember the conversation that he said to me that it didn't matter to him what I thought of him at that time, that what he was concerned about was what would I think of him 15 years from now.

And I must say, before he departed this Earth and 15 or more years had passed, I'm grateful that I had the opportunity to tell him what I thought of him, which was what he had meant to me, and as the years went by, I had come to realize how much he had meant.

When one of you blasts off from Cape Kennedy next January, you will be representing that hope and opportunity and possibility -- you'll be the emissary to the next generation of American heroes. And your message will be that our progress, impressive as it is, is only just a beginning; that our achievements, as great as they are, are only a launching pad into the future. Flying up above the atmosphere, you'll be able to truly say that our horizons are not our limits, only new frontiers to be explored.

But seriously, I wish you all the best of luck, and I hope your mission is as successful as the one that we've just completed. I'm glad it's not me who'll have to make the final selection of the first teacher astronaut because each one of you is eminently qualified. For the lucky one who does go up in the shuttle, I have only one assignment: Take notes. There will be a quiz after you land.

So, thank you, and God bless you all, and may I ask though, in their being here, is there a possibility that on the schedule is a view of that movie that we saw the other night? Well, then, to those of you who don't make it -- have you seen it yet?

Communications Commission, to be a member of the Council of the Administrative Conference of the United States for a term of 3 years. This is a reappointment. Upon his reappointment, the President also intends to redesignate him as Vice Chairman.

The sights and sounds of the world around us are among the gifts we cherish most. But for approximately 40,000 Americans who are both deaf and blind, seeing and hearing exist only as dreams. Through an accident of birth or illness, these men and women may never gaze at the splendor of a spring garden or listen to the voices of their loved ones. Cut off from what most of us take for granted, people who can neither see nor hear live in a kind of solitary confinement.

This month marks the 102nd anniversary of the birth of an American who found herself in such a prison -- and broke out of it. At the age of 19 months, Helen Keller lost her sight, hearing, and speech, and her formative years were spent in utter isolation. But she had two powerful forces on her side: an absolute determination to overcome her handicaps, and the devotion of one person, Annie Sullivan, who recognized the child's innate abilities and helped her construct a bridge to the world at large.

Today, the scientific and medical communities are showing great determination to build more bridges for deaf-and-blind individuals. Research on disorders that cause deaf-blindness is being conducted and supported on several fronts: by the Federal government through the National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke, and the National Eye Institute; by universities and other institutions of higher learning; and by voluntary health agencies and numerous groups in the private sector.

America can ill afford to lose the contributions of her deaf-and-blind citizens. Helen Keller became renowned for her writings and her civic spirit at a time when the study of deaf-blindness was in its infancy. Scientific progress will enable the deaf-and-blind to utilize their talents and ideas, and expand their educational and employment opportunities, thereby increasing their contributions to our society.

But now, I know that you've already been briefed on a number of specific aspects of our proposal for all Americans to pay their fair share of taxes and no more. Permit me then to give you an overview, if I can, of why I believe this plan is so important and how it'll affect you in those very difficult jobs that you have to perform in your States and localities.

Today it runs 4 volumes, and the number of pages adds up to more than 4,000. The complexity alone is staggering, but worse is the unfairness, the simple injustice that such complexity engenders. You just know that with a tax code that complicated, there are going to be accountants and lawyers who know how to make it work to their advantage and to the advantage of their clients -- and that ordinary Americans who can't afford such high-paid professional help will end up paying for it with higher taxes. When it comes to taxes, one man's loophole is another man's noose.

Many Americans, individuals and families, paid a higher tax rate last year than the gigantic corporations that they work for. And well-to-do individuals are able to take so-called educational ocean luxury cruises or buy sky boxes at sporting events and write it all off as business expense.

Now, I'm certainly not against big business or businessmen. These are the people who provide many of our jobs and create much of America's wealth. What I am against is the unfair tax system that allows them to take perfectly legal deductions, deductions that by virtually any standards of fairness are ludicrous.

The key idea in our proposal is that by ironing out the complexities and closing unfair loopholes, by making everyone pay their fair share, we can make the system more equitable and dramatically lower marginal tax rates without a loss in revenue. Lower marginal rates for both individuals and corporations will mean a greater reward for work, saving, and risk-taking, more efficient use of scarce capital, and a stronger and healthy economy. In other words, our fair share plan is also a progrowth tax plan.

Another key component of our proposal is to provide America's families with a long overdue break by practically doubling the personal exemption. Indeed, our plan would drop virtually every poor family in America off the tax rolls entirely. And a working family with two or three children would pay less than a 10 percent income tax on its earnings well into the $25,000 to $30,000 range.

Now, I know that many are concerned about our proposed elimination of the State and local tax deduction. Well, the first point to make here is an argument for fairness -- and I have a hunch that maybe somebody here's already made this argument -- but only about one in three itemize their deductions and get the benefit of that deduction. There can be no justification for a preference that gives the wealthiest -- one taxpayer in three -- a rebate on local taxes while its less fortunate members -- or neighbors pay a full dollar locally plus higher Federal taxes in order to fund that rebate.

Recently, too, I heard some good news from my home State of California. Now, California is generally considered one of the high-tax States and so, according to the prevailing wisdom, would have the most to lose from the loss of deductibility. The Los Angeles Times has reported, however, that the State Franchise Tax Board has completed a study, finding that Californians would dramatically benefit under our new plan.

Well, lower tax rates, doubling the personal exemption, an end to loopholes -- it all adds up to fairness, more growth, more jobs, and renewed hope for our future. My friends, isn't that why we are all in government in the first place?

I am deeply disappointed by the action of the Senate Judiciary Committee this morning. That some members of the committee chose to use the confirmation process to conduct an ideological assault on so superbly qualified a candidate was unjust and deeply wrong.

Since the Revolutionary War, America's men and women have made unselfish sacrifices to defend freedom. In each of America's wars, America's prisoners of war have faced extraordinary hardships and overcome them through extraordinary sacrifices. The bravery, suffering, and profound devotion to duty of our P.O.W.s and M.I.A.s have earned them a preeminent place in the hearts of all Americans. Their heroism is a beacon to follow forever. Their spirit of hope and commitment to the defense of freedom reflects the basic tenets of our Nation.

This country deeply appreciates the pain and suffering endured by families whose fathers, sons, husbands, or brothers are today still missing or unaccounted for. These families are an example of the strength and patriotism of all Americans. We as a people are united in supporting efforts to return the captive, recover the missing, resolve the accounting, and relieve the suffering of the families who wait. We accept our continuing obligation to these missing servicemen. Until the P.O.W./M.I.A. issue is resolved, it will continue to be a matter of the highest national priority. As a symbol of this national commitment, the P.O.W./M.I.A. Flag will fly over the White House, the Departments of State and Defense, the Veterans' Administration, and the Vietnam Veterans Memorial on July 19, 1985, and over the Vietnam Veterans Memorial on Memorial Day and Veterans Day.

P.O.W./M.I.A. Recognition Day.'' On this day, we recognize the special debt all Americans owe to our fellow citizens who gave up their freedom in the service of our country; we owe no less to their families.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other Executive order, the functions of the President under the Federal Advisory Committee Act applicable to the White House Conference on Small Business Authorization Act, except that of reporting annually to the Congress, shall be performed by the Administrator of the Small Business Administration in accordance with the guidelines and procedures established by the Administrator of General Services.

The President. When we speak up, people speak up. With what we believe, we can defeat the armies of lobbyists in Washington. And I've come here to enlist your support in our efforts to push our profamily, profairness tax plan past the lobbyists and special interests and through the Congress.

And -- stepping outside for a few minutes, that's why my schedule is pretty short here. And I wanted to have this opportunity to appeal to you, the community leaders, directly -- you want to be -- [inaudible] -- leaders in the community, the battle for tax fairness can only be won out here in America's heartland by community leaders like you. The people you represent, the people you cherish -- grassroots heritage, values of family and faith and neighborhood and work that our tax must -- [inaudible].

American people win this one. If we live up to -- or leave it up to the special interests, I should say, in Washington, that's the last we'll hear about tax fairness, and we're writing the epitaph. We have to make our voices loud and clear and make them heard in Washington.

The President. I'm not going to comment on that or anything else. I only know that none of us, any country, can afford to pay off terrorists for the crimes that they're committing because that will only lead to more crimes.

The President. I have commented several times on that, Chris [Chris Wallace, NBC News]. Israel had always intended to release them and had made that very clear. So, a linkage that has tied it to our hostages is something that never should have happened.

The President. I don't think anything that attempts to get people back who have been kidnaped by thugs and murderers and barbarians is wrong to do. And we are going to do everything that we can to get all of the Americans back that are held in that way.

When terrorism strikes, civilization itself is under attack; no nation is immune. There's no safety in silence or neutrality. If we permit terrorism to succeed anywhere, it will spread like a cancer, eating away at civilized societies and sowing fear and chaos everywhere. This barbarism is abhorrent, and all of those who support it, encourage it, and profit from it are abhorrent. They are barbarians.

In a different age, the civilized world faced the bloody scourge of piracy. It was a long fight against a great but diffuse evil. But it was won in the end because civilized nations refused to succumb and missed no opportunity to stamp it out. The United States can be proud of the role that it played in that struggle, a role our marines still sing about in the marine anthem.

In our time, it's terrorism that must be overcome. We cannot accept these repeated and vicious attacks against our nation and its citizens. Terrorists, and those who support them, must and will be held to account.

But now, onto a happier and brighter subject, one that is very close to your families and America's future -- that's our plan to completely overhaul our tax system. We're going to junk the present code with its loopholes and shelters and special interest provisions and replace it with a fairer, simpler plan, written with the average American in mind -- a plan that rewards hard work, supports our families, protects the old and the poor, and gives the U.S. economy a powerful boost ahead in world competition.

Today I'm bringing you a message of hope and opportunity and a call to action. America is the greatest country on this Earth, but our tax system is a disgrace. It is unworthy of us. Ours is a government of the people, but our tax code seems designed of, by, and for the tax lawyers. The time for excuses has past. Let's turn the years of bitterness, frustration, and anger at paying unfair and wasteful taxes into a ground swell of support for change.

Now, I know some people are skeptical -- too often before they've seen America's hopes for tax fairness shot down by the special interests. Well, the lobbyists are out in force again; they've dug in around the Capitol building in Washington, trying to keep the special interests in and the people's interests out. But they've forgotten one thing -- this time they're going to have to contend with the allied forces of the President and Chicago's own Dan Rostenkowski, chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee. And if they think that things have been hot so far, Ron and Rosty have got news for them -- [laughter] -- you ain't seen nothin' yet.

Now, this issue goes beyond Democrat or Republican -- it's simply a matter of doing what's right for America. And if we work together with good faith and determination, the people can win this time, and they will win.

Ordinary people couldn't even hope to understand it, so taxes became the specialty of the high-priced tax consultants, who spend their whole lives mastering its intricacies and manipulating the code for the benefit of their intricacies and manipulating the code for the benefit of their privileged clients. The result is that workers sometimes find themselves paying higher taxes than the giant corporations they work for, and hardworking families have to struggle under a growing tax burden while the special interests get a free ride. Now, we're not against big corporations -- they provide many of the jobs, goods, and services that keep America strong. It's the system that's unfair, and that's what we're going to change.

Just a few moments ago, I told some people inside the building here of a letter that I just received the day before yesterday. It's a letter from a man out here in the country, an executive who's earning in six figures -- well above $100,000 a year. He wrote me in support of the tax plan because he said, ``I am legally able to take advantage of the present tax code -- nothing dishonest, doing what the law prescribes -- and wind up paying a smaller salary than my secretary gets -- or I mean, paying a smaller -- I'm sorry, paying a smaller tax than my secretary pays.'' And he wrote me the letter to tell me he'd like to come to Washington and testify before Congress as to how that's possible for him to do and why it is wrong. So, this is the kind of spirit that is going on throughout the country.

It stands to reason that the more complex our tax code is, the more open it is to abuse. So, we're making it simple to make it fair. America's tax plan will do away with special breaks for a few so we can lower the tax rates for all. Our simpler, three-bracket design will assure that no American pays one penny more than his fair share.

Well, right is right, and fair is fair, and it's time for all of us to put on our American citizen hats and do the right thing for America. By closing the loopholes, we can bring tax rates down for the vast majority of Americans. Our tax proposal is the opposite of trickle down; it's bubble up.

Most important of all, America's long suffering families will get dramatic tax relief. The fair share plan gives all of America's families a much-needed break by lowering the tax rates, increasing the standard deduction, making tax deductible IRA's equally available to homemakers, and best of all, nearly doubling the personal exemption so that you can deduct $2,000 for yourself and every one of your dependents.

And we propose indexing that so that if inflation continues to make that $2,000 not worth as much as it was when we started, we'll increase the $2,000 exemption. In our view, nearly doubling the personal exemption makes our tax proposal twice as good.

You see them in communities like this one every day -- the wage earner, checking in at sunrise at the factory gate; the homemaker, doing the work of 10 to keep the house running; the parents who save and sacrifice and do without so that they can provide their children with the things they need. It's their hard work, dedication, and faith that keep the American dream alive. Are we profamily? You bet we are. In fact, you might say that the family is the one shelter we approve of.

We are also completely exempting the low-income elderly from taxation. We think they've worked hard enough all their lives, and they shouldn't have to carry the IRS on their backs into retirement. And we're dropping the struggling low-income families from the tax rolls altogether.

This is a tax plan for a growing, dynamic America. Lower, flatter tax rates will give Americans more confidence in the future. It'll mean if you work overtime or get a raise or a promotion or if you have a small business and are able to turn a profit, more of that extra income will end up where it belongs -- in your wallets, not in Uncle Sam's pockets.

With lower personal and corporate rates and another capital gains tax cut, small and entrepreneurial businesses will take off. Americans will have an open field to test their dreams and challenge their imaginations, and the next decade will become known as the age of opportunity.

American industry will benefit, too, because the billions that are presently being squandered on the loopholes -- things like jojoba bean shelters, racehorse writeoffs, windmill farms, and luxury lunches for business executives -- will be reinvested in the productive economy, where it will build new factories and businesses, create new jobs, and finance the new inventions that will keep America number one in the world market.

The economic misuse of the real estate provisions in our tax code alone is mind-boggling. Some business districts look more like ghost towns, with building after building constructed primarily for tax reasons and never occupied. Tax waste, we should call it. It's huge, reaching into the multibillions, and you, the American people are paying for it with higher taxes and lower economic growth. It's time we pulled our money out of the tax shelters and invested it in America's future.

Now, you can get a feeling for how good our tax proposal will be for our economy. In the month since we announced it, the financial markets have been smiling, interest rates have been falling, the stock market has been rising -- to a new record, as a matter of fact, both signs of confidence in the future -- and inflation still lies dormant. From that double-digit figure of a couple of years ago, it is down now to 3.7 percent for the last 12 months. I'm not going to be happy until it isn't even seven-tenths of 1 percent.

But in that time we've also seen the special interests fire their first volley to shoot down America's fair share plan -- so far they haven't made a dent. Our tax plan is strong and solid because it's fair, and we're going to make sure it stays that way.

The opponents of our fair share plan have one strategy -- to filibuster it to death, to delay, put off, procrastinate. They'll think of a million excuses for inaction. They'll study and debate and meet in committee -- they'll nibble at it all summer and then try to bury it deep in the bowels of the next session of Congress. But if we wait, if we let them delay, then we might as well kiss tax fairness goodbye. That's why we've got to set a date -- a vote up or down on the fair share plan this year -- in 1985.

Now, that means we have to start putting a grassroots coalition together now so that we make sure that Congress will hear the voice of the people over the pleadings of the special interests. We have to be ready to move out this fall with a people's crusade for our profamily, profairness, profuture tax plan. When Congress gets back to town after summer vacation, I'm heading out into the country -- I'm going to campaign all across this nation throughout the fall for tax fairness.

And I'm going to look to Alan Dixon and George O'Brien, and Phil Crane and John Grotberg to help us marshall the profairness, progrowth forces in the Congress. I didn't tell them I was going to say that. [Laughter] If we make the commitment now, if we can work together to get the fairness bill through the House and the Senate, we can do it by Thanksgiving. And we're going to keep this historic reform above politics so that it will truly be an American victory. And then when our nation comes together to celebrate Thanksgiving, we'll have something extra special to be thankful for.

We continue to work for the release of the American hostages held in Lebanon. This terrorism reminds us of the threat posed to open societies and of the great challenges we face in a world where many disdain our values and seek to harm us and our way of life.

One of those challenges is our need to counter the rash of spy activities that threaten our security and interests at home and abroad and to improve our own intelligence-gathering capabilities. The number and sophistication of Soviet bloc and other hostile intelligence service activities have been increasing in recent years.

The Soviet Union is a closed society whose rulers fear the intoxication of freedom, indeed fear it so much they forbid their people to compete freely with us in the great race to create and invent our future for the 21st century. As the West pulled ahead, the Soviets embarked on a major effort to catch up by stealing or buying what they need from classified information on American satellites, reports on future weapon systems, including our combat aircraft bombers, to our most advanced technologies from high-tech areas like Silicon Valley in California.

Besides espionage against our most sensitive secrets, theft of the high technology upon which our defense depends, the Soviets have intensified what they call ``active measures'' -- propaganda and disinformation meant to mislead Western governments and their citizens, subversion, forgeries, and covert action. For example, while American officials and other proponents of freedom are systematically excluded from Soviet radio or TV, hardly a week goes by without a so-called Soviet journalist or scholar on our own airwaves. These men and women should at least be identified for what they are -- propagandists whose appearances and statements are totally controlled by the Communist Party.

The Soviets, Communist-bloc nations, and surrogates elsewhere rely on a huge apparatus, including the KGB, to spy on us and influence our public opinion. To equate the KGB with the CIA is an injustice to the CIA and a grave mistake. Far more than an intelligence service, the KGB is a political police operation. As its motto says, ``The sword and shield of the Communist Party of the U.S.S.R.'' The KGB mission to shield the rigid Soviet dictatorship from any internal challenge, to weaken and discredit the United States and the various alliances we've built up, particularly the NATO alliance, and to advance the Soviet quest for power to destroy freedom makes it unique in the world.

What can be done? Well, we can counter this hostile threat and still remain true to our values. We don't need to fight repression by becoming repressive ourselves, by adopting such restrictions as internal passports for our citizens. But we need to put our cleverness and determination to work, and we need to deal severely with those who betray our country. We should begin by recognizing that spying is a fact of life and that all of us need to be better informed about the unchanging realities of the Soviet system. We're in a long twilight struggle with an implacable foe of freedom.

Some 30 to 40 percent of the more than 2,500 Soviet-bloc officials in this country are known or suspected intelligence officers and all can be called upon by the KGB. We need to bring the number of their intelligence officers to a more manageable number. We need a balance between the size of the Soviet diplomatic presence in the United States and the U.S. presence in the Soviet Union. The Soviets currently have a huge advantage. Now, we intend to take steps to accomplish this, and we need to better control foreign intelligence agents working at the U.N., who have utilized that organization as a spy nest.

Another priority is to improve our own counterintelligence during the seventies -- well, I should say during the seventies, we began cutting back our manpower and resources and imposed unnecessary restrictions on our security and counterintelligence officials. With help from Congress we've begun to rebuild, but we must persevere. We must work for better coordination between counterintelligence agencies, better analysis of hostile threats, and learn from the mistakes of past restrictions, which unduly hampered us.

There is no quick fix to this problem. Without hysteria or finger pointing, let us move calmly and deliberately together to protect freedom. We've developed a list of things to be accomplished in the counterintelligence and security areas. I'm tasking Cabinet officers to implement the improvements and reforms in every one of these areas on a priority basis.

Well, I may not be able to tell you much about voluntarism that you don't already know, but it's appropriate for us to gather today in a spirit of celebration and reflect upon the goodness of the American people and their willingness to give each other a helping hand. The spirit of voluntarism is deeply ingrained in us as a nation. Indeed, when asked by pollsters, most Americans state their belief that no matter how big government gets and no matter how many services it provides, it can never take the place of volunteers. In other words, the American people understand that there are no substitutes for gifts of service given from the heart.

In the past few years, moreover, we've witnessed an unprecedented outpouring of the volunteer spirit -- a reassertion of good will and neighborliness. Last year alone, individuals, corporations, bequests, and foundations gave nearly $80 billion to good causes; and that is an all-time record high in our country. Now, according to polls -- and I know this includes people in this room -- some 92 million Americans, more than a third of our entire population, perform volunteer work year-in and year-out. And I just have to believe that we're entitled to feel pretty good about that.

You can see these volunteer efforts, these private sector initiatives, all around. Hands Across America last week represented a dramatic, national effort to help the poor and homeless who live in our midst. Just Say No is a largely volunteer organization teaching children around the world to say no to drugs. And a week and a half ago Nancy hosted a Just Say No rally here at the White House. It was one of those small affairs that she likes so much -- [laughter] -- there couldn't have been more than 2,300 kids here. [Laughter] But although Just Say No requires school officials, teachers, and especially parents to give up a great deal of their time, Nancy told me that everyone that she spoke to at the rally was convinced that it was not only worth it but of vital importance for the future.

But all of you have our deepest thanks and admiration. I can think of nothing finer to say about our country than that it has produced men and women like you -- true heroes of the heart. God bless you.

I recommend that the Senate consider this treaty as soon as possible, and give its advice and consent to ratification of the treaty, with related exchange of letters and supplementary protocol, at an early date.

The President. Well, the week before last, as you all know, I vetoed a joint resolution which would have prevented the sale of defensive missiles to Saudi Arabia. And I understand the vote on my veto is scheduled in the Senate for this Thursday at 2 o'clock. And I'd like to stress once again how important I feel it is for you to sustain my veto.

I want all of you to understand that this vote will have a profound effect upon our relations with the Arab world, not just with Saudi Arabia. If the veto isn't sustained, it'll seriously undermine our foreign policy objectives throughout the region. A sale is, clearly and without question, in the interest of the United States. It's quite simply necessary and indispensable to the execution of our foreign policy. And I'm counting on you in the Senate for your support. Most people don't seem to be aware or stop to think about that we've had a relationship for more than 40 years, a sound and mutual security relationship with Saudi Arabia. And it's been of great benefit to us as well as to them.

The President. It isn't a case of what we may think or not. There is a law that was passed -- I believe it was 1954 -- that's very specific -- not just about the media, it's about anyone who makes public information which can be dangerous to our national security. And I would think that all of us are bound by that law.

Note: The President spoke at 9:34 a.m. in the Cabinet Room at the White House, prior to a meeting with the Republican congressional leadership. Robert Dole was the Senate majority leader. Helen Thomas referred to the first day of television coverage of the Senate proceedings.

The President today announced his intention to nominate William R. Graham to be Director of the Office of Science and Technology Policy, and he will also serve as Science Adviser to the President. He would succeed George A. Keyworth II.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Saundra Brown Armstrong to be a Commissioner of the United States Parole Commission for a term of 6 years. She would succeed Helen G. Corrothers.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Eleanor R. Seagraves to be an alternate member on the part of the United States on the Roosevelt Campobello International Park Commission. She would succeed William S. Cohen.

On May 15 I wrote to the leadership of the Congress to express my deep concern regarding the large reductions in our defense program proposed by the House Budget Committee. In my letter I made it clear that these huge reductions would have a severe impact on our national security, and I stated my intent to work with the Congress -- both Senate and House -- to protect those programs most vital to our national security, including our Strategic Modernization Program.

The extraordinary events of this year's congressional review of my defense proposal and the extreme sensitivity of international events compel me to restate to the Congress, and to the American people, my intention and rationale for protecting those few high-priority programs that form the very foundations of our Nation's security in this troubled world.

Almost five years ago, in October 1981, I announced a balanced and coherent program for rebuilding America's strategic forces. That five-part modernization program was designed to redress the growing strategic imbalance between the United States and the Soviet Union, to strengthen and modernize the U.S. forces that have deterred nuclear war for almost 40 years, and to pave the way for meaningful arms control negotiations aimed at significantly reducing the existing nuclear arsenals of both the United States and the Soviet Union.

These past five years have been a cooperative effort. With a few exceptions, the Congress has supported our five-part program. Because we have worked together we have achieved results in which we can all take pride. With the stability provided by the Congress, our programs have been well managed and have cost less than we planned in almost all cases.

Our modernization program has also achieved many of the military and political results we expected. Deterrence has been strengthened, and we are stronger and more able to defend the values we hold dear. Our determined progress has been understood by the Soviets, and, as predicted, they have returned to the negotiation table in Geneva.

As our negotiators in Geneva seek equitable and verifiable agreements, they are mindful that we have no more urgent task in preserving peace and freedom than the deterrence of nuclear confrontation or war. The strategic programs now before the Congress represent a vital foundation to this search for a more stable peace. They are designed to restore and strengthen our traditional approach to deterrence, while we seek new research initiatives to harness rapidly advancing technologies in order to provide for a safer world.

We must also always remember that maintaining a strong nuclear deterrent does much more than prevent nuclear war. Strong U.S. nuclear forces also contribute significantly to deterring aggression with conventional forces. In calculating what they call ``the correlation of forces,'' the Soviet political and military leadership are ever mindful of the state of the nuclear balance between the United States and the Soviet Union. As a result, a strong U.S. strategic deterrent decreases the threat of any Soviet aggression and serves as the vital background that discourages Soviet attack -- nuclear or conventional -- upon us, our allies, or our interests abroad. Any weakening of our nuclear deterrent, leaving the Soviet Union with superior nuclear forces, could have the opposite effect. It could invite the Soviet Union to rely on such an advantage. Our strategic programs provide, therefore, a beneficial effect that far outweighs the less than 15 percent of the defense budget they consume. They are affordable -- they are vital.

The Congress will recall that this Nation entered the 1980s after a decade of restraint in the modernization of our nuclear forces unmatched by the Soviet Union. Facing an increasingly capable Soviet force, all three legs of our own strategic Triad badly needed modernization: Our forces were becoming obsolescent and increasingly were losing both their military effectiveness and survivability in the face of steadily improving Soviet capabilities. Additionally, and perhaps most importantly, the essential command, control, and communications networks that undergird our forces had grown fragile and susceptible to Soviet disruption.

This loss in survivability of U.S. strategic forces, coupled with the magnitude of the Soviet buildup, had begun to erode seriously the stability of the strategic balance between the United States and the Soviet Union. The five-part Strategic Modernization Program I submitted to the Congress in October 1981 was designed to address all these dangerous deficiencies.

We have made major strides in upgrading our warning sensors by modernizing the Thule Ballistic Missile Early Warning (BMEWS) radar, by improving the capabilities of the existing Pave Paws radars, and constructing two new ones to fill gaps in coverage -- all in compliance with the ABM Treaty. Also by deploying a series of mobile ground terminals, we are strengthening the command and control network. We have further strengthened presidential control of our forces by a number of measures including continued deployment of the Defense Satellite Communication System (DSCS) III, and by fielding the Jam Resistant Secure Communications system.

Through cooperation with the Congress we have improved and stabilized the Trident submarine construction program by ensuring the continued production of one of these new strategic submarines per year.

Our two-bomber program has progressed successfully. The B - 1B is being produced on schedule and within our cost estimates. Our low observables research program over these past five years has proven that stealth works far better than anyone would have believed possible five years ago. Our program has also removed much of the risk we faced when we first began what has become the most revolutionary development in military aviation since World War II. Accordingly, our Advanced Technology Bomber and Advanced Cruise Missiles will be able to penetrate improved Soviet defenses for the foreseeable future. The effectiveness of our aging B - 52s has been extended by equipping them with air-launched cruise missiles.

Additionally -- and in my view most significantly for the long-term safety of America and stable world peace -- we have launched the Strategic Defense Initiative program and are even now deeply engaged in researching how we might be able to employ our technical genius to eliminate one day the threat of nuclear ballistic missiles.

The Trident II (D - 5) missile -- whose enduring hard-target capability is so vital to our strategy of flexible response -- begins flight-testing next January. The deployment of D - 5 - equipped submarines must continue as planned; continued production of one Trident submarine per year is critical to providing an effective and survivable sea-based force in the 1990s and beyond.

The second half of our two-bomber program, the final development and deployment of the Advanced Technology Bomber, must reach fruition on schedule. I recommended the two-bomber program -- and the Congress approved it -- precisely because it provided a phased near-term and a longer-term solution. To pause now, before we have achieved the second part of the program -- the stealthy ATB, the part designed to provide the answer for the longer-term -- would be to undercut completely our capability to maintain an effective bomber force that could penetrate air defenses into the 21st century, and ignore the enormous potential that stealth adds to deterrence.

We are in the stages of final development of -- and soon will begin to deploy -- the Advanced Cruise Missile. In 1983 procurement of our older Air-Launched Cruise Missiles was stopped so we could take advantage of this far more capable stealthy new missile. Having taken that step, continuation of the ACM program is essential. In fact, I have asked the Secretary of Defense to work with the Congress to accelerate this program.

Modernization of the ICBM force remains incomplete -- and, given congressional action last year, truncated. My FY 87 budget request contains funds that will allow us to move forward, with the cooperation of the Congress, to select a basing mode for the second 50 Peacekeeper missiles and to place the Small ICBM into full-scale development. This Fall, the Department of Defense will recommend, in accordance with my May 27, 1986, decision on interim restraint, an appropriate best configuration, in terms of weight, number of warheads, and production schedule, for the Small ICBM. The long-range viability of our strategic Triad depends on the modernization of the land-based leg through the deployment of the Peacekeeper and Small mobile ICBMs.

The fifth part of our Strategic Modernization Program is strategic defense. The SDI program I submitted to the Congress in 1984 was a carefully structured effort that integrated realistic technical opportunities in a research effort, under prudent financial planning. By funding SDI at lower-than-requested levels, the Congress has narrowed the scope of our research, forcing us to make decisions on candidate technologies more quickly than we had originally desired. I believe it would be most unwise to delay and further restrict the program.

When I launched the SDI, I pledged to the American people a determined effort to investigate whether it is possible to build an effective defense against ballistic missiles. If advanced technology enables us to eliminate the threat of nuclear ballistic missiles -- and I believe it can -- we need to know this so that we can decide how we can build a safer strategic relationship that would rely increasingly on defensive systems that threaten no one. Also, it is important to have a vigorous research effort now because the Soviets have long been heavily engaged in their own strategic defense efforts, which in their case go well beyond research, and without the fiscal restrictions that have been placed on our SDI program. Our SDI program threatens no one. But if the Soviets are allowed to unilaterally continue to improve their strategic defenses, including a long-standing research effort in many of the same technologies being investigated by our SDI program, our future ability to deter Soviet aggression will be significantly and dangerously reduced.

I frequently hear two arguments -- one political, one scientific -- against the SDI. The first is that SDI would be ``destabilizing.'' This argument implies that peace is best maintained by preserving in perpetuity a U.S.-Soviet relationship of mutual vulnerability to missile attack. The argument rests on the twin assumptions that the Soviet Union would agree with us in maintaining this relationship, by abstaining from building defensive systems and by halting the buildup of offensive systems.

Of course, we have since discovered that both these assumptions were wrong: Since the signing of the ABM Treaty the Soviet Union has spent roughly as much on strategic defense as it has on strategic offensive forces. And certainly the Soviet Union, in building a first-strike capability, never accepted the premise that the West should be allowed to possess secure retaliatory forces. Since the Soviet leadership does not share our views of the world -- and since we must be able to deter them from acting rashly or aggressively in a crisis -- we should be taking their actions seriously, and not remain wedded to disproven assumptions. Conducting our own policy on the basis of false assumptions about Soviet policies is dangerous and destabilizing. Exploring technologies that might blunt the Soviet ability to attack us, on the other hand, may well give us the means to reestablish and ensure strategic stability over the long term.

The ``scientific'' objection I hear to SDI is that ``it won't work.'' Clearly the Soviet researchers who have been engaged for the past 10 to 20 years on the Soviet version of SDI do not believe the arguments often heard from Soviet negotiators that SDI won't work. How can such a judgment be made when the research necessary to decide this is incomplete? Science is based on knowledge gained through research and testing. It is exactly such knowledge that the SDI program is designed to produce. Where would we be today if Bell, or Edison, or the Wright brothers curtailed their efforts because untested judgments about their work indicated they could never succeed? To cut SDI on these grounds would run counter to the American spirit that pushed back frontiers in all realms of endeavor. I cannot accept this -- and I do not believe the Congress should allow it.

I am also aware that certain Members of Congress believe that we are attempting to move too quickly on the SDI program. These members would constrain the growth in the SDI program to the same level of growth as the entire Department of Defense budget. This logic is fatally flawed. The DOD budget is made up of thousands of programs and accounts that grow and decline in response to the military needs of the Department. To constrain SDI research by some fictional average of all these independent events would ignore the enormous advantage of American free enterprise to exploit technology to the limits of our knowledge. The cuts SDI has suffered to date have already limited our ability to fully exploit Western technology. Further cuts will only compound this problem.

We have also made good technical progress in closing the gap between the United States and the Soviet Union in antisatellite systems. But progress in our laboratories does not give us military capabilities. Progress in the lab must be verified and tested before a system can be made operational. Unfortunately, our program is inhibited by congressionally imposed restrictions on testing -- restrictions that have increased program costs and ultimately will cripple our efforts to create a credible deterrent in this area. Failure to provide a deterrent ``in-kind'' to the existing, operational Soviet system could create dangerous temptations for Soviet attacks on our satellites in time of crisis or during a conventional war. This failure to provide a capability to counter satellites that directly support hostile military actions also undercuts deterrence.

Just as our strategic force programs are designed to assure an effective and credible deterrent for the United States and our allies, so too our efforts to reduce substantially the levels of U.S. and Soviet nuclear arms are not ends in themselves but are designed to contribute to increased U.S. and allied security and global peace and stability. Over the past several years, we have put forward a series of far reaching arms control proposals that seek concrete steps toward such enhanced security and stability.

In the Strategic Arms Reductions Talks (START), we have continued to set a priority on the achievement of significant, equitable, and effectively verifiable reductions in the Soviet and U.S. nuclear arsenals, while strengthening strategic stability. Through agreements on such reductions we seek to achieve a safer world and to work, on a sound basis, toward our long-term objective of ultimately eliminating all nuclear weapons. Our proposals include the principle of 50-percent reductions for comparable strategic systems, as well as trade-off and ``build-down'' concepts designed to contribute enhanced stability at lower levels of arms.

Since the overall strategic equation can be directly affected by other nuclear forces, in particular by those of longer and intermediate range, we have applied similar security and stability principles in a related area of nuclear weapons arms control -- the negotiations on Intermediate Range Nuclear Forces (INF). We are proposing a global solution of completely eliminating U.S. and Soviet longer-range land-based INF missiles (LRINF) as our preference or, as an intermediate step, U.S./Soviet equality in LRINF missile warheads at any level.

Finally, as part of the Nuclear and Space talks in Geneva, we have sought in the Defense and Space negotiating group to initiate a dialogue with the Soviets on the vital relationship between strategic offense and defense and on a possible cooperative transition to a more defense-reliant posture, should the research on defensive technologies prove successful. We are conducting research on strategic defense as a prudent hedge against the Soviet buildup in offense and defense so that we can establish and preserve the option for shifting the basis of deterrence to defensive systems that threaten no one.

In each of these arms control efforts, as in parallel efforts involving chemical and conventional forces, and in measures we and our allies have proposed to build confidence and reduce the risk of misunderstanding between East and West, we have focused on concrete steps that involve real reductions and constraints, that are equitable in contributing to security and stability, and that can be effectively verified. Our proposals have the strong support of our allies and provide a sound basis for significant progress in the future.

I am hopeful that the Congress therefore will join with me to protect the strategic modernization programs that make these negotiations possible. The Soviets are well-informed regarding congressional support for our modernization programs. If they detect a collapse of American resolve, we will see no movement in the negotiations because the Soviets will know they are better off by letting the Congress reduce our programs unilaterally rather than by engaging in meaningful negotiations that would result in both U.S. and Soviet systems being reduced on an equitable and verifiable basis.

On April 22, 1986, I wrote to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives concerning appropriate near-term U.S. responses to the continuing pattern of Soviet noncompliance with existing arms control agreements. In my letter I reviewed the justification and rationale for our policy of interim restraint and proportionate response. I also spoke of my judgment that it remained in the interest of the United States and its allies to try to establish an interim framework of truly mutual restraint on strategic offensive arms as we pursued with renewed vigor our goal of real reductions in the size of existing nuclear arsenals through the ongoing negotiations in Geneva. My letter explained why my highest priority of all our defense needs remains the full implementation of the Strategic Modernization Program, to underwrite our deterrence today, and the pursuit of the SDI research program to provide better alternatives for the future.

The U.S. Strategic Modernization Program, including the deployment of the full 100 Peacekeeper missiles, as called for by the Scowcroft Commission, is the foundation for all future U.S. options and provides a solid basis that can and will be adjusted over time to respond most efficiently to the continued Soviet strategic buildup. It is absolutely critical that this program not be permitted to erode. That would be the worst way to respond to the continuing pattern of Soviet activities, would increase the risk to our security and that of our allies, would undercut our ability to negotiate the reductions we all seek in existing arsenals, and thus send precisely the wrong signal to the Soviet leadership.

Our attempt to use the structure of SALT as the basis for interim restraint until a START agreement can be achieved has always been based on the assumption of Soviet reciprocity. It makes no sense for the United States to continue to support the SALT structure while the Soviet Union undermines the foundation of SALT by its continued, uncorrected noncompliance. Unfortunately, the Soviet Union has not reciprocated. Therefore, in the future, the United States will base decisions regarding its strategic forces on the nature, and magnitude of the threat posed by the Soviet Union, rather than on standards contained in expired SALT agreements unilaterally observed by the United States.

On the 27th of May, after consulting with the Congress and with our allies, I announced my decision to retire two older Poseidon submarines as the eighth Trident submarine begins sea trials. This means the United States will stay in technical observance of SALT for some months, thus giving the Soviet Union still more time to correct their erosion of SALT. If they do, I will take this into account.

I believe we must now look to the future, not to the past. The primary task we now face is to build a new structure, one based on significant, equitable, and verifiable reductions in the size of existing U.S. and Soviet nuclear arsenals. This is what we are proposing in the ongoing Geneva negotiations.

Thus, we come to one of those unique crossroads of history where nations decide their fate. Our choices are clear. We can hold firm to our policies of modernizing to maintain our deterrent strength that has preserved the peace for 40 years or we can shrink from the challenge by offering a host of excuses. We can strengthen the hand of our negotiators in Geneva to achieve deep, equitable, and verifiable reductions or, by unilaterally reducing our forces, we can make a mockery of the only process that leads us toward meaningful arms control.

There is no free ride. Some people will argue that strategic forces must take cuts along with everything else when budgets are tight. Those ``spread-the-pain'' theories are not only false, they are dangerous. Every dollar taken from our strategic programs is a victory for potential aggressors. Every cut or delay weakens our cause in Geneva and adds materially to the ultimate cost of deterrence. It is not unreasonable for a great nation like the United States to invest the relatively modest sums we have requested to maintain a credible deterrence and preserve the peace. In fact, it is the very existence of these investments that makes us first among the nations of the free world.

In considering our proposed funding for strategic programs, I would ask each and every member of the Congress to consider the stakes involved. The Congress can proceed along the path of strategic modernization we charted five years ago, and strengthen thereby our ability to deter both conventional and nuclear coercion or aggression. It can permit us to proceed as quickly and efficiently as possible to determine how we can create a safer world and ensure peace and stability for the longer term. Alternatively, by ``cutting here and trimming there,'' the Congress can stretch programs, thereby delaying scientific results, postponing the deployment of capabilities that we all agree are necessary, and, as a further penalty, increasing programmatic costs. I know which choice the American people would make.

This year I have begun to implement the recommendations of my Blue Ribbon Commission on Defense Management, the Packard Commission. This group of distinguished Americans once again pointed out the enormous importance of stability to our defense programs. These complex and intricate programs are difficult to manage at best because they involve new technologies and new concepts. They are impossible to manage if they become hostage to short-term budget issues that reduce and delay them at every turn.

We recognized in 1981 that we had to make strategic modernization our first priority. We have done so -- and it has paid clear dividends. Our strategic programs have been models of management efficiency where we have kept them stable and on track. Internationally, our progress has paved the way to negotiations now in progress where for the first time the prospect of deep nuclear arms reductions is before us.

The essential feature and greatest strength of the 1981 Strategic Modernization Program is its integrated, phased nature. A failure to follow through with this design risks squandering the progress we have made and the effort -- and money -- we have invested thus far.

Having come this far, we must not falter now. If we do, the fruits of all our labor will be gone in the twinkling of an eye. I cannot allow this to happen. I cannot and will not accept a defense bill that undercuts our Strategic Modernization Program and the prospect of significant and equitable arms reductions. The security and peace of the world depend on the credibility of our strategic forces. I pledge myself and my Administration to do everything that can be done to ensure that our security is maintained and our strategic forces are sufficient to meet our needs.

The President sent a message to Congress today that called upon the Congress to fully support his budget request for strategic modernization and the Strategic Defense Initiative. The President views this message as a companion piece to his recent statement on interim restraint with respect to the SALT treaty limitation on strategic weapons.

The President noted that over the past 5 years, with the support and cooperation of the Congress, we have made substantial progress in rebuilding our deterrent capabilities. We can be justifiably proud of what we have accomplished by working together, but much more remains to be done. While recognizing the progress we have made, we must be clear that the advanced systems which have been proceeding through intensive development programs during the past 5 years are only now beginning to be deployed. Those unfamiliar with the sequence of research, development, and deployment all too often assume that our commitment to build a new system results in its immediate deployment. This error may explain the view held by some that we have now accomplished enough in restoring our strategic capabilities and that we can begin to cut those programs significantly. In fact, the real benefits of our strategic modernization efforts will be realized only if we complete the tasks that we have begun with the research and development phase.

We recognized in 1981, when we began to modernize our defenses in response to the Soviet buildup, that we had to make strategic modernization our first priority. We have done so, and it has paid clear dividends. Our strategic programs have been models of management efficiency where we have kept them stable and on track. Internationally, our progress has paved the way to negotiations now in progress, where for the first time the prospect of deep nuclear arms reductions is before us. As our negotiators in Geneva seek equitable and verifiable agreements, they are mindful that we have no more urgent task in preserving peace and freedom than the prevention of nuclear war. The strategic programs now before the Congress represent a vital foundation to this search for a stable peace. They are designed to restore and strengthen our traditional approach to deterrence while we explore through our Strategic Defense Initiative the feasibility of harnessing advanced technologies in order to usher in a safer world.

We must also always remember that maintaining a strong nuclear deterrent does more than prevent nuclear war. Strong U.S. deterrent forces also contribute significantly to preventing major conventional aggression. In calculating what they call ``the correlation of forces,'' the Soviet political and military leadership are ever mindful of the state of the nuclear balance between the United States and the Soviet Union. As a result, a strong U.S. strategic deterrent decreases the threat of any Soviet aggression and serves as the vital background which discourages Soviet conventional attack upon our allies or our interests abroad. A weak nuclear deterrent, leaving the Soviet Union with superior nuclear forces, could have the opposite effect. It could invite the Soviet Union to rely on such an advantage and to use conflict or coercion to achieve their objectives. Our strategic programs provide, therefore, a beneficial effect which far outweighs the less than 15 percent of the defense budget they consume. They are affordable, they are vital, and they respond to an increasing threat.

In considering our proposed funding for strategic programs, the President asks each and every Member of Congress to consider the stakes involved. The Congress can proceed along the path of strategic modernization we charted 5 years ago and strengthen thereby our ability to deter both conventional and nuclear coercion or aggression. It can permit us to proceed as quickly and efficiently as possible through the Strategic Defense Initiative to determine how we can create a safer world and ensure peace and stability for the long term. Alternatively, by cutting here and trimming there, Congress can stretch programs, thereby delaying scientific results; postponing the deployment of capabilities, which we all agree are necessary; and as a further penalty, increasing programmatic costs. The President knows which choice the American people would make.

The President is confident that the Congress will therefore join with him to protect the strategic modernization programs that make these negotiations possible. The Soviets are well informed regarding congressional support for our modernization programs. If they detect a collapse of American resolve, we will see no movement in the negotiations because the Soviets will know they are better off by letting the Congress reduce our programs unilaterally rather than by engaging in meaningful negotiations which would result in both U.S. and Soviet systems being reduced on an equitable and verifiable basis. By standing together to protect these few programs that form the foundation of our national security, we will send a clearly different message. The world knows that there is no more powerful force than an America united and determined to protect its freedom. That is the message we must send forth to pave the way for peace in the years ahead.

The general waiver authority conferred by Section 402(c) of the Act is an important means for the strengthening of mutually beneficial relations between the United States and certain countries of Eastern Europe and the People's Republic of China. The waiver authority has permitted us to conclude and maintain in force bilateral trade agreements with Hungary, Romania, and the People's Republic of China. These agreements continue to be fundamental elements in our political and economic relations with those countries, including important exchanges on human rights and emigration matters. Granting of MFN gives U.S. companies the ability to compete in those markets. Moreover, continuation of the waiver authority might permit future expansion of our bilateral relations with other countries now subject to subsections 402(a) and (b) of the Act, should circumstances permit. I believe that these considerations clearly warrant this renewal of the general waiver authority.

I note the Romanian Government's continued responsiveness to our concerns about its emigration record, the criterion established by Section 402 for extension and continuation of the waiver authority. I am disappointed, however, by the Romanian Government's very limited response to numerous expressions of strong U.S. public, congressional, and Administration concern about its performance in areas of human rights and religious issues, and I am directing the Secretary of State further to press our concerns in these areas.

Hungary. Hungary has continued to take a relatively positive and constructive approach to emigration matters. Nearly all Hungarians who are eligible to apply to emigrate for purposes of family reunification receive permission to depart. The American Embassy in Budapest issued 103 immigrant visas in 1985, approximately 15 percent more than in 1984. There is one pending divided family case, but a resolution is expected shortly. There are no systematic official sanctions imposed on persons who seek to emigrate.

Although numerous problems remain in the emigration area, the Administration notes that the Romanian Government's substantial implementation of new procedures for emigration from Romania to the United States, which were arrived at last year, has reduced material and physical hardships for the majority of people departing for the United States since the middle of 1985. The Romanian Government has continued to honor its assurances, given in June 1983, that it would not require reimbursement of education costs as a precondition to emigration.

My decision to extend the waiver authority for Romania for 1986 - 87 has been taken with difficulty, following careful deliberation within the Administration. I have concluded that extension of MFN to Romania continues not only substantially to promote the objectives of the Act concerning emigration, but also to enable us to have an impact on human rights concerns and to help to strengthen the extent of religious observance in Romania. The Romanian Government's efforts to discourage religion should not be allowed to overshadow the widespread practice of religion in Romania that, especially among the Protestant denominations, is growing faster than in other countries of Eastern Europe. Romania has some 8,100 functioning Orthodox churches, as well as over 4,000 of other denominations including more than 1,000 functioning Baptist churches. There is extensive training of new ministers. The extension of MFN has facilitated American citizens' access to coreligionists in Romania as well as the flow of several million dollars' worth of material assistance to them each year. In this difficult context, I believe it important that existing access and influence be preserved.

People's Republic of China. China continues to have a relatively open emigration policy. The number of immigrant and nonimmigrant visas issued by our Embassy and Consulates in China has increased every year since the United States normalized relations with China in 1979. In fiscal year 1985, 13,356 immigrant visas were issued. In addition, 45,000 nonimmigrant visas, compared with 24,000 the previous year, were issued to Chinese who wished to study, conduct business, or visit relatives in the United States. It remains true that other Western countries have also experienced increases in Chinese travel and emigration.

Seriously, I couldn't be happier than to be here. The recruitment posters say they're looking for a few good men, and I can see here today they've found them -- and I shouldn't leave out the women. This is about the finest bunch of leathernecks I have ever seen. Well, the few and the proud -- the Marines have always exemplified those cardinal virtues of duty to country, honor, and bravery. Since the beginning of the corps at Philadelphia's Tun Tavern in 1775, marines have always been on the frontlines of freedom. Often the first into battle, the first to fight for right and freedom -- on land, on the sea, and in the air, in every corner of the world -- you've been there when your country needed you.

You know, you and I are basically in the same business. Each day of my Presidency I work to keep our nation strong and secure so that we may always remain free and at peace. And each day you follow one of the most difficult but noble callings: the calling of freedom fighters and peacemakers. And that's why I wanted to come here today to talk to you about this country of ours -- where we've been, where we're going, and how we can make sure that the future for Americans is one of a prosperous nation in a peaceful world. The news about our country today is good, and it's getting better. Pride is back. Patriotism is fashionable once again. We've taken our Armed Forces, which had suffered neglect and budget cuts for too many years, and gotten them back in shape -- given them a little PT [physical training], you might say. We've restored our military to what it ought to be: combat-ready and fighting-fit, the strongest, proudest military for the strongest, proudest nation on Earth. And we've got to keep it that way.

Morale is up -- way up -- in the services, and the quality of recruits -- I can tell you now and proven by actual figures -- has never been higher. And you can see that here today. And I can tell you nothing makes me prouder than to see the fine young men and women in uniform, so ready and eager to serve their country. Ernie Pyle, the famous war correspondent in World War II, reflected on the Marine Corps spirit. He wrote that he never did find out what perpetuated it. But he concluded: A marine just plain ``considers himself a better soldier than anybody else.'' Well, Ernie Pyle didn't just admire marines; he died with many of them on a terrible campaign called Okinawa, a campaign of bloodshed and valor for the men of the globe and anchor.

So, America is back. America's military is back and standing tall. And our economy is on a record-setting roll. Most important, like in the Marines, morale is way up in America. We've developed an esprit de corps that can't be beat. There was a time, less than a decade ago, when America's leaders cowered before a future that looked to them dark and threatening and out of control. Well, no longer. The future is an open vista of expanding opportunities, and Americans are just itching to take on the challenge of tomorrow. You, the recruits of Parris Island, are part of the rising generation that will be meeting those challenges. The future of America is in your hands. Whatever path in life you've chosen -- whether in the military or some other profession -- as Americans, you carry a special responsibility. Just as in the Marines, the pride of being an American goes hand in hand with duties and responsibilities -- the duties and responsibilities of citizenship and preserving and defending democracy.

Good citizenship is vitally important if democracy is to survive and flourish. It means keeping abreast of the important issues of the day and knowing the stakes involved in the great conflicts of our time. It means bearing arms when necessary to fight for your country, for right, and for freedom. Good citizenship and defending democracy means living up to the ideals and values that make this country great. Today the world looks to America for leadership. They look to what they call our miracle economy for an answer to how they may give their people a better life. And they look to our courage and might to protect them from the forces of tyranny, brutality, and injustice.

I believe we've accomplished too much over the past 6 years in rebuilding our defense to see it all undone through shortsighted cuts in the budget. The true measure of our resolve is not only our willingness to make the great sacrifices necessary in war but also our willingness to invest a modest level of resources in peacetime to deter war in the first place. America is today reaffirming her proud role as a leader of the free world. We've learned something about leadership here on Parris Island. And in the same way that your DI [drill instructor] instills in his recruits leadership by example, America must lead the world by example -- by always remaining true to her ideals.

You marines know better than anyone that staying true to your ideals isn't always the easiest course. It isn't always the most comfortable or even the safest way. And sometimes it's a lot like that confidence course: There are hurdles and obstacles, and sometimes you just have to hold on for dear life. But America didn't become great because we took the easy road. America's great because of men and women like you -- men and women with big hearts and strong minds and with courage beyond the usual measure. You know, someone wisely said that a hero isn't really braver than anyone else; he's just brave 5 minutes longer than anyone else. And it's because of you that America's future will be big and strong and generous and full of hope and fighting spirit. It's because of you that we can be sure that America will be ``Semper Fidelis'' -- always faithful to her best hopes and highest ideals.

Note: The President spoke at 11:40 a.m. at the headquarters building. Prior to his remarks, he reviewed marines participating in training exercises. Following his remarks, he attended a reception for honor graduates and Families of the Year. The President then traveled to Greensboro, NC.

The President. It's wonderful to be here in North Carolina. We've come here fairly often the past few years, and you should know this is partly due to the cheerleading that is done behind your back by two members of my Cabinet -- our Secretary of Transportation, Elizabeth Dole, who hails from Salisbury, as you know. And our Secretary of Education, Bill Bennett, has adopted North Carolina, after teaching at Chapel Hill and North Carolina State. I just thought you should know. They're great boosters of North Carolina, and you should be aware of that.

Now, I know I could say that I've come here to enjoy the lovely weather and the beauty of the nearby Appalachians and the charm of the people. And I did come here for those things, and I am enjoying them. Or I could say I'm here because I was nearby, over at Parris Island, looking square in the face at the best generation of fighting men this country has ever produced. And I did come here for that, and I enjoyed every minute of it. But there's another reason for my visit. And I was going to say it has to do with politics, but it really has to do with something bigger: history. I came here in part to say thank you for sending to the United States Senate two great men who are here with us this afternoon.

One is an American classic and an American original, a man who went to Washington not to make himself into something big but to fight for big things and big principles. I'm speaking of Jesse Helms. I need Jesse Helms in the Senate. The other man I'm here to say thanks for is John East. In my 5 years in the White House, I've learned to depend on John for help and support and, often enough, guidance. He's a great man, and I needed him in the Senate. But now he's leaving, and we're none too happy about it.

But here is one comfort, and his name is Jim Broyhill. And that's another reason I came here today: to tell you why I need Jim Broyhill in the Senate. And you're just the sort of people to whom I wanted to speak about Jim. You're detached and impartial and -- [laughter] -- you wouldn't start to cheer just because I said something like let's send Jim Broyhill to the Senate. [Applause] I didn't think so. Well, let me tell you why I need him. He's been a leader. In his 24 years in the Congress Jim has shown himself to be a man who is motivated by principle, but who also has a gift for the maneuvers whereby principle is translated into effective legislation -- which is one way of saying Jim really knows how to work the Hill. He knows how to get things done, and he gets things done for North Carolina.

Now, Jim Broyhill supports true tax reform -- reform that makes the tax code simple and fair for all Americans, while preserving incentives for businesses to create new jobs. Now, there's an amazing fact that can be boiled down to one sentence: When we came in, in 1981, the top income tax bracket was way up here, 70 percent; and now we're actually going to get the top rate down to here, 27 percent. This is nothing less than historic. And at the other end on the tax range, we're going to get a lot of people removed from paying any tax at all. And it's the type of thing that doesn't happen without the help of people like Jim Broyhill.

Jim Broyhill has supported our efforts to sort of dust off and speak highly of the values that made America not only a great country but a good country. And I think he and the other Members of Congress here deserve some credit for urging a return to the old standbys of studying and discipline in the schools. Jim has been a big supporter of educational excellence and achieving it through a return to the four R's -- reading, 'riting, 'rithmetic, and respect. He knows the importance of involving parents. Do you remember back in the sixties when the think-tank liberals used to make you feel like you had no right having an opinion about the education of your own children? That sort of thing is pretty much history by now, and partly because of the leadership of people like Jim Broyhill. And if I could just say one more thing in this area. Jim never went the way of those who said, ``If you have a problem in the schools, you can buy your way out of it.'' He never had so little respect for the problems of teachers and students that he'd just sit back and pass a program and declare a problem solved. He knew that the answers to society's problems reside in the hearts of the people in the society. And this is an important insight, one that has helped shape the progress we've made over the past few years.

He supported us on the tax cuts of 1981. And he supported our efforts to control and then cut inflation. So that when we came in, inflation was up here, 12.4 percent, and now it's down here at 1.6 percent. He supported our efforts to create new jobs. And now we have a record number of people holding jobs in the United States and a record number of people holding jobs in North Carolina. In fact, your State has one of the lowest unemployment rates in the entire country. But I know things aren't perfect. I know there've been pains and strains here -- pockets of industry that've not only not recovered but that have gotten worse in some respects. There have been plant closings, and there have been farmers who've had it rough. We're not unaware of this back in Washington -- we're totally aware of it. And part of the reason, again, is Jim Broyhill. Don't think he isn't pressing constantly for the interests of North Carolina. And we respect his caring and concern. And we listen to him, and we mean to continue listening to him.

We may not always see everything eye to eye, but we have the same desire: to make life better for the people of our country and the people of this region. And that's what we're working for, together. Jim and I know American workers can outwork, outproduce, and outcompete anybody in the world. And that's why we'll continue to press for that level playing field through fair trade actions in every arena. Jim, Jesse, and I will continue to work together for America and North Carolina. We've solved a lot of problems in the last 5 years, and we're determined to solve these, too.

By the way, I also want to mention that Jim has just come through a primary where he faced a most worthy opponent, Dave Funderburk. I know Dave isn't here today, but Dave is a young star with a bright and beckoning future, and I wish him well. And of Governor Jim Martin. It's his kind of leadership that has helped North Carolina get through the occasional economic storms, his kind of leadership that has created an environment that is hospitable to employment and new jobs. He was a great Congressman, and now he's a great Governor. So, what do you say: Do you think you can add a new name to the classic team of Martin, East, and Helms?

The President. Will you work hard for him so that he can come to Washington and work hard as a member of the Republican majority and support me? If you do that, you're going to be helping to make sure that Jesse stays on as chairman of the Senate Agriculture Committee. Will you send back to Washington my friends Bill Cobey and Howard Coble?

The President. And Alex McMillan and Bill Hendon? And that's good, because I need them, too, and we all do. You know, talking about the Governor here, I have to tell you something. I have a warm feeling, as you can imagine, for Governors, having spent some time as one myself. I don't know that I ever had a chance to tell him; I got into some dark days in California when I first became Governor. And one day I was on my way to the office, and I was listening to a disc jockey show on the car radio. And all of a sudden this disc jockey said something that won my heart. Out of a clear blue sky he said, ``Every man should take unto himself a wife, because sooner or later something is bound to happen that you can't blame on the Governor.'' [Laughter] Well, I couldn't resist telling that. I thank you.

I have a lot of faith in you, and I'm hoping that on election night someone will suddenly on the media be reporting excitedly a Broyhill sweep. And then he'll follow it with, ``And as North Carolina goes, so goes the Nation.'' That sounds nice, doesn't it? And, you know, with you having Jesse and Senator East both there in Washington, and now continue on this path -- every once in a while I run into people that think that, in our system of checks and balances, it maybe makes sense to have a Senator of each party in the Senate. That isn't part of the checks and balances. [Laughter] Why should you send a Senator to Washington to undo everything the other Senator is trying to do for you? Send two of them there, and we'll get a lot of things done.

Well, I thank you very much for your warm welcome and even for your warm weather. And thank you all. God bless you. And send these people I've just been talking about back to Washington. They'll come back and visit you. All right. Thank you.

Today the United Nations observes World Environment Day. The United States joins in this celebration, affirming our belief that the most important resource of any nation is its people. The successful promotion of resource conservation and wise stewardship, like the development of both human and material resources, depends on the institutional arrangements which permit the free exercise of human creativity. Americans have valued highly personal liberty and have favored institutions which permitted a wide range of individual activity largely free of social and political constraints. Yet the freedoms which we enjoy have not been secure in many other lands or at most other times throughout history.

Working over the past four centuries through the institutions of limited government, secure property, personal liberty, individual enterprise, and voluntary association, Americans turned a nearly unpopulated continent into a prosperous, peaceful, and protective home for 240 million persons. To be sure, America was blessed with vast amounts of farmland, timber, water, and minerals. Nevertheless, it took hard work, sacrifice, daring, initiative, and a willingness to risk failure by millions of free men and women to create the kind of society Americans enjoy today. Americans have been so successful at making intelligent use of their land and its resources that many people believe the effort to sustain our current standard of living long into the future will bring about the exhaustion of natural resources as well as unacceptable environmental damage.

While it is a truism that this is a finite world with physical limits to resources, it is not correct to conclude that, therefore, the Nation will eventually lose the ability and the resources necessary to sustain modern civilization. In practice this should never occur because as a given resource is used up its price rises, stimulating conservation, the search for additional supplies, and substitution of new resources for the depleted one. A superior natural resources policy is one that favors those institutions by which new resources are substituted for old ones: individual enterprise, guided by the price signals of the market, and technological advances that conserve resources and permit them to be used more efficiently. For example, in the past 5 years, America has transformed an energy crisis into energy abundance by increasing our production, by using our energy more efficiently, by conservation, and by diversifying our supplies. We have rightly placed our trust in our people; in the strength of American businesses, large and small; and in the belief that we were not running out of energy, only imagination.

One month ago today, seven leaders of the free world met in one of the largest capital cities in the world: Tokyo, Japan. That country is a free and prosperous nation of many people and few natural resources. Like its neighbors surrounding the Pacific, it is thriving dynamically through free exchange, building on its rich cultural heritage. While we were there, we adopted the Tokyo Declaration: Looking Forward to a Better Future, and we declared our obligation to pass on to future generations a healthy environment and a culture rich in both spiritual and material values. We observed that personal initiative, individual creativity, and social justice are the main sources of progress in the world. The United States pledged there, and we renew our pledge to the world today: ``More than ever we have all to join our energies in the search for a safer and healthier, more civilized and prosperous, free and peaceful world.'' In so doing, all the nations of the world can join us in facing the future with confidence.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Mark S. Fowler to be a member of the Federal Communications Commission. This is a reappointment, and upon confirmation, he will be redesignated Chairman.

The President stressed, in particular, that at his November meeting in Geneva with General Secretary Gorbachev of the Soviet Union the two leaders had reaffirmed their support for a global ban on chemical weapons, which the United States is seeking at the Conference on Disarmament, and that they had agreed to accelerate efforts to conclude an effective and verifiable agreement. The President attaches great importance to this commitment and has, therefore, instructed the United States delegation to continue to seek mutually acceptable solutions to the outstanding issues in the negotiations on a chemical weapons ban, both in the Conference on Disarmament and in the accompanying bilateral talks with the Soviet Union.

At the President's request, Vice President Bush addressed the Conference on Disarmament in 1983 and 1984. On both occasions he introduced U.S. initiatives in the chemical weapons negotiations. The Vice President continues to take great interest in our efforts to successfully complete the negotiations on a treaty at an early date.

The President asked Ambassador Lowitz, in their meeting today, to continue to keep him fully informed on the progress of these negotiations as well as on other important issues under consideration in the Conference on Disarmament. He also requested that Ambassador Lowitz convey to the representatives of the other member states of the Conference his sincere hope that a spirit of dedication and vigorous work would result in a successful agreement on a comprehensive chemical weapons ban and his conviction that the Conference is fully capable of achieving such an agreement, which the peace-loving nations of the world greatly desire. He stated that, for its part, the United States again stands ready to intensify even further these negotiations when the Conference reconvenes and called upon the other members of this unique body -- the sole arms control negotiating forum in which all regions of the world participate -- to do likewise.

Today's vote in the Senate on the Saudi arms sale confirms America's commitment to a security relationship that has served both the United States and Saudi Arabia well over the past 40 years. The United States continues to consider the security and well-being of Saudi Arabia and the stability of the Persian Gulf to be a matter of vital interest. Similarly, our commitment to freedom of navigation in the Gulf remains firm. We are determined to work with the Saudis and other friendly states to achieve our shared goal of peace and stability in the region.

Senate consideration of the Agreement, which was transmitted for advice and consent to ratification by letter dated August 10, 1984, has been delayed in light of the concern expressed that it lacked strong ``anti-treaty shopping'' provisions. The 1986 Protocol remedies the situation by providing rules designed to prevent residents of third countries from investing through China in order to get the benefits of the income tax treaty.

It is most desirable that this Protocol, together with the Agreement, the 1984 Protocol thereto, and the related exchange of notes, be considered by the Senate as soon as possible and that the Senate give advice and consent to ratification of these instruments.

The President believes the recent decline in oil prices will improve economic growth, reduce the cost of energy to consumers, and contribute to maintaining the current low rate of inflation. The decline in oil prices is an excellent example of the benefits of relying on the principles of a free market. At the same time, the President is intent upon maintaining our national energy security and ensuring that the United States does not become unduly dependent upon unreliable sources of oil.

In addition, the administration will pursue several new initiatives to preserve the viability of marginally economic production wells in the United States and reduce regulatory barriers to the operation and development of natural domestic energy resources.

Secretary Hodel also will fully consider every opportunity to strengthen our domestic petroleum capability when reviewing: (1) policies and procedures governing the availability of Federal lands both onshore and offshore and (2) leasing and operating regulations and procedures of the Bureau of Land Management and the Minerals Management Service.

The Secretary of Commerce will immediately begin a review of State coastal zone management programs to advance the national interest in energy security. This review will include all aspects of energy exploration, development, and production. Secretary Baldrige will also use his regulatory authority to minimize the overlap in judicial and administrative jurisdiction over coastal zone practices. Finally, he will seek to streamline permitting processes and reduce administrative costs to applicants.

The Environmental Protection Agency will be reviewing regulations affecting the petroleum industry to assure that maximum opportunity be given to regulatory approaches that are less costly, but equally protective. The Agency will continue to seek certainty and predictability in its regulations to foster an investment climate conducive to further development of the Nation's energy resources. Further, measures to encourage environmentally beneficial use of alternative fuels derived from natural gas will be explored.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 6th day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

H.R. 2672 fills this void by establishing a defined benefit plan and an optional thrift savings plan, which, in combination with Social Security, will provide attractive retirement benefits for Federal employees at a reasonable cost. The modern, comprehensive retirement program resulting from this bill is modeled after some of the better private sector plans. The enactment of this landmark legislation has been a major accomplishment that could not have been achieved without the efforts of many Members of Congress and representatives of the executive branch. I particularly want to salute Senators Roth, Stevens, and Eagleton, and Representatives Ford, Taylor, and Oakar for their tireless efforts during the last several years to design a new retirement plan that is fair both to Federal employees and taxpayers. This formidable goal has been accomplished with the enactment of H.R. 2672.

Although I strongly support the overall approach of H.R. 2672, some provisions of this legislation present problems, mostly technical or administrative, which may require future correction. In addition, I must object to the sections of H.R. 2672 that purport to give the Comptroller General authority to establish procedures for depositing monies into the Treasury to the credit of the Thrift Savings Fund; for example, 5 U.S.C. 8422(c), 8423(a) (4) 8432(f), and 22 U.S.C. 856(c). The grant to the Comptroller General, an officer of the Congress, of the authority to bind the Executive raises serious constitutional concerns relating to the separation of powers. The Attorney General is presently conducting litigation that challenges grants of Executive authority to the Comptroller General in several respects. I am therefore requesting that agencies responsible for administering the provisions of H.R. 2672 seek the advice of the Department of Justice in order to implement these provisions in a constitutional manner. Despite these concerns, I am very gratified to be able to sign this historic legislation.

I know that Secretaries Baldrige [Secretary of Commerce] and Baker [Secretary of the Treasury] have briefed you on trade and tax policies. And I'm grateful for this opportunity to speak with you personally. Grassroots America will be playing a decisive role in the next few weeks as Congress decides some issues that are at the heart of our country's security and economic well-being. Your active support will make a difference and, believe me, is really appreciated here.

Seriously though, we must be vigilant to the power of the special interests. And I hope you'll put the word out that it's time to get on the tax reform bandwagon. Anybody waiting for special accommodations is going to be left behind. Whether America takes this giant step forward depends on grassroots Americans, like yourselves, combating the special interests. I hope I can count on you to put tax reform on your front burner. [Applause] You just made my day. [Laughter] Well, the order of the day is: Get with the program! And good economics will usher us to a better future, but we must also ensure that when America -- or when tomorrow comes, America is secure and firm in its commitment to those principles that we, as a free people, believe in.

But expressions of solidarity aren't enough. Albert Camus, a leader in the French underground during the Nazi occupation, wrote during the war, ``Contrary to what we sometimes used to think, the spirit is of no avail against the sword, but that the spirit together with the sword will always win out over the sword alone.'' Well, those who fight for freedom are our brothers and sisters, and they deserve more from the United States than words. With our adversary arming totalitarian forces to the teeth, we must have the courage to give those who share our ideals, especially those in this hemisphere, what they need to defend themselves and to win the day.

In recent years we've witnessed in the Americas the greatest expansion of democracy in this century. Today 90 percent of the people of the Western Hemisphere -- North, South, and Central America -- live in countries that are democracies or are in transition to democracy. We cannot stand by and permit a Soviet beachhead, which will be used to undermine this process, to be consolidated on the mainland of the Western Hemisphere. The zeal of the Communist regime in Managua for internal repression is matched only by its commitment to subvert neighboring democracies and to spread terror and chaos far and near. The Nicaraguan Government has provided weapons, logistical support, and training for Communist revolutionary movements that are plaguing Latin America. And the Palestinian Liberation Organization, Italy's Red Brigade, the Baader-Meinhof gang, and agents of Colonel Qadhafi -- all are in and out of Managua all the time, and there is a close connection. Now, is this a threat to the rest of Central and South America? Yes. Is this a threat, ultimately, to the United States? Yes. The strategy of the Sandinistas should now be clear to everyone. It's a strategy of delay -- dragging out negotiations, never taking a serious position -- so they can wipe out their opposition while Congress waits to see if a peace treaty is around the corner. Well, if we continue to delay, all we are doing is playing into the hands of the Nicaraguan Communists. We must stop falling victim to stall tactics.

We cannot, we must not, downplay the threat to our country or to freedom in the hemisphere. To deny aid to the contras is a mandate for inaction which could well result in the creation of a Libya on our own doorstep. Let's not kid ourselves. If the opponents of aid have their way -- preventing us from assisting our friends -- Central America could soon become a divided, war-torn region with Nicaragua a refuge and safe haven for terrorism. If this happens, the American people will know who to blame. As President of the United States, my primary job is not placing blame; it's the security of this country. Deserting the Nicaraguan freedom fighters would be a national security disaster for the United States. And together we can see this never happens.

So, our greater days do lie ahead. Van Dyke's poem says it well: ``But the glory of the present is to make the future free. We love our land for what she is and what she is to be.'' Well, I thank you all again for all that you're doing, appreciate very much the opportunity to spend these few minutes with you. God bless you all.

You see, if the Congress moves speedily this summer, most of you are going to be getting a reduction in tax rates starting next year. That's because there's a new bill that's going to drastically overhaul the tax code and reduce the current 14 tax rates to only 2 -- 15 percent and 27 percent. That means 80 percent of the American people will be paying the rate of 15 percent or less. For most of you, that's going to be a significant tax cut.

But lower tax rates aren't all. This new legislation raises the personal and dependent's exemption from $1,080 to $2,000 for all but the very richest Americans. It also removes 6 million poor people from the income tax rolls, making it one of the most effective antipoverty programs in our history. And the Council of Economic Advisers tells me that the added incentives and efficiencies in the bill could increase our country's growth rate nearly 10 percent over the next decade. That could mean as many as 4 million new jobs. It could also mean as much as $600 to $900 more real income per household each year; $600 to $900 each year -- now, that could come in handy. So, extra money in your pocket, millions of new jobs over the next decade -- how could all of this come just from changing the tax code? Well, let me explain.

You see, the current code -- taking up loads of shelf space and filled with paragraphs like the one I just read -- is hardly a code at all. It's a hodgepodge of special favors, a product of the great Washington taffy-pull: the favor-seeking and influence peddling. So, it's unfair, yes. But even worse, all this special privilege makes the code the single biggest obstacle to economic growth in our nation today. That's because it thwarts the very people who create wealth and generate new jobs, the people who take a risk, go out on their own with a bright idea and start a new business, those darers and dreamers we call entrepreneurs. But to get their businesses up and running these entrepreneurs need capital -- seed money. And many potential investors aren't interested in helping the entrepreneurs precisely because the tax code makes it far more profitable to divert their money into nonproductive tax shelters. Because of these shelters -- the fancy schemes and fast angles protected and encouraged by the law -- there's less investment in the new products and services offered by the entrepreneurs, products and services that would help the consumer and stimulate growth. So, when you get down to it, the tax shelters aren't really just a break for a lucky few; they're a drag on the whole national economy and a form of hidden taxation on us all.

Right now the Senate has before it an excellent bill framed by Senators Packwood and Long of the Senate Finance Committee and pushed hard by Majority Leader Bob Dole. If we can get that bill adopted, if we can stop the Washington lobbyists from loading it up with the bells and whistles of special privilege, we hope to get the House of Representatives to agree to it in legislative conference. And that means that I could sign that bill by Labor Day. What a way to end the summer. Bipartisanship -- Democrats and Republicans pulling together.

But we need your help. You know, there's a story about the candidate for public office who was once asked why he didn't win the election. ``A shortage of votes,'' he replied. Well, that's not as silly as it sounds. I hope each of you will help us out. I hope that you'll join me in supporting tax reform and the booming economic growth that will come with it.

It is deeply disturbing that accidental injury is the leading cause of death among children in the United States. More than 10,000 children die each year and thousands more are left with physical damage as a result of accidents.

Experts predict that the incidence of accidental deaths among our children can be decreased by 90 percent by preventing accidental injuries and seeking immediate emergency care when needed. Working together, parents, schools, private and voluntary organizations, and government at all levels can bring about a greater public understanding of this problem and of strategies for solving it.

Well, tonight's gala will enable this historic hall, as we've been told, to continue and expand its work in bringing theatre to the heart of our Nation's Capital. And to everyone here tonight, especially the remarkably generous Carl Lindner, Nancy and I are grateful for what you've done. After all, it's our own neighborhood that you're helping to spruce up. To Ford's Theatre chairmen Millie O'Neill, Carol Laxalt, executive producer Frankie Hewitt, and gala chairman Mary Jane Wick -- you've made special efforts, and we want to join in giving you our special thanks. And by the way, congratulations to you, Mary Jane, for your recognition here tonight.

Ford's is a theatre set apart. Seriously, it is a kind of shrine, one of those rare buildings that puts us directly in touch with the great men and events of our past. And what gives this house its sense of presence, what makes Ford's central to the history of our country and indeed of the world, is what took place here one foggy night more than a century ago, up there, in that box.

On the evening of Good Friday 1865, President and Mrs. Abraham Lincoln drove in their carriage from the White House to this theatre through streets so thick with mist that the Lincolns could hardly make out the buildings they passed. And just 5 days before, Lee had surrendered the Army of Northern Virginia, and the long and terrible war was coming to an end at last. On that gloomy night Mr. Lincoln came here seeking some measure of relaxation, some measure of refreshment, from a comedy entitled ``My American Cousin.'' And when the President and his party entered the theatre, an actor on stage ad-libbed a line: ``This reminds me of a story, as Mr. Lincoln would say,'' and the audience roared. When the President and his party entered the state box, no one noticed that a peephole had been dug in the door. And it was during the third act that the shot rang out. And for an instant, no one moved. Then Mr. Lincoln slumped forward. As Mrs. Lincoln reached to support him, John Wilkes Booth leapt from the state box to the stage below -- from that box to this stage -- and escaped through a side door. Mr. Lincoln was carried to a house across the street. At shortly past 7 the next morning, he died. Lincoln, Father Abraham, was gone.

Is it fitting for us to come here tonight in a spirit of celebration, for this theatre once again to ring out with laughter? I believe that Mr. Lincoln himself would have wanted it so. He loved the theater, his biographers tell us, and nothing could have pleased him more than the performances we've seen here tonight. But more profoundly, it was the message of his life, as it is the message of our history, that joy must triumph over sorrow, that good is greater than evil, that laughter, in the end, must do away with tears.

Some of his harshest critics when he was living as President in the White House assailed him because they said there was too much laughter and he was too prone to joke. And he said, ``I could not perform for 15 minutes the tasks that confront me here if I were not allowed to laugh.'' Well, his laughter in the end must do away with tears, and that's why we're here tonight. That's why we must fill this hall with song and dance and comedy and above all with the most triumphant sound known to man -- the sound of joyous applause. And certainly, the people standing behind me here on the stage and behind Nancy have richly deserved that kind of warm and happy applause.

The President. Good afternoon, and welcome to the Rose Garden. The members of the Commission on the Space Shuttle Challenger Accident have just briefed me on their report. It examines the reasons for the accident. It presents recommendations on what we must do to help prevent such a tragedy from occurring again. And I look forward to reading and reviewing it in thorough detail.

And let me give my heartfelt thanks to the members and staff of the Rogers commission. They've performed their task with distinction, and it was an arduous one. To a nation still suffering from the trauma of the loss of the Challenger and her brave crew, it was often a painful duty. Yet the Commission members were resolute. Their investigation was thorough and comprehensive and completed within the mandated time. They went in with their eyes wide open and were unflinching in pursuit of the facts. Though saddened and chastened, our nation will be stronger because of their courage and dedication. And as we push forward in our conquest of space -- and push forward we will -- our shuttle program will be safer and better prepared for the challenges that lie ahead. I want to thank the Congress for letting the Commission proceed unfettered with its investigation, and also the staff of NASA, the Department of Defense, the Federal Aviation Administration, the National Transportation Safety Board, and others, whose cooperation made the Commission's report possible.

And today we see once again that our true faith as a nation lies in our free and open society. In America we learn from our setbacks as well as our successes. And although the lessons of failure are hard, they are often the most important on the road to progress. We've learned in these past few months that we're frail and fallible, but we have also learned that we have the courage to face our faults and the strength to correct our errors. Because we don't hide our mistakes, we're not condemned to repeat them. Because we're an open society, we have room to grow. We can count on their courage to pull us through the hard places -- I'm speaking now of the American people, because we base our trust on the American people. And that's why we can look to their wisdom, creativity, to show us the way to the future.

This has been a difficult passage for America, but we will go on just as the crew of the space shuttle Challenger would have wanted us to. We'll use every ounce of American skill, ingenuity, and gumption; and we'll work twice as hard and be twice as vigilant. We'll simply do what has to be done to make our space program safe and reliable and a renewed source of pride to our nation.

America has a claim to stake on the future. We've suffered a tragedy and a setback, but we'll forge ahead, wiser this time, and undaunted -- as undaunted as the spirit of the Challenger and her seven heroes.

Thank you very much, and good evening. It's an honor to speak to you today before the members and guests of the Georgetown University Center for Strategic and International Studies, an institution whose work so directly affects the security of our nation. I want to commend your founders, Admiral Arleigh Burke and Ambassador David Abshire, and your president and chief executive officer, Joe Jordan, for all they've done to make this institution so worthy of respect. And permit me to commend as well those of you today who are present from the private sector. In supporting CSIS, you do yourselves and your nation a service.

This evening I would like to speak briefly on a matter of central importance to the security of our nation and hemisphere, but a matter, above all, of central importance to the cause of human liberty. I refer to aid for the democratic resistance forces of Nicaragua. Now, I know that each of you is a foreign policy expert and that you've studied this issue, each of you, in detail; and I value that. But in a complex of politics, in the midst of all the twistings and turnings, one can sometimes discern a moment of impending decision, a moment to reduce the issue at hand to the plain facts and submit, if you will, the closing argument. With your permission, I would like to submit that argument this evening before you and the Nation.

After the nearly 7 years during which the Nicaraguan Communists have held power, there can no longer be any legitimate doubt about the nature of their regime. There is a brave man in Nicaragua, a man who courageously opposed the Somoza dictatorship. And listen for a moment to that man, to the words of Cardinal Obando y Bravo, Archbishop of Managua, as they recently appeared in the Washington Post: To consider the Sandinista regime democratic, as Cardinal Obando y Bravo asserts, is ``to ignore the mass exodus of the Miskito Indians, who on numerous occasions fled in the thousands. It is also to ignore the departure of tens of thousands of Nicaraguan men and women of every age, profession, economic status, and political persuasion. It is to ignore that many of those who are leaders or participants in the counterrevolution were once leaders or members of the Sandinista front or were ministers in the Sandinista government. It is to ignore the lack of any justification for the most terrible violation of freedom of the press and of speech in the history of our country. It is to ignore the progressive and suffocating restriction of public liberties under the cover of an interminable national emergency law and the continual violation of human rights. It is to ignore the expulsion of priests and the mass exodus of young people eligible for military service . . . None of this is true of a government that has the sympathy and general support of the people.'' Well, I might add that not long after Cardinal Obando y Bravo wrote that statement for the Washington Post, the Sandinista regime cut off electricity to his office -- just one more act of harassment among many scores of such acts visited upon him.

Yet despite the brutal and totalitarian nature of the Sandinista regime, the struggle for freedom inside Nicaragua continues. By the thousands, men and women have moved into the countryside and taken up arms. Indeed, today these democratic resistance forces number some 20,000 -- four times the number of troops the Sandinistas had in the field when they themselves seized power. In full knowledge, the members of the resistance have chosen to separate themselves from their families and homes, to live in conditions of immense hardship, often with scant water and food, and to expose themselves to the dangers of battle. They fight to liberate their country from a regime that is loyal only to Communist powers. They fight for freedom.

Just as the men and women of the resistance have decided what they must do, so, too, have Gorbachev, Castro, Arafat, and Qadhafi. Soviet military advisers in Nicaragua number in the hundreds. The Sandinistas possess at least six Soviet-built HIND attack helicopters -- helicopters that represent, in effect, flying tanks. Cuban troops swarm the streets of Managua by the scores, and the PLO has established an embassy there. Links between the Sandinistas, the PLO, the Libyans, and others are extensive. And let no one forget the photograph of Libya's Qadhafi and the Sandinistas' Ortega. In that photo there they stand, their fists clenched in a salute of solidarity.

The Communists have made their decision; the resistance has made its decision; and now we must make ours. The choice is stark; the choice is unavoidable. We can help our neighbors in their struggle for freedom, or, by doing nothing, we can abandon them to a Communist dictatorship. Over 3 months ago, I submitted to the Congress a plan to provide the resistance forces of Nicaragua with $100 million in urgently needed support. More than 2 months ago, the Senate approved the plan. Now, at last, a new vote in the House is scheduled to take place. I want the House -- I want the country -- to know how much is riding on this decision.

If the House chooses to deny to the Nicaraguan resistance the help it needs and deserves, this will, in effect, grant permission to the Sandinistas to ignore any negotiated settlement and pursue a military victory instead. The final outcome is only too predictable. Backed by a steady supply of arms from the Soviets and Cubans, the Sandinistas will be able to pin down the freedom fighters, surround them, and, in time, crush them. Whatever is left of free institutions in Nicaragua will be utterly destroyed. And upon the ruins of Nicaragua's best yearnings and aspirations, upon the mutilated hopes of her people, a second Cuba -- indeed a second Libya -- will have been ruthlessly built. We can be certain that tens of thousands of Nicaraguan refugees will seek to inundate our Southern States. More than a quarter of a million Nicaraguans, nearly 10 percent of the entire population, have already fled the country.

But none of this need take place. If the House votes to give the Nicaraguan resistance the support we've proposed, democracy in that nation can be given a chance. Again and again, the freedom fighters have proven their commitment to just this hope. Last month they took steps to broaden their political base and increase their support among the Nicaraguan people. With adequate training and supplies, they could mobilize the oppressed people of their country and win untold new recruits. If only the House votes yes.

Our goal is not -- and repeat not -- a military solution. Instead we seek to help the freedom fighters achieve only the leverage they need to bring the Communists to the table and negotiate a political and democratic solution. Three times the resistance has already offered to put down its arms and go to the table. Three times the Communists have said no. The Catholic Church in Nicaragua supports an internal reconciliation aimed at achieving democracy. The Communists have rejected this plan. The Contadora nations have backed a negotiated peace based, again, upon internal reconciliation and democracy. The Sandinistas have refused to grant these proposals serious consideration.

The Communists are intransigent because they believe they can afford to be. Each day the military situation in Nicaragua twists another dangerous degree in favor of the Communists. In the months since we made our initial request for assistance, Soviet-supplied weapons in Nicaragua have mounted, censorship and other human rights violations have increased, and human suffering has grown. And now those who oppose aid must ask searching and painful questions. Can we bear responsibility for such anguish? Can we permit ourselves to acquiesce in the Sandinista tactic of delay, delay, delay?

Again, I must repeat that there is hope. Just 10 years ago, less than one-third of the people of Latin America lived in democracies. Today that figure is 90 percent. Many had written off El Salvador. Others claimed there was no hope in Honduras and Guatemala. Today those nations have their freedom, and today democracy in Latin America constitutes a swelling and life-giving tide. It can still flood its powerful, cleansing way into Nicaragua -- the Communist wall against it is high, but not yet too high -- if only the House takes action. And I appeal here to Democrats and Republicans alike: The issue is human freedom, and it towers above all partisan concerns. What it comes down to in the end is the matter of witness, of choosing whether to believe those whom we know to be providing us with accurate reports about Nicaragua, or to listen instead to the whispering voices within our own minds that say there is no trouble there. Not because this is the truth, but because we don't want to be convenienced [inconvenienced] by the need to risk action.

The Cardinal goes on to relate that church offices had been appropriated by government order; that a church printing press had been confiscated by the state security police; that the government had shut down Radio Catolica, the only Catholic radio station; and that even the Sunday bulletin, with the prayers and texts for the day, had been confiscated. ``It was at this point,'' the Cardinal writes, ``when the Church was gagged and bound, that your request arrived. The reading for the day pricked my conscience. The Sanhedrin sent for Peter and John, intending to force them into silence. `But Peter and John said to them in reply, is it right in God's eyes for us to obey you rather than God? Judge for yourselves. We cannot possibly give up speaking of things we have seen and heard.''' Those were the Archbishop's words.

The penultimate round of the Conference on Confidence and Security Building Measures and Disarmament in Europe (CDE) begins in Stockholm on June 10. The 35 signatories of the Helsinki Final Act are charged with adopting militarily significant, verifiable measures designed to increase openness about military activities in Europe, from the Atlantic to the Urals. Implementation of such measures would enhance stability and security by giving all participating States greater confidence in the accuracy of information upon which European security decisions are based.

The President attaches great importance to the CDE as an integral part of our broad concept of security, encompassing political, economic, cultural, and humanitarian issues as well as military matters. He believes that success in the CDE could contribute to improved East-West relations and help to lower the artificial barriers that divide East from West in Europe. He is concerned that, with only 10 negotiating weeks remaining before the Conference adjourns, the prospects for success are diminishing rapidly, and the opportunities offered by the CDE could be lost. The previous round, which we and our allies as well as many neutral and nonaligned states believed was critical, made minimal progress because of Soviet reluctance to engage seriously in the drafting process.

Upon resumption of the talks, the first task of the conferees must be to decide on the level of ground force and joint arms activities for which advance notice must be given and the measures necessary to verify compliance with such provisions. Western proposals provide extensive information on such exercises and a reasonable verification scheme.

The last moment to resolve this impasse has arrived. The President has instructed Ambassador Robert L. Barry, head of the U.S. delegation in Stockholm, to press for real progress in the Conference in the next round, which ends in July.

The President. Well, if I were not as used to the extravagant claims of Cuban propaganda as I am, I would be outraged by such a charge. First of all, there are no U.S. forces in Nicaragua, but there are several thousand Cubans there. So, it makes you wonder who might be the real imperialists; that's not even to mention the Soviets or the Bulgarians or the Czechs or the East Germans or the Vietnamese or the North Koreans or the PLO or the Libyans or the Iranians. Does anyone really believe that these people are in Nicaragua to help them harvest their coffee crop?

What we are doing is supporting democracy in Nicaragua and all the people who seek to build it. They're the real revolutionaries. They joined the popular effort to overthrow Somoza, but then they saw their democratic revolution betrayed. What we're witnessing is very much a repetition of the betrayal of the Cuban revolution by the Communists. In each case the reins of power were seized by a well-organized, disciplined minority of Communists who liquidated the genuine democrats.

They do not rule by the people's consent. They are militarizing and regimenting Nicaraguan society because they fear the power of the real democratic revolution, still very much alive. The people are joining a spontaneous uprising against the Sandinistas, an uprising which today has more than twice as many guerrillas as did the Sandinista movement when it was fighting Somoza. The Nicaraguan democrats have organized themselves into an effective movement. All they need is enough material support to compete with the vast quantities of arms supplied to the Sandinistas by Cuba and the Soviet bloc. By the way, they should not be called Sandinistas -- they've stolen the name of a true national leader who, in fact, rejected communism. What they really are, in truth, are Stalinistas because their revolution is a Stalinist one.

The President. In the first place, there's no truce in the fighting because the Communist regime feels that it can achieve its objectives without peaceful negotiations with the democratic opposition and by delaying negotiations with its Central American neighbors. It should be clear to everyone that the Sandinista strategy is to delay. The longer they can drag out negotiations, the easier it is for them to destroy the democratic forces while Congress waits to see if a peace treaty is just around the corner. But with each day of delay, the Communists are attacking and killing freedom fighters while we deny them the means even to defend themselves.

Since the March 19th vote in Congress denying aid to the resistance, the Sandinistas have used the delay to move to consolidate their totalitarian control over society. They have increased their militarization of the country, invaded Honduras, and launched an unprovoked attack on a number of Miskito Indian villages. That attack triggered a panic that led to an exodus of 11,800 villagers to Honduras. The regime has forced thousands of small businessmen to shut down. And the persecution of the church continues every day. Didn't Cardinal Obando y Bravo just say that the Communists were suffocating the church? Unless we help those who are resisting these crimes against the Nicaraguan people, we will share responsibility for the increasing toll of human suffering. Any further delay by us just plays into the hands of the Communists and their stalling tactics.

We have never shied away from negotiations as a solution, but we would want them to result in a real democracy in Nicaragua in which all sectors of the Nicaraguan society are really free to participate. We have always supported a dialog of reconciliation and believe that this is the answer. President Duarte has taken the courageous step of reopening talks with the armed and unarmed opposition in his country -- why can't the Sandinistas? Are they afraid that these talks would lead to the real, democratic outcome we all hope to achieve? Are they worried that they would result in real arms reductions and the elimination of their Soviet, Cuban, and other Soviet-bloc advisers?

The President. For one, the discoveries we made in Grenada itself were an eye-opener. We knew of the violence in Grenada and of that island's growing ties with Cuba, the Soviet Union, and the international Communist movement. But it wasn't until our boys went down to rescue the American students there that we realized how bad things had become for the Grenadian people. Their country had been turned into a base for Soviet-Cuban expansionism in our hemisphere. And while constructing this garrison state, the Communists were destroying everything that benefited the people: the consumer economy, basic individual freedoms and rights, schools and even churches. Everything was politicized. You couldn't do anything or go anywhere without being surrounded by Marxist-Leninist ideology.

The experience of the Grenadian people -- descending into communism and then emerging to breathe freely again -- is the unique feature of events on that island. Never before has an entire country made that journey. Individuals who successfully escaped communism have, but never a country. What a wonderful sight it is to see the exhilaration of people who have regained their freedom; to see people thrill once again at the chance of choosing their own leaders through free elections.

But there's still more significance in this episode. It was the first time in history that a Communist regime, having consolidated totalitarian control, was replaced by a democracy. The world has now seen the proof -- the old idea that communism is irreversible is itself being reversed. Communism is not the wave of the future. The future belongs to those people who are free to choose their own destiny. That's why we believe that democracy has the brightest future of all.

Q. Mr. President, before your Geneva summit with Soviet General Secretary Mikhail Gorbachev, you delivered a major speech at the United Nations in which you referred to five regional conflicts which were of major concern to the United States. Cuba is militarily involved in three of them: Angola, Ethiopia, and Nicaragua. Do you believe that your general policy of supporting the forces of freedom in these conflicts increased the danger of conflict between the United States and Cuba?

The President. No, I don't. The real conflict going on in each of those countries is between the Communist dictatorship and free people fighting to regain liberty for their entire country. None of these dictatorships could stand on their own without the massive intervention of Cuban troops and advisers sent as mercenaries for the Soviet Union. This intervention has placed innocent Cuban soldiers in the midst of other people's battles, and their lives are at great risk.

The United States would like to see these battles come to an end as quickly as possible, with freedom replacing dictatorship. That's why we support freedom fighters in each of these countries; indeed, in all countries. But we have no intention to get involved directly in any of these conflicts ourselves.

Today the freedom movements in Nicaragua and Angola are so strong that, if it weren't for the intervention of Cuban and other foreign forces, they could win all by themselves. Innocent Cuban soldiers are in a trap, and many may have to give their lives if they are forced by their government to stand in the way of these freedom movements. We deeply regret that Cuban families may suffer because their government insists on waging war in faraway lands.

Q. Since January 1961 the United States has not maintained diplomatic relations with Cuba. Throughout this period, the Cuban Government has pursued a policy of hostility toward the United States and has kept the Cuban populace in a military state of preparedness under the supposed threat of U.S. military intervention. Do the Cuban people have anything to fear from the United States?

The President. To the contrary. I would hope that the Cuban people would look at the United States as their friend and moral supporter. Unfortunately, they have been subjected to all sorts of propaganda about the supposedly aggressive intentions of the United States. In particular, the Cuban Government has used propaganda to blame my administration for the frequent defense mobilizations in Cuba and for the increasing militarization of Cuban society. But these mobilizations began before I was even nominated to be President. And they're nothing but false alarms. The Cuban Government is using the so-called American threat as an excuse to maintain its de facto martial law. So long as it has such an excuse, it can maintain a military-style system of authority that reaches into every household in Cuba. This, I suspect, is the way that the Government keeps control over the force that it fears most of all: the free will of the Cuban people themselves. The Government fears a free election. It knows that never in history has the full majority of a free electorate elected a Communist Party to power in any major nation.

At the time of the Cuban missile crisis, President Kennedy stated that there would be peace in the hemisphere if the nuclear missiles were removed and Cuba stopped exporting revolution. The Soviets removed the missiles, but Cuba never did stop its subversive activities in the region. And these activities were not just a problem for the United States. They were a threat to countries throughout Latin America. That's why the Organization of American States expelled Cuba. Cuba still isn't a member, and it won't be until it begins to behave like a good neighbor. Likewise, there cannot be good relations between the United States and Cuba until Cuba remembers the Golden Rule.

Imagine if we did to Cuba what it does to us and its other neighbors. Many Cuban parents would be heartsick over their children destroying their own lives with addictive drugs. Cuban towns would actually live in fear of attack by well-armed guerrillas. We do not want these things for the Cuban people. And so, we do not do these things to Cuba. Why does the Cuban Government do such things to its neighbors?

Q. When Radio Marti broadcasts began 1 year ago, the Cuban Government unilaterally suspended an immigration agreement with the United States and curtailed exile visits to the island. Critics have charged that the decision to establish Radio Marti is keeping Cuban families apart. Do you feel that broadcasting by Radio Marti prevents the reunification of Cuban families?

The President. No, I don't think so. It is the sincere wish of the United States to see Cuban families reunited. This was one of the key points in the U.S.-Cuban immigration agreement. But that agreement was suspended by the Cuban Government when Radio Marti went on the air. It was not Radio Marti that suspended reunification, it was the arbitrary decision of the Cuban Government, made with an eye to getting us to stop broadcasting the truth about Cuba.

In fact, we've learned many times from Communist refugees about the problem of whether to keep silent about Communist human rights violations in the hope that these regimes will release people and reunite families. We've learned that if we're silent, the Communists would have a perpetual lever to enforce this silence -- they could always hold people hostage to prevent the truth about the regime from being told. We can never accept such a situation. The truth as an instrument for the protection of human rights is too precious for us ever to relinquish it.

The President. We, in America, believe the free flow of information and ideas is one of the most important rights that a people can enjoy. And if people know the truth, if they can learn the facts of a situation, their common sense will help them reach good decisions on how to run their lives. Truth is indispensable to a free society. Where people cannot know the truth, a ruler can manipulate them into taking actions that they otherwise would not take on their own.

Thus, the absence of truth can damage the prospects for peace. If the Cuban people learn the truth about the United States, they will see that we are their friends and not their enemies. They will see that we are interested in peace and not war and prosperity for all and not poverty. This can only increase mutual understanding, which can only advance the cause of real peace. Radio Marti will help the Cuban people know the truth. It provides information being denied them by the Government. It was specifically for this reason that the radio bears the name of Jose Marti, one of the great champions of freedom of expression throughout the Americas.

Radio Marti has another purpose as well: to help the Cuban people communicate with each other. So long as the Government maintains a monopoly of information and total control over all the means of communication, the society will be fragmented and atomized. When people cannot communicate with each other, they find it hard to trust each other. So long as people are split apart and live in fear and mistrust, they can be easily dominated and manipulated. Radio Marti can help the Cuban people avoid such a trap. It can serve as a transmission belt of ideas and information for the Cuban people themselves.

The President. That's a difficult question. We want very much to see democracy in a free Cuba. A democratic Cuba would be a country at peace with itself and at peace with its neighbors. Democracies do not wage war on their neighbors. Democracies are always more peacefully inclined than totalitarian dictatorships because the people can restrain the excesses of their leaders. But however strong and deep our affinity for the Cuban people, we cannot solve their problems. What we can do is offer the Cuban people a beacon of hope by standing up for ideals we cherish: freedom, unconditional individual human rights, and equal justice under law and by standing by your friends and allies in the world who share these ideals. We also have an obligation to resist those ideas and forces, such as communism, which encroach on democratic ideals and destroy democratic societies.

If we're successful in resisting Soviet and Cuban expansionism, which we have been, we can show the world that communism can be resisted. And if the people living under communism can see this, they will know that there is hope. And if people have hope, then they can avoid becoming demoralized and paralyzed. They can learn that the future can be in their own hands, that it hasn't been completely taken away from them.

The President. Yes, I would. I would like you, the Cuban people, to know of America's deep and abiding respect for you and your contribution to Western civilization. There is a great number of your fellow Cubans in the United States whose hard work is making our country a better place. In fact, the city with the largest Cuban population outside Cuba is here in the United States -- the city of Miami. Thousands of you have family members living here. Your relatives are part of the heart and soul of our nation. It is my hope and prayer that the barriers separating you will someday be torn down.

That day will come when our relations with your country can be reestablished on the basis of the historic tradition, which has guided both nations. Americans fought for your independence, and Cuban battalions fought for our independence. One of George Washington's close friends was Juan de Miralles, a Cuban maritime businessman, who helped guarantee the credit notes for the purchase of arms and supplies for the American rebels. His wife, Dona Maria Josefa, and other Cuban women even sacrificed their jewelry to raise funds for American independence. It was this kind of devotion to the principles of our cause that won Miralles the highest regard of Washington, the father of our country.

I believe that the new day will come when U.S.-Cuban relations, based on the ideals of democracy, will be restored. The philosophical foundation of these relations already exists in the hearts of the Cuban people. We see them most dramatically expressed in the courage of the plantados, the men who will not sell their souls to gain greater creature comforts in the Cuban gulag. It is this principled devotion to the truth -- not the so-called truth of the Communist Party but the real truth as revealed to man in his soul -- that will be the source of that new day and a new era of peace between our nations. I hope and pray that this day will come soon.

The report, with appropriate background, describes efforts by the United States and others, including developments in the Contadora process, to promote a negotiated settlement in Nicaragua; alleged human rights violations by the democratic resistance and the Government of Nicaragua; and disbursement of humanitarian assistance to the democratic resistance (with a classified annex).

During the period covered by the report the Sandinistas continued to obstruct the Contadora process, maintaining their refusal to negotiate a comprehensive, verifiable agreement. The Contadora mediators set June 6 as a deadline for signing a final agreement. The United States has reiterated its support for a comprehensive, verifiable agreement implemented in a simultaneous fashion which is respected by all parties.

During the ninety days covered by the enclosed report the Sandinistas continued their aggression against other countries in the region. In late March the Sandinistas launched the largest border incursion to date into Honduras, when at least 1,500 Sandinista troops attacked up to 25 kilometers into Honduran territory. At the same time, Sandinista attacks against Indian villages caused some 11,000 refugees to flee to Honduras. As detailed in the enclosed report, the Sandinistas accelerated efforts to eliminate domestic dissent. They increased pressure on the Church and continued to violently harass members of the opposition political parties.

The need for sustaining U.S. support for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance forces is clear. Only in this way can the necessary pressure be applied effectively on the Sandinista leadership to: 1) move it toward serious internal and regional negotiations, 2) prevent its consolidating a Marxist-Leninist totalitarian state allied with Cuba and the Soviet bloc, and 3) cease its continuing aggression against the democracies of Central America.

It is a pleasure to be with you. A few weeks ago, the word was out that tax reform was dead, loopholed to death. And today, thanks to the work of Bob Packwood, Russell Long, and some other fine Senators, we're on the edge of a fine step forward. I would like to acknowledge the core group of Senators who've committed themselves to protecting the tax bill on the Senate floor. Some of them are here this morning -- that's those fellows I was shaking hands with. Without the help and commitment of Senators Dole, Simpson, Packwood, Long, Danforth, Chafee, Wallop, Goldwater, Thurmond, Quayle, Durenberger, Warner, Bradley, Moynihan, Mitchell, Hart, Biden, Kennedy, Rockefeller, and Eagleton, this bill might soon fall prey to the special interests. I want each of you to know how grateful I am for all that you're doing to ensure that this initiative is not sidetracked and that America does indeed take this step forward.

Well, if we work together, we're going to give the journalists and historians something to write about. The current tax code of the United States is an antiquated relic of a bygone era. The blatant unfairness of the code, loaded to the brim with special interest provisions, contributed to the general cynicism and economic stagnation that prevailed not so long ago. It doesn't take a Ph.D. to know something is fundamentally wrong when neighbors who earn similar incomes can easily be paying phenomenally different tax bills. And how does a corporate head feel about bearing the burden of a heavy tax load when he discovers his competition is legally paying next to nothing?

We've got a chance to clear up many of the inequities and bring down the tax rates of most Americans. And by now you know that what we're proposing is a tax code with 2 rates -- 15 and 27 percent. Eighty percent of the people will be paying either no tax or the lower rate. Maybe we should have said there are 3 brackets -- zero, 15, and 27. Most Americans will enjoy a reduction of their total tax obligation. The least fortunate will be taken off the rolls altogether. They'll be in that zero bracket.

For the business community our tax program represents a pathway to sanity. The current code is a bizarre menagerie, one that runs counter to the interests of good management and a sound economy. It encourages people to channel their resources into tax shelters rather than economy building investment. Businessmen spend too much of their time, effort, and creative genius maneuvering through the system rather than planning for efficient production, distribution, and sales. Our plan is to bring the maximum corporate rate down from 46 percent to 33 percent. At the same time, we'll be closing off many of the special tax benefits built into the system at the behest of this or that industry. We want to level off the playing field and make it fairer for those who compete within one industry and fairer for those segments of our economy which compete with each other. It wasn't a good idea for government to take sides in the first place. And I've always felt that the best thing government can do for our men and women of enterprise is to get out of their way.

Seriously, though, the Council of Economic Advisers suggests that this bill will add tremendous incentives and efficiencies to our economy. We could well increase our country's growth rate nearly 10 percent over the next decade, putting as much as $800 to $900 -- I'm sorry, $600 to $900 more in real income into the pockets of each household each year and creating as many as 4 million additional new jobs. These results are worth every ounce of energy that we put into tax reform. What we're doing is reaffirming the viability of our system of government. During the last decade there were some who seemed to have their doubts. Well, we've proven the naysayers wrong time and again. America works when we work.

I've had many wonderful experiences during my time in office, but the greatest thrill has been meeting and getting to know this generation out there of young Americans. I've met them on the campuses and high schools and in churches, in factories, and, just last week, at a Marine base in South Carolina. They're the best darn bunch of kids we've ever had. And what we're doing now is for them. We're going to pass on to them a free, prosperous, and secure America. That's what this is all about. And after what I've seen of them, they'll take darn good care of it when we do. Well, I thank you for all you are doing, and I certainly thank these gentlemen here behind me, these Senators, for what they're contributing to all of this and what they have brought forth.

Our youth are this Nation's hope for the future. Young people have so much to offer society and so much to hope for that their early death is always a keenly felt tragedy. That tragedy becomes even more poignant when a young person takes his or her own life.

During the last three decades, youth suicide rates have tripled. Last year alone, approximately five thousand young people took their own lives, and many thousands more attempted suicide. Their actions left family and friends bereft, heartbroken, and often baffled.

You know, the Air and Space Museum is one of my favorite places in the whole world, and I have a hunch that you feel the same way. Here are the aircraft, the jets, and the spaceships that broke the records, that went farther and higher and stayed up longer than any before. And these rooms are a living history of almost a century of progress and scientific achievement.

But you know, each one of these air and space ships needed a pilot to fly it to fame and glory. And without the spirit of adventure that animated these heroes of aviation, these flying machines would never have gotten off the ground. Men would have remained forever a slave to gravity, a prisoner of two dimensions on the Earth's surface.

And just above you is the plane that made the first powered flight: the Wright brothers' Flyer. That wasn't many years before I was born. The Wright brothers' first flight lasted only 12 seconds and covered only 120 feet -- and that is less than the wingspan of a 747 -- but that short flight transformed the world. Right above you, too, is the Spirit of St. Louis. That's the plane in which Charles Lindbergh made his lonely flight across the cold waters of the North Atlantic. I remember well the headlines and celebration when Lucky Lindy, as we called him, touched down safely in Europe. And there in back of us to my right you can see the Orange Bell X - 1 in which Chuck Yeager broke the sound barrier and proved he had ``the right stuff.'' And then here, too, are the capsules that first carried man into Earth orbit. And over there to my right you can reach out and literally touch another world: a piece of rock brought back from the Moon by our Apollo astronauts.

These magnificent men and their flying machines have enlarged our world. They gave mankind wings so that he could soar like his spirit, and they have immeasurably enriched all our lives. But this epic advance into the future has also been a tale of brave sacrifice. Chuck Yeager would be the first to tell you his conquest of the sound barrier was made possible by many fearless test pilots before him, not a few of whom sacrificed their lives in the hazardous line of duty. It was only after we lost three of our honored Apollo astronauts in a fire on the launchpad that we landed on the Moon. And we all remember too well that tragic day last January when we lost the brave crew of the Challenger. How our nation mourned. And yet even in our grief, we immediately set about our duty, finding the cause of the accident, doing everything humanly possible to prevent such a tragedy from ever happening again.

The investigation was expeditious and thorough. We learned again that we're far from perfect, that we're frail and fallible. We make mistakes, but we will not hide from our errors. Though saddened and chastened, our nation and our space program will be stronger because we have looked our faults straight in the face and we have done what must be done to correct them.

So, yes, we're going ahead with a space program worthy of the memory of the Challenger Seven. Their commitment to excellence will guide us on to new and even greater achievements and conquests. For our journey into space we have a copilot now: the memory, the spirit of the Challenger Seven. We will make our space program safe, reliable, and proud -- just as the Challenger Seven would have wanted. Our commitment to space hasn't and won't slacken one bit. In fact, it's strengthened. Because with their memory in mind, we're not only going to do everything we planned to do before, we're going to do it better.

Let me tell you about the future. Not only will we maintain our commitments to our national security and civil government satellite launchings, but we're also actively encouraging the private sector to begin its own space ventures. We're going to let the American spirit of enterprise loose in the limitless frontiers of space. And we're going to build a manned space station for the 1990's. That model, I think, is above me here and to the left. Some of you Young Astronauts could be its first inhabitants. And some of you may even pilot the spaceplane that we're building so that we can commute up and down to our new homes in the sky. The spaceplane will be a hypersonic marvel that can take off from a standing runway, accelerate up to 25 times the speed of sound, and break into Earth orbit. We should have the first test model ready about 1993. And if any of you are its pilot, I'd like to have you take me along for a ride. [Laughter] Nancy says I'm good company, and -- [laughter] -- sometimes I can make people laugh when I tell stories.

This may sound like dreaming; well, it is -- the sort of dream that comes true. You know, I've lived through a sizable chunk of this 20th century, and I've seen some mighty big changes in my lifetime. Believe it or not, I can remember the first time I ever heard a sound brought from radio. I was about the age of some of the older ones here -- in high school -- and there was a young man -- a little older -- in our town. He was quite a scientist in his own development of himself. He was an experimenter, like so many of you, and he built himself a little crystal radio set. There was no such thing then as a manufactured, or factory-built, radio set. You couldn't go into a store and buy one. There were people like this young man who'd experimented and had created these sets. You didn't have a loudspeaker; you had to put on earphones to hear if they could find anything. And there was the earliest radio station in America -- Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. And so, we walked all over town with him on a Sunday afternoon -- several of us. And he had an aerial he kept holding up trying to find, out of the air, some sound. And down by the river in Dixon, Illinois, suddenly he turned the earphone around so we could hear, and we were hearing orchestra music. And it was coming from KDKA in Pittsburgh -- as I say, one of the first -- the first radio station.

Now, to show you how fast things advance -- 9 years later I got my first job, after graduating from college, as a radio sports broadcaster. Radio had become an institution; everybody in the land could listen to radio. There were hundreds of radio stations. And it was a great industry, a national institution, with programs and radio stars known nationwide because of its enormous impact -- and all in those 9 years.

Since then, the pace of technological progress has become ever more rapid, and the changes that I've seen in my lifetime will be dwarfed by the changes you see in yours. I envy you that. But the experiments I saw on my way in convince me that many of these changes will be made by the young men and women -- the Young Astronauts -- right here in this room. As you know, 1992 is designated International Space Year. We chose that year because it's the 500th anniversary of Christopher Columbus' discovery of America. Each one of you young astronauts, scientists, and experimenters is a future Columbus, an explorer of the 20th and the 21st centuries.

Remember this: When we come to the edge of our known world, we're standing on the shores of the infinite. Dip your hand in that limitless sea; you're touching the mystery of God's universe. Set sail across its waters, and you embark on the boldest, most noble adventure of all. Out beyond our present horizons lie whole new continents of possibility, new worlds of hope waiting to be discovered. We've traveled far, but we've only begun our journey. There are hungry to feed, sicknesses to cure, and new worlds to explore. And this is no time for small plans or shrinking ambitions. We stand on the threshold of an epic age, an age of technological splendor and an explosion of human potential, an age for heroes. And I think I'm seeing many of them right here in this room.

The dreams of your parents will become your realities. The future we can only conjecture, you will be able to reach out and touch -- just like that piece of moonstone. You Young Astronauts will be our pilots into the future, and it is our hearts you will carry with you on your voyage to the stars.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Kathleen W. Lawrence to be Under Secretary of Agriculture for Small Community and Rural Development and to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Commodity Credit Corporation. She would succeed Frank W. Naylor, Jr.

I want to say a few words tonight about three important issues that are now before the Congress. We've reined in government spending, and with Gramm-Rudman we can look forward to a disappearing deficit by 1991. But there are still a few obstacles in the way on our road to a balanced budget. Rather than make the sensible adjustments we've suggested, some in Congress apparently intend to take large and dangerous cuts out of our national defense. And again we hear that constant refrain coming out of Washington: Raise taxes. Well, it's time for Congress to take a responsible approach to spending decisions. And when it comes to taxes, let's get into the spirit of the times. I've said it before, and I'll say it as often as it takes: I'll veto any tax hike that comes across my desk. Not only will we not raise taxes before I leave office, I plan to make sure we have a balanced budget amendment that puts a permanent lid on taxes and doesn't let the Government grow any faster than the economy.

So, we've made progress, but we have a ways to go on the budget. I'm glad to say, though, that we're moving on tax reform that will achieve fairness and promote growth. We're looking at a tax reform bill in the Senate that's quite simply one of the best antipoverty programs, one of the best job creation programs, and one of the best profamily bills this country has ever seen all rolled into one. I hope the House and the Senate will move quickly to bring this bill into law so America can make a fresh start in 1987 -- and even lower tax rates, even more jobs, and even stronger growth.

Finally, there is the upcoming vote on aid to the Nicaraguan freedom fighters. Congress must understand the urgency of the situation in Central America. Delay is deadly and plays right along with the Communist game plan. Because while we may have tied our own hands, the Soviets, Cubans, and Libyans haven't tied theirs. With over $1 billion of support and some of the most fearsome weapons in the Soviet arsenal, the Communist strategy is simple: Hold off American aid as long as possible in the hope they can destroy all opposition before help arrives. It's time for an up-and-down vote on freedom in Nicaragua, an up-or-down vote on whether the United States is going to stop Soviet expansionism on the American mainland while the price is still not too high and the risks are still not too great. We must act now in a bipartisan way to do the right thing: to rescue freedom in Nicaragua and protect the national security of the United States.

Q. Mr. President, your decision to tear up the SALT treaty by the end of the year has caused great consternation among the allies, among Members of Congress on both sides of the aisle, among others who fear that you are creating a more dangerous world. My question is: Is this decision irrevocable? And I'd like to follow up.

First of all, this treaty, which was signed 7 years ago, was never ratified -- well, it was more than 7 years ago, I guess. But for 7 years there is supposed to have been this restraint and this observation of the -- or observance of the treaty's terms. And for 7 years this country has been doing that. The Soviet regime, for 7 years, has been violating the restraints of the treaty. We found it necessary to -- or advisable to do away with two Poseidon submarines as we launched the last Trident. But that, I had to make plain, while it did keep us within the constraints of the SALT agreement, that wasn't the reason. Had there been no SALT agreement, we would have done away with those two submarines because -- or dismantled them because of the cost and the military value of them, or lack of it.

But then what I said was that before we reached another point where this might be an issue at all, several months away, which has to do with the arming of the 131st B - 52 with a new air-launch cruise missile; and in the interim period I said that we could not go on unilaterally observing the constraints while the Soviet Union violated them and gained even greater superiority over us; and that we were going to be bound from now on by the necessity of maintaining a deterrent. We're not seeking to achieve superiority over them, but we're certainly not going to let them go on increasing their superiority over us. But I said -- because we have these several months before that moment comes up -- that we were going to do our utmost -- since they themselves have talked of arms reductions -- that we were going to do our utmost to see if we couldn't involve them in replacing this SALT treaty, which, first of all, was never ratified, as I said, but, second of all, would no longer be in power if it had been ratified, because it was stated for a limited period of time -- that, if we could replace that with a realistic program of arms reduction, which has been my goal ever since I've been here. Now we have the first Soviet leader, to my knowledge, that has ever voluntarily spoken of reducing nuclear weapons. And we want to follow up on that.

Q. Well, it sounds like you are going to tear it up, Mr. President. Do you agree with [Assistant Secretary of Defense] Richard Perle, who branded as Soviet supporters Members of Congress who want to keep you within the limits of this treaty?

The President. I'm not going to make any comment on anyone who wants to keep this. But I did find it rather strange that some of the Senators who spoke very critically of me, without really understanding what it is that I've tried to explain about this -- some of them were Members of the Senate when they refused to ratify the treaty to begin with.

The treaty was really nothing but the legitimizing of an arms race. It didn't do anything to reduce nuclear weapons or the nuclear threat. All it did was regulate how fast and how much we could continue increasing the number of weapons. So, I was always hostile to that particular treaty because it did not reduce weapons, and that's what we're going to do. But again, as I say, the Soviets have an opportunity to meet us now with regard to some of the very things they've been proposing -- arms reduction. And we will observe the constraints to the same extent that the Soviet Union does. But we can't go on unilaterally observing this while they take off on their own with the violations that they've already made, and probably more to come.

Q. Mr. President, NASA is awaiting your decision on how to replace the Challenger spacecraft. Could you tell us tonight how you would finance a fourth orbiter? And if you can't tell us that, could you explain what's holding up your decision?

The President. Well, for one thing, we're studying the report that we've received, and there are many things that have to be decided. There is a backlog now of space cargo that is supposed to be up there. And we have the problem of determining whether we shouldn't increase the number of unmanned launchers, for many of those things, that could put them in space, and then see where we can come with the -- believe me, I want to go forward, and I think we all do, with the shuttle program. But how soon we can get to that is a question, and in the meantime should we emphasize more of the unlaunched [unmanned] to move on that backlog that we have of cargo that needs to get into space. So, I don't have an answer for you on this except that, yes, I think we should go forward with another shuttle.

Q. I have a two-part question, sir. You've left no doubt through your public statements of your determination not to permit Nicaragua to become another Communist Cuba or a Libya. What means are left to the United States if the contras are defeated by any means whatever? Is a naval quarantine possible?

The President. I couldn't and, Jerry, wouldn't comment on anything that might be further actions for us, because I don't think you could do that without informing them of anything we're thinking. And right now we have not planned for any contingency beyond aiding the contras, because we think that -- I've got to stop using that word. That was the Sandinistas' title for them, and I don't like to do anything they're doing. So the freedom fighters, we believe, with all the information that we have, that they are capable of, at the very least, applying sufficient leverage that they could bring the Sandinista government to a negotiating table for a settlement. We would prefer that over a military settlement, if that can be done. We know that there are thousands of recruits that are waiting to join the freedom fighters, and they need the weapons and ammunition and so forth for them.

Q. And the other part of the question is: This week in a speech you likened Mr. Gorbachev to Castro, Arafat, and Qadhafi. And I'd like to ask what effect you think this statement would have on future relations with the Soviet Union and a possible summit? I'm talking about the Georgetown speech.

The President. I certainly -- then it was a bad choice of words, because I didn't mean to do that. As I've said, he is the first Russian leader, to my knowledge, that has ever voiced the idea of reducing and even eliminating nuclear weapons. So, I must have goofed some place, because, believe me, I don't put him in the same category.

Q. Mr. President, with the Supreme Court's decision today allowing a woman to have an abortion -- yet again another Supreme Court decision -- will your administration let this be the law of the land, or are you going to look for another case to press your position on this matter?

The President. Not a case. If we interpret the decision right of the Court, their objection was not to what we were trying to accomplish, but the fact that, evidently, the regulations from HHS that we asked for were based on that previous bill that had to do with discrimination against the handicapped. And they, the Court, said they thought that this was putting the Federal Government -- they were getting into something that properly was the province of the State and all.

Q. Mr. President, if I could pursue the questions on your decision on the SALT treaty: On one hand, you're saying that the Soviets have continued to increase their superiority over us. On the other hand, you said that the treaty did not constrain either side in terms of the arms race and was one of the reasons you were not for it. It really can't be both ways. At the same time, we've had a massive defense buildup, the Reagan defense buildup. Which way is it? Have the Soviets been able to increase superiority over this period of time, or has the treaty not been able to stop them?

The President. No, it hasn't been able to. The treaty actually set limits, as for example, that you could only have one new type of weapon now that you could develop that didn't exist. And they have developed two instead of one. And this was a violation. It also set numbers and figures so that it was a restraint to the extent of just not an all-out arms race with no limit on the way you could progress. But when you say about achieving, remember, we're still playing catchup. They were building when we were dismantling. And we feel that, as I've said before, there's no way that we can allow them to reach for and get a superiority. And we don't want a superiority over them. But also we simply want to maintain enough of a deterrent that even with whatever superiority they have it won't be enough for them to take the chance on the followup action that could happen.

Q. If I could just follow that up: At the same time, your own arms control director, Mr. Adelman, has said that the Soviet violations have not had any great military significance. What is the possibility now, since the violations themselves -- which have been disputed by some people as to their significance -- what is the possibility that by abandoning the treaty now, which is, as you just admitted, has some limited significance in providing some degree of predictability, that we won't go into a complete arms race now? What's to replace SALT at this point? And why make this decision now?

The President. Didn't make it now. I said we've got several months here in which we're going to try to involve them in the things they themselves have been talking about -- and that is a definite arms reduction program. This is the only thing that makes sense in the world, and I've been talking about this since 1980. And I said I was sick and tired of agreements that just said, ``Well, we'll only go at this pace in our increasing the number of weapons.'' Let's get around to getting rid of them as much as we can.

Q. Thank you, sir, for remembering. A couple of weeks ago you said that the problem of the hungry people in America is not due to the fact that they don't have food and the ability to get food, it's that they don't know where to get it. And some poor people we talked to at the time said you're blaming the hungry people for being hungry -- you're putting the blame on them.

The President. Well, I don't know who those people were, and I do have to say that I think there are people who lack the information -- people out in the country that maybe don't know. And we've had plenty of evidence of that. But the simple truth of the matter is we are spending on nutrition more than has ever been spent before, and more than $3 billion over and above what was spent in 1981 -- $18.6 billion, I think, it is this year that is being spent on this program. But in the interim, during this same time that we've been increasing, the private sector has gone all out in programs, all over the country, of meals for the hungry. Today the Federal Government is providing -- I think it's 93 million meals a day. And that does not count all those private agencies, too. So, I think there is considerable merit for saying that it's difficult to believe that people are starving in this country because food isn't available. As I say, I think that in many instances the people just don't know where or how to go about it. And at the same time I find it difficult, also, to find any cases of starvation and undernourishment.

Q. But, sir, if that is the problem, public education, why then did you cut out the one Federal program that did just that -- educate hungry people, educate the rural poor, educate elderly shut-ins, about how to get food assistance? It was there, and your administration cut it out.

The President. Well, Lesley, you're asking something -- yes, we will have a plane coming up to be armed with a cruise missile that would put us, to that extent, beyond the constraints of the limitation. Now, we've got several months before we reach that point. We've got several months in which to see if the Soviet Union -- we have taxed them over and over again with regard to their violating the constraints. Now, on that basis we're going to see if we cannot persuade them to join in the things they're talking about: arms reduction. And if nothing is done, then we'll make the decision with regard to that plane.

The President. I can't comment on it because of the confidentiality of the situation there in Geneva. But, yes, as of today we have received this proposal. And now we're going to study that and see what they have in it.

Q. Mr. President, the Rogers commission detailed a series of actions and inactions leading up to that shuttle disaster of individuals who knew that the O-rings had a problem, but did nothing about it and, in the last 24 hours before the launch, of engineers from Thiokol saying it's unsafe to launch -- don't launch, but of pressure being put on Thiokol to reverse it. And yet William Rogers seems to think that the individuals involved should not be punished further, their culpability should not be established. Do you agree?

The President. Yes, I do. We are still studying that report of theirs. But I don't believe that there was any deliberate or criminal intent in any way on the part of anyone. I think that with the great record of success that NASA has had -- going all the way back to when men circled the Earth in those capsules and then to men on the Moon and now 24 successful shuttle flights -- I think there was a complacency there. And, yes, it's something that has to be corrected before another one of those takes off again. But I think it was just a carelessness that grew out of success. And I think that it's time for us also to remind ourselves of the tremendous record that NASA had and help now in the restoration of the program and their going forward and to see that this cannot happen again. I've often wondered this: if part of it wasn't due to the balmy climate of Florida and that it was difficult for anybody to believe that they'd had a cold snap that could render that O-ring dangerous.

Q. Well, sir, if I may: In our society if an engineer of a train falls asleep at the switch, we pursue him for negligence. If bus drivers -- all through our society when people do things, even though they don't mean to kill anyone, as you've said in this case -- they're brought into court if there's evidence that they've been negligent in some sort of criminal fashion. Why should these people be exempt from that kind of just review?

The President. Well, Sam, let me plead waiting until we see the entire report -- until we've had a chance to read all of the testimony and everything else before making a decision. We've put a man in there that we believe is going to do much.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President, and I will have a followup. Immediately after the U.S. attack on Libya, you were particularly grateful to Prime Minister Thatcher for her help in allowing the United States to let airplanes take off from the U.K. Since then American tourists have been staying away from England and Europe in droves, and Mrs. Thatcher has made a personal plea for Americans and their dollars to come back to the Continent. Do you think that it's safe in Europe for Americans to return? And will you tell Americans whether they ought to go overseas this summer?

The President. You've asked me a very tough one in my position with what we know about the dangers throughout the world. I certainly don't want to be quoted as advocating a tourist rush in the face of the world the way it is. I'm going to be rather bold and just tell you that our Ambassador has recently had a little talk, or something, that was carried in the Los Angeles Times. And it was to the effect that he believed that London was probably one of the safest cities in the world and that he saw no reason for anyone to be fearful of that. Well, I have not argued with him on his making that point.

Q. My follow, then, is that we also read about the extraordinary security precautions that are going to be taken for the Statue of Liberty festivities July 4th. Are you concerned that perhaps that's a pretty delectable domestic target?

The President. Yes, but I also have a great deal of confidence in our security people. And I can see where they would think that that would be a very inviting target for those who hate us in the terrorist ranks and think that they might be able to embarrass us that way.

Q. Mr. President, the Agriculture Department has been severely criticized for its treatment of minorities in employment and service delivery. This, despite your saying that you would not tolerate discrimination in the Federal Government. What are you going to do about the Agriculture Department?

The President. Well, because I feel as strongly as he does about that. I'm going to be watching this very carefully. I don't want any hint or sign in our administration that there is any kind of discrimination of that kind. And I think I've got a record that should make you willing to believe that. Because as a Governor in California, I eliminated a kind of quiet discrimination that had seen an unfair balance in employment and ended up appointing more members of the minority communities to executive and policymaking positions than all the previous Governors of California put together. So, yes, I'm going to ride herd on this, but I have great confidence in the Secretary of Agriculture, because he was doing this in California at the same time that I was Governor.

Q. Mr. President, the Warsaw Pact is said to be offering to withdraw a million of their troops that face us in the West. For those of us with families in Europe that sounds like a lot. I know that you always like to deal with these offers in the confidentiality of Geneva. But isn't it perhaps time, bearing in mind that nothing seems to have come out of Geneva for over a year, to go with an offer like this, run with it and see what happens?

The President. Well, as I say, there have been offers, and we have made counter-offers; much in the same thing and with pretty much the same end result as to numbers of weapons. And where the difficulties seem to come in is the Soviet Union and the United States have somewhat different mixes of weapons that we believe are essential to -- well, for theirs, we believe theirs is based more of an offensive nature. We believe ours is based more on a deterrent idea. And so, sometimes we run into difficulties then in reconciling some of the means of getting to the same number of warheads being eliminated.

This has kept us from having an agreement so far. Now this last agreement has come in, and we don't know yet until we see it carefully -- is it a response to one of our counteroffers? Does it in some way change some of their proposals and bring us closer to a negotiated position? And this is what we want more than anything. So, you can depend on it that we're going to make every effort. But it must be fair and balanced. It must not be an agreement in which one side is trying to maintain or increase an advantage over the other.

The President. That's what I'd like. In fact, we're waiting to hear when this can take place. We suggested a date, and evidently it was too early for them. They didn't suggest, but they spoke publicly about a possible date, and that was wrong for us because of the coming political campaign. But we still, and I still, believe that he wants a summit and I want a summit, and I believe it's going to take place.

Q. Mr. President, the Pollard spy case has precipitated some confusion within your administration over the matter of how much Israeli spying there is in this country and if it goes beyond the Pollards. The Justice Department officials are telling us that it goes beyond the Pollards, and they're continuing their investigation. The State Department officials have told us that there's no more Israeli spying here, and they're satisfied, and they seem to want to put an end to it. I wonder if you could clear up this confusion.

The President. The only thing I know is that the Israeli Government has assured us, as much as they can, that they have never had any program of trying to get intelligence information from our country or doing any spying on us. And so far, as I say, the Justice Department has said they will look to see if there is anything that they can find out. But so far there's been no evidence presented to us from anyone.

Q. Federal Reserve Chairman Volcker made an unannounced trip to Mexico this week to discuss that country's financial problems. Are you worried that Mexico might unilaterally default on payments or totally default on its foreign debt?

The President. Well, I think this is a possibility with not only Mexico but a number of other countries that are having these debt problems -- and much based on the high interest rates of the past before we reduced inflation. And obviously, we'd like to be of help to them within the framework of the agreements that were reached in Korea by Secretary [of the Treasury] Baker. And we want to be of help as much as we can. Mexico is a next-door neighbor; our fortunes are linked on many fronts. And so, we want to be of as much help as we can. And that was the reason for his trip.

The Warsaw Pact statement regarding troop reduction was made at a Warsaw Pact meeting in Budapest yesterday. This has apparently been agreed to by Warsaw Pact leaders but has not been presented for a detailed Western review in any of the conventional arms control fora. That would be not yet in Vienna, where MBFR is being considered, or CDE in Geneva, or the Conference on Disarmament in Stockholm.

We find the ideas, as reported, of interest and would welcome the opportunity to analyze concrete proposals embodying them. We would note, however, that the Warsaw Pact has not responded fully to a more modest, but more concrete, NATO proposal last November at Vienna for a first step toward conventional reductions.

That proposal, last November, involved initial reductions of U.S. troops by 5,000 and Soviet troops by 11,500 with a 3-year, no-increase commitment on forces in the zone. Also, it called for a development of a verification regime over 3 years and the development of an agreed data base on which future reductions would be calculated.

We have noted the action by the South African Government this morning. We call on both sides again to use restraint, to avoid violence, to enter into a dialog, to work out a negotiated settlement to the problems that exist in South Africa. The State Department early today was in contact with the Embassy. The Embassy will be in contact with the South African Government.

Note: Larry M. Speakes read the statement to reporters at approximately 9:33 a.m. in the Briefing Room at the White House. The South African Government had declared a state of emergency in response to domestic violence.

President Reagan met today with David Packard and the members of the President's Blue Ribbon Commission on Defense Management. Mr. Packard briefed the President on the contents of the Commission's final report, which will be submitted to the President on June 30.

In his briefing, Mr. Packard noted that much progress has been made in implementing the Commission's recommendations within both the government and industry. Mr. Packard was especially pleased that a group of 24 major defense contractors has developed a code of ethics and procedures to review compliance with the code, in line with the recommendations of the Commission's interim report. He hopes that other firms will join this important initiative. The Commission will address the industry initiative in its final report to the President. Mr. Packard also noted that the Commission will soon publish a supplemental report containing more detailed recommendations for improving national security planning and budgeting procedures. The Commission's final report will also recommend development of centers of excellence in defense management that are similar to successful management initiatives used by industry.

Secretary Weinberger was also present at the meeting and outlined to the Commission and to the President the progress the Department of Defense has made in implementation of the Commission's recommendations to date. The President was pleased with Secretary Weinberger's report and asked that Mr. Packard and Secretary Weinberger report to him again early next year on the Department's progress.

The President. So, it's a welcome to the White House and a special hello to your executive director, Julian Niemczyk. And it is certainly a pleasure for me as honorary chairman of the People to People program to have this opportunity to speak with you before you are off on your great adventure.

These exchange programs in which you and many thousands of others participate, I think, are one of the most important ways for others to learn about our values and our views. And during your time overseas, you will likely be confronted with many foreign policy questions. There is every reason for Americans to be proud of our country's dealings with other nations. We have been a force for freedom and a force for peace on this planet. And when we turn over the reins to your generation -- and that won't be so long from now -- we want this to be a safer planet than it is today. That is what the negotiations in Geneva are all about. There is a great deal of maneuvering that goes on during such negotiations, but I'm still optimistic.

The United States is willing to do more than put a lid on the number of nuclear weapons. We are proposing to reduce U.S. and Soviet nuclear arms to an equal and verifiable level, and it is in the interest of both the Soviet Union and the United States to do this. If the Soviets will agree, we can get started on this right now.

While trying to achieve nuclear and conventional arms reductions, we are exploring technologies that will protect people from the threat of ballistic missiles. This is our research under our Strategic Defense Initiative, which everyone knows as SDI. If we are successful, those missiles will be less effective, and thus both sides will be all the more likely to agree to cut deeply the number of these weapons and their arsenals. And if that one day leads to a shield against ballistic missiles, the whole world, I think, will breathe easier.

You young people, more than any other group, have a stake in the future. I'm going to be speaking at a high school graduation in Glassboro, New Jersey, next week. It'll be my first high school graduation in quite some time. And some of the matters under discussion -- the future of peace and freedom will be on the agenda. But now I know that you have some things that you'd like to discuss. So, we shall allow the press to retire, and then we can get on with our discussion.

The President. No. What I was saying is we'll make the decision with regard to the ballistic missile or the cruise missile when that time comes. But in the interim, we're going to be dealing with the Soviet Union on their most recent proposal to us. The time has come to replace a treaty that was never ratified, that has now gone beyond the length of time for which it was designed, which they have never observed -- have been violating since its inception -- to replace that with a legitimate arms reduction treaty. Now, that's what I was saying last night.

The President. One of the reasons I'm not saying to that is because right now we are going to do our utmost to engage the Soviet Union in an arms reduction agreement. And anyone going into negotiations, I think, has a right to remain silent so that nothing will be used against him.

The United States was born in a War of Independence against an oppressive rule. We stood up for inalienable rights given by God and declared that governments that systematically violate those rights lose their claim to legitimacy.

It is a tragedy of our time that many peoples continue to live under the brutal totalitarian rule of the Soviet empire. We will expose the inhumanity of the oppressors and speak out on behalf of the oppressed. We will denounce tyranny and champion the cause of its victims.

Baltic Freedom Day provides these opportunities. On this day, we observe the anniversary of the callous and treacherous subjugation of three independent and freedom-loving states. Forty-six years ago, invading Soviet armies, in collusion with the Nazi regime, overran and occupied the Republics of Estonia, Latvia, and Lithuania. Through police-state tactics, the occupation and subjugation continue. Soviet outrages against these peoples have included massive deportations from their native soil to concentration camps in Siberia and elsewhere. At the same time masses of Russians have been uprooted from their homes and relocated in the Baltic nations in an effort to eradicate the cultural and ethnic heritage of the Baltic peoples. Against all recognized principles of international law, justice, and humanity, the Soviets have continued their domination over Lithuania, Latvia, and Estonia. The United States has never recognized their forced incorporation into the U.S.S.R. It is illegal, indefensible, and iniquitous.

We are engaged in a very real struggle to focus the world's attention on one of the gravest wrongs of our age -- the stubborn and contemptuous Soviet disregard for the sovereignty of independent nations and the rights of oppressed peoples. As evidence, we hold up its first victims -- the heroic Baltic nations we honor today. To do less is to acquiesce in injustice and to betray our heritage as champions of human freedom.

I have completed my review of the report from the Commission on the Space Shuttle Challenger Accident. I believe that a program must be undertaken to implement its recommendations as soon as possible. The procedural and organizational changes suggested in the report will be essential to resuming effective and efficient Space Transportation System operations, and will be crucial in restoring U.S. space launch activities to full operational status.

Specifically, I would like NASA to report back to me in 30 days on how and when the Commission's recommendations will be implemented. This report should include milestones by which progress in the implementation process can be measured.

Let me emphasize, as I have done so many times, that the men and women of NASA and the tasks that they so ably perform are essential to the nation if we are to retain our leadership in the pursuit of technological and scientific progress.

Despite misfortunes and setbacks, we are determined to press on in our space programs. Again, Jim, we turn to you for leadership. You and the NASA team have our support and our blessings to do what has to be done to make our space program safe, reliable, and a source of pride to our nation and of benefit to all mankind.

This morning the President held a brief meeting with the NASA Administrator, Dr. James Fletcher. The meeting was held to follow up on the recent report by the President's Commission on the Space Shuttle Challenger Accident. The President has completed a review of the Rogers commission report and believes that their recommendations should be implemented.

The changes suggested in the report are essential to resuming effective and efficient space transportation system operations and will be crucial to restoring full operational status once again. Dr. Fletcher has been asked by the President to report back in 30 days with a plan for implementing the Commission's recommendations and establish milestones measuring progress in that process.

The 10th anniversary of the Soweto uprising of 1976 will be commemorated on June 16, a day that has become a symbol of black aspirations for freedom, equal rights, and full political participation. On this solemn occasion, it seems fitting that the U.S. Government renew its call on all parties to exercise maximum restraint in searching for solutions to South Africa's severe political crisis. Violence by those who enforce apartheid and by those opposed to it has become so common that South Africa risks becoming a continuing tragedy.

The American people feel strongly that permitting nonviolent meetings is the hallmark of civilized governments and in the best tradition of the Western democracies. I have communicated directly with President Botha to ensure that he and his government are aware of my deep feelings about this. At the same time, I want to address myself publicly to all South Africans to urge that they consider again the stark consequences of violence before lighting the next match or pulling the next trigger. Our hearts are with the people of South Africa in this time of trauma. We appeal to them -- white and black -- to face up to their own responsibilities to make the Soweto anniversary truly a time for peaceful expressions of opposition to apartheid. Only in this way will they truly honor those who died in Soweto 10 years ago and the millions of South Africans still yearning for justice in that land.

Well, indeed, they could not, and neither can we. You know what storm I speak of. Earlier this week, to a Georgetown group, I spoke of the situation in Nicaragua. My remarks were well covered, and you're familiar with all the arguments, pro and con. You know my views.

The current regime in Nicaragua sustained, encouraged, and used by Cuba and the Soviet Union is intent upon institutionalizing a Communist totalitarian form of government in that country. A Communist regime in our hemisphere is good news for no one. It's bad news for those who love freedom and bad news for those who love peace.

We have a chance to help stop this ominous development and help stop it relatively cheaply by giving support, financial and material support, to the growing body of men and women in Nicaragua who are resisting the imposition of communism in their homeland. We prefer a peaceful solution to the problems of Central America, but it's every day more evident that the Sandinista game is a game of delay designed only to give themselves time to crush the democratic opposition and consolidate their totalitarian system of control over Nicaraguan society.

We're now asking for $100 million in aid -- $100 million to help the democratic forces resist and to pressure the Sandinistas to remember their promises of democracy and peace to the people of Nicaragua and the wider international community. I'm telling you this because I'll need your help and the help of the American people. I know that support begins with understanding. And so, if there's anything that is left that is not understood about our policy toward Nicaragua, well, I'm here prepared to testify, as they say. So, let's fire away.

Q. Mr. President, Joe Day, from WNEV - TV in Boston. And on that subject, sir, there have been calls, as you're well aware, for investigations of alleged criminal activity on the part of the freedom fighters, or the contras. And I wonder, sir, whether you think that's a good idea and whether you are satisfied with the conduct of those people who you are seeking additional aid for in Nicaragua?

The President. Let me say that in any conflict of this kind, we understand, of course, that there are going to be individual deeds, there are going to be acts of brutality, whether against civilians or whatever, by individuals. But we know and are satisfied that the policy of the leaders is one of abiding by humanitarian rules of warfare as far as the contras are concerned. This is not particularly true of the Sandinista forces, and we've had individuals here in our country testify as to the brutal treatment that they have received. And we have not found that -- well, much of this we have found is a part of a disinformation campaign tending to discredit them.

For example, the charges of dope running -- well, the factual evidence that we have -- and it's photographic as the result of a kind of sting operation -- is that among the high officials of the Sandinista government, utilizing one of their military air bases, is the transshipment of drugs aimed for the United States. And, as I say, this we have pictured. And now, the latest one is: The big investigation is has there been shenanigans with the $27 million of humanitarian aid that was sent down there or that was passed by the Congress, reluctantly, to do this. Well, I don't see why their investigation has not revealed, as yet, that they were so concerned that the agencies of the executive branch might not be trustworthy in the handling of this money, that in the passing of the $27 million, they laid down the strict rules as to exactly how that money must be delivered and spent. And we followed those rules. I think they ought to give us back control over that because they didn't do too well.

Q. Mr. President, Brad Willis, WBZ - TV, Boston. Can you tell me why you're putting a larger effort into aid for the contras in Nicaragua than the freedom fighters in Afghanistan, who have been under Soviet occupation for over 6 years now, and also what your feelings are about the Soviet occupation of Afghanistan and what the U.S. should do?

The President. We are helping in Afghanistan. I'm not at liberty to tell you any details as to how we are and what we're doing. We're definitely on their side, the mujahidin, and believe that this invasion by the Soviet Union is just further proof that they are following an expansionist policy that is based on the Marxian doctrine, and the Marx-Lenin doctrine, that communism must become a one world -- that it must be a one-world Communist state, that that is their goal. And, no, we're doing everything we can to, hopefully, get them out of there.

Q. From Miami, Tomas Regalado, WQBA, sir. Of course, Nicaragua is the priority, but you also have mentioned Cuba always as part of Nicaraguan problems. We hear rumors that an envoy of the church had met with you several days ago, and that Castro, because of the economic situation, wants better relations with the United States. What would it take for this to happen? Have you had those report or signs from Cuba?

The President. I know there have been. And ever since I've been here, every once in a while, there have been statements of this kind. And early on, we made contact at a very high level down there to see, and nothing came of it. It's very simple. If he really means that he would like to have better relations and rejoin the countries of the Americas, of the Western Hemisphere, all he has to do is engage in some actions. All he has to do is release some political prisoners. All he has to do is change his persecution of and his dominance of -- or interference with the free press, and all of those things and show that he's ready to change from a totalitarian form of government and to allow the people -- Cuban-Americans who are here -- to be able to visit their families and so forth. And until they take some actions -- this much of what I said in our negotiations in Geneva also -- we need more than words, we need some action.

The President. With regard to the Israelis spying on us, all we can tell you is that the Israeli Government has sworn to us that this, certainly, is nothing official from them, if there is such a thing going on, that they have not been doing this. We have been doing all the investigating we can. We have no evidence that it is a part of their government policy. But as to spies, I think they're always present. And we do everything that we can to be able to identify and find them if they're doing these things. And the reason it has come to the floor and there's so much attention is we've been successful, of late, in bringing some of them to justice. But we're going to keep on with that, but we can never rule out that that's going on.

Q.  --  -- is working on tax reform, while the House and Senate Committee is trying to come up with a spending bill for fiscal 1987. And several members of that committee have suggested a tax increase as a means for you to get the defense spending that you want. I know you are opposed to tax increases. Now that I'm on the right track, would you tell me why you would not like to have at least a small tax increase to get the kind of spending bill that you would like?

The President. This has been, of course, the pattern for a half a century, that I know of, in our government here. That you can nibble away at increasing the taxes in order to get the spending that various individuals want for their favorite programs. It's also been traditional -- and not just under Republican administrations -- but going back, I remember, with F.D.R., that defense has been the grab bag. Anybody that's got a social program up on the Hill, and they want to do it for whatever reason, they can get the money from defense -- take it away from defense. That is why when some of our ranking officers asked their counterparts after World War II in Japan: Why Pearl Harbor -- why they ever did that? The answer was very simple. They said we didn't think you'd fight. And they told our officers that in the Louisiana maneuvers -- the great war games that preceded World War II here in our country -- we had soldiers carrying wooden guns and were using cardboard tanks to simulate armored warfare, so they assumed we wouldn't fight.

This still goes on. Defense is always supposed to be the one that is -- and yet defense is the first priority under the Constitution of the Federal Government -- the protection of the national security of our people. And right now, with all of our increases and what we've done, our defense budget is a smaller percentage of the national budget and of the gross national product than it has been in years past, when we weren't doing as well as we've been doing.

And this thing of tax increase -- the plain, simple truth is the Federal Government is spending too much. If we had gotten the cuts that we asked for in 1981, when we were asking for our first budget, there would have been $207 billion less deficit than we've had in these last few years. And they're still protecting many of those. The budget that we presented -- and I'd like to take a chance to just tell you something about the budgeting process. Having been Governor of a State, I can tell you that if the Federal Government would simply pattern itself after one of the States -- any one of about 40 of them -- they'd have a better budgeting system than they have here at the national level.

We sit around a Cabinet table for months and for long hours with all the heads of the various Departments, who are going to implement the congressional-passed programs. And these people, who have to implement them and work with them, tell us the figure that they need to do the job that Congress has assigned to them. And we send this up to the Hill as a budget. Then they sit down in a committee and without any regard to who's going to run the program or whether they know anything about how to run the program, they say, ``Oh, no, we've got to give them more money than that.'' And then when they give you the more money, they tell you also you have to spend it. Lots of times, you know, in the past, there've been government agencies here that come -- at the end of the year, they go out and buy new furniture because they've got to get rid of the money. And this is one of the things we're trying to change.

So, for them to sit there again and say, we believe that the tax decrease that we achieved in 1981 is the principal cause for the astonishing economic recovery that we've had. We believe right now that to go to a tax increase again would be detrimental to that recovery and would risk us going back into that thing we've known for the last 50 years of every few years, another recession. So, we've said no; cut spending. We suggested the elimination of scores of Federal programs that aren't serving any useful purpose -- none of them have we been permitted to eliminate.

And so, we say again, the only time you can ever say a tax increase is if we get government spending down to where we say this is it, this is now the level at which we can perform the task government is supposed to. And if, then, that isn't enough -- we don't have enough -- then you say we will have to have revenues to match this. But when we're doing the things we're doing, when we're doing social programs that -- when I was Governor, we had programs in which it cost two dollars for the Federal Government to deliver one dollar to a needy person. And things like this are still -- there's too much of that going on.

Q.  --  -- in Lebanon for 17 months now -- one of five Americans who've been held for at least a year. The family of Father Jenco today is calling on you and the administration to take a more aggressive role in securing the release of those hostages. If you can tell me, what is the Government doing now to get the hostages out, and why haven't you been successful up to this point?

The President. I can answer the question here -- and let me just say to you, and we've tried to impress this on the families of all of those hostages that are being held -- we're not sitting idle. The fact that we aren't on the front page of the paper everyday with a story is because that would be counterproductive. There has never been a minute that we have not been working for their release.

We have gone down channel after channel, and many of them have brought us to the point where we believed that within a few days we were going to be successful, and then would find a dead end, that it didn't work out. We have never given up for a minute in our efforts to get them back. But I cannot describe those efforts because, as I say, that would be counterproductive. And all I can do is tell you that we're going to continue. We've never given up for a minute in trying to get them back. We know the anguish of the families, but we know even more the distress of the men who are being held. And we've gone in every direction possible and followed every lead possible.

The President. Well, to be honest with you, we're right now in one of those moments in which we have had the great disappointment -- that the channel that we have been following, and that we thought was going to be successful, failed.

Q. Mr. President, Dale Huffman, from Dayton Newspapers in Dayton, Ohio. Along those same lines -- this is kind of a personal question, but you say that you're involved in this and that it is trying on you. It seems like every day you're involved in something that's serious, something that's trying, something that's emotional, something that's stressful. You've got the most stressful job in the whole world, obviously. My question, I guess, is how do you deal with this? How are you able on a day-to-day basis to face all these things and keep your head above water?

The President. Well, for one thing, I'm surrounded by some awfully good people who are sincerely dedicated to serving and who made great sacrifices to be a part of government and serve. And I'm a little self-conscious about this next one. Let me just call on Abe up there for his answer. He said many times he has been driven to his knees because there was no place else to go. And if he did not believe that he could call on One who was wiser and greater than all others for help, there was no way that he could stand this position.

The President. I hope we're going to have the thing that is now before the Congress. We tried with their previous effort. It is true that our borders are getting out of control -- or are out of control, and we do need an immigration program. And we're still trying to get it through the Congress.

The President. Well, I imagine that what they're probably looking into is, are they people who were strictly political prisoners. Because, you know, at the Mariel lift, at the time when so many came flooding in, Mr. Castro filled their ranks -- or didn't fill their ranks, but infiltrated among them even mental patients and people who were guilty of horrendous crimes -- not political prisoners at all. And then we had a tremendous job -- that isn't finished yet -- of trying to find people that were just outright violent criminals who had been sent here as political refugees. So, this might be what they're looking into with regard to these others. Earlier it was mentioned that we've had some meetings with some of the clergy from Cuba, and we voiced our belief to them, particularly about one man, in particular, and if they had any influence on Castro -- and that one man has been released.

The President. No. We're engaged now in a modernization program, as made necessary, as it would be with any kind of weapons that -- better ideas come along and some things get outmoded and so forth. And we're not going to retreat from that modernization. We're behind the Soviets; they've been doing it much longer, beginning with the SS - 18. Our MX, which is not yet deployed, is our counter to the SS - 18. We are right now technically within the limits of SALT. They are not, as they have not been for 7 years -- that they have been violating it. So, we're going to be guided by what is necessary for our national security and a deterrent to their ever feeling tempted to launch a first strike.

And what we're doing down the road in our modernization program -- there is coming a moment in which, to continue with that modernization, will take us beyond the terms of SALT. But SALT was a treaty that the Senate -- some of the Members of that Senate then are still Members now and they're criticizing me for talk of not abiding by SALT. Well, they were Members of the Senate that wouldn't ratify SALT as a treaty. It has not been observed, as I say, for 7 years by the Soviets. There's no way that we could possibly or should possibly go on, unilaterally, adhering to this treaty.

In the first place, I always opposed the treaty because it didn't do anything to reduce armaments. All it did was set a pace at how much you can and how fast you could increase. What we're going to do in the intervening time, however, is -- since the Soviets for the first time that I know of have made proposals themselves about reducing the number of weapons -- we're going to try to engage them in that kind of a practical treaty of negotiating reductions of weapons that will replace this unratified treaty. And a treaty which, incidentally, has already outlived the period of time for which it was established.

The President. Well, I think in many places there certainly is a reasonable safety. Our Ambassador to England recently was quoted in your papers -- and I have not argued with him on this; I agree with him. He's quoted that he believes that London is probably as safe as any city in the world. On the other hand, in a situation such as Lebanon, which is virtually out of control, I don't believe that anyone could say that an American is safe there. We're bound to be a target with the factions that are fighting there in Lebanon. Now, whatever we can do -- I didn't know about this, but now that you've told me about it, I'm going to go back to the office and see that we look into this to see whatever we can do.

Q. Mr. President, my question is about strategic defense. There were quotes in the -- I'm sorry, David Ropeik, from Channel 5 News in Boston. There were quotes by a high-level policymaker who chose to be unnamed a couple days ago in the Boston Globe suggesting for the first time that parts, or perhaps all, of the Strategic Defense Initiative may be subject to compromise by your administration, given recent Soviet proposals on defense research under the ABM and given their recent proposals as to possible reductions in offensive weapons. Is any or all of SDI in any way negotiable?

The President. Not in the sense of using that as a bargaining chip to get anything in the line of arms reduction or anything of the kind. I think that this is one of the best things that has come along in scores of years. Here is this idea of switching from a policy, the MAD policy, mutual assured destruction -- that we and the Soviets could be safe, the people of our two countries -- if we each had so many destructive weapons that for either one of us to start a war -- the one who started it could get destroyed also.

This doesn't make sense in a world where madmen can come along as one did half a century, almost, ago -- Adolf Hitler. The idea of a defensive weapon that could probably make us take a second look at intercontinental ballistic missiles; they are the most destabilizing. That's the weapon that if you push a button, 30 minutes later a lot of people blow up. If we could have a defensive system that says anyone who decides to start a war with those things may have trouble because not very many of them may get through. This, we're going to continue. But we also know that the Soviet Union has preceded us. They have been working and researching on a defensive program long before we started.

Now, our idea is that research on strategic defense comes within the ABM treaty. We're not violating any treaties or anything in doing this. If we can develop an idea that shows that these ballistic missiles can be rendered obsolete, that is the time then when Mr. Gorbachev's proposal of total elimination of those weapons -- that we could both have it. And frankly, I have said publicly a number of times -- I'm prepared to say that whichever one of us can come up, or if both of us come up, with such a defensive weapon, as far as we're concerned we'd be happy to make ours available worldwide in return for the elimination of those weapons. Reduction of nuclear weapons is our goal. That is our purpose.

The President. We still don't think that sanctions would be effective. First of all, American investment in South Africa is 1 percent or less of their total investment. So we couldn't affect them very much in doing that. But secondly, whatever we did do in that line would militate against the people we're trying to help. And we feel that, also, for us to get out, as some of our young people think we should, we're taking away the only contact and base we have there for continued contact with them to try and help bring about a solution to this problem and an end to apartheid, which we find repugnant, as I'm sure all of you do.

The President. Well, let me say we regret it. It's awfully hard when you're not involved in that. But what we're seeing now is an outright civil war that is going on, and it's no longer just the contest between the black population and the white population. It is blacks fighting against blacks, because there's still a tribal situation involved there in that community. And we want to continue doing everything we can to help that faction of the Government that has made some progress and has corrected some of the evils and has announced its desire to do the rest, but has a faction in its own government that is opposing it.

Today we celebrate Flag Day, the birthday of our Stars and Stripes. As we think back over the history of our nation's flag, we remember that the story of its early years was often one of hardship and trials, sometimes a fight for simple survival.

Such is the story behind our Star-Spangled Banner. It was 2 years into the War of 1812, and America seemed to be teetering on the edge of defeat. The British had already taken our Capital and burned the White House. Baltimore was the next target in a grand design to divide our forces and crush this newly independent nation of upstart colonies. All that stood between the British and Baltimore were the guns of Fort McHenry, blocking their entry into Baltimore Harbor.

The British bombardment lasted for 25 hours. Through the dark hours of the night, the rockets fired and the bombs exploded. And a young American patriot named Key, held captive aboard a British ship, watched anxiously for some proof, some sign, that liberty would prevail. You can imagine his joy when the next morning, in the dawn's early light, he looked out and saw the banner still flying -- a little tattered and torn, but still flying proudly above the ramparts. Fort McHenry and the brave men manning it had withstood the assault. Baltimore was saved. The United States, this great experiment in human freedom, as George Washington described it, would endure.

Thinking back to those times, one realizes that our democracy is so strong because it was forged in the fires of adversity. In those dark days of the war, it must have been easy to give in to despair. But our forefathers were motivated by a cause beyond themselves. From the harsh winter of Valley Forge to the blazing night above Fort McHenry, those patriot soldiers were sustained by the ideals of human freedom. Through the hardships and the setbacks, they kept their eyes on that ideal and purpose, just as through the smoke of battle they kept a lookout for the flag. For with the birth of our nation, the cause of human freedom had become forever tied to that flag and its survival.

And I hope you all will join Nancy and me and millions of other Americans at 7 o'clock this evening, eastern daylight time, when we pause a few minutes to say the Pledge of Allegiance. Though separated by many miles, we will be together in our thoughts. These anniversaries remind us that the great American experiment in freedom and democracy has really just begun. They remind us of the terrible hardships our forefathers willingly endured for their beliefs. And they challenge us to match that greatness of spirit in our own time, and I know we will. We are, after all, the land of the free and the home of the brave.

If we ask ourselves what has held our nation together, what has given it the strength to endure and the spirit to achieve, we find the answer in our families and those basic family values of work, hope, charity, faith, and love. So, it's appropriate that this year Father's Day falls on the same weekend as Flag Day, for in commemorating fatherhood, we're also expressing a basic truth about America. What does fatherhood mean today in America? I guess the same as it always has.

Fatherhood can sometimes be walking the floor at midnight with a baby that can't sleep. More likely, fatherhood is repairing a bicycle wheel for the umpteenth time, knowing that it won't last the afternoon. Fatherhood is guiding a youth through the wilderness of adolescence toward adulthood. Fatherhood is holding tight when all seems to be falling apart; and it's letting go when it is time to part. Fatherhood is long hours at the blast furnace or in the fields, behind the wheel or in front of a computer screen, working a 12-hour shift or doing a 6-month tour of duty. It's giving one's all, from the break of day to its end, on the job, in the house, but most of all in the heart.

Benny's swing music came to symbolize the new energy of 20th-century America, and it helped us all through the Great Depression. It was a new and uniquely American sound that was as fresh as the land that inspired it. We all miss Benny but will forever remember his contributions to American life and music.

I appreciate your presence here today and all that you are doing to ensure that our country is secure and that this hemisphere is free in the years ahead. It doesn't seem so long ago when it was widely recognized that our freedom depended on helping those who were desperately fighting for their liberty.

America was the arsenal of democracy, for example, during a time when the outcome of the Second World War was seriously in doubt. One can only imagine what incredible totalitarian challenges we would've had to overcome had our precious supplies been withheld, and thus permitting England to fall to the Nazi onslaught. And no one my age can forget the massive commitment we made after the war to rebuild Europe and to thwart the expansion of communism. Part of that effort was the help we gave the democratic forces in Greece during their struggle against Communist insurgents, which was not dissimilar to what we're doing in El Salvador today. And all of this was not without opposition in the United States.

Nevertheless, America unflinchingly met its responsibility. A bipartisan consensus permitted us to leave politics at the water's edge and do what was necessary to keep the country safe. Some historians believe the trauma of the Vietnam war irreparably destroyed the spirit of cooperation. Well, I think otherwise; I think America is leaving the Vietnam syndrome behind. We face serious challenges -- it was great, wasn't it, on television last week, to see that [Vietnam veterans] parade in Chicago. They finally had come home.

Well, I expect the upcoming vote on aid to the Nicaraguan freedom fighters will signal the reemergence of bipartisanship in areas of national security and an end to the pessimism and disunity of the last decade. Over 2 months ago many Democrats voted for aid to the freedom fighters, and we're reaching out now to many more Democrats to make this truly a bipartisan issue and carry the day for the freedom fighters. We're looking to win this next vote, because it's becoming irrefutably clear that helping those fighting for freedom in Nicaragua is important to the safety of the United States and it is the right thing to do. And under those circumstances, there are no Republicans and no Democrats -- just Americans.

Some of those opposing our efforts have been hoping that the regime in Managua would reform and seek reconciliation with its opponents. Well, instead, the Nicaraguan Communists have taken every opportunity to smash internal opposition and annihilate the armed resistance. Their hints at reform are little more than delaying tactics, providing them time to silence, jail, or kill anyone who threatens their absolute power. The last House vote on this issue had barely been taken when Nicaraguan troops crossed over into Honduras to attack resistance forces. This was hardly the gesture of good will that many Members of the House had hoped for. That mini-invasion received much attention, but just as important was the major attack, an unproved assault, launched against Miskito Indian villages at the same time. I said unproved -- unprovoked assault launched against the Miskito Indian villages at the same time. This bloody operation triggered a panic that led to an exodus into Honduras of nearly 11,000 villagers. And others suffered a fate who didn't leave for those camps, such as being herded into camps and then left with no provision for supplies of food. And yet they could not go beyond the fences that hemmed them in.

Since the House vote, repression against independent labor unions, the press, the church, and opposition political parties has continued. The jails remain swollen with political prisoners, such as this one [pointing to a photograph] near Managua. And many of the prisoners are democratic union leaders. And today even the smallest vendor finds his or her tiny bit of private enterprise threatened. In the period since the last House vote, Managua has signed economic and cultural agreements with the Soviets. Foreign advisers remain ever present throughout the Nicaraguan military and secret police. The regime, for all its youth and designer glasses -- [laughter] -- is doing its best to turn Nicaragua into an Eastern European-style Communist dictatorship. And this is absolutely inconsistent with the values and traditions of the Americas, and we're not going to let it happen.

The Soviets, on the other hand, after a brief respite, are again stepping up the flow of weapons into Nicaragua. For the first time since 1984 a ship coming directly from the Soviet military port of Nikolayev delivered cargo to Nicaragua. And another significant step has been the arrival in Nicaragua of a reconnaissance aircraft with highly sophisticated equipment -- as shown in this photo here to the right -- which gives the Communist regime a significant advance in its military and intelligence capabilities. There is little room for doubt. The Communists show no intention of compromise, no intention of keeping their promises of democratic pluralism, or of refraining from aggression upon their neighbors. They've been given their chance and used it to thumb their nose at those who tried to give them the benefit of the doubt. Gestures of good will have been scoffed at. Opportunities for peace, diplomatic solutions, compromise, and negotiated settlements have been arrogantly passed by.

And all of this leads to one inescapable conclusion: If democracy is to have any chance at all, we must back up those who are fighting for freedom and back them with the weapons and resources they need. This is the only way that the Communists will take the demand for democracy and negotiations seriously. Much has been said of late about the consistency of a policy that advocates both aiding the freedom fighters and reaching out to find an agreement that could peacefully end the conflict. Well, there's nothing confusing or contradictory about supporting those who are using armed might to pressure an authoritarian regime into democratic reform. Those fighting the Communists are not, as they've oftentimes been portrayed, seeking power.

They want only the democracy that was promised. In 1979 the clique that now holds power in Managua made a solemn promise to the Organization of American States and to the people of Nicaragua as to the democratic and pluralistic nature of the government they planned to establish. And that promise was made to the OAS, and the result was the OAS asked Somoza then to step down in order to end further bloodshed. And on the basis of that promise, he did step down. What the freedom fighters seek and what we support is simply adherence to that promise of democracy. What we will not do is passively watch as a clique, armed to the teeth by a totalitarian power outside this hemisphere, as it beats its own population into submission and establishes a beachhead of tyranny, subversion, and terror on the continent of the Americas.

Thomas Jefferson once said, ``If a nation expects to be ignorant and free . . .  it expects what never was and never will be.'' It's our job to make certain the American people get the facts about what is at stake in Central America. And I hope I can count on each one of you to get the word out, and I'm sure I can. Together, armed with the facts, we can revitalize that bipartisan spirit that puts the safety of our country and the love of liberty above all else.

I tell you from the bottom of my heart, I thank you for all that you're doing. And now is the time to put out the maximum effort, and we'll get the job done. There are thousands of young men and women in Nicaragua who are waiting to join the contras -- well, I'm going to stop calling them that. That word was given -- or appellation was applied to them by the Communists. They are freedom fighters. And these young people want to join the freedom fighters, only they don't have the arms and the equipment yet to take them on board. So, we know what our job is, and God bless all of you.

I met this morning with leaders of the Afghan resistance alliance: Professor Burhanuddin Rabbani, who is the spokesman of the alliance, and his colleagues. They speak for the many citizens of Afghanistan who are battling Soviet forces in the name of national liberation.

My message to the resistance delegation was simple: In your struggle to regain your nation's independence, the American people stand with you. This policy has broad and deep bipartisan support; it is an unshakable commitment. Your goal is our goal -- the freedom of Afghanistan. We will not let you down.

Like the Afghan people, we hope for a negotiated end to this war. Year after year, U.N. resolutions have called for a total and rapid withdrawal of Soviet troops and for self-determination for the Afghan people. Let us renew that call today. Only an agreement that has the support of the Afghan people can work. This is a fact of life, and it is why the role of the resistance alliance is crucial. The diversity of the alliance, its roots in the faith and traditions of Afghanistan, shows that the alliance is the true representative of the Afghan people.

People everywhere admire the courage of the Afghans, but the people and Government of Pakistan have also borne a large share of the burden of Soviet pressure and intimidation. We are honored to join with them in supporting Afghan freedom.

On March 25 the House Appropriations Committee reported the urgent supplemental appropriations bill to the House floor. Seventy-four days have passed since then. The bill is now in conference committee, and both the House and Senate versions are too expensive and contain legislative and policy provisions that do not belong in an appropriations measure. Thus, several provisions before the conference are unacceptable.

It is time for Congress to act quickly and responsibly to spare hardship for Americans who depend on programs made possible by this bill. The Commodity Credit Corporation has ceased getting much-needed payments to farmers because its cash has run out. The Federal Housing Administration can no longer insure home mortgages because its authority has expired, and soon it will be unable to make additional loan guarantees unless its ceiling is raised. The Internal Revenue Service is desperately in need of supplemental appropriations, or up to 6,000 seasonal employees will have to be released immediately, postponing returns to deserving taxpayers and losing valuable revenue for the Federal Treasury. The Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) has virtually depleted its funds, because of the large number of natural disasters occurring in the first half of FY 1986. Additional moneys are contained in the bill to enable FEMA to provide relief if such is needed later this year. The bill includes funds requested by the President for the Federal Aviation Administration to assure safety in the airways. Much-needed safety measures to protect the lives of Americans serving their country in embassies overseas have been unduly delayed.

Thankfully, the conference committee is moving ahead to bring the bill to final resolution. However, several key changes must be made before the President will consider signing the measure. For instance, the House bill contains a provision repealing the President's authority to make deferrals based on policy, an authority used by every administration since 1974. This provision is flatly unacceptable in any form.

The full Senate added a provision which amounts to a windfall for rural utilities by allowing them to escape commitments they made when receiving Federal loans, at a cost of $2.4 billion to American taxpayers. These commitments are the same the vast majority of American homeowners are prepared to accept and honor: to pay a loan prepayment penalty if they wish to refinance their loans. If millions of American families can honor their contractual obligations, why not multimillion dollar businesses? The Senate also added in this appropriations measure a massive expansion of unemployment benefits in the form of trade-adjustment assistance. This provision is so far-reaching we can do little more than guess at its cost.

These provisions, and others too numerous to mention here, threaten the urgent supplemental. It is good that Congress is moving ahead to reach an agreement on this legislation, but it is important that Congress pass it in a form that doesn't incorporate unnecessary spending and bad policy -- so the President can approve the measure.

President Reagan. It gives me great pleasure to greet President Sanguinetti. Mr. President, as the elected leader of a free and democratic Uruguay, you have our respect, our admiration, and our heartfelt welcome. Uruguay is a friend and a country that shares with us the heritage, traditions, and values of the Americas. Our countries, as is true of so many in this hemisphere, were born of independence movements seeking to break away from colonial power. Yet, those who founded our two countries fought not only to be rid of domination but also for freedom. Our histories run parallel: Both are the stories of people struggling to be free; people striving to live up to the ideals expressed at the time of their nation's birth.

Today the people of Uruguay are reaffirming their faith in democracy. And all those who love liberty applaud this giant step forward. President Sanguinetti, we appreciate that your official delegation includes representatives from the judicial and legislative branches, as well as your executive branch of government. Separation of powers, protection of the rights of all citizens, and a healthy respect for the opinions of others are hallmarks of a truly free society. And that is what you and the current leaders of Uruguay are building.

In recent years, we have witnessed an unprecedented expansion of democracy in the Americas. Just a decade ago, only one-third of the people in this hemisphere lived in democracy. Today 90 percent of the people live in countries that are democratic or in transition to democracy. We should not be satisfied until all Americans -- and that means every living soul from the North Slope of Alaska to the tip of Tierra del Fuego -- live in freedom, as is their birthright. In this hemisphere, the days of dictatorship, left or right, are numbered. The peaceful process used to reestablish democracy in Uruguay can serve as a model for others. Authoritarian regimes should take notice.

Yet, while we celebrate the progress that has been made, no one should overlook the decisive battle in the cause of human freedom now taking place in Central America. The outcome will determine, ultimately, whether the people of that region will enjoy a future blessed with peace and development or, instead, be engulfed in tyranny and conflict. We who enjoy the fruits of liberty understand that just and lasting peace is built on freedom. Our search for peace in Central America must, above all, be an effort to continue the expansion of democratic freedom that has reached four of the five nations of this troubled region. We must continue to press for a negotiated solution. And in this work, we must uphold our democratic values and insist that they be the basis for any agreement that is worthy of our support.

The Western Hemisphere still holds the promise of liberty and opportunity that drew our forefathers and mothers from the Old World. Uruguay, like the United States, is a nation of immigrants. They came to our shores in quest of freedom and looking for the chance, through hard work, to improve their well-being and that of their families. Uruguay's commitment to economic growth and revitalization is well appreciated here. You have set out to attack not just the symptoms but the underlying causes of your country's economic problems. By protecting Uruguay's good name and creditworthiness, by avoiding simplistic solutions and quick fixes, and by strengthening your private sector, you are building the confidence at home and abroad needed to carry your country into better and more prosperous times.

Mr. President, in a speech to your people on April 7th, you said: ``The state sets the direction, but it does not move the boat. The boat is moved by the private sector . . . .'' Well, this appreciation of the essential role of profit motive and enterprise bodes well for Uruguay. Already, your country is enjoying its first real economic growth in 4 years. And there's every reason to be optimistic that this upward trend will continue. Let me just add that, as Uruguay's largest trading partner, nothing makes us happier than to see your country prosper.

Mr. President, I'm looking forward to getting to know you and discussing some of the issues that are of importance to both of our countries. These are exciting times, and we're proud to have you here with us and thrilled that Uruguay is again in the family of free peoples. President Sanguinetti, welcome.

President Sanguinetti. Mr. President, it is a great honor for any Uruguayan citizen to come to this House. There are strong reasons for this. Our countries were born during the same span of history and were part of the same liberal revolution which inspired them with the same ideals. Our century and a half of independent life since then has demonstrated our faithfulness to those principles. Because of this, we stood together in the two great World Wars of this century; milestones which have defined the political philosophies of the peoples of the world ever since. If this is true for any Uruguayan citizen, how much more so is it true for someone like me, arriving here as the President of the Republic and representing a people that has, by its vote, entrusted me with the difficult task of peacefully guiding our republic back, after a de facto government, to a full and stable institutional life.

You know, Mr. President, that during these last 15 months all of Uruguay has made a great effort and lived a wonderful experience of peaceful change with the full and unrestricted interplay of its institutions and rights with violence toward none. Uruguay is heir to a long democratic tradition and, therefore, suffered all the more from the collapse of its institutions. Today it feels it has returned to its old legacy and has done so in exemplary fashion, one that enhances those traditions.

For this reason, as you, yourself, have pointed out, Mr. President, you have before you today not only the Chief of the Executive Branch but also the President of the Supreme Court of Justice, the President of the House of Representatives, who represents the main opposition party, and my party's leader in the Senate, who happens to be the son of the last Uruguayan President to visit here, 31 years ago. This environment of harmonious cordiality among the different branches of government and democratic parties is the best evidence we can offer the world of what we have achieved in such a short time.

I would not be sincere, however, if I did not mention that our country is still experiencing serious problems that stem from both domestic and international causes. It is not easy, Mr. President, to strive for the consolidation of our hard-won democracy and to put our domestic economy in order while external economic and financial conditions subsist that in some cases hamper, and in other cases actually cancel out, the fruits of our own internal efforts. We must respond to the legitimate and urgent call of our people to recover their past standard of living and, at the same time, confront the heavy debts we have inherited -- all within the context of an increasingly closed and protectionist world trading system. These are trends which your government has committed itself to fight; a position we wholeheartedly endorse in order to preserve the mutual advantages of fair and open world trade.

We have come to exchange views with you and your government on many of these problems. We shall speak frankly, as we always do -- the more so in a country we have always considered a friend. We may at times disagree, but precisely because of our friendship we feel that it is our duty to speak to each other with loyalty, clearly and constructively. We know that public opinion is very important in this democratic nation, and will therefore understand our positions. We are also confident that your government will take them into consideration when we look together at ways of improving our relationship and overcoming the consequences of these problems.

Either international trade is freed, or we must all resign ourselves to being locked into a new feudalism. The more powerful may survive longer, although condemned to live in an aggressive, unstable, and violent world. The weaker, like us, will be sentenced to a life of mediocrity. But all of us, sooner or later, will be staring poverty in the face. George Washington foresaw the importance of this over 200 years ago when he said, ``Sound policy, humanitarianism and our own self-interest all suggest a harmonious and liberal exchange with all nations.'' However, even in our trading policy, we must keep a fair and unbiased position without seeking or granting favors or exclusive preferences, respecting the natural course of events. For this reason, we seek neither charity nor protectors of any kind. We need only cooperative partners, strong in capital and technology, with whom we may work together to build a better world guided by the same ideals of freedom that inspired our forefathers.

Mr. President, in a troubled world, our country is today, as it has been in the past, a land of peace and democracy. We would wish to see this same peace and democracy all over the Americas, achieved by us Latin Americans as the result of our own historical commitments and our sense of responsibility to the future. Uruguay will continue to participate in all political efforts aimed at promoting peace in today's world, especially within our America. Peace and democracy are inseparable. We cannot have one without the other. Uruguay today reaffirms once again its faith in both principles, which constitute the backbone of its very existence as a free and independent nation.

It is with great regret that I today accept your retirement as Chief Justice of the United States, effective at the conclusion of the Court's current Term. Your service on the Court, extending over 17 years, has set a high standard for your successors, and you leave with the gratitude of the Nation you served so well.

In our discussions over the past year, you have emphasized to me the importance you attach to the work of the Commission on the Bicentennial of the United States Constitution, of which you serve as Chairman. I respect your desire to retire from the Court in order to devote your full energies to the important objectives of the Commission. But I must express regret that your extraordinary gifts will no longer be employed on our highest Court.

Your career exemplifies the highest traditions of this great Nation, having served your country in the Department of Justice, as a Judge of a United States Court of Appeals, and as Chief Justice of the United States. I can only wish you good luck and Godspeed in the important endeavor on which you are now embarked.

Last year when you asked me to be Chairman of the Commission on the Bicentennial of the United States Constitution I agreed to undertake at least to try to get the program under way. My old friend John Warner who was similarly ``drafted'' to chair the 1976 Commission later cautioned me that the chairmanship of such a project was a full time enterprise.

I know we share the view that the story of our great constitutional system must be recalled to the American people -- and indeed told to people everywhere who seek freedom. To tell that story as it should be told is an enormous and challenging task. I fear, however, it is now too late to enlist a new full time Chairman. Accordingly, I have resolved to request that I be relieved as Chief Justice of the United States effective July 10, 1986, or as soon thereafter as my successor is qualified, pursuant to 28 U.S.C. 371(b).

It has been an honor and privilege to hold this great office for seventeen years during a stirring period in the history of the Republic and of the Court. I am grateful that our system is such that this opportunity could come to me. So long as I am able, I expect, as I told the Senate Judiciary Committee on June 6, 1969, to continue to devote every energy to help make our system of justice work better.

The President. On May 27, 1986, Chief Justice Burger advised me that he wanted to devote his full energies in the coming year to the important work of the Commission on the Bicentennial of the Constitution and for that reason would be retiring as Chief Justice of the Supreme Court as of the end of the Court's current term. Today I received with regret Chief Justice Burger's letter formally notifying me of his retirement.

And immediately after my conversation with the Chief Justice, I directed my Chief of Staff, together with the Attorney General and the Counsel of the President, to develop recommendations for a successor. And I am pleased to announce my intention to nominate William H. Rehnquist, currently an Associate Justice of the Supreme Court, as the new Chief Justice of the United States. Upon Justice Rehnquist's confirmation, I intend to nominate Antonin Scalia, currently a Judge of the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit, as Justice Rehnquist's successor.

In taking this action, I am mindful of the importance of these nominations. The Supreme Court of the United States is the final arbiter of our Constitution and the meaning of our laws. The Chief Justice and the eight Associate Justices of the Court must not only be jurists of the highest competence, they must also be attentive to the rights specifically guaranteed in our Constitution and to the proper role of the courts in our democratic system. In choosing Justice Rehnquist and Judge Scalia, I have not only selected judges who are sensitive to these matters, but through their distinguished backgrounds and achievements, reflect my desire to appoint the most qualified individuals to serve in our courts.

Justice Rehnquist has been an Associate Justice of the Supreme Court since 1971, a role in which he has served with great distinction and skill. He is noted for his intellectual power, the lucidity of his opinions, and the respect he enjoys among his colleagues. Judge Scalia has been a Judge of the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit since 1982. His great personal energy, the force of his intellect, and the depth of his understanding of our constitutional jurisprudence uniquely qualify him for elevation to our highest court. I hope the Senate will promptly consider and confirm these gifted interpreters of our laws.

And in closing, I want to say a word about Chief Justice Burger. He has led the Supreme Court for 17 years, a time of great change, and yet a period also of consolidation and stability in the decisions of the Court. Under Chief Justice Burger's guidance, the Court has remained faithful to precedent, while it sought out the principles that underlay the framers' words. He is retiring now in order to devote his full attentions to a momentous occasion in our country's history: the observance in 1987 of the 200th Anniversary of the Constitution. This is an endeavor for which all Americans will be grateful and to which I and the members of the administration will lend our total support.

I'm proud and honored to stand here today with Chief Justice Burger, with Justice Rehnquist, and with Judge Scalia, and to discharge my constitutional responsibilities as President of the United States. Thank you all. God bless you.

Chief Justice Burger. For one primary reason: that the 200th Anniversary of the Constitution got a late start -- the celebration got a late start. It is vastly underfinanced, and we're going to have the devil's own time trying to do the kind of a job that ought to be done for this great event. John Warner, the Chairman of the '76 event, you remember, was drafted from his job as Secretary of the Navy, which he did not want to leave; and being an old friend, he told me, when this subject came up last year, that the job of Chairman was a full-time job. I already have two full-time jobs, as you know: a job as a Justice of the Court and the other job with all the vast administration problems. And it just isn't feasible to have three full-time jobs.

Chief Justice Burger. What I did not finish was an absolute imperative, and that's to experiment with this intermediate panel that is now pending before the Congress. It's a 5-year experiment. It won't cost any money, and that's, perhaps, why it doesn't attract much attention in Washington. It literally will cost nothing except to bring the judges from wherever they are into Washington.

Chief Justice Burger. And I've known Judge Scalia since the time he was an Assistant Attorney General. He's participated in extrajudicial activities, like being a member of the American team visiting England to study some of their methods. We are not close friends. I have a high regard for each of them, a high regard.

Judge Scalia. My personal thoughts are -- for somebody who spent his whole professional life in the law -- getting nominated to the Supreme Court is the culmination of a dream, of course. And I'm greatly honored that the President would have such confidence in me and hope that the Senate will do so as well. And I'll certainly do whatever I can to live up to it.

Q. Mr. Chief Justice, some people suggest that the Supreme Court has become more sharply divided under your tenure. First of all, do you agree with that, and how would you characterize the general level of comity among the Justices today?

Chief Justice Burger. It has not become more sharply divided. If you go back and read the opinions over 35, 40 years, you'd find there just isn't any substance to that. The reason there are nine people up there -- and there are days when I'd like there to be just one -- [laughter] -- the reason you have nine is to have this interchange and interplay. It goes on all the time. In the 17 years I have been there presiding over the conferences, never once, never once has a voice been raised in any discussions. They're vigorous discussions, as they should be -- always will be, I hope. We have cordial and good relations. We can disagree in a civilized way, and we do.

Q. Mr. Chief Justice, since you are not going before the Senate, perhaps you can give us your views on whether these new appointments will change the philosophy or direction of the Court in the next few years.

Q. Mr. Chief Justice, what was the reason for the timing of the announcement today of the change in the Court? The President said you decided on your resignation last month. Why was it all announced today?

Q. What was your toughest case? Some people have suggested it was the Nixon tape case. After all, he appointed you to the Court, you joined the unanimous judgment which forced him to turn over those tapes, which were his undoing.

Q. Judge Scalia, many of the judges appointed by this administration are said to have been subjected to a rigorous screening process conducted under Attorney General Meese. Were you at all -- Roe v. Wade aside -- asked any of your positions on various points of law?

Q. Well, I think what has us all astounded here is the fact that you are the Chief Justice of the United States and you're putting that aside to handle a job that in fact is going to be over in a year.

Chief Justice Burger. No, I wasn't weary of being Chief Justice. It's a lot of fun. But I go back to what I said first. We have an inadequate preparation for the Bicentennial of the Constitution. It's a remarkable story. It's one of the great, great stories in American history, and it's our job to tell it. And we're just getting organized. We haven't got a main headquarters yet. We're scattered in three buildings. We've got, for Washington, a piddling appropriation of $12 million, and 10 years ago John Warner had over $200 million. If we're going to celebrate this thing in the proper way and have people get an understanding -- in this country and elsewhere -- about what freedom means and that this is the instrument that gave that freedom and how it works, there is a lot of work to be done. I expect to be working literally full time.

You, sir, have had a reputation more as a thinker and writer on the Court than as an administrator. Do you, too, consider it the culmination of a dream to be Chief Justice and thus have to take on all these administrative tasks?

Justice Rehnquist. I wouldn't call it the culmination of a dream, but it's not every day when you're 61 years old that you get a chance to have a new job. [Laughter] And you take on some things you don't like along with a lot of things that you do like.

Chief Justice Burger. Well, if you look over the history of the Supreme Court of the United States or of the country, you will find at different periods there are different needs and different problems and there are different answers. And then sometimes you find that an answer that you gave 2 years ago or 3 or 5 doesn't quite fit, and you adjust it. We have been doing some adjusting. That was done in the previous 15 years, but we haven't done a fraction of that adjusting that was done in the 15 years before my tenure began.

Q. Mr. Chief Justice, you've had a good relationship with the American Bar Association throughout your tenure as Chief Justice. Are you at all concerned that the ABA was not consulted, apparently, about your replacement on the Court?

Chief Justice Burger. I don't know anything about the procedures, not a thing. I have never understood that the appointments to the Supreme Court automatically were cleared with the American Bar. Sometimes they are consulted, and sometimes they're not.

William B. Walsh, M.D., of Virginia, is founder and president of Project HOPE, a volunteer organization that has lead the way in trying to find some meaningful private sector solutions to world health problems. Dr. Walsh received his medical degree from the Georgetown University School of Medicine in Washington, DC.

Richard Treibick, of Connecticut, is president and chairman of the board of Cable Holdings, Inc., a company engaged in the cable television business. He is president of Alexandra Realty Corp., which handles construction and development of real estate and other projects. He is a member of the New York Association for the Blind, a volunteer organization to help the handicapped. Mr. Treibick attended Cornell University and Columbia University.

Frederic H. Brooks, of Connecticut, is chairman of the board of MacGregor Sporting Goods Co. headquartered in East Rutherford, NJ. He is also president of Connecticut Economics Corp. Mr. Brooks has been involved in several international volunteer activities, including a 1984 trade mission to explore investment and trade with the Government of Haiti. Mr. Brooks received his degree from Columbia University.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Milton Frank to be a member of the Board of Directors of the African Development Foundation for the remainder of the term expiring February 9, 1990. He would succeed A.C. Aterbery. Upon confirmation he would be designated Vice Chairperson.

Kate Smith was a patriot in every sense of the word. She thrilled us all with her stirring rendition of ``God Bless America'' and sang with a passion which left few eyes dry. For many years, Kate Smith touched our hearts and souls and made us all swell with the special pride of being Americans.

No one who heard her sing will ever forget the verve she brought to her music in a way which made her a special part of the American fabric. All America loved her, and she loved America. America was indeed God-blessed to have Kate Smith as one of her daughters. Nancy and I will miss her and extend our deepest sympathy to her family.

President Reagan. Greetings, and welcome to the White House, if you don't feel welcome already. Tonight we mark not only the visit of a friend, but also we celebrate a nation's return to democracy. Historic events such as the rebirth of Uruguayan democracy do not just happen. They're the outcome of the hard work, courage, and commitment of extraordinary individuals. Tonight it's my honor to be hosting such an extraordinary individual, a man who shepherded his country through the rocks and crevasses of military rule and safely back to freedom.

Speaking for his fellow countrymen earlier this year, President Sanguinetti said, ``We know we want democracy; we know we want the observance of human rights; we know we want the self-determination of the people; we know we want the enforcement of the principles of international law within our America; we know we want peace.'' Well, Mr. President, we share those goals, and we also know what we want: We want to be friends with those who love liberty, people like yourself and your fellow citizens of Uruguay.

As I indicated in my welcoming remarks this morning, a love of freedom is an integral part of the national identities of our two countries. One need only think back to the hero whose birthday your country celebrates this week -- General Jose Artigas, a romantic and dashing figure if there ever was one. This brave man, along with his army of gauchos, fought a courageous fight for freedom and independence. Once he had won the day, unlike so many other so-called leaders throughout the world, he did not march to the capital. Instead, he lived in the countryside, content with the title, ``Protector of Free Peoples,'' which his countrymen had affectionately bestowed upon him. Mr. President, as the elected leaders of democratic governments, we, too, are the protectors of the people -- not just at home, but wherever people struggle for liberty. And, if you'll pardon me for turning around a quotation from General Artigas, today, for those who live in democracy, the challenge is for us to be as brave as we are enlightened.

President Sanguinetti. Mr. President, dear friends, you have spoken just now of some two things which are especially dear to us Uruguayans: friendship and General Artigas. I would like to speak about both of these things because they are both related historically.

The friendship between our peoples was born during the time of Artigas' life. Artigas had only the support of the United States. He was received with very great misunderstanding all over the Americas as well as in Europe. All of his political culture and education came from here. He was a man of arms, a man of the country. The common sense of Thomas Paine had already explained to him what the ideas of freedom were. And he had taken them into his heart, and with incredible tenacity and honesty, he stuck to them throughout.

I would like to remind you that in 1815, precisely when the provinces of the River Plate region gave him the title or the name, ``Protector,'' he found himself quite alone. At that time, he was fighting not only against the Spanish Empire but also against the Portuguese, which at that time was very strong. So, the Secretary of State of President Madison, who was -- of President Monroe, rather -- who was James Madison, at the time, sent a mission to see General Artigas, and General Artigas asked for American support against the Portuguese. The Americans gave that support in the form of seamen from Baltimore. So, supported by these naval people from the United States, from Baltimore, Artigas broke the Portuguese blockade.

We could continue talking about this longer, but I would just recall that in 1820, the star over Artigas set, and he was defeated. Abandoned then, he chose the road of exile. And he received then a letter from James Monroe which, fortunately, still survives. In this letter, Monroe offered asylum in the United States. This letter said that not only would he be allowed to lead a peaceful life here, but that he would be given also a stipend or a pension in keeping with his condition in life and his rank. At the very saddest moment in his life, the only voice he had nearby was that one. And that man, who was defeated militarily, triumphed spiritually because he created a country with an idea, an ideal, and that ideal was the ideal of freedom.

So you see, Mr. President, how old are the ties which bind us in this friendship. A century and a half have passed. Our nations have prospered, have grown, and have had their history. The important thing is that we continue inspired by the same banner, the same flag -- the flag of freedom. I would like to propose a toast that that flag of friendship and of freedom never be struck down. So, together with your wife and you and all our friends here present, I would like to propose a toast to that old friendship, which is always renewed.

The President met this morning with the leaders of the United Nicaraguan Opposition (UNO) -- Alfonso Robelo, Arturo Cruz, and Adolpho Calero. They discussed with him the serious threat to the resistance forces now that the United States has cut off all assistance. The three leaders of the democratic resistance told the President that Nicaraguan freedom fighters have never been more committed to their struggle and will fight on, whatever the odds. They promised to fight alone, if necessary, against the largest army in Central America -- an army supplied with the most deadly Soviet weaponry and trained and led by Cuban mercenaries.

The resistance leaders pledged their efforts to keep Congress and the American people aware of the urgency of this situation. They expressed their concern over the Sandinista tactics of stalling in regional negotiations while using the delay to attempt to stamp out both the resistance and the internal opposition. The resistance leaders pointed out that the Soviets are stepping up their weapons shipments and direct assistance to the Sandinistas in the hope that they can destroy the freedom fighters before help arrives. The President pledged that we cannot let that happen and noted that the world is watching us to see if the United States is only a fair-weather friend of freedom, unwilling to help those fighting and dying for the very same principles and beliefs on which our nation was founded.

The UNO leaders briefed the President on the recent steps they have taken to broaden their democratic base, refine their political program, and ensure that their movement remains representative of the Nicaraguan people. The President congratulated the UNO leaders on these steps. He praised the Nicaraguan leaders for their clear and firm commitment to the goal of establishing democratic government in their country.

But I want to extend special thanks to John Phelan who has very actively taken on the chairmanship of my Board of Advisors for Private Sector Initiatives. It's always good to know that the chairman of the New York Stock Exchange is bullish on our program. I also want to thank Eddie Fritts who, as vice chairman of the Board, is mobilizing the communications industry to recognize model private sector initiatives around the country and help give credit where credit is due. And I also want to thank Bill Taylor, the chairman of the ``C'' Flag program, who has provided strong leadership and, together with the other sponsoring organizations, has made this day possible.

The truth is, when we first came to office talking about private sector initiatives, there were a lot of skeptics out there. In those days people had been conditioned to -- certainly beginning to be conditioned -- to always look to government first. But the funny thing was, the more they depended on government, the more disappointed they invariably became. To steal a phrase from the private sector, they were using it more, but enjoying it less. What had been forgotten in all those times was that, with personal charity, there are two winners: the person who gives as well as the person who receives. And very often, it's the giver who receives the most precious gift. Personal, private charity humanizes a society. It makes us more aware of each other, of our hopes and needs and of our sorrows and our joys, and it makes us all more compassionate. I think we found that the cold, clinical, impersonal giving of government handouts can just never replace private voluntarism; sometimes it's even counterproductive.

Well, I said earlier there were skeptics, but they're being blown out of the water by the rising tide of charitable giving. In 1985 all of you, the private citizens of this country, the corporations and the foundations, gave a record of nearly $80 billion to philanthropic causes. And that was an increase of $6\1/2\ billion, roughly, more than from 1984. Between 1980 and '85 charitable giving in this country has risen over 60 percent. Private corporations have been an important part of this renaissance in private giving, as the thousands of ``C'' Flags, waving over office buildings from New York to San Francisco, attest. It's particularly significant that corporations and associations in this country are on the move in new and innovative ways, channeling resources and creative genius into improving our communities. Corporate giving of in-kind and noncash donations, such as property, personnel, products, and low-interest loans, have as much as tripled -- without replacing cash contributions. You are using your organizational expertise and knowledge on the marketplace to focus on new opportunities to promote community partnerships. These private sector initiatives are win-win situations and demonstrate that no task is too difficult or challenge too great when matched against American ingenuity and resourcefulness.

All of you here today are shining examples of the can-do spirit. For example, there's the program initiated by the Clorox Company in Oakland, California. It's called Project JOY -- that stands for Job Opportunities for Youth -- training young people in the art of getting and holding on to jobs. There's the program begun by Avon Products to enable disadvantaged children to give Christmas gifts to their families. Can you ever imagine government thinking of that one, or doing it? The Kroger Company donated 10 cents of every purchase of a certain number of items, raising $100,000 in 1 week, to help feed the poor. Polaroid Corporation in Boston trains 500 unemployed from the inner city every year for meaningful, full-time jobs and follows up to make sure they stay employed. Now, that's a pretty picture. The Pillsbury Company is carrying good will abroad with a self-help program to improve nutrition in rural Bolivia. I wish I could name you all. The good work you're doing makes your country proud. We've shown that American business can, and that American business cares.

And now I am going to hand this ceremony over to Bill Taylor and John here who'll be calling your names and helping as I present the awards. And in advance I'll say congratulations to you all. Keep up the good work, and thank you, and God bless you.

With a view to receiving the advice and consent of the Senate to accession, I transmit herewith the Berne Convention for the Protection of Literary and Artistic Works. I also transmit, for the information of the Senate, the report of the Department of State with respect to the Convention.

The Convention obligates States party to the Convention to maintain high levels of protection for artistic works. The extent of protected works is broad, ranging from conventional works -- such as books, motion pictures, and music -- to new technological works including audio and video cassettes, and computer-related works. The Convention contains detailed provisions that specify minimum levels of protection to be provided by member countries.

Adherence to the Convention by the United States will demonstrate our commitment to improving international protection afforded intellectual property. When we are urging other countries to enhance copyright protection, the United States can no longer remain outside the Berne Union. It is, therefore, a matter of some urgency that the United States finally join the Berne Convention.

As indicated in the report of the Department of State, implementation of the Convention will require legislation. Until this legislation is enacted, the United States instrument of accession will not be deposited with the Director General of the World Intellectual Property Organization.

I am pleased to inform you that all conditions set forth in my October 28 letter and repeated in Section 131 of the ISDCA have now been met and that I herewith forward to you my certification to that effect. Through the extensive efforts of the Defense and State Departments, agreements and other actions necessary to fulfill these requirements have been concluded.

I now wish to draw particular attention to the sixth condition that I have certified. I remain convinced that, as I stated in 1981, the sale of these AWACS aircraft to Saudi Arabia will contribute directly to the stability and security of the area and enhance the atmosphere and prospects for progress toward peace. I also believe that significant progress toward peaceful resolution of disputes in the region has been accomplished with the substantial assistance of Saudi Arabia. These perceptions are strengthened by a review of events of the last five years.

The current deployment of U.S. AWACS aircraft to Saudi Arabia has contributed significantly to the stability and security of Saudi Arabia and the region as a whole. The Royal Saudi Air Force's (RSAF) gradual assumption of the role now performed by the U.S. AWACS aircraft will continue this contribution. Over the past five years the U.S. AWACS aircraft have demonstrated their ability to detect approaching Iranian aircraft well before they would be detected by ground-based radar. This early detection, coupled with the demonstrated resolve of the RSAF to deploy its F - 15s and engage aggressor aircraft, has deterred Iran from escalating attacks against targets on land and in Gulf waters under the Saudi protective umbrella. The Saudi commitment to a strong defense as evidenced by such measures as the AWACS acquisition, past defensive military action, and efforts to organize collective security among the member states of the Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC), taken together with the Kingdom's obvious lack of aggressive intent, have contributed and will continue to contribute to the stability and security of the area. Our continued success in helping to support regional stability will diminish prospects that U.S. forces might be called upon to protect the governments, shipping lanes, or vital petroleum resources of the region.

Saudi Arabia has firmly supported every significant diplomatic effort to end the Iran-Iraq war. Mediation missions under the auspices of the United Nations, the Organization of the Islamic Conference, and third countries acting independently have received Saudi diplomatic and facilitative assistance. In encouraging a negotiated settlement of the conflict, the Saudis have made clear their preference that the war end without concessions of sovereignty by either side.

Saudi efforts to advance the Arab-Israeli peace process have been substantial. The Fahd Peace Plan and the Arab endorsement of the plan embodied in the 1982 Fez Communique significantly and irreversibly modified the Arab consensus of the three ``no's'' enunciated at the 1968 Khartoum Summit, i.e., no recognition, no negotiation, and no conciliation with Israel. The Fez Communique moved the formal Arab position from rejection of peace to consideration of how to achieve peace with Israel. The plan's statement that all states in the region should be able to live in peace was an implicit acceptance of the right of Israel to a secure existence. The concept of land for peace was a direct reflection of U.N. Resolution 242. While various elements of the Fez Plan differ from our views, the Plan remains the single largest step toward peace on which the Arab world has been able to agree. The existence of this consensus provided a base from which King Hussein felt he could launch his initiative to bring Israel, Jordan, and the Palestinians to the negotiating table in 1984 - 85.

Saudi Arabia has signaled its tacit support for King Hussein's moves to lay the foundation for peace negotiations by continuing substantial financial assistance payments to Jordan following critical steps in the process, i.e., after Jordan resumed diplomatic relations with Egypt and again after the February 1985 agreement between Hussein and PLO Chairman Arafat. Despite vocal Syrian opposition, the Saudis sent official observers to the Amman Palestine National Council meeting in late 1984 where moderate Palestinians made a decision to break with the radicals thereby opening the way for King Hussein to begin his peace initiative.

During the subsequent and continuing debate over how to make peace with Israel, the Saudis have consistently lent support to moderate Arab governments. Egypt's readmission to the Organization of the Islamic Conference was significantly assisted by crucial Saudi support for a procedural motion calling for a secret ballot on the readmission vote. Following the police riots in Cairo in February of this year, the Saudi Council of Ministers issued a statement supporting President Mubarak.

Although its efforts, like our own, met with limited success, Saudi Arabia played a major and highly visible role in attempts to arrange a lasting cease-fire in Lebanon. In the August 1983 efforts of Crown Prince Abdullah and Prince Bandar to bring an end to fighting in the Shuf mountains, and again through observers at the Geneva and Lausanne Lebanese national reconciliation talks, Saudi Arabia sought to bring peace to a moderate Arab nation and establish the framework for stable government. The Saudis also proved supportive of Lebanese efforts to negotiate directly with Israel conditions for Israeli withdrawal from southern Lebanon. In this regard, the Saudis supported Lebanese efforts to win Syrian consent to compromises necessary to reach agreement.

Saudi Arabia has provided crucial support for Sudan during that country's transition to a democratic form of government. Furthermore, it has established a significant record in working for regional stability and settlement of regional disputes in countries beyond its immediate neighborhood. Saudi aid has been crucial to the Afghan cause and significant to Pakistan, Morocco, and Tunisia. Despite limitations imposed by concern for its own security, the depth of regional animosities, and the need to establish and work within an Arab consensus, Saudi Arabia has assisted substantially the significant progress that has been made in the peaceful resolution of disputes in the region.

Saudi Arabia has publicly condemned terrorism and terrorist actions, having itself been a victim of terrorism. More important, it has taken practical actions to oppose terrorism regardless of its origins.

I am convinced that the assurances I made in my letter to Senator Baker have been amply fulfilled. A firm foundation has been laid for close and continued U.S.-Saudi cooperation in operating the Saudi AWACS and in building an air defense system for Saudi Arabia and the GCC. By contributing to the self-defense of these countries, we are diminishing the likelihood of direct intervention by U.S. forces in defense of vital Western interests. At the same time, we are encouraging forces of moderation which, if they prevail, will bring lasting peace to a turbulent region.

B. There are in place adequate and effective procedures requiring the screening and security clearance of citizens of Saudi Arabia and only cleared Saudi citizens and cleared U.S. nationals will have access to AWACS equipment, technology, or documentation, or information derived therefrom, without the prior, explicit mutual consent of the two governments.

That the Saudi AWACS will be operated solely within the boundaries of Saudi Arabia, except with the prior, explicit mutual consent of the two governments, and solely for defensive purposes as defined by the United States, in order to maintain security and regional stability.

That the sale contributes directly to the stability and security of the area and enhances the atmosphere and prospects for progress toward peace. Significant progress toward the peaceful resolution of disputes in the region has been accomplished with the substantial assistance of Saudi Arabia.

I will provide separately to the Congress, under appropriate procedures, those contracts and agreements pertinent to this sale and certification, including those whose confidentiality must be preserved.

During the past several months, my senior advisors and I have considered the implications of Soviet noncompliance for U.S. and Allied security, as well as the Soviet strategic arms buildup, and Soviet behavior at the Geneva negotiations. We consulted with key Allies and members of Congress. We also took account of the sense of the Congress expressed in the above legislation concerning changes in U.S. interim restraint policy.

To fulfill the first legislative request above, I am forwarding my major statement of May 27, as well as an accompanying White House fact sheet reflecting the Administration's assessment of the implications of Soviet behavior and of the corresponding requirements for programmatic U.S. responses.

The report further finds that the SALT I and II agreements, even if fully complied with, would not prevent a very substantial further expansion of Soviet capabilities. We believe that, absent SALT II, the Soviets would not necessarily expand their forces significantly beyond the increases already projected with SALT II since the Soviet forces are very large and would appear, in our judgment, more than enough to meet reasonable military requirements.

My belief that U.S. restraint requires Soviet reciprocity has long been clear. I announced in 1982 that in spite of the serious flaws in the SALT agreements, the U.S., in an effort to foster mutual restraint conducive to negotiating arms reductions agreements, would not undercut the SALT agreements so long as the USSR exercised equal restraint. In three comprehensive reports to the Congress, I have detailed the facts and adverse implications of Soviet noncompliance for our security and the integrity of the arms control process.

In June of last year, I went the extra mile. Regrettably, the Soviets did not alter their behavior. Given this situation, I determined that, in the future, the United States must base decisions regarding its strategic force structure on the nature and magnitude of the threat posed by Soviet strategic forces, and not on standards contained in the SALT structure which has been undermined by Soviet noncompliance, and especially in a flawed SALT II treaty which was never ratified, would have expired if it had been ratified, and has been violated by the Soviet Union.

The full implementation of the Strategic Modernization Program is critical both to meeting our future national security needs and to appropriately responding to Soviet noncompliance. However, we will exercise utmost restraint. As we modernize, we will continue to retire older forces as national security requirements permit. We do not anticipate any appreciable growth in the size of U.S. strategic forces. Assuming no significant change in the threat, we will not deploy more strategic nuclear delivery vehicles or more strategic ballistic missile warheads than does the Soviet Union.

As a result of my decision to retire two POSEIDON submarines, the United States will remain technically in observance of the terms of the SALT II Treaty for some months. We continue to hope that the Soviet Union will use this additional time to take the constructive steps needed to alter the current situation. Should they do so, we will take this into account.

I want to emphasize that no policy of interim restraint is a substitute for an agreement on deep and equitable reductions in offensive nuclear arms, provided that we can be confident of Soviet compliance with it. Achieving such reductions continues to receive my highest priority. This is the most direct path to achieving greater stability and a safer world.

Impetus for the original law was provided by studies conducted by the Environmental Protection Agency in the early 1970's which showed that many public water supplies were periodically contaminated by synthetic organic chemicals. To protect the quality of the Nation's drinking water, the original law directs the Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency to establish national drinking water standards, enforceable by the States, that are designed to protect the public health. In addition, the act requires the Administrator of the EPA to regulate State underground injection control programs to protect underground sources of drinking water. Operators of public water systems are required to monitor the water quality to assure compliance with EPA standards.

This legislation, however, does include provisions that are not supported by the administration. I agree with the necessity for the EPA to regulate drinking water contaminants posing a significant health threat as expeditiously as possible. I believe, however, that the statutorily mandated requirement to regulate specified listed contaminants seriously curtails the EPA Administrator's flexibility to determine which contaminants actually need to be regulated to protect the public health, and when.

The legislation also provides for the establishment of a new sole-source aquifer demonstration program and a new wellhead protection program that are not supported by the administration. When originally introduced, we observed that these new programs represented significant and unwarranted intrusions into local and State land-use control and water-use decisions. Although we certainly agree that ground water needs to be protected from major contaminants, we believe that States have the principal role in protecting this valuable resource, and that the EPA has sufficient statutory authority to assist the States where appropriate. In fact, the Federal Government can never hope adequately to protect the ground water resources of America without the major participation and indeed the leadership of State and local communities, and S. 124 reflects this important understanding.

The conference-approved version of these provisions represents significant improvement over the ground water provision contained in the original House bill. I am assured that the ground water grant program in S. 124 as enrolled cannot be used as an instrument to create a new Federal regulatory program. In fact, the only sanction applied to States that fail to develop an approved ground water program would be the loss of their Federal grant money for running the program. Neither can the bill's provisions establish a major Federal presence in highly sensitive local land-use decisions that could affect ground water. I read the bill as not authorizing direct and detailed Federal intervention in State planning and control of land use, and I hereby direct the EPA to recognize to the fullest extent the primacy of State Governments in decisions affecting ground water in the implementation of this act.

Further, there are certain enforcement provisions that I believe are of questionable validity. For example, the bill uses language that suggests that some enforcement actions are mandatory. The principle of prosecutorial discretion is an essential ingredient in the execution of the laws. I believe that the Congress cannot bind the Executive in advance and remove all prosecutorial discretion without infringing on the powers of the Executive. It is unrealistic to expect that the EPA will ever have the resources or the need to take formal enforcement action against each and every violation of the act, without regard to how trivial the violation or unfair an enforcement action would be.

The American farmer is the most productive in the world. Citizens from virtually every nation rely on our farmers for food and fiber for nourishment and for clothing. This Administration is firmly dedicated to developing, maintaining, and expanding international markets for United States' agricultural exports.

Agriculture is the single largest export industry in the United States. Earnings from agricultural exports have contributed $333 billion to the United States balance of payments in the past decade, and these earnings have stimulated additional employment and investment estimated at $1 trillion.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 19th. day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

During the last 30 years, the construction of the Interstate System has brought about tremendous change and progress in our society. As the world's largest and most successful transportation and public works project, it has enhanced travel and has helped join the Nation together to supply raw material, finished goods, food, and other essential products and services, and contributed to the national defense.

The Interstate System accounts for just over one percent of the total road mileage in the United States, yet it carries approximately 20 percent of the Nation's total traffic volume. Employing the most advanced highway safety designs ever devised, the Interstate System is one of the Nation's safest modes of transportation.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this nineteenth day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

You know, your principal, Mr. Holland, showed me your American history book, and I was startled to see that it took almost 400 pages to tell the story of our nation. When I was your age, it only took two stone tablets. [Laughter] But there are advantages to being President. The day after I was elected, I had my high school grades classified top secret. [Laughter] By the way, I understand this is the biggest crowd, here in the gym, since the last time the Bulldog basketball team played a home game. [Laughter] Am I correct in thinking there may be one or two Bulldog fans here today? [Applause] I was looking at those championship banners back there.

But what I have to say today I've come to say to you, the students of Glassboro High School, who are about to graduate. Mothers and fathers, families and friends, you have our permission to eavesdrop, but you must understand that this is between us, one who has seen more than seven decades of American life and the bright young people seated before him, who have not yet seen all of two. Glassboro High School class of 1986, if we had time today, I might talk with you about good citizenship, all that we've been trying to achieve in Washington, or even the things I think we both enjoy, things like football games and going to the beach.

It's hard for you to believe that grown- ups, parents, et cetera, can understand how you feel and what it's like to be your age. When you get to be parents yourselves, you'll be surprised how clear your memories will be of these days at Glassboro High. You'll remember how you felt about things, about successes, and, yes, disappointments. You'll discover as you get older that certain things are so much a part of your life that you'll remember them always, and high school, I assure you, is one. But as I was saying, it's in the very nature of time that it runs on more quickly than any of us would wish, and I must compress all that I want to say into a few brief and fleeting minutes. Now, perhaps that in itself represents one of the lessons that I can impart: the preciousness of each moment. And if you're ever a commencement speaker, try to keep in mind the importance of brevity in a speech.

You know every generation is critical of the generation that preceded it and feels it must discard many of the mores and customs of those who had gone before. Our generation felt that way, and so will yours. But in casting aside the old, don't throw out those values that have been tested by time just because they're old. They're old because their value has been proven by many generations over the years and, yes, the centuries. Now, I know that in recent days you've been bidding farewell to your teachers and friends, and I wonder whether you've noticed as you've done so that this time of year tends to bring out some old and familiar phrases -- phrases like, ``The future belongs to you,'' and, ``You are the hope of tomorrow.'' I must tell you that each of these phrases speaks deep truths. You are the future. Oh, the phrases may sometimes sound worn, perhaps because you've already heard them so many times. And they can seem inadequate to your parents and me because we want to tell you all that we have learned.

We want to paint for you our own experience so vividly that you'll be able to avoid our heartaches while you double and redouble your joys. And then we find we have nothing at our disposal but words, weak and feeble instruments that cannot possibly carry the full freight of our meaning. Still, we must try. Every modicum of knowledge that can be truly and rightly transmitted from one generation to the next can prove invaluable. So it is that I want to speak to you about this nation of which you'll so soon become the leaders, in particular about those qualities of our national life that we Americans have always cherished in our own country and hoped to extend to all the world: freedom and peace. Perhaps you could think of our talk on this matter as writing a high school essay, an essay on peace, one last assignment before we let you go.

Well, today historians have concluded that the Glassboro summit was not, in fact, one of the most momentous. No major breakthroughs were made or agreements reached. Nevertheless, the two men met. They were frank. They worked to understand each other and to make themselves understood. In this alone, I would submit, they taught us a great deal. Let us then remain mindful of that Glassboro summit of 19 years ago. And let us remember that as we look back upon the Glassboro summit, others -- perhaps 19 years in the future -- will look back upon us. It's my fervent hope that they will say we worked to break the patterns of history that all too often resulted in war, that we reached for accord, that we reached for peace.

Do we have faults? Of course. But we have as well the courage and determination to correct them. Consider the darkest blot upon our history: racial discrimination. We fought the Civil War and passed the 13th and 14th amendments to bring slavery to an end. But discrimination still made itself felt. But so did the American sense of decency, and this ultimately gave rise to the civil rights movement. Sweeping legislation was passed to ensure that all Americans, regardless of race or background, would be able to participate fully in the life of the Nation. Today bigotry has been beaten down, but not yet totally destroyed. It falls now to you to carry on the battle. So, fight racism; fight anti-Semitism; fight in all its variations the bigotry and intolerance that we Americans have worked so hard to root out. I make much of all we've done to combat discrimination in our country because it seems to me of central importance to our essay on peace. Here in this green and gentle land people of all nations, people of all races and faiths, have learned to live in harmony to build one nation.

Nor is the story over. Listen indeed to this roll of some of your schoolmates: born in India, Sajad and Khatija Bilgrami; born in China, Wun Ting Geng; born in Japan, Tomoko Sasaki; and born in Laos, Bounmy Chomma and Rasami Sengvoravong and Sisouva Phatsodavong. If ever in coming years you grow disillusioned with your nation, if ever you doubt that America holds a special place in all the long history of humankind, remember this moment and these names that I've just read, and then you'll understand. You'll find new strength. And then you know how it is that we Americans can look to all the other peoples of this planet with self-confidence and generous friendship. Call it mysticism if you will; I have always believed there was some divine plan that placed this great land between the two oceans to be found by people from every corner of the Earth -- those people who had in common that extra love of freedom and that extra ounce of courage that would enable them to pack up, leave their friends and relatives and homeland to seek their future in this blessed place.

We must remember that the Soviet Government is based upon and drawn from the Soviet Communist Party -- an organization that remains formally pledged to subjecting the world to Communist domination. This is not the time to delve deeply into history, but you should know that the emergence of the Soviet Union is in many respects an expression of the terrible enchantment with the power of the state that became so prominent in the first half of our century. In his widely acclaimed book, ``Modern Times,'' Paul Johnson has argued just this point: that modern ideologies had exalted the state above the individual.

This rise of state power affected my life as it did the lives of many of your parents and nearly all of your grandparents. In the late 1920's I graduated from high school full of hope and expectation, like you today. Then just as I'd established myself in a career, and just as my generation had established itself, we were at war. We fought valiantly and well, but not without a sense of all that might have been. In the end representative government defeated statism. Indeed, Japan, Germany, and Italy, once our deadly enemies, all soon became thriving democracies themselves and are now our staunchest allies. But not the Soviet Union; there statism persists.

You know, there's something you should be very proud of and aware of. Back through the history of man there have been revolutions many times. Ours was unique. Ours was the only revolution that said, we, the people, control the government. The government is our servant. Those other revolutions just exchanged one set of rulers for another set of rulers. Well, what then are we to make of the Soviet Union? My own views upon the character of the regime are well known. And I am convinced that we must continue to speak out for freedom, again and again, making the crucial moral distinctions between democracy and totalitarianism. So, too, I am convinced that we must take seriously the Soviet history of expansionism and provide an effective counter.

At the same time, we must remain realistic about and committed to arms control. It is indeed fitting to pay particular attention to arms negotiations in these days, for if the Soviet Union proves willing, this can represent a moment of opportunity in relations between our nations. When I met Mr. Gorbachev last November in Geneva, he and I agreed to intensify our effort to reduce strategic arms. We agreed on the next steps: negotiating a 50-percent reduction in strategic nuclear forces and an interim agreement to cover intermediate-range missiles. And we both spoke of the ultimate goal of elininating all nuclear weapons.

By November 1st we had presented new strategic arms reduction proposals designed to bridge the gap between earlier Soviet and American proposals. Our proposal would've achieved a 50-percent reduction in strategic nuclear forces in a manner both equitable and responsible. Then in mid-February we proposed a detailed, phased approach for eliminating an entire class of weapons -- the so-called longer range intermediate-range weapons, or INF's -- by 1990. And we repeated our offer of an ``open laboratories'' exchange of visits to facilities performing strategic defense research. Until recently the Soviet response has been disappointing in a number of ways. But in recent weeks, there have been fresh developments. The Soviets have made suggestions on a range of issues, from nuclear powerplant safety to conventional force reductions in Europe. Perhaps most important, the Soviet negotiators at Geneva have placed on the table new proposals to reduce nuclear weapons. Now, we cannot accept these particular proposals without some change, but it appears that the Soviets have begun to make a serious effort.

If both sides genuinely want progress, then this could represent a turning point in the effort to make ours a safer and more peaceful world. We believe that possibly an atmosphere does exist that will allow for serious discussion. I have indicated to General Secretary Gorbachev my willingness for our representatives to meet to prepare for the next summit. The location is unimportant. What matters is that such a meeting take place in mutual earnestness so that we can make progress at the next summit.

Certainly Mr. Gorbachev knows the depth of my commitment to peace. Indeed, when we went to Geneva my advisers told me that if we could achieve nothing more than an agreement to meet again, if we could do no more than that, then all our work at that summit would have been worthwhile. Well, on the first day of meetings, Mr. Gorbachev and I took a little walk together alone. He happened to mention that there was a great deal in the Soviet Union that he wanted me to see, and I answered that I wished that he could visit the United States. Next thing you knew, we had an agreement to meet here in 1986 and in the Soviet Union in 1987. Now, that wasn't so hard, was it?

In this essay on peace, then, we can assert that the time has come to move forward. Let us leave behind efforts to seek only limits to the increase of nuclear arms and seek instead actual arms reductions -- the deep and verifiable reductions that Mr. Gorbachev and I have agreed to negotiate. The goal here is not complicated. I am suggesting that we agree not on how many new, bigger, and more accurate missiles can be built, but on how to reduce and ultimately eliminate all nuclear missiles.

Let us leave behind, too, the defense policy of mutual assured destruction, or MAD, as it's called, and seek to put in its place a defense that truly defends. You know -- let me interrupt right here and say that possibly you haven't considered much about this system. This MAD policy, as it's called -- and incidentally, MAD stands for mutual assured destruction, but MAD is also a description of what the policy is. It means that if we each keep enough weapons that we can destroy each other, then maybe we'll both have enough sense not to shoot those weapons off. Well, that's not exactly the way for the world to go on, with these massed terribly destructive weapons aimed at each other and the possibility that some day a madman somewhere may push a button and the next day the world starts to explode. Even now we're performing research as part of our Strategic Defense Initiative that might one day enable us to put in space a shield that missiles could not penetrate, a shield that could protect us from nuclear missiles just as a roof protects a family from rain.

And let us leave behind suspicion between our peoples and replace it with understanding. As a result of the cultural exchange agreement Mr. Gorbachev and I signed in Geneva, the Soviet Union has already sent to our nation, just recently, the Kirov Ballet and an exhibition of impressionist paintings. We in turn will send to the Soviet Union scholars and musicians. Indeed, the Russian-born American pianist Vladimir Horowitz has already performed in Moscow. And we hope to see a large increase in the number of everyday citizens traveling between both countries. Just last week at the White House I met with high school students your age who will visit the Soviet Union this summer. Surely it's in our interest that the peoples in the Soviet Union should know the truth about the United States. And surely it can only enrich our lives to learn more about them. As a matter of fact, I believe with all my heart that if a generation of young people throughout the world could get to know each other, they would never make war upon each other.

This brings us at last to our conclusion. If I may, then, a few final thoughts, from the heart. I have tried to speak to you today of peace and freedom. As your President it's my duty to do so, and because in my lifetime I have seen our nation at war four times. During the Second World War, hundreds of thousands of Americans died, including friends and relatives of mine and including friends and relatives of your families. Perhaps some of you have pictures in your homes of great-uncles you never knew, soldiers who fell fighting. The Soviets suffered even more painfully than we. As many as 20 million people in the Soviet Union died in World War II, and the western third of their country was laid waste -- parallel, if you will, to what would be the destruction of all the United States east of Chicago.

All the world has cherished the years of relative peace that have followed. In the United States we have seen the greatest economic expansion and technological breakthroughs known to man -- the landing on the Moon, the development of the microchip. But our greatest treasure has been that you, our children, have been able to grow up in prosperity and freedom. It falls to us now -- as it soon shall fall to you -- to preserve and strengthen the peace. Surely no man can have a greater goal than that of protecting the next generation against the destruction and pain of warfare that his own generation has known. There can, therefore, be no more important task before us than that of reducing nuclear weapons. I am committed -- utterly committed -- to pursuing every opportunity to discuss and explore ways to achieve real and verifiable arms reductions. What our two nations do now in arms control will determine the kind of future that you and, yes, your children and your children's children will face.

So, I have come here today to say that the Glassboro summit was not enough, that indeed the Geneva summit was not enough, that talk alone, in short, is not enough. I've come here to invite Mr. Gorbachev to join me in taking action -- action in the name of peace. My friends, let us dare to dream that when you return for your own son or daughter's graduation, you'll do so in a world at peace, a world that celebrates human liberty, and a world free from the terror of nuclear destruction. And let us work -- first my generation, then soon, very soon, your own -- to make that dream come true.

The President. Thank all of you, but I want you to know that I am a great admirer of your good Governor, Governor Kean. So, a good afternoon and thank you to all of you. I can't tell you how honored I am that so many of you would come out here to say hello. And just let me say how grateful I am for you making me feel so much at home.

By the way, I thought you'd like to know that my pilot, Captain Jack Suter -- he was raised just down the road in Gibbstown. [Applause] And it means a lot to Jack to be here today, and I wonder -- well, you've already done it -- I was going to ask you to give him a cheer so that he could hear it over there in the helicopter.

The President. Thank you. Give me an audience like this and I just can't resist the temptation to say a few words. Flying over your town today and speaking to those young people who grew up among you and being here with you, it is -- all been a lesson in the great and essential goodness of our nation. Just think of the 300-year history of Gloucester County: first came the Dutch, and then the Swedes, then the English Quakers who were seeking religious liberty. And each, in turn, found here a gentle and fertile country -- a place here where, with hard work, the earth could be persuaded to treat man kindly. And today southern New Jersey is home to all of you, people of every background imaginable -- Irishmen and Italians, blacks and whites, Christians and Jews, all living in peace, living in prosperity, and, yes, living in freedom.

Now, I may be a few days late, but permit me to say it anyway: Happy birthday, Gloucester County! And I'm especially touched to have so many families here today. As I look out I can see some little ones sitting on, probably, their fathers' shoulders, and I can see some that aren't so little that are sitting on someone's shoulders, too. But certainly, it was their hopes for their children that brought our ancestors to America -- the love they felt in their families that sustained them in building our nation. And today our families give us strength still. And I have a feeling that Glassboro is a good place, a happy place for you and your families.

On the way in I saw your neighborhoods and your churches and schools, your baseball diamonds and swimming pools and football fields. And, you know, it really moved me and gave me heart. It put me in touch with America. But sometimes you can lose touch with -- when you're down there on the banks of the Potomac -- and all the basic values that we're working so hard in Washington to defend. It even kind of reminded me of a town of about 10,000 in Dixon, Illinois, where I grew up. I guess what I'm trying to say is that Glassboro gave me a gift today and for that, my friends, I thank you from the bottom of my heart.

Today's public and private sector employers and employees recognize the need to safeguard the working place so that all may enjoy a productive and healthy environment. National Safety in the Workplace Week, supported by the Occupational Safety and Health Administration of the United States Department of Labor, the American Society of Safety Engineers, and the Associated General Contractors, presents an opportunity for all Americans to reaffirm our dedication to the protection of the health and safety of American workers.

President Reagan has approved for publication in the Federal Register, the Coordinated Framework for the Regulation of Biotechnology, a comprehensive regulatory policy for ensuring the safety of biotechnology research and products. Biotechnology is expected to become a major industrial force in the Nation's economy. Applications of biotechnological products for use in health care, agriculture, and the environment are developed through genetic engineering techniques. Current projects include vaccines and diagnostic tests for a host of animal and human diseases, creating crops that are insect or frost resistant or make their own fertilizer, and many others.

The United States is the world leader in biotechnology, owing to government-sponsored research, innovative private enterprise, and an appropriate regulatory climate. As the new biotechnology moves from research to commercial manufacture, this advantage is believed to provide a solid base for the U.S. industry and strengthened U.S. competitiveness. To ensure a consistent Federal Government approach, the framework sets forth the basic policies and procedures of the several agencies that have jurisdiction over the different types of products that biotechnology may produce. The framework balances concerns for health and the environment. It designates categories of engineered organisms that are believed to pose risks of sufficient concern to merit Federal regulation, and it expedites review for others of less concern. The framework requires Federal agencies to review the application in the environment of living microorganisms, such as microbial pesticides.

Implementation of the policy is expected to reduce concerns about overlapping reviews by several agencies. The framework identifies lead agencies responsible for particular classes of products or research categories. Included are: the regulatory and/or research policies of the Food and Drug Administration, the Environmental Protection Agency, the Department of Agriculture, the Occupational Safety and Health Administration, the National Institutes of Health, and the National Science Foundation.

The framework is a refinement of a proposal published in December 1984. Upon analysis of public comments, the framework was reformulated with special attention to fostering a rational, integrated regulatory structure that is neither unduly burdensome nor carelessly incomplete. The framework emphasizes that this structure must evolve along with technological developments. Controls are adequate for the present, but they will be frequently monitored and improved. The framework is intended to ensure timely focus on emerging issues that need to be addressed. The framework provides a measure of regulatory certainty for industry. Implementation of the policies in the framework will allow U.S. industry to efficiently deal with commercialization and promote increased competitiveness internationally.

This week Chief Justice Warren Burger stepped down from the Supreme Court to devote his time fully to the upcoming bicentennial celebrations of our Constitution. It is fitting that Justice Burger's distinguished career of service to country and the law will be capped by honoring the legal document that's the very foundation of our Republic. Today all America salutes Justice Burger and thanks him for his devotion to this country.

I have nominated Justice Rehnquist, whose distinguished service on the Court is also widely recognized, as the next Chief Justice. He's been a consistent model of fairness and an articulate spokesman for straightforward interpretations of the Constitution. And I've selected Judge Antonin Scalia, one of our most gifted legal minds, to fill the vacancy. Two men better qualified for their positions would be hard to find, and I hope the Senate will move quickly to confirm their nominations. Justice Rehnquist and Judge Scalia are representative of the high caliber of our Federal court appointments. I have considered it a primary duty to appoint men and women, such as Sandra Day O'Connor, of proven abilities and the finest character to the Federal courts. And I think we have a proud record to show for it.

In fact, during the campaigns of 1980 and '84, I spoke often of the distressing loss of faith by the American people in their criminal justice system. It seemed to many of us that the scales of justice had become seriously unbalanced, making it difficult to arrest criminals and harder and harder to convict them. Let me give you an example: Two narcotics agents in California had a warrant to search the home of a couple they suspected were pushing heroin. They didn't find anything at first, and were just about to give up, when one of the agents, on a hunch, went back to the baby's crib. There, stashed inside the baby's diapers, was the heroin. But in a hearing for possession, the judge threw the case out of court on the grounds that the baby's constitutional rights had been violated. So, on the crime issue and a whole host of other issues, we've sought to appoint judges who look at the law as something to be honored, respected, and interpreted according to legislative intent, not whim or ideology. One other basic principle guides us: We nominate only those with high qualifications.

Our selection for the Court of Appeals, Daniel A. Manion, is such a nominee. He has substantial litigation experience and a reputation for integrity; even opponents from his days in the Indiana Senate attest to his character and ability. And the American Bar Association has declared him fully qualified to be a Federal judge. Nevertheless, partisanship in the Senate has pushed fairplay by the boards, which is why I've sent a letter to the Senate expressing my strong opinion about the prerogative of the President to make qualified appointments to the Federal judiciary and what I feel has been the partisan use of the confirmation process. Some are doing just about everything they can think of to prevent Daniel Manion's confirmation. Believe it or not, they've even tried to make a major issue of a few typographical errors in several of his briefs and the fact that he practices law in a small town.

Dan Manion is a fine lawyer. Father Theodore Hesburgh, the president of Notre Dame, where Dan Manion was an undergraduate, has strongly endorsed his nomination. I know him to be a person who has the ability and determination to become the kind of judge the American people want in the Federal courts; one who believes in the rule of law, who reveres the Constitution, and whose sense of fairness and justice is above reproach. Let's be honest. The real objection to Dan Manion is that he doesn't conform to the liberal ideology of some Senators. In fact, one Senator blurted out as much in the confirmation hearing. ``I think you're a decent and honorable man,'' he said to Dan Manion, ``but I do not think I can vote for you because of your political views.'' Well, I believe the Senate should consider only a nominee's qualifications and character, not his political views.

Now, I would welcome a national debate on those political views and how we're going to keep up the attack on this nation's crime problem. In the meantime, however, I intend to keep right on appointing tough, responsible judges to the courts. And I would hope that the Senate would get to work and confirm Daniel Manion to the U.S. Court of Appeals. It's the right thing to do. He's the kind of judge American people want, and I think they know it.

The manufacturing industries in the United States have been a major factor in creating a high standard of living for all Americans. These industries now generate and ship more than $1 trillion of our annual gross national product.

Our manufacturing industries have done a magnificent job of meeting the needs of consumers and of the Nation and its allies, and they continue to do so. Those industries have demonstrated their ability to remain competitive in the emerging world marketplace.

American manufacturers are adapting to new economic circumstances by increasing their efficiency, their productivity, and their price-competitiveness. They have retained their share of the gross national product in a dynamic and changing national economy.

It is the policy of this Administration to ensure the right of all American industries to compete fairly in world markets by vigorously enforcing our trading rights worldwide. I am convinced that in an environment of free and fair trade, our manufacturing industries can meet any foreign competitors in price, quality, and reliability.

In recognition of the many accomplishments of our manufacturing industries, their critical role in our economy, and the many contributions of their employees to our national life, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 346, has designated June 21, 1986 as ``National Save American Industry and Jobs Day'' and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this occasion.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-first day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Good afternoon, and welcome to the White House. Forgive me for being a few minutes late on a hot day like this, but by this time in the afternoon I'm usually behind schedule. Secretary Bennett, Ronna Romney, and guests here and ladies and gentlemen -- and especially you, our Presidential Scholars for 1986. It's an honor to be able to help celebrate all that you 141 young people have achieved. Congratulations as well to your teachers and parents -- they're the ones with the ear-to-ear smiles.

We celebrate on your own behalf, taking pride in your individual achievements. But we celebrate as well on behalf of the Nation that nurtured you and afforded you the opportunities to develop your talents to such an impressive degree. As my assistant, Mitch Daniels -- himself a former Presidential Scholar -- pointed out in his talk a few minutes ago, your country's proud of you now, and we're certain to be proud in the future. The inspiration that you as Presidential Scholars provide to all young Americans is of immense importance, especially now that we're working so hard to improve American education.

You may remember that during our first term, the Department of Education published a report called ``A Nation At Risk.'' The report concluded that the decline in our educational standards had become a crisis. If a foreign power had somehow done the damage to our schools that we ourselves had permitted, the report said, we might have considered it an act of war. Well, since then things have gotten better -- not by themselves but through hard work. Today all 50 States have task forces on education. Over 40 have stiffened their graduation requirements, and 31 have enacted or are considering plans to encourage excellence among their teachers. Perhaps most telling, SAT scores, the scholarship [scholastic] aptitude tests, have started to rise after almost two decades of decline.

And now here you are today, 141 of you, proof positive that American schools and students can indeed achieve great things. I can't acknowledge each of you, but perhaps by mentioning a few I can indicate how outstanding you all are. There's Neil Minkoff of Maine, at 14, the youngest Presidential Scholar ever. There's Keith MacKay of New Hampshire, who likes math so much he's opened his own computer business. And Anne Handwerger comes from right here in Washington, and at her young age she's already fallen in love with teaching. Indeed, Anne spent last summer teaching in a village in the African nation of Zimbabwe.

Kim Redlinger of Texas is the great-granddaughter of an Irish immigrant who was orphaned as her parents made the passage to America. Listen for a moment to Kim's own words: ``Today I go to a great school and have everything I need; a far cry from a little Irish orphan on a leaky immigrant ship. In fact, the greatest legacy that my family has given me is an unshakable belief in hard work and the knowledge that I must give something back to a country that has given me so much.'' Kim's comments on her family bring to mind a few thoughts about education that I'd like to share with you. We Americans are becoming more and more aware these days of the importance of a good education for the family. A strong family makes it so much easier to raise children and give them a good education.

So, my friends, congratulations to you all once again. You've shown what we can achieve in two words: the best. And in doing so, you've given us heart. So, thank you, God bless you all, and I'll now do what the little 11-year-old girl who wrote me a letter told me to do after I finished her letter. She said: ``Now, get to the Oval Office and get to work.'' And Secretary Bennett, while I do that, will be handing out the awards. And again, congratulations. God bless you all.

The President has asked to address the House of Representatives on Tuesday, June 24, on the cause of freedom and democracy in Central America. In the President's view, the way the United States responds to this fundamental challenge will affect the course of U.S. foreign policy for decades to come. It is a cause which requires national unity and firm bipartisan support.

The Speaker of the House of Representatives has declined the President's request. The President is deeply disappointed. The President feels strongly, as did other Presidents, that U.S. policy must support free peoples who are opposing totalitarian rule supported by external forces. The President, in his speech, would have sought to outline the historical trends in our hemisphere today which are directed toward democratization, and he would have discussed the exceptions to this trend by such countries as Nicaragua.

He was also planning to give his analysis of the status, goals, and prospects of the democratic resistance in Nicaragua. His purpose was to also outline what type of negotiated settlement the United States can support in Central America. And finally, on the legislative side, he wanted to explain what forms of military and economic assistance he supports for the democratic resistance.

In the President's view this issue embodies a basic principle of the Reagan foreign policy, and that is: We will stand up to totalitarian governments, and we will seek support for people, and we will support people who seek their basic freedom. Our response involves not only the future of democracy in our hemisphere, but it also embodies the basic political ideals of the American people.

The Convention is the result of a broad international recognition of the economic, cultural, scientific, ecological, and recreational value of wetlands, coupled with rising concern over the progressive worldwide loss and degradation of these habitats and their dependent resources. The Convention provides a framework for promoting the conservation of wetlands through international cooperative and coordinated actions, consultations, and information exchange.

A primary obligation under the Convention is the designation by Contracting Parties of wetlands within their territory for inclusion in a ``List of Wetlands of International Importance.'' If advice and consent to ratification is forthcoming, I intend to designate the four wetlands named in the Department of State report.

International efforts directed toward wetlands conservation are vital to the preservation of United States migratory bird populations, which are affected by the loss of wetland habitats to the south. United States participation would complement domestic wetlands protection efforts and legislation; help stimulate Latin American countries, in particular, to cooperate in protecting the wintering habitat of birds that migrate to North America; and provide a framework for sharing U.S. wetlands technology and expertise.

Q. Mr. President, Senator Paul Laxalt, your old friend, said that early on in your administration, not long after the assassination attempt, that he told you he thought that the Lord saved you out there on the sidewalk, not so much to save the economy but to save the world, and that what he meant by that -- to reach some sort of an arms control agreement with the Soviets. And he said you didn't disagree with that. Now, you've recently in the speech at Glassboro said that you are firmly committed to an arms reduction. I was just wondering, the Soviets have made a proposal now for deep reduction in offensive weapons in return for some restraint on deployment of the space-based defense. Can you accept that in principle?

The President. Well, almost all of them in principle -- there have been, you know, like the figures and so forth, talking of the weapons. I think because of the mix that each of us sees, we have chosen a different way to go -- with what we call the triad -- than they have. They've placed more reliance on the intercontinental. And so, there are things that have to be negotiated and worked out. Now, we're still in the process of studying their latest proposal. But I am encouraged because -- not only this one but the first proposals that they began making -- it's, to my knowledge, the first time that the Soviets have ever proposed actually reducing the number of weapons.

Q. Yes. The other thing is just what kind of priority do you give -- I mean, how high a priority do you give on arms control or arms reduction? Would it be possible, for example, to raise the level of the Geneva talks from ambassadorial level to the level of foreign minister to accelerate the progress there?

The President. Well, I don't know. Our negotiators there, we think, are very capable, and I assume the Soviets think theirs are, too. But whatever way is necessary to get an agreement, we'll do. Eventually, of course, it has to come back to the top. And, therefore, if the General Secretary and I could in a forthcoming summit arrive at some agreements there, and then hand it over to our negotiators to put it down on paper and work out the details -- but we agreed, as you say, in principle, then, on all the major elements -- that would probably help shortcut it, instead of waiting for something to come back to us and then having to go through it, dotting every ``i'' and so forth. As I say, this has been my belief and my goal long before I came here. The previous efforts at arms -- which have literally only been a kind of legitimizing of a continued arms increase -- I've been critical of those. That was why I spoke as harshly as I did about a couple of those stories.

The President. I think that this could be as important a thing for the world at large. If anything is to remove this menace -- for the world to sit here with the MAD policy, as it's called -- and it is mad, even though it means mutual assured destruction. The idea that we're going to base our hopes for peace on each being able to destroy the other and, therefore, hoping that no one will suddenly go mad and push the button.

The President. It's things of that kind that have to be ironed out, that are not specific, and that we might, in some instance, find ourselves in disagreement. We've announced our willingness several times of changed figures to approximate theirs in which we're willing to buy any substantial reduction as long as we both are aiming eventually at the total elimination.

The President. As I say, we're still studying those things. And I'm waiting for some of the people who are dealing with the exact terms -- for us to get together and sit down and see what our positions really are.

The President. We know that this has been of great concern to them -- the SDI. On the other hand, we believe that this is one of the most hopeful things that's come along in a long time: with the idea of making it possible for us mutually to depend more on defensive systems than on just the threat of overpowering offensive systems. And we have some ideas about that, too, which we think will be forthcoming when we start responding to their latest proposal.

Q. I just want to ask you, on a sort of a lighter note: If the summit with Mr. Gorbachev comes off, what it is you would like to do with him? Do you want to take him to the ranch? And what would you like to see in Moscow? Have you thought about that?

The President. Yes. Oh, I've thought of that. And then they're going to have to do it right away so there couldn't be any time lapse in there in which he would think, having chosen the spot, we are now doing something about it.

The President. We've talked about that. We don't know now what the time constraints would be and whether we could or not. But since he comes from an agricultural background, we have thought about his seeing our countryside and maybe the ranch.

Q. Mr. President, if I can take you back to arms control for a moment. On the SALT treaty, you and your top advisers have used a variety of euphemisms to declare the treaty dead, but you've never quite said so in so many words. Are you prepared to say that the SALT II treaty is dead?

The President. You know, when you keep asking for things like that -- I spent about a quarter of a century in labor management negotiations for my own union, the Screen Actors Guild, and for much of that time I was in charge of the negotiations. I think I know something about negotiations, and now you have a kind of a built-in instinct. And I just am reluctant to come out with some of the declarations that many of you want to hear, either way, because, in a way, you commit yourself in advance to things that may become issues in a negotiation. So, yes, I have tried to avoid that. But, in effect, what I was saying with regard to SALT II, the proposal, I understand, came from the Soviet Union prior to my arrival in office about observing the constraints even though our Senate would not and never has ratified that treaty. The treaty was only for a temporary period of time, and we've gone past that time. So, it would've outlived itself by now.

But the Soviets were very choosy about their own observance of the constraints of SALT. Some things they did abide by and observe, others they ignored and violated the terms of SALT to go forward with their own arms buildup. We found ourselves the only one that unilaterally was observing the constraints that were laid down in the SALT treaty. Well, we can't go on doing that. We don't seek a military superiority over the Soviet Union; we seek a deterrent. But it must be a deterrent that is practical and real.

Q. Well, would the setting of a firm date for the summit, Mr. President, together with the latest Soviet arms control proposal, maybe persuade you that you should not exceed the SALT II limits, as you've indicated we might do near the end of the year?

The President. We are in the process of a modernization program, long overdue and way behind theirs. Both sides have been modernizing, not just expanding in numbers but exchanging now for superior versions of these weapons. They are way ahead of us in that. We're playing catchup, and we must go forward with that program if we are to have an assurance that our national security is solid.

The President. Well, now, here again, we made a proposal. It obviously was too early for them because of their great national congress [27th Congress of the Communist Party] and so forth and a new administration just taking over. So we've recognized that, and we have expressed our feeling about ourselves and the problems of our own election coming up -- that it would be better following that. And, frankly, I'm waiting to see if he has a particular date that he could suggest. I'm quite sure that when it comes to '87 and they start inviting, they could very easily hit upon a wrong date for us because of our own commitments here. And we would come back with an alternate suggestion. So, whether they suggest one or whether they're waiting for us, we'll work that out, and we'll have a summit.

The President. I think they're on a more solid footing than they've been for a long time, for one thing, because I think we've made it plain to the Soviet Union that we are realistic. We see them and what their goals are, and we're not deluding ourselves in any way. And I think in the past there has been a tendency to see them in a mirror kind of image and think, well, if we just are nice, they'll want to be nice in return. They've got some practical goals of their own. Some, we probably disagree with -- be opposed to. And based on Geneva, he and I did have hours of talk together, and we got right down to basic fundamentals and found out pretty much what each other believed. And so, as I say, I think that it's on a solid basis. When you say it's been an up or down thing, you have to remember for most of my first term here we had Soviet leaders, one after the other, that were almost incommunicado because of health reasons, and they kept dying.

The President. I think they've got some very real economic problems. And this, again, is one of the reasons why I'm hopeful about our getting together. We've all got problems, one kind or another, and they have some very real economic problems. So, I think that the -- well, let me put it this way, I don't think that either one of us wants to engage in an arms race. I have made it plain that there's no way we're going to sit back and allow someone else to build a great superiority. And I believe that they have other problems that they think might take precedence over a continued arms buildup at the rate that they've been doing it in the past.

Q. Mr. President, if I might ask you just a quick question on terrorism: There have been reports that Colonel Qadhafi is in a very bad mental state since the bombing of Libya. Do you have any information yourself on what sort of situation he's in now and whether he's beginning to lose his grip on his own country?

The President. Well, we've seen these rumors and there have been reports, sometimes conflicting. But we are aware that he has not made any public appearances as he usually did. I don't think that one television speech could count as out with the public as he's done in the past. He's been keeping a very low profile. And we do know that -- from some reports -- that sometime back, shortly after our attack, there was fighting in the streets in his country. And I have to say, I think it's apparent that his Arab neighbors, while they dutifully said some things at the time, are more or less keeping their distance.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to switch to South Africa. It's been reported that you made a personal plea to South African President Botha to lift the current state of emergency and that he turned you down. How do you feel about that, and what do you do next?

The President. Well, yes, we think that things would be better and that we would be closer to -- or they would be closer to getting to some kind of negotiations without this. We've made it plain that we disagree with this as the move that he's made. We think that, first of all, that the Botha government has shown its willingness to take steps and has even expressed its desire to rid the country of apartheid. At the same time, he is faced, as anyone in his position is -- as I am here in our government -- with a faction in his own government that disagrees and doesn't go along with what he's trying to accomplish. But he has made some gains, the pass laws, single citizenship, a number of, well, things having to do with racial mixing in marriage and so forth, labor unions, black labor unions, that have been permitted there.

Q. Yes, but, Mr. President, when you single out the fact, I guess, that, you know, blacks are fighting each other and you point out the advances that Botha has brought, some people think that you're expressing sympathy with his government. And while you have called apartheid repugnant, your administration has taken very few concrete steps. And you have sanctions against Nicaragua and Libya, and there's a feeling that you've treated South Africa with somewhat of a kid-glove approach.

The President. We have sanctions also against South Africa. But they're not the kind of sanctions that, for example, were being talked about up on the floor of Congress the other day. Because what would happen with those is you would punish the very people we're trying to help. There would be great unemployment there. There would be a terrible economic situation. But at the same time, we then would have removed ourselves. We would be on the outside and no longer able to communicate and try to persuade and talk, as we have been all this time.

Take, for example, the idea of American firms being ordered out of South Africa. They have an employment policy that was written out by a very estimable black clergyman in this country, Reverend Sullivan. They followed that. They have set a standard for South African firms in that their treatment of employees is different than it has been anywhere else in South Africa -- their promotion to supervisory positions and so forth of black employees. Now, what we think would be truly counterproductive and disastrous is for us, out of sheer pique or anger, to just remove ourselves and lose all contact with that government.

The President. Well, may I cite some of the statements that I've made publicly about actions there and that the Secretary of State has made -- our disapproval of various things? That, too, is a part of negotiations -- and to disapprove as well as to try to be helpful.

Q. Mr. President, if I can turn you to the domestic side of government: I wonder if you could tell us how you'd like to see the addition of Judge Scalia to the Supreme Court and the elevation of Justice Rehnquist affect the Court's rulings on the social issues like abortion and school prayer and so forth.

The President. Well, I have never given a litmus test to anyone that I have appointed to the bench, nor did I in this instance. I feel very stongly about those social issues, but I also place my confidence in the fact that the one thing that I do seek are judges that will interpret the law and not write the law.

We've had too many examples in recent years of courts and judges legislating. They're not interpreting what the law says and whether someone has violated it or not. In too many instances, they have been actually legislating by legal decree what they think the law should be, and that I don't go for. And I think that the two men that we're just talking about here, Rehnquist and Scalia, are interpreters of the Constitution and the law.

Q. Mr. President, [Assistant to the President and Director of Communications] Pat Buchanan has said that if you got two appointments to the Supreme Court it could make more difference on your social agenda, in achieving it, than 20 years in Congress. Do you agree with that -- that it could?

The President. Yes, I think there are a great many things, particularly these social things that Congress has debated off and on and over the years and the interpretation of the law, for example. You mentioned abortion. Let me state just unequivocally what I feel about it. And I don't feel that I'm trying to do something that is taking a privilege away from womanhood, because I don't think that womanhood should be considering murder a privilege. The situation is: Is the unborn child a living human being? Now, every bit of medical evidence that I have come across says that it is. Then you're taking a human life. Now, in our society and under our law, you can only take a human life in defense of your own. And I would respect very much the right of a prospective mother if told that her life is endangered if she goes through with the pregnancy. Then that is an entirely different situation. But until someone can prove medically that the unborn is not a living human being, I think we have to consider that it is.

Q. Well, there've been suggestions, though, by people in your administration that while you feel strongly about these subjects -- abortion, school prayer, busing, and so forth -- that you haven't pushed them as much as you might have because of the other more pressing matters of taxes, budget, and so forth, and that you've almost given up getting them through Congress, but you expect the Supreme Court appointments, if you get them, to help achieve that social agenda. Would that be accurate?

The President. Well, you have found that Congress has been unwilling to deal with these problems that we brought up. Prayer in schools -- I was struck the other day when Chief Justice Burger was speaking about a subject of that kind and the separation of church and state and the interpretations that have been placed upon it. And he said there are only 16 words in the Constitution, and those 16 words are very simple and plain. The Congress shall -- I may not be able to quote it accurately -- the words of the Constitution -- but Congress shall make no laws or provisions -- whatever the word is used there -- regarding the establishment of religion or the prohibition of the practice of religion. And whatever it is, it comes out to just 16 words, and that's it. Well, now, if you tell somebody they can't pray, aren't you violating those 16 words? And are you violating those 16 words with regard to establishment of religion if somebody's allowed to pray? And the funny thing is, it was Benjamin Franklin that uttered the statement in the Constitutional Convention that finally got them to open the meetings with prayer. And the Continental Congress, before there was the present Congress and the Constitution, always opened with prayer. And to this day the Congress opens with prayer. And on our coins it says, ``In God We Trust.'' And to me, the decision that prevented voluntary prayer by anyone who wanted to do so in a school or a public building is just not in keeping with the Constitution at all.

Q. Mr. President, I think the predictions are that Judge Scalia and Justice Rehnquist will sail through their confirmation. But you've had a couple of other nominations that have been stalled on the Hill. And in the radio address you attributed it largely to partisanship. If the ABA [American Bar Association] has given both [Daniel A.] Manion and [Jefferson B.] Sessions the lowest ranking possible in terms of their Good Housekeeping Seal, so to speak, I mean how can you call these distinguished appointments?

The President. Yes, and in this one particular case right now, I think there've been -- well, one Senator openly and in the committee meeting expressed himself to my nominee as that he respected his ability and his character, and so forth, and would vote against him, however, only because he disagreed with his political views. Well, now that is not the prerogative of the Senate. This should never have been said, and that should not be their reason. But I was in this same position as the Governor of California that I am in now as President of the United States. And there I had a legislature of the other party in the majority. And you'd be surprised how difficult, as it got down toward the last couple of years, it was for me to appoint anyone requiring senate confirmation in the State -- to get them qualified. Because they just decided they'd wait -- outlast me now and let all these things remain for -- if their fellow got elected.

Q. The Public Health Service has projected some pretty scary figures about AIDS, and it says that it will strain the existing health resources of the nation. I mean, first of all, do you think of AIDS as kind of public health enemy number one? And do you think it's time for a stepped-up government effort?

The President. Well, you know, I said that in talking about -- well, actually I was talking about the -- well, I know, I was talking about that as well as my own Lieutenant Governor. But I've done here the same thing I did with the Lieutenant Governor in California, and that is, our dogsled -- we're running double harness. The Vice President is a party to and part of every decision and every meeting that we have.

The President. I'm going to do -- even without that -- what I'm forced to do, and that is, as titular head of the party, until the party has decided on a nominee -- and then I will support that nominee all out. I cannot take sides in a primary.

The President. Well, let me define principle. As I've said, for the first time they are -- as representatives of the Soviet Union -- are proposing actual reductions and have even announced their desire that these lead to an eventual elimination of such weapons. That principle, yes, I agree on. That was my goal long before they said it in 1982. I made the proposal, and I'd still like to see happen -- of the intermediate-range weapons that were based in Europe, aimed at each other -- that those be just totally eliminated, that threat be taken away. The principle of starting meaningful reductions of weapons and with the ultimate goal of eliminating them entirely -- yes, I agree wholeheartedly with that.

I am pleased to send you the annual report of the National Science Foundation for Fiscal Year 1985. This report describes research supported by the Foundation in the mathematical, physical, biological, social, behavioral, and information sciences; engineering; and education in those fields.

I am transmitting in writing my remarks that I had hoped to deliver to members of the House of Representatives today. It was my desire to speak directly to the members of the House of Representatives to emphasize the importance of achieving a bipartisan approach to address the urgent question of providing assistance to the freedom fighters in Nicaragua.

Earlier this year the Senate passed a bipartisan program of assistance to keep the hope of democracy alive in Nicaragua. In the House of Representatives many members of both political parties have worked together in support of a program that would promote democracy in Central America and to resolve the internal conflict in Nicaragua.

This program is embodied in the Skelton-Edwards-Ray-Chandler amendment to the Military Construction Appropriations bill and provides a balanced package of immediate humanitarian and military aid essential to the freedom fighters in Nicaragua. The amendment also provides much needed additional economic assistance to the neighboring democracies of El Salvador, Honduras, Guatemala, and Costa Rica.

This is a great day for America. The Senate has voted on tax reform, and the score is: taxpayers, 1; special interests, nothing. The Cinderella team came out on top. As it was said once of another underdog: ``You gotta believe!'' And believe we did.

This Senate bill is visionary in its scope and revolutionary in its implications. It is a dramatic break with an antiquated and unfair tax system that had become laced with special favors, tangled in needless complexities, and burdened by growth-killing tax rates. And it is a breakthrough into a new era of fairness and economic growth. With this bill, we stand on the threshold of a renaissance of business starts and revved-up job creation -- a new age of opportunity that will reach out to embrace all Americans. Building on the momentum begun in the House of Representatives, the Senate gathered an overwhelming consensus for tax reform with lower, flatter rates. Fifteen and 27 percent rates for individuals and a 33-percent top rate for corporations were the magic numbers that swept aside the opposition of the special interests and paved the way for the triumph of the one interest that really matters -- the public interest, America's interest.

Now the Senate and House conferees, under the leadership of their chairmen, Bob Packwood and Dan Rostenkowski, will meet to hammer out the differences between their two bills. I believe the rates in the Senate bill should be preserved; and it is my hope that the positive features of both bills will be reconciled in such a way as to preserve the important principles of fairness, simplicity, tax rate reductions, and growth. Then we can all take our vacations this summer looking forward to the low rates of the Senate bill and a fairer, simpler, profamily tax system for all.

Since our days as a young nation, the American people have always banded together to meet the needs of our citizens and our communities. Awareness, generosity, and the determination to find solutions to community problems are traits that have long kept our country strong. We have always been a people who give of ourselves to help those less fortunate in a way that no government or institution by itself can.

Prevention of homelessness is a complex challenge that faces us today. Although estimates of the exact number of homeless vary widely, innovative approaches to this problem by all elements of our society are needed. And in few other areas has each segment of our society been so involved, with so much dedication and sacrifice. Federal, State, and local governments, national service organizations, corporations, churches, synagogues, and voluntary groups, over the years, have worked together to provide food, shelter, and comfort for the needy.

Now, I call upon all Americans to come together in partnership and resolve to invigorate their commitment to reach out to their fellow Americans in need. Let us all experience the blessings of compassion and goodwill that come from the joy of helping others.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-fifth day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

The vote today in the House of Representatives signals a step forward in bipartisan consensus in American foreign policy. I want to congratulate all those who voted to restore this spirit of bipartisan cooperation on foreign policy issues. Once again members of both parties stand united in resisting totalitarian expansionism and promoting the cause of democracy.

As we approach the celebration of our own Independence Day, we can be proud that we as a people have embraced the struggle of the freedom fighters of Nicaragua. Today their cause is our cause. With our help, the people of Nicaragua will win their struggle to bring democracy to their land, remove the threat to neighboring countries and to our own security, and restore again the prospects of peace -- and the chance for a better future -- to our hemisphere.

Moreover, with additional aid, we have offered the people of Central America hope for the future so that their democratic aspirations can indeed be achieved. The cause is freedom, the cause is just, the cause will triumph. Again, my thanks to all those who labored so hard on this legislation.

Well, thank you all very much for a very warm greeting. And I happen to have a hunch that a great many of you are out here becuase you are supporters of a fellow named Jim Santini. And, therefore, all I'll say to you is thank you again for this greeting, which I'm sharing with him and his lovely wife. And I think now maybe you'd like to have Jim Santini say hello to you. And I'll let him do that if you promise me that you'll send him right out of Nevada come November and send him to Washington, DC.

Thank you very much. And, Jim, thank you. And won't you all please be seated. You know, I'm -- I know I'm a little late -- about 24 hours late. [Laughter] A funny thing happened to me on the way to Nevada. [Laughter] We had to tend to the Nation's business, and that meant helping the freedom fighters and trying to restore the bipartisan coalition on foreign policy. And let me tell you right now that it's situations like this one that we just saw in Washington that make it so obvious why we need Jim Santini in the Senate.

Now, I imagine you're all well aware that the problem confronting us, and that caused the 24-hour delay, had to do with an amendment to a military construction bill, and the amendment that they were going to try to put on that bill was one that called for aid to the contras and to our other allied states down there in Central America. And the vote has just taken place a short time ago. And on the amendment -- now there must be a vote on the entire bill and so forth. But the vote was 221 to 209 in favor of the aid to the contras. Now, as I say, it's only round one, but, oh boy, what a round! We've got several more votes tonight, so we can't quit yet. There are going to be attempts at other amendments, which I hope they'll get through with very quickly, but it does represent a giant bipartisan effort. We hope that our coalition will hold together for the rest of the amendments tonight and we can get the freedom fighters in Nicaragua the assistance that they desperately need.

Tonight we're here to honor and show our support for someone who also made the switch and joined the Republican ranks, and his name is Jim Santini. When he and I met in the Oval Office several months ago to discuss his making this race, I urged him to run and told him I'd do everything I could to help, because Jim's election is vital on a number of counts. By getting behind his candidacy, we're sending a message to those many members of the other party who've been voting Republican all these years yet can't get themselves quite ready to reregister. We not only want them to switch labels, we want them to get involved, to be a part of the team, and to utilize their skills and talents. And if that means running for office -- terrific.

Take it from me, it's no easy affair to reregister, even after years of supporting what are clearly Republican goals. It takes time for it to dawn on people that changing their party affiliation is not changing their principles. They are, in principle, already Republicans. Winston Churchill, that great hero of World War II, in England -- Winston Churchill changed parties. And he made this comment, and it's very appropriate tonight. He said, ``Some people change principle for party and some change party for principle.'' And that is especially true in Jim's case. No one should ever forget he was one of the members of the other party who provided us with the margin we needed when our economic recovery package passed the House in 1981. And he helped me even though the House Democratic leadership put extreme pressure on him to vote against those 1981 tax cuts.

During his years in the House, Jim represented Nevada well. He supported responsible economic policies and pushed for a strong national defense. And, Jim, I think you'll agree with me: We didn't leave the Democratic Party; it left us. And seriously -- and I know there are many of you here still aligned with that party, but I would like to just say one thing: My first vote for President in 1932 was for Franklin Delano Roosevelt. And I was a diehard Democrat and supported him; I voted for him four times. But the Democratic platform in 1932 called for a 25-percent cut in the cost of government, the elimination of useless boards and commissions, and the return to States and local communities of the autonomy and authority that had been unjustly seized by the Federal Government. I want you to ask yourselves which party could run on that platform today. No, the party did leave us, because I still go for that kind of a platform and I know Jim does, too.

Earlier this month I visited some young marines going through boot camp in -- well, I was first of all, before I say that I want to tell you that one of the most heartening trends, I think, are the young people. And God love them, they're with us. I've seen them all over the country, and just a few days ago I was at a high school in New Jersey. And the energy and optimism of this generation is infectious. And then, I tell you, earlier this month I visited some young marines going through boot camp in Parris Island, South Carolina. And they are really great. Their commanding officer, a general, will be retiring at the end of the month. And he told me that in all his years in the military, he has never seen young people of greater quality than those that are in the uniform today. And I found myself remembering -- and if you'll permit me to use a bit of profanity, but I'm quoting accurately -- back in World War II someone asked General George Marshall if we had a secret weapon, and he said, ``Yes, the best damn kids in the world.'' Well, I can tell you, after what I've seen of today's youth and those in uniform today, the Commander in Chief can say the same thing that George Marshall said, and I do say it about those young people of ours. There's never been a higher quality in our military than we're seeing today.

And a majority of today's young voters identify with our goals and our ideals, and why shouldn't they? Let others advocate more bureaucracy and higher taxes. We'll march under the banner of opportunity and more take-home pay. Let the other party stick with the policies that created inflation and stagnation. We delivered stable prices and high growth. And let the others keep trying to cut defense. We'll hold firm to our support for a strong, secure America. You know, if I would have been a young person of today, rather than during the Great Depression, I guess I wouldn't have been a Democrat in the first place. Right? [Laughter] In the upcoming election, I think we've got to do our utmost to mobilize these young supporters. And this election will be vital to everything we've fought for in the past. It will determine control of the United States Senate.

We have tremendous opportunities ahead in these next few years; one example is the tax bill we've been working on for so long. Only a short time ago tax reform was declared dead, yet we stayed with it. We knew we were on the edge of an historic overhaul of the tax code. The Senate bill will simplify the system -- it will bring down the number of rates from 14 to only 2 -- and will make it more fair. And it doesn't take an M.B.A. to figure out there are inexcusable inequities in a system that allows two neighbors earning about the same income to bear dramatically different tax burdens. And that breeds cynicism and disrespect for the law. It's even worse in business. How does a corporate executive feel about his heavy taxload when he finds out his competition is legally paying tax next to nothing? The Senate proposal will cut out many of the loopholes, but it will bring down the rates, also. And most Americans will enjoy a reduction of their total tax obligation. Less fortunate Americans will pay zero income tax. Maybe we should start saying we've got 3 brackets -- zero, 15, and 27. Those people at the bottom of the scale will be taken off the rolls altogether.

And with the reforms early on in the administration, we've ushered in 3\1/2\ years of growth and stability of which we can all be proud. Yes, the American people are better off, but they're better off -- and I would say -- because of what we've done. But let me tell you, you're better off because of yourselves. Because, really, all we did was get government out of the way and turn you loose to do the things you can do so well. But when I use that word ``we'' that includes Jim Santini; because, even as a Democrat, he was on our side with things such as that.

But now is the time for another push forward, a step up to the next plateau. The tax reform program proposed by the Senate would catapult America into a new era of enterprise and opportunity. My Council of Economic Advisers tells me it could increase our country's growth rate by nearly 10 percent over the next decade. To put that in dollars and cents, it could mean as much as $600 to $900 more in new, real income to each household each year. It could create as many as 4 million new jobs. And is that worth it? You bet it is! Well, yesterday the Senate acted on this bill. And as I've said, I'm delighted to tell you the Cinderella team came out on top. The tax reformers and the taxpayers won, and the special interests lost.

The Senate labored long and hard on the bill, and it's been worth every second of time and every ounce of effort. They deserve the heartfelt thanks of our nation. So, let me say right here to every Senator who worked and voted to give America the kind of tax reform we deserve: Congratulations on a job superbly done! And two of those Senators are here tonight. Now the Senate and House conferees, under the leadership of their chairmen, Bob Packwood and Dan Rostenkowski, will meet to hammer out the differences between their two bills. I believe the rates in the Senate bill should be preserved; and it's my hope that the positive features of both bills will be reconciled in such a way as to preserve the important principles of fairness, simplicity, tax rate reductions, and growth. Then we can all take our vacations this summer looking forward to the low rates of the Senate bill and a fairer, simpler, profamily tax system for everyone. It's a great day for America.

Now, in the next 2 years, we'll be laying the foundation for the future of those young people I spoke about a few moments ago. Just last week I announced a new appointment to the Supreme Court. He's a man we can all be proud of. Appointments to the bench are for life. America needs judges of integrity, men and women who will be tough on criminals because they fully understand that the job of the judicial system is protecting the innocent and putting the guilty where they belong -- behind bars. Of course, that's another good reason to send Jim Santini to the Senate and to keep that body in Republican hands. Jim can be counted on to work with us and support, rather than undermine, our efforts to put judges on the Court that we can trust. We need a person like that in the United States Senate, the body which must confirm judicial appointments.

And while we're talking about Jim's record, one of the accomplishments of which Jim is most proud is an issue of great concern to Nevadans. Jim was instrumental in ensuring that the States are provided with a chance to veto any nuclear waste repository site selected by the Department of Energy. The issue of nuclear waste is important to all of us, to the whole country. It is not and will not be handled in an arbitrary or political fashion. What we must do is reject those who would politicize this issue, those who would make political gain for themselves at their country's expense. I've always been a firm believer in States rights and local control, and that's why I'm proud of Jim Santini for giving the State a voice in this particular matter. We haven't taken this great responsibility lightly. The Federal Government was required by law to narrow the number of States down to three in order to fully study the matter. I will not even be President in 1992 when the final recommendations are expected, but I can assure you and the people of Nevada: I'll never do anything that is not totally safe, and that will be true for any President -- Republican or Democrat -- who follows me.

I recognize that this is a very controversial process and that there are sincere differences of opinion about certain provisions of the Nuclear Waste Policy Act. The State of Nevada has begun legal proceedings questioning the process the Department of Energy has used in selecting the three sites for further analysis. Now that it's in the courts, it will be up to them to judge the appropriateness of this process. And I'm confident that this will provide an equitable resolution of this matter.

And finally, you've got the fellow who I've saved for last. I've known Paul Laxalt since the days when we were Governors of neighboring States. And the friendship we've built over these many years has carried me through many rough times. He has always been a man to whom I could turn. Paul is leaving the Senate, and when he tells me some of his plans about riding trips in the High Sierras, I'm a bit envious. But I'll get there, Paul. It'll just take a couple of more years. [Laughter] And, seriously, I want to thank Nevada for Paul Laxalt.

You know, people have many misconceptions about Nevada, and especially Las Vegas. The images of gambling and casinos; yet this is also one of the most naturally beautiful States in the Union. Within a short distance from here there stands magnificent Mount Charleston, with all its strength and grandeur set against the western sky. There are the pine forests and rivers, spectacular scenery. There's the brilliance of Red Rock Canyon and the Valley of Fire and the cool, deep blue of Lake Meade -- and we just came over that and were pressing our noses to the windows of Air Force One looking at it as we went over. What I'm talking about is the soul, the inspiration of Nevada, the home of great people in the land of the brave and the free.

I just want to add one thing here. In a campaign like this -- Jim stepping forward to replace who has truly been a great Senator -- and there are going to be people that are going to talk about the checks and balances in our system. And as long as you have Chic Hecht, shouldn't you perhaps have then a balance, someone from the other party and other side? That is not the way the checks and balances are supposed to work. The two Senators represent a State. I say that it makes great, good common sense to send two Senators of similar views there and not send a Senator there who will simply cancel the vote of Chic Hecht on the things that you sent him there to do. So, I know what you're going to do; and again, as I say, I'm deeply indebted to you, and the country will be also, for what you're going to do.

Today marks the close of round five in the U.S. and Soviet nuclear and space talks in Geneva (NST). The U.S. goal in these negotiations is to obtain Soviet agreement to deep, equitable, and effectively verifiable reductions in the nuclear arsenals of the U.S. and the Soviet Union in a manner that strengthens strategic stability.

The American negotiators have presented these proposals in the spirit of last November's Geneva summit. At the summit, General Secretary Gorbachev and I promised to seek 50-percent reductions in offensive nuclear arms, appropriately applied, as well as an interim INF agreement. Much to our disappointment, until recently the Soviets have shown no interest in seriously following up at the negotiating table. In the past 2 weeks, however, the Soviet negotiators at Geneva have tabled new proposals. I am hopeful that these proposals signal the beginning of a serious Soviet effort to join with us in actually reducing offensive nuclear arms. If the Soviet Union is now genuinely seeking progress, we may have reached a turning point in our efforts to build a safer and more peaceful world. I deeply hope that this is indeed the case.

We approach these negotiations with realism and determination. While we clearly cannot accept these Soviet proposals without changes, we are studying Soviet ideas on reductions very carefully to see how they might help to move us toward our goal of deep, equitable, and verifiable arms cuts. At the same time, we believe that if progress can be made in one of the three NST negotiating areas, it should not be held up -- as the Soviets are still insisting -- pending agreement in another area.

We know there is much hard bargaining ahead, but for our part, the United States is determined to do everything we can to achieve these deep reductions. If recent events indicate that the Soviet Union is now ready to work together with us in this urgent endeavor, we can begin now to ensure a safer and more stable peace for future generations.

The conference agreement on the budget resolution would alter the President's priorities. For example, it cuts too much from defense and international affairs in fiscal year 1987 and is way too limiting in the outyears. Moreover, it increases domestic spending by more than the President recommended. However, the conference report does not call for a tax increase as did both earlier resolutions. While the President reserves judgment on individual authorization and appropriation bills and the use of the special reserve fund, he nevertheless finds the overall conference agreement generally acceptable and commends the conferees for their efforts in producing a report that meets the fiscal year 1987 deficit-reduction target of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings.

This coming week we'll celebrate the Fourth of July and the birthday of the Statue of Liberty, dedicated one century ago this year. Nancy and I will be in New York Harbor for the event, watching fireworks light the sky over the grand old lady who welcomes so many millions of immigrants to our shores. But I've often thought that Lady Liberty also represents another symbol of our openness to the rest of the world. With the ships plying the waters of New York Harbor beneath her, she reminds us of the enormous extent of our trade with other nations of the world.

Now, I know that if I were to ask most of you how you like to spend your Saturdays in the summertime, sitting down for a nice, long discussion of international trade wouldn't be at the top of the list. But believe me, none of us can or should be bored with this issue. Our nation's economic health, your well-being and that of your family's really is at stake. That's because international trade is one of those issues that politicians find an unending source of temptation. Like a 5-cent cigar or a chicken in every pot, demanding high tariffs or import restrictions is a familiar bit of flimflammery in American politics. But cliches and demagoguery aside, the truth is these trade restrictions badly hurt economic growth. You see, trade barriers and protectionism only put off the inevitable. Sooner or later, economic reality intrudes, and industries protected by the Government face a new and unexpected form of competition. It may be a better product, a more efficient manufacturing technique, or a new foreign or domestic competitor.

By this time, of course, the protected industry is so listless and its competitive instincts so atrophied that it can't stand up to the competition. And that, my friends, is when the factories shut down and the unemployment lines start. We had an excellent example of this in our own history during the Great Depression. Most of you are too young to remember this, but not long after the stock market crash of 1929, the Congress passed something called the Smoot-Hawley tariff. Many economists believe it was one of the worst blows ever to our economy. By crippling free and fair trade with other nations, it internationalized the Depression. It also helped shut off America's export market, eliminating many jobs here at home and driving the Depression even deeper.

Well, since World War II, the nations of the world showed they learned at least part of their lesson. They organized the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, or GATT, to promote free trade. It hasn't all been easy going, however. Sometimes foreign governments adopt unfair tariffs or quotas and subsidize their own industries or take other actions that give firms an unfair competitive edge over our own businesses. On those occasions, it's been very important for the United States to respond effectively, and our administration hasn't hesitated to act quickly and decisively.

And in September, with more GATT talks coming up once again, it's going to be very important for the United States to make clear our commitment that unfair foreign competition cannot be allowed to put American workers in businesses at an unfair disadvantage. But I think you all know the inherent danger here. A foreign government raises an unfair barrier; the United States Government is forced to respond. Then the foreign government retaliates; then we respond, and so on. The pattern is exactly the one you see in those pie fights in the old Hollywood comedies: Everything and everybody just gets messier and messier. The difference here is that it's not funny. It's tragic. Protectionism becomes destructionism; it costs jobs.

And that's why I wanted to talk with you today about some legislation that the Congress now has before it that is a throwback to the old protectionist days. It greatly cuts down my flexibility as President to bargain with and pressure foreign governments into reducing trade barriers. While this legislation is still pending before the Senate, it has already passed the House of Representatives. So, the danger is approaching. Should this bill become law, foreign governments would respond, and soon a vicious cycle of trade barriers would be jeopardizing our hard-won economic prosperity. Yes, the politicians are back at it in Washington. And should this unacceptable legislation continue to move through the Congress, I'll need your help in sending them a message. So, please consider our talk today an early warning signal on free and fair trade, a jobs and growth alert. And stand by, I may need your help in resisting protectionist barriers that would hinder economic growth and cost America jobs.

John East was a true patriot. He loved his country and was motivated by a deep sense of duty to his fellow man. A United States Marine, an attorney, an instructor of college-level English, and a United States Senator, John East dedicated his life to serving his fellow citizen. Never flamboyant or interested in personal acclaim, he was a quiet and effective legislator who never wavered in his belief in principle and in his determination to keep our country strong. He cared about the people of North Carolina in a special way and was immensely proud of being chosen to represent them in Washington. Even in the face of adversity, John East put his duty and his constituents ahead of his personal comfort, earning him the respect of his colleagues on both sides of the aisle. The people have lost a great Senator, and Nancy and I have lost a valued and trusted friend. We extend our deep sympathy to Priscilla and the East family.

Q. Mr. President, just a few words. Have you heard about the two French hostages which were released last week in Beirut through negotiations? Does that mean that the free world has to bargain with terrorists or terrorist countries to get back the hostages, like the American hostages?

The President. Anytime would be a good place -- [laughter] -- no one turns down a trip there. Except that in this case, I think that having gone to a neutral country, which was what they preferred in the first summit meeting, and having agreed unequivocally that the second meeting would be held here and the third meeting would be held in Moscow, I think that that's -- we should hold to that.

The President. But, no, I think our friendship is solid and sound, and I think that was evident in Tokyo at the -- with the President and the Prime Minister, when we met in addition to the summit meetings -- when we met just ourselves.

The President. No, not at all. As a matter of fact, one of the things that came out of Tokyo was the agreement now to have a round of international trade talks between us and our trading partners to see if we can't make trade more free and more fair and eliminate some of the obstacles to free trade that exist between all the nations.

Q. Do you believe that the Statue of Liberty, whose bicentennial you will be celebrating this Fourth of July in the company of the French President, remains for the rest of the world the symbol it was in earlier days for the immigrants who arrived in the United States as though arriving in the promised land? In other words, in the year 1986, is the United States, as a country, still the beacon of liberty?

The President. The answer is positively yes. Liberty remains a powerful symbol. One hundred years ago the statue represented hope and promise of freedom. For millions of Americans that hope has been realized and the promise fulfilled. In a wonderful way the Statue of Liberty has been the inspiration to millions of people from completely different walks of life. She will go on lighting the way for generations to come, giving hope where tyranny and repression reign. So, yes, the statue is still a powerful symbol, partly for the promise she makes, but more importantly, because she keeps that promise.

Is America still the beacon of liberty? Yes, I believe it is. One of your countrymen, Alexis de Tocqueville, visited our young Republic in its infancy and observed our democracy. He was a truly insightful observer of America's destiny. De Tocqueville said that while some nations struggle with arms against other nations, America struggles against nature's obstacles. Our conquests, he wrote, will be gained by the plowshare, not by the sword. Our citizens will rely on personal interest to accomplish their goals. And our nation will give free scope to the unguarded strength and common sense of the people. Our principal instrument will be freedom. De Tocqueville's prophecy has become reality, and we are very proud of our democratic traditions.

Q. Isn't it true that bringing back and maintaining older traditions and values, which is one of your objectives, is incompatible with the fact that liberty is won every single day through movement, evolution, and adaptation?

The President. We see no opposition between tradition and liberty. We are a dynamic nation politically, socially, and economically. The freedom that makes that dynamism possible is the same freedom that protects the customs and traditions of all Americans from the threat of government interference. So, tradition and social change, far from contradicting one another, are rooted in the same principle: the protection of individual rights.

The President. The greatest threat comes from the self-proclaimed enemies of our freedoms and civilization, a group that includes, but is not limited to, the Communist bloc. Communists and other radical forces oppose us because they are wedded to violent means of obtaining power, to rule by dictatorship once that power has been obtained, and the unrelenting opposition to the very idea of fundamental human rights. All of these beliefs continue to be inimical to everything that free governments represent. And they continue to threaten the gains of freedom-loving peoples throughout the world.

Q. For France and the United States, Bartholdi's monument is also a symbol of a privileged relationship, dating back to your War of Independence, which has endured the test of time, particularly through the two World Wars. Nonetheless, at times there is strain on the relationship, especially when it seems to us that you do not respect our liberty of choice. The most recent example is your decision to bomb Libya and to request permission to fly over France without even consulting us on the advisability of such an action.

The President. The relationship between France and the United States is one whose bonds were forged in our initial fight for freedom and have been inexorably linked throughout history. Americans and Frenchmen have fought side by side in defense of freedom, and we continue to stand together to uphold the common values of democracy and liberty, which we hold dear. During times of troubles we have stood together. You have sent to us your heroes -- like Lafayette -- during our hour of need, and we have sent you ours when you were threatened.

But there are bound to be some differences between free and freedom-loving peoples. It is precisely because we respect each other's freedom of choice that disagreements develop over the best way to achieve our shared goals. Sometimes nations must take actions even their best friends do not agree with entirely. When that happens, it is important for both the United States and France to remember the fundamental values that bind us together in the first place and to work to overcome our differences so we can continue to promote these values. For the record, we did consult the French Government before we acted in self-defense against Libya.

Q. You also give us the impression that you do not respect our liberty when you make decisions which involve us in an important way -- even without asking our opinion -- as in the case of calling into question, once again, the SALT II agreements.

The President. We consulted very closely and on numerous occasions with the governments of our allies and friends in Europe and Asia and have taken their views into account. We believe United States and allied security to be indivisible. Since U.S. strategic forces are an essential part of the Western deterrent capability, Soviet noncompliance affects the security of our alliance as a whole. In that regard, many of our allies have expressed concern about Soviet violations of existing agreements and understand the rationale for the May 27 decision regarding SALT.

Q. One of the principal liberties at the foundation of the international network of democratic countries is the liberty to conduct free trade among these countries. Aren't you attacking this liberty by adopting protectionist measures which serve to limit the entry of certain European products into the United States?

The President. I am firmly committed to a free, open, and fair international trading system. We have done our best to keep our markets open to foreign suppliers, and we hope and expect that other nations will do the same. Our efforts in support of a new trade round are a further indication of our commitment to increased international trade. It is clear, however, that we cannot accept unfair practices by other trading nations which damage our commerce. Indeed, where necessary, we have taken strong measures to discourage such practices.

The President. The world agreed that apartheid is an assault on liberty, on social and economic justice, and on basic human rights. Apartheid is repugnant. As Martin Luther King said: ``So long as there is injustice anywhere in the world, it threatens justice everywhere.'' We are calling upon the South African Government to end apartheid quickly and get on with the business of setting up a new social and political order that has the consent of the majority of the South African people. The sooner apartheid is ended, the better the chances that the twin pillars of political and economic freedoms will foster an economic system which benefits the majority of the people in that country. We want a transition in South Africa that will bring a nonracial democracy in which human rights and free enterprise prosper. I believe that this is in the best interest of the South African people, as well as people in southern Africa, indeed in all of Africa and the entire world.

The situation in South Africa is both volatile and fluid. The violence expresses the frustration of the oppressed and reveals the tragic consequences of the divisive policy of apartheid. The South African Government has made some important changes in recent years, but far more needs to be done. I believe that the United States and its allies in the industrialized democracies have encouraged progress toward the end of apartheid by the steady application of pressure and our continued support for reform by governments, corporations, universities, and churches. To reach an end to apartheid without invoking anarchy requires careful moves which avoid polarization of attitudes and heightened intransigence. The seven countries which met at the Tokyo summit last month have unique histories and individualized social and economic systems. We must encourage South Africa to develop its own systems based on a respect for human rights, a respect for private property, and economic and social justice for all. Only through persistent pressure and encouragement of those who have dedicated their lives to ending apartheid can this oppressive system be dismantled in a manner that preserves basic human rights.

Q. The United States supports those whom you have referred to as freedom fighters in Nicaragua, Angola, Cambodia, and Afghanistan. Do you think that a return to peace in these countries can only be achieved through armed struggle, or through global negotiations with the Soviet Union?

The President. We seek to give effective support to those who have taken the initiative to resist Marxist-Leninist dictatorships so they can struggle for freedom. Also, it is justified because of the threat that these regimes pose to their neighbors, our allies and friends, and our own national security. Support to resistance forces does not undermine our commitment to negotiated settlements. On the contrary, strong resistance movements can only increase the likelihood of bringing Communist rulers to the bargaining table. The Nicaraguan Communists have so far delayed the negotiation process because they believe that their military power, supported by the Soviets, will allow them to crush the resistance. We want to convince them that a military approach to stabilizing their dictatorship cannot succeed. By strengthening the Nicaraguan resistance, we are giving the Communist regime an incentive to come to the bargaining table.

Q. In the name of liberty, the United States helped restore democracy in Haiti and the Philippines. Why not take similar action in the case of other dictatorships, for example the regime which has governed Chile for 13 years?

The President. The advances made toward the establishment of democratic self-government in Haiti and the Philippines are heartening, but it is the unfortunate case that too many nations today do not enjoy the benefits of representative democracy, which are so important in ensuring respect for basic human rights. The United States has been and will remain in the forefront of efforts to promote human rights and democratic freedoms. We oppose tyranny, whether of the right or left. We have committed our resources and our influence to efforts aimed at extending throughout the world the rights we enjoy, rights which we firmly believe are the prerogative of all. At the same time, we recognize fully that there are great differences among the countries which lack freedom. While we will continue to provide encouragement and use our influence to promote democratic development, ultimately, only the people of a nation can determine their future. We have supported democratic yearnings against Communist dictatorships, such as Nicaragua, and we've supported the restoration of established democratic traditions in Chile. There can be no doubt about the strong support of the United States for Chile's peaceful transition to democracy just as quickly as the Chileans themselves can achieve it.

Q. On several occasions your administration has been in conflict with the press, most recently over a case of espionage. Do you think that the liberty of the press is one liberty which should be limited, as many Third World countries would like?

The President. Freedom of the press is one of the basic guarantors of political liberty. We strongly oppose efforts to limit such freedom in the name of a so-called new world information order or for any other reason. At the same time, all democratic governments seek to protect essential military, diplomatic, and intelligence secrets, because sometimes the survival or welfare of our societies, or the success of important diplomatic enterprises, can depend on maintaining such secrecy.

A government, in the first instance, must maintain its own self-discipline. As far as the press is concerned, in the United States there are some legal sanctions available for extreme cases involving, for example, sensitive intelligence information. We all recognize the fundamental importance of the Constitution's first amendment, guaranteeing freedom of speech. But we, including the press, recognize also that with rights come responsibilities, including safeguarding the national security interests of the United States.

The President. Rather than single out any lone example, I'd like to emphasize how much our policies in many different areas fit together as a defense of liberty. Rebuilding Western strength helps keep the peace. Keeping the peace strengthens freedom. Reviving economic growth strengthens freedom. And we contribute to the same cause through our support for the forces of freedom worldwide. In the past 6 years we have achieved or contributed to extraordinary successes: the expansion of democracy throughout Latin America, the restoration to democracy in Grenada, the transition to democracy in Haiti and the Philippines. And our policy of support for freedom fighters is increasing the chances for democratic outcomes even in the face of Communist aggression or repression.

Note: The interview took place in the Oval Office at the White House. A tape was not available for verification of the content of the oral portion of this interview, which was released by the Office of the Press Secretary on June 30.

The President. Well, welcome to the White House, and congratulations to the special representatives of the 1987 Elementary School Essay Project. It could be said that each of you boys and girls here is just about one in a million, because that's how many children entered the Elementary School Essay Project -- more than a million. And the judges tell me they read countless outstanding essays, but yours, well, they just stood out just a little bit above all the rest. And that's why you're here. So again, congratulations. I know you and your parents and teachers and principals are proud, and you deserve to be.

You know, Thomas Jefferson once wrote a friend to say that our Constitution represented ``unquestionably, the wisest ever yet presented to men.'' Well, right about here, you probably think I'm going to say there's no truth to the rumor that I was the friend he was writing the letter to. [Laughter] But history has certainly borne out Mr. Jefferson's judgment. Through two centuries now, our Constitution has proven a source of strength, stability, and unerring wisdom, serving longer than any other written constitution in the world. Think of that: Young as our country is, we're really, though, the oldest republic in the world. I know that, what with some of the budget bills, Presidents have days when they think the Constitution created one branch of government too many. But seriously, the Constitution has blessed us with what I have to believe is the finest Government in history.

Of course, as President, I find that the Constitution is part of my daily life. It's the Constitution that established the Office of the President of the United States. And it's the Constitution that sets forth my responsibilities at home and abroad, the Constitution that guides my dealings with the Congress, the judiciary, and the members of my Cabinet, like Secretary Bennett.

At the same time, the Constitution plays a part in guiding each of your lives. You see, when the Founding Fathers met in Philadelphia to draft that document, they were thinking of the future. They were thinking of the kind of country they wanted to leave for their children and their children's children. They wanted their sons and daughters to grow up in a land that was safe for people of all religious faiths, a land where they would be free to speak their minds and shape their own lives, a land where all would be free.

We're all heirs to the Constitution; we're all the Constitution's children. Being the heirs to the Constitution is our good fortune, but it also places upon us a responsibility: the responsibility to nurture and defend this country so that, when our turn comes, we, too, can pass on to our children a nation of greatness and freedom. And maybe that's the most important part of all that you've learned in studying and writing about the Constitution. You have taken the first step toward shouldering your responsibilities as citizens of our country, the country that you will one day lead.

Secretary Bennett. Thank you very much, Mr. President. We thought, since all these children did so much homework and they represent the homework of more than a million children, we ought to give you, just very briefly, a little sample of the work. So, I'd like to call on two of the Constitution's children to read some remarks, their essays, little essays, they wrote.

Wanda Nichols. As a young, individualistic, black citizen, this magnificent document means so much to me. The Constitution and its Bill of Rights have given me a distinct and honorable place in a democratic society. I am a respected human being, although I happen to belong to a minority. I can do what I please within the limits of the law. It has granted me rights and freedoms to pursue my human goals and aspirations. Freedom of worship has reinforced and nourished my belief in God and consideration to fellow man. Freedom of speech and of the press have given me the tools to speak out in a positive way, because I am more informed. These constitutional rights have made me a true believer in equal justice and equal opportunity.

To me, the Constitution is like a beautiful and talented lady. She is charming, but unyielding to the onslaughts of bigotry. She is rigid, but flexible. She changes her mood according to the way our society sees change. Yet I am not afraid to face changes, because she is there to guard my identity and human worth. Thank you.

The Constitution is important to me. It lets me go to my church. No one is allowed in my house without my permission. I can say anything I want when I get big. I even get to vote for our leaders, and maybe I'll be one. I think our country is lucky we have the Constitution. We all pay taxes to help build roads, schools, parks, courts, and we pay police, firemen, but most important, good leaders. They make the laws we must live by in America. I think the men who wrote the Constitution in 1787 were pretty smart. I'm glad we have the Constitution. I love living in America.

As you go on in school, you're probably going to see constitutions in your studies of other countries. I've read a number of constitutions from other nations, even including the Soviet Union. And I'm surprised to find things in there that sound like ours: the right of assembly, the right to do this or that. And you think, well, they seem similar, but there is one great difference. And the difference is so tiny that it's almost overlooked, but it is so great that it spells the difference between all those constitutions and ours. All those other constitutions are written by the government, telling the people what they can do. Our Constitution is written by the people, telling the Government what it can do. And the whole difference is the phrase in our Constitution: ``We the People . . .'' So, when you're looking around here today, why, if you see anything that needs correcting, let us know; you're the boss.

Welcome to the White House, and we'll try to get you back in the shade shortly. I remember back in the campaign of 1980 -- please, sit down -- back in the campaign of 1980, in a speech to the American Legion Convention, I proposed enactment of a peacetime GI bill. One of the great success stories of our time, I think, was the first GI bill passed at the end of World War II. No investment our government has ever made returned better dividends. It gave an entire generation of Americans, for the first time in history, the chance to get a college education.

In signing this bill, we're providing not only for the future of our service men and women but for America, too. Our military forces are only as good as the men and women who man them, and in this high-tech age, we need an increasingly educated and motivated military guarding our country. I've had the privilege these last few years to visit often with our military men and women, from Quantico to the demilitarized zone in Korea, and I can tell you they're among the finest bunch that this country has ever seen. The perseverance of the crew of the Stark demonstrated the caliber of our boys -- who accept danger manfully, who guard our nation's security with courage and competence and, not infrequently, great heroism. They are, simply, the best.

I want to pay a special tribute today to Congressman Sonny Montgomery of Mississippi. He is the chairman of the House Veterans' Affairs Committee, whose great efforts have made this day possible. Also, the members of both the House and Senate committees, who worked so diligently for the passage of this bill, and we also appreciate the support of the many veterans and military organizations represented here today. I thank you all. So many of you have worked so hard to make this day possible. And now, that's enough out of me. I'll start writing and sign the bill.

Our country has a proud tradition of assisting in the smooth transition of veterans from military to civilian life through educational and training assistance for over 42 years now. Since June 1944 over 18 million veterans and service personnel have received educational assistance under three prior GI bills, including 7.8 million under the World War II GI bill, almost 2.4 million under the Korean conflict GI bill, and over 8 million trainees under the post-Korean Vietnam-era GI bill scheduled to end on December 31, 1989. All of these programs operated in conjunction with the draft and afforded a readjustment opportunity for many people whose lives were involuntarily disrupted. The programs undertaken have taken place in classrooms, businesses, on farms, at schools of higher learning, and even at elementary schools. In terms of content, they range from remedial mathematics to advanced calculus and everything in between.

The GI bill programs have been widely acclaimed as the best investment America has ever made. These programs have promoted quality education for our nation's veterans, providing them the opportunity to be the best that they can be. Our defense of freedom requires a willingness to sacrifice on the part of those in our Armed Forces. The provision of GI bill benefits is one substantial way for the country to express its appreciation to and support of those who serve.

Thank you very much, and welcome to the White House. I'd like to thank you for being here. It's a pleasant coincidence that George C. Marshall Month, which we will proclaim today, coincides with the upcoming economic summit. I'm certain that General Marshall would approve of my taking advantage of this opportunity to speak with you also about some of our expectations, our goals, for that important gathering.

First and foremost, today we gather to honor George C. Marshall, a gallant soldier, a visionary statesman, and an American who set a standard of honor and accomplishment for all who have followed. George Marshall is the only professional soldier ever to win the Nobel Prize for Peace. It was a fitting tribute. Even in time of war, Marshall was a champion of peace. During his tenure as Chief of Staff of the United States Army, a war -- the greatest conflagration in human history -- was won, and that victory was not a triumph of conquerors in a struggle for power and domination, but a desperate fight of free peoples for the preservation of the humane values and democratic institutions they held dear.

What made the Second World War different from all those that had preceded it was that Western civilization, by its outcome, was left in the hands of leaders like George Marshall, individuals dedicated to ideals which were not forgotten after the enemy was vanquished. It's difficult in this time of plenty to imagine the destitution, devastation, and hopelessness that pervaded Europe after the close of the Second World War. The conflict had taken the lives of millions of Europeans, many of them the young leaders who are the greatest asset of any society. Resources used to fuel the war machines were gone. Great destruction had been brought upon the face of Europe. Germany lay in almost total ruin. Throughout the rest of the continent, cities and factories were in disrepair; the whole economic infrastructure had been devastated. The monumental job of rebuilding seemed overwhelming.

It was at this time of despair when, under the leadership of wise and decent individuals like George C. Marshall, by then Secretary of State, our country stepped forward with a program Winston Churchill referred to as the ``most unsordid act in history.'' Forty years ago June 5th, Secretary of State George Marshall gave the commencement address at Harvard University. In it he laid out a proposal for the reconstruction of Europe, the foundation for what has been the most remarkable period of peace and prosperity in the history of that continent.

In today's money, the Marshall plan was a commitment of extraordinary proportions, about $60 billion. And with that, industry, large and small, was provided capital; harbors, canals, roads, electric systems were rebuilt; and the production lines began to roll as Europe went back to work. The Marshall plan was an investment America made in its friends and in the future. If it had simply been a gift of resources, it would likely have been a colossal failure. The success of this greatest of undertakings, the rebuilding of a battle-scarred continent, can be traced to goals that are easily distinguished from the mere transfer of money.

First, it was designed to generate hope where there was none. George Marshall, as a soldier, well understood the role of motivation. ``It is the spirit which we bring to the fight that decides the issue,'' he once wrote. ``It is morale that wins the victory.'' George Marshall's speech was viewed by many Europeans as a lifeline thrown to them at a time when they were foundering. It gave them reason to work, to build, to invest. And in short order, purpose replaced aimlessness; enterprise replaced inertia.

The second and most important goal of the Marshall plan was to provide incentives for Europeans to find common ground, to bring down the political barriers which stifle economic activity and growth. Our leadership helped officials overcome local interest groups and work with other governments to beat back the pressures for protectionism and isolation; to free the flow of commerce, materials, and resources across international frontiers; to integrate transport and power systems; and to develop economic and political ties that would serve as an engine for progress.

The Marshall plan led to the creation of institutions that today are pillars of the free world's economy -- the European Economic Community, the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, the OECD -- and created the environment where the World Bank and the IMF could function. The Marshall plan was an act of generosity, but it was not a giveaway program. Instead, it was the beginning of a process of cooperation and enterprise that has carried the peoples of the Western democracies to new heights. But there was one most important achievement, too much overlooked. A reading of history reveals that in past wars, the peace settlement laid the foundation for the next war. Hatreds and enmity remained. And today we have known 40 or more years of peace, and one-time enemies are the closest of friends and allies as a result of the Marshall plan.

With us today is an individual who, at President Truman's direction, took a central role in polling the leadership, gathering the ideas, and putting together a comprehensive overview of foreign policy strategy. This effort was the genesis of the Marshall plan. His dedication, creativity, and resourcefulness were of great service to his President and his country at that pivotal moment. And Clark Clifford, we are proud to have you with us today.

Now, in a few days, I will leave for the economic summit in Venice. It will be the 13th time the 7 major industrial democracies have so met, and the 7th time I've been privileged to represent the United States. While our country is still looked to for leadership, the free world is now undeniably a partnership among democracies, to a large degree because of initiatives we set in motion four decades ago. Today free world efforts -- economic, political, and security -- depend on genuine cooperation. Self-determination, as we've recognized since the time of Woodrow Wilson, is consistent with the interaction of free peoples. We sought it, and, brother, we've got it.

The Governments of Western Europe, North America, and Japan face the future together, and meetings like the economic summit build unity and sense of purpose. And that unity is increasingly important. The velocity of economic change reshaping our world is making greater demands on our governments, individually and collectively. This change flows naturally from the open economic system we've established in the West. Our peoples and countries are now operating in a global market. Instantaneous communications, multinational corporations, the flow of international investment, widespread computer technology, and the integration of financial markets are facts of life.

The greatest challenge for those of us who live in freedom is to recognize the ties of common interest that bind us, to prove wrong those cynics who would suggest that free enterprise and democracy lead to shortsighted policies and undisciplined self-interest. Today -- and we can't say this too often -- it is in the common interest of all of us, in every free land, to work against parochialism and protectionism, to keep markets open and commerce flowing. By definition, protecting domestic producers from competition erodes national competitiveness, slows down economic activity, and raises prices. It also threatens the stability of the entire free world trading system.

Some countries, which have taken full advantage of America's past openness, must realize that times have changed. Today any country selling heavily in the United States whose markets are not substantially open to American goods risks a backlash from the American people. No country that closes its own markets or unfairly subsidizes its exports can expect the markets of its trading partners to remain open. This point will be driven home in Venice. It was the central theme of our agreement at last year's Tokyo summit to launch the Uruguay trade round.

While the vibrancy of the U.S. economy has contributed enormously to the world expansion, preserving a growing world economy is the business of every member of the world trading community. It is the special responsibility of the larger economic powers. It will be made clear, especially to our friends in Japan and the Federal Republic of Germany, that growth-oriented domestic policies are needed to bolster the world trading system upon which they depend. We and our allies must always fulfill our agreements concerning exchange rate stability. Economic policy decisions made last year in Tokyo and at this year's meeting of Group of Seven finance ministers in Paris and in Washington cannot be ignored or forgotten. The commitments made at these meetings need to be translated into action. Talks continue to flow about the necessity of a coordinated attack on market-distorting agricultural policies, policies which are found in almost every Western country. The time to act is fast approaching.

One concern shared by the industrialized powers is what to do about the Third World countries which are not developing, not progressing, countries that, if something doesn't happen, will be left behind. Japan has made admirable strides in this direction by offering to share some of its wealth, some of its trade surplus, with lesser developed nations. I hope that during the course of this summit Japan will clarify what form this aid will take. I also hope that other countries will consider following Japan's good example.

However, as I noted about the European example of four decades ago, the transfer of cash alone is not the solution. If tax rates are too high, if markets are not free, if government is big, corrupt, or abusive, a country cannot expect to attract the expertise and private investment needed to advance, nor will its own people have the incentives needed to push their economy forward. After the war, German industry was little more than a shell. If Ludwig Erhard and Konrad Adenauer, courageous democratic postwar leaders of that country, had not dramatically, in one fell swoop, eliminated most of the intrusive controls on the West German economy in 1948, Marshall plan aid might not have had the miraculous impact that it did.

If we're serious about changing the plight of less fortunate nations, we must, at the very least, be candid with them about these economic realities, open their eyes to the secret of Germany's restoration and the secret of the amazing growth taking place on the Pacific rim. That secret is a Marshall plan of ideas. It is simply that freedom of enterprise, competition, and the profit motive work. They work so well that the United States now must maneuver with economically powerful competitors, friendly competitors.

And, yes, let us admit the recognizable friction among the great democracies about trade and economic policy. Our heated debates and maneuverings and the fact they're front-page news are a healthy sign. First, during economic movement, close friends disagree, but no one should lose sight of the impressive strides taking place. Second, the attention paid to complex economic issues, which decades ago were subject matter only for specialists, suggests the wide degree of consensus our nations have reached on the vital issues of war and peace, human rights, and democracy.

Today, the unity of the West on security issues is something which George Marshall and his contemporaries would look on with a deep and abiding pride. Marshall led America through war and out of isolationism. Like protectionism, isolationism is a tempting illusion. Four decades of European peace and the greatest economic expansion in history stand as evidence that isolationism and protectionism are not the way. We must work with like-minded friends to direct the course of history, or history will be determined by others who do not share our values, and we will not escape the consequences of the decisions they make.

Nowhere is this burden heavier than in the Middle East, a region that has been plagued with turmoil and death. If we retreat from the challenge, if we sail to a distance and wait passively on the sidelines, forces hostile to the free world will eventually have their way. Two weeks ago, we lost 37 of our sons in the Persian Gulf. They were the pride and joy of their families, fine young men who volunteered to wear the uniform and serve their country. We have none better than these. They died while guarding a chokepoint of freedom, deterring aggression, and reaffirming America's willingness to protect its vital interests.

Yet the American people are aware that it is not our interests alone that are being protected. The dependence of our allies on the flow of oil from that area is no secret. During the upcoming summit in Venice, we'll be discussing the common security interests shared by the Western democracies in the Persian Gulf. The future belongs to the brave. Free men should not cower before such challenges, and they should not expect to stand alone. And we're working together in a number of critical areas. Our friends and allies have been cooperating ever more closely to combat the scourge of terrorism. Democracies are peculiarly vulnerable to this form of international criminality, and at the upcoming Venice summit, we will give renewed impetus to the momentum which has developed in the past year.

The Western alliance, with courage and unity of purpose, has time and again thwarted threats to our prosperity and security. During the last decade, as American military spending declined, the Soviets raced ahead to gain a strategic advantage, deploying a new generation of intermediate-range missiles aimed at our European allies. This hostile maneuver, part of a long-term strategy to separate Europe from the United States, was countered by a united alliance. Pershing and cruise missiles were deployed in Western Europe, even amidst the noise and clamor of sometimes violent opposition and an intensely hostile Soviet propaganda campaign. Let no one forget, 6 years ago we offered to refrain from deploying our intermediate-range missiles if the Soviets would agree to dismantle their own. It was called the zero option. The other side refused. At that time, a vocal minority in Western countries, including the United States, suggested if we moved forward with deployment of our Pershing and cruise missiles all hope of arms control agreements would be lost.

The pessimists, however, have been proven wrong, and Western resolve is paying off. In recent months, we've witnessed considerable progress in our talks with the Soviet Government. The Kremlin now in principle accepts the zero option formula in Europe, and our negotiators are busy seeing if the details can be worked out. In short, we may be on the edge of an historic reduction of the number of nuclear weapons threatening mankind. If this great first step is taken, if nuclear arms reduction is achieved, it'll be due to the strength and determination of allied leaders across Western Europe who refused to accept the Soviet nuclear domination of Europe. European leaders, and indeed most Europeans, have come to understand that peace comes only through strength. Strength and realism are the watchwords for real progress in dealing with our Soviet adversaries.

As we view changes which seem to be happening in the Soviet Union with cautious optimism, let it be remembered that, four decades ago, the Kremlin rejected Soviet participation in the Marshall plan. If the current Soviet leadership seeks another path, if they reject the closed, isolated, and belligerent policies they inherited, if they wish their country to be a part of the free world economy, we welcome the change. Let there be no mistake: The Soviet Government is subject to the same rules as any other. Any government which is part of our deals with the West's major economic institutions must do so with good faith, open books, and the open government on which both depend. Economic transactions are not maneuvers for political gain or international leverage; such destructive tactics are not tolerated. Countries which are part of the system are expected to do their best to strengthen the process and institutions or be condemned to economic isolation.

The Soviet Union must also understand that the price of entry into the community of prosperous and productive nations is not just an economic price. There is a political price of even greater significance: respect for and support for the values of freedom that are, in the end, the true engines of material prosperity. Time will tell if the signs emanating from the Soviet Union reflect real change or illusion. The decisions made by the Soviet leaders themselves will determine if relations will bloom or wither. Any agreement to reduce nuclear weapons, for example, must be followed by reductions in conventional forces. We are looking closely for signs that tangible changes have been made in that country's respect for human rights, and that does not mean just letting out a few of the better known dissidents. We're waiting for signs of an end to their aggression in Afghanistan.

This year is also the 40th anniversary of the Truman doctrine, which fully recognized the need for economic assistance, but underscored the necessity of providing those under attack the weapons needed to defend themselves. On March 12, 1947, President Truman addressed a joint session of Congress and spelled out America's commitment. ``It must be the policy of the United States to support free peoples who are resisting attempted subjugation by armed minorities or by outside pressures. I believe that we must assist free peoples to work out their own destinies in their own way.'' So said Harry Truman.

Nineteen forty-seven was a volatile political year for our country. I was a Democrat back then. President Truman was under attack from both sides of his own party, and the opposition controlled both Houses of Congress -- and believe me, I know how frustrating that can be. Even amidst the deep political divisions so evident in 1947, the Marshall plan and Truman doctrine were approved by Congress. In the end, it was our ability to overcome our own domestic political discord and forge a bipartisan approach that made the difference. Greece and Turkey were saved; Western Europe was put on the path to recovery; human freedom was given a chance. Democracy has its weaknesses, but its strengths will prevail.

I leave for Europe with confidence. This generation of free men and women, too, will work together and succeed. We will pass on to our children a world as filled with hope and opportunity as the one we were handed. We owe this to those who went before us, to George C. Marshall and others who shaped the world we live in. With this said, I will sign the order proclaiming George C. Marshall Month. Thank you, and God bless you.

Forty years ago this June 5, Secretary of State George Catlett Marshall, Jr., in a commencement address at Harvard University, proposed a plan for the reconstruction of war-shattered Europe. It is truly fitting that we commemorate the 40th anniversary of what became known as the Marshall Plan, because it was the foundation for the most remarkable period of peace and prosperity in history. Highly symbolic of American commitment to peace and freedom in Europe, the Plan most appropriately bore George Marshall's name. As Chief of Staff of the Army during World War II, he had been instrumental in the liberation of Europe; after peace had come, he worked with equal vigor as Secretary of State to see Europe restored to a new level of strength and vitality.

The Marshall Plan is a proud monument in the history of our Nation, because it derives from our large and generous spirit and our commitment to the principles of interdependence, self-determination, and openness to positive cooperation. The plan succeeded beyond greatest expectations and remains an inspiration today because it demonstrates what is possible when nations lay aside differences to meet a common challenge.

We also take this opportunity to honor George C. Marshall for his lifetime of devotion to the United States of America. He led the Army during our greatest test of arms, served as Secretary of State and Secretary of Defense, and became the first professional soldier to receive the Nobel Peace Prize. He will be remembered forever as the epitome of the citizen soldier.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this first day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The President. I have a statement for you: Paul Volcker has advised me of his decision not to accept a third term as a member and Chairman of the Federal Reserve Board. I accepted Mr. Volcker's decision with great reluctance and regret. He has served with distinction on the Board of Governors and has been an historic Chairman during this time of economic recovery and expansion.

Therefore, it's my intention to nominate Dr. Alan Greenspan to a 4-year term as Chairman of the Federal Reserve. Mr. Volcker has indicated his strong support for Dr. Greenspan. And let me add, my dedication to our fight to hold down the forces of inflation remains as strong as ever. And I know that Dr. Greenspan shares that same commitment.

Now, let me explain that because of my schedule and an appointment waiting for me, I am going to leave you and these three gentlemen here -- Chairman Volcker and Secretary Baker and Dr. Greenspan all will have statements for you and take your questions.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this second day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The general waiver authority conferred by section 402 of the Act is an important means for the strengthening of mutually beneficial relations between the United States and certain countries of Eastern Europe and the People's Republic of China. The waiver authority has permitted us to conclude and maintain in force bilateral trade agreements with Hungary, Romania, and the People's Republic of China. These agreements continue to be fundamental elements in our political and economic relations with those countries, including important exchanges on emigration and human rights matters. Granting of Most Favored Nation (MFN) status gives U.S. companies the ability to compete in those markets. Moreover, continuation of the waiver authority would permit future expansion of our bilateral relations with other countries now subject to subsections 402 (a) and (b) of the Act, should circumstances permit. I believe that these considerations clearly warrant this renewal of the general waiver authority.

The American Embassy in Bucharest issued visas or other documentation to 1,996 people in 1986 for legal departure from Romania to the United States. Although this figure reflects a decline in Romanian passport issuances to individuals qualified for U.S. admissions processing in the latter part of 1986, and a decrease from the previous year's total of 2,913, it still is substantial in human terms. The more than 900 new approvals since January and discussions with the Romanian Government suggest that steps are being taken to increase the flow to a level consistent with U.S. immigration and admissions procedures.

Although numerous problems remain in the emigration area, the Romanian Government's substantial implementation of new procedures for emigration from Romania to the United States, which were agreed to in 1985, has reduced material and physical hardships for the majority of people departing for the United States since the middle of 1985. The Romanian Government also has continued to honor its assurances, given in June 1983, that it would not require reimbursement of education costs as a precondition to emigration.

I share the strong concerns manifested among the public and in the Congress regarding many Romanian Government policies and practices regarding human, including religious, rights and the treatment of ethnic minorities. However, it is the MFN relationship that enables us to engage the Romanians in a frank dialogue on these issues and work to improve conditions there.

We have been able to raise issues of concern to minorities, particularly with regard to educational and cultural opportunities. We have urged the Romanian Government to ease administrative restrictions on the ``unrecognized'' religious groups and to release imprisoned religious activists. Similarly, we have argued against measures that discourage construction and repair of churches and that have allowed, in a number of cases in recent years, their demolition for alleged building code violations or for urban renewal purposes.

I can report that many of the cases of high U.S. public and congressional interest have been resolved. Constantin Sfatcu and Dorel Catarama, freed earlier from prison, have now emigrated to the United States. The charges against Ilie Neamtu have been dismissed by a Romanian court. The mathematicians Radu Rosu and Silviu Teleman have been allowed to take up academic positions in this country.

The Second Baptist Church in Oradea will be spared from demolition, and we are trying to assist the congregation in gaining permission to build on a newly acquired site. The Seventh Day Adventists have been given assurances regarding a replacement site for a church and offices that were torn down last year because they were in a redevelopment zone. Although one major synagogue was demolished in 1986, important Jewish buildings in Bucharest, the Choral and Great Synagogues and the Jewish museum, have been preserved in accordance with assurances provided by the Romanian Government. We also have been successful in promoting the printing of Protestant Bibles, something that has not happened in Romania since the 1920's.

My decision to extend the waiver authority for Romania for 1987 - 88 has been taken after careful deliberation within the Administration. I have concluded that extension of MFN to Romania continues not only substantially to promote the objectives of the Act concerning emigration, but also to enable us to have an impact we would not have otherwise on human rights concerns and to help to strengthen the extent of religious freedom in Romania.

Despite many problems, religious observance is active and widespread in Romania and, especially among the Protestant denominations, is growing faster than in other countries of Eastern Europe. Romania has some 8,000 functioning Orthodox churches, as well as over 4,000 of other denominations including more than 1,000 functioning Baptist churches. The extension of MFN has facilitated American citizens' access to co-religionists in Romania as well as the flow of several million dollars' worth of material assistance to them each year. In this context, I believe it important that existing U.S. access and influence be preserved.

I have instructed the Secretary of State to pursue with renewed vigor our human rights dialogue with Romania and seek further improvements, and to continue to report to me and to the Congress every 6 months concerning these matters.

The President is forwarding to the Congress his determination to continue most favored nation tariff status for Romania, Hungary, and the People's Republic of China. MFN is a basic element in the development of bilateral trade relations with each of these countries and is an important aspect of our political relationships as well. The President concluded that extension of MFN status to these countries for another year, in accordance with the Jackson-Vanik amendment, would serve the economic and foreign policy interests of the United States.

The decision to continue Romania's MFN status was exceptionally difficult. The issue was addressed at the highest levels of the administration. All options were seriously considered. The President carefully weighed the strong criticisms that have been made of Romania's human rights record. He shares the concerns expressed in the Congress and by private citizens about violations of basic human rights in Romania, despite the Romanian Government's freely undertaken commitments under the Helsinki Final Act and other international instruments. He found reports concerning limitations on religious freedom and discriminatory treatment of national minorities particularly distressing. He is sympathetic to the plight of the Romanian people who endure a very harsh economic and political reality. The President also has been disappointed by the Romanian Government's very limited response to our numerous expressions of concern.

However, after weighing all the factors, the President decided that we should continue the MFN relationship with Romania as long as it enables us to help substantial numbers of people. Over the years, MFN has stimulated increased Romanian emigration and made possible the reunification of thousands of divided families. MFN has also enabled us to have an impact on Romania's human rights practices and to help strengthen the conditions for religious observance there. We are not prepared to place at risk these benefits. They are more modest than we would like but nonetheless important in human terms.

For the President, the humanitarian considerations were most compelling in deciding to renew Romania's MFN status. He has taken the position that it is better to direct our efforts to improving conditions that arouse our concern than to abandon the principal means of influence we now have and walk away. As noted in his report to the Congress, the President has instructed Secretary Shultz to pursue our human rights dialog with Romania with renewed vigor.

The President. No summit meeting has been scheduled. You may remember that in November 1985, when General Secretary Gorbachev and I met in Geneva, we agreed to intensify the dialog between our two countries. As part of this process of dialog, I invited the General Secretary to visit the United States. My invitation to Mr. Gorbachev remains open, and I will welcome him whenever he chooses to come.

Q. You have said you will consult with your European and Asian allies on arms control. What does consultation mean to you? Are you willing to give the allies ``veto power'' in sensitive issues or just the right to voice concerns? For example, would you be inclined to sign an arms control agreement without the alliance's consensus?

The President. We, of course, consult closely with our allies on the whole range of security issues as well as many other important questions. One topic in particular, INF, has been the subject of especially intense consultations throughout my administration. In 1979, in response to the new and unprovoked threat to our allies posed by the deployment of new triple-warhead Soviet SS - 20 missiles, NATO made a decision to pursue a dual track of modernization of longer range INF nuclear forces in parallel with U.S.-Soviet arms control negotiations. U.S. positions at the INF negotiations have been developed in close collaboration with our NATO allies as well as our friends and allies in Asia, particularly Japan, and have been fully supported by them.

Recently, we also have been consulting within the alliance on the question of reduction or elimination of shorter range INF missiles. There will be no decision until the consultation process has been concluded. Whatever decision is reached, the United States remains fully committed to effective deterrence and the NATO strategy of flexible response, which requires U.S. conventional and nuclear forces in Europe as well as U.S. strategic forces.

The President. We favor not only close contacts between East and West Berlin but the elimination of all barriers between the two parts of this single city. In a word, we want the Berlin Wall to come down so that the reintegration of all four sectors of the city into one unit again becomes a reality. Moreover, preservation of the city's current legal status remains vital to protect the freedom of the Western sectors. Visits and exchanges which can be carried out without undermining that status are to be welcomed, but clearly caution and close consultation among the Governments of Berlin, Bonn, and the three protective powers are essential. Such consultations have worked smoothly in the past and, I'm certain, will work well in the future.

I would add that the East Germans have demonstrated provocative contempt for the status and stability of Berlin over the past year. They harassed diplomatic personnel last May by attempting to restrict their movements. They subsequently attempted to exploit CDE procedures to undermine Berlin's interests. And they declined cooperation on 750th anniversary events except when it served their narrow interests. Furthermore, brutal killings on the Berlin Wall have increased recently.

Q. The United States is pressing her major trading partners to stimulate their economies and is, in the case of Japan, even applying sanctions. Do you really think these nations are obligated to ``bail out'' the United States, as critics have put it? How do you respond to the view that the U.S. economy is not sufficiently focusing on foreign trade? Will you be able to prevent trade conflicts with the European Community, for instance over agriculture, from getting worse?

The President. Let's get the facts straight: We are not looking for a ``bail out'' of the United States by her trading partners. The serious imbalance we face in world trade today was caused by a number of factors. The U.S. economy has grown faster since the early eighties than other major economies. This fact combined with the excess of investment demand over savings in the United States generated large capital flows into the United States. As a result, for the last 4 years the United States has been a net importer from other countries to the tune of $550 billion. This pattern cannot be sustained. To reverse it, all major trading countries will have to cooperate. The shifts in exchange rates since early 1985 are contributing to the adjustment of external imbalances. Japan, the largest creditor nation in history, must reduce its trade surplus by strengthening its domestic growth and importing more. The FRG, the world's largest exporter, must also do more to promote domestic demand. The United States must continue to reduce government spending. I agree that U.S. firms need to be more responsive to foreign buyers in order to take advantage of recent exchange rate movements. Most of our trade problems with Europe stem largely from mutual concerns about agricultural support programs. We, the EEC, and the major agricultural trading nations of the world have agreed to make a serious effort in the Uruguay round to reach agreement on a fundamental reform of agricultural policies. By allowing market forces to guide production and trade, we can avoid serious trade conflicts in the future.

The President. No, that is not true. At Tokyo there was a good discussion on terrorism, reflected in the final declaration. All summit participants agree that terrorism continues to be an important issue and that through multilateral cooperation important progress has been made in the fight against terrorism. No one should lose sight of the fact that the decline in international terrorism in Europe over the past year shows that by working together democratic governments can take effective measures against terrorists and that these policies are positively reflected in public opinion. Terrorism is on the agenda at Venice, and we welcome such discussion. There are no differences at the summit on the need to combat terrorism by continuing cooperative efforts.

Q. According to polls, many Europeans consider Gorbachev the politician more aggressively looking for disarmament and detente than you. Is he simply a better communicator than you, or do you accept that view?

The President. The last guest to arrive at a party usually gets the attention, and I think that is what's happening with the Soviet Union these days on arms control. I know from my meetings with Mr. Gorbachev that he is an effective spokesman for his country. And if he is eager for arms reductions and better relations with the West, all of us in the West would welcome that. But the search for peace requires more than slogans and reassuring words; it requires genuine actions and concrete proposals that deal with real problems. We in the West have always been in the forefront in this regard. Look at what we have accomplished in arms control over the past year or so.

We are very close to an agreement that would drastically reduce longer range INF missiles, hopefully even eliminate them worldwide, which is our strong preference. Both are in fact U.S. proposals, based on our consultations with the FRG and our other allies. We have made progress toward deep reductions, 50-percent cuts, in strategic nuclear arsenals. This is an idea that I have been advocating for almost a decade, and I'm glad the Soviets are finally accepting it.

Working with our allies in the 35-nation CDE, we concluded an agreement at Stockholm last year on measures that will improve military openness in Europe, reduce the risk of surprise attack, and increase the political cost of using military force for political intimidation. The measures agreed to in Stockholm are based on NATO proposals. The Soviets wanted an empty, declaratory accord. We held out for something concrete that would enhance our security, and we got it.

Q. The Venice Economic Summit will be held at a very important time: The World economy is still growing, but there is real danger of a recession if the industrialized nations are not able to agree soon on their actions for the near future. Given differences in expectations among the seven countries, is a satisfactory agreement possible?

The President. Economic growth in the summit Seven is well into its fifth consecutive year, and future growth prospects are enhanced by relatively low inflation, moderate interest rates, and a strengthened framework for coordination of economic policies. The summit Seven agree on the basic ingredients of policies that are necessary to sustain this growth: stable, noninflationary macroeconomic policies and market-oriented microeconomic policies that tap the inherent dynamism of the private sectors of our economies. We need to intensify our efforts to promote growth through the more consistent application of such policies. In particular, I expect the Venice summit to give impetus to progress in a number of areas, including reform of agricultural and other structural policies, strengthening the world trading system, and promotion of further adjustment of trade imbalances through stronger domestic-led growth in surplus countries. We will be doing our part by continuing our efforts to further reduce government spending.

The President. We made some real advances towards an INF reductions agreement last year in Reykjavik. Secretary Shultz' April meetings in Moscow further enhanced prospects for progress. Several problem areas remain, however, including verification. We are working in Geneva to see if the Soviets are willing to accept the kind of verification measures that will be needed. Of course, we have no way of knowing how long this will take. An INF missile agreement would be an historic achievement in that it would be the first time an arms control agreement actually reduced nuclear weapons. At the same time, we must be very careful to ensure that arms control enhances our security and is effectively verifiable. That is why we have consulted closely with our allies on INF and are continuing to do so.

Arms control only comprises one aspect of our relations with the Soviet Union, however. We also conduct important exchanges with the Soviets on human rights, bilateral issues, and regional affairs, and are trying to improve our dialog in these areas, as well. We stress with the Soviets that a sustained improvement in U.S.-Soviet relations depends on progress in all four areas -- human rights, arms reductions, regional affairs, and bilateral relations.

Q. The Marshall plan's 40th anniversary is on June 5. The cooperation it fostered among the countries of the West was one of the most significant events in the post-World War II period. Is it possible that a similar idea, a common effort towards a goal of economic growth, could be proposed to solve the debt and other difficult economic problems of the Third World?

The President. In October 1985 Treasury Secretary Baker proposed to strengthen our existing approach to the management of the Third World's external debt and other economic problems by launching the program for sustained growth. This initiative has the goals of promoting growth-oriented macroeconomic and structural reform in the Third World countries and mobilizing international support for such reforms. We have already seen substantial progress under this approach.

In some respects, the Marshall plan never ended. Many of the summit nations are providing coordinated assistance to Third World countries through the international institutions, such as the World Bank and the IMF. The difference, of course, is that the original beneficiaries of the Marshall plan are world economic powers in their own rights and must assume the responsibilities commensurate with that role, including the continued assistance to developing nations. However, providing significant amounts of assistance in the absence of comprehensive economic reform policies could well prove to be to the long-term detriment of the countries involved. Money alone will not set the stage for sustainable and balanced growth and in fact could weaken the incentive to pursue sound policies designed to remove impediments to growth.

Q. In the past few months Italy, with its expanding economy, has fulfilled its responsibilities in many economic multilateral groups and institutions as well as in the international financial markets. Italy has also taken part in the current discussions about disarmament and its potential consequences for Europe. How do you see Italy's role, both economic and political, among the countries of the industrialized world?

The President. Italy is among our closest and most trusted friends. We work together in many fora on issues confronting the alliance, such as East-West arms control, terrorism, and drug control. In recent years, Italy has carried out an increasing international role, participating in the UNIFIL in Lebanon and in the MFO in the Sinai. A growing economic power, Italy also is a member of the Group of Seven industrialized nations which meet annually to discuss important economic and political issues and will host the summit this year in Venice. Certainly, the sustained growth of the Italian economy has contributed to promoting a growth-oriented reduction of extended imbalances. We look forward to continued collaboration with the Italians on a broad range of economic and political issues.

Q. On Saturday, June 6th, you will have an audience with Pope John Paul II at the Vatican. Does this meeting have special significance, given the fact that the United States only recently reestablished diplomatic relations with the Holy See and the fact that the Pope plans to visit the United States this summer?

The President. I have met before with Pope John Paul II, both in Rome and in the United States. The Holy Father is a man of peace whose words for a more just society inspire all. Our meetings have always been very warm and very useful. The present meeting is a continuation of talks we have had on a broad range of world issues.

The President. Well, thank you all for coming to see us off, and a special thank you to the Marine Band for that great music. As you know, Nancy and I are leaving today for the economic summit in Venice. Many of you have helped me prepare for this meeting, and I'm most grateful. Others of you will, in the months ahead, join with me in helping to chart the course, not only for our economy but, in large measure, for the entire world's economy. Of course, I'm looking forward to continuing our common work.

But for a moment, rather than address you, the men and women who are my partners in shaping our nation's policies for the future, I would like to direct my words to some very special guests, to those of you here today who are the future, you graduates of James Madison High School. The man your school was named for, James Madison, has been called the Father of our Constitution, and he was also our fourth President. And, no, I was not one of his staff or advisers. [Laughter] But in his first inaugural address, Madison said these simple and profound words: ``It has been the true glory of the United States,'' he said, ``to cultivate peace by observing justice.'' Well, this is a particularly good moment for remembering that wisdom.

On this trip, I will commemorate the 40th anniversary of the Marshall plan. Yes, 40 years ago the United States said that if Europe were ever to see an end to the specter of war that had haunted that great continent for over two centuries all of its people would have to know freedom, democracy, and justice. And so we extended both to allies and former enemies a helping hand, a hand of compassion, and a hand of hope. The Soviet Union declined to take part in the Marshall plan, as did the countries under its control, but to the rest of Europe, we gave help. What we know now as Western Europe was rebuilt. And today, in part as a result of the Marshall plan, those countries and the United States as well as Japan have known the longest period of general peace in this century and the greatest prosperity in the history of man.

Well, some of the answers to these questions are clear. Our countries should move forward to end unsustainable trade imbalances, to reform agricultural policies, and restore stability to the international currency markets. The major economic powers of the world must also work to eliminate inequities in the international trade environment to keep markets open and to keep commerce flowing. Economic growth and free markets are everybody's business.

At Venice we'll talk about how to improve East-West relations. We will discuss arms reductions, human rights problems, regional conflicts, and bilateral cooperation. Our discussion in Venice will help strengthen Western solidarity, which is indispensable to progress on issues of contention between the East and West. We will also address various regional issues and other problems, such as international terrorism, where we can point to stepped-up and increasingly effective Western fronts -- or efforts, I should say, especially after last year's summit in Tokyo.

Despite this long agenda, we won't find all the answers to those questions about our future at this summit -- not by a long shot. In fact, many of the answers will come from where mankind's greatest energy and vision have always come: from you, from those like you throughout the world, from the hope that lives in the hearts of free people everywhere. But we will take steps; we will continue the work of, as Madison said, cultivating peace by observing justice. I'll outtalk it [referring to an airplane flying overhead]. And as I sit at that table and remember Madison's words, I will see not just the faces of those other leaders but your faces as well.

I welcome the statement today by the Government of the Federal Republic of Germany to the Bundestag supporting deep reductions in an entire class of nuclear weapons. This decision sets the stage for establishing a common NATO position at the coming foreign ministers meeting in Reyjavik.

The position which our country takes with the Soviet Union on SRINF affects both the security of the NATO alliance and the entire West. I am confident that based on discussions within NATO and those that will occur here in Venice, a foundation will be laid for equal and verifiable global constraints on United States and Soviet SRINF missiles in the near future. Once that is established, I will instruct our negotiators in Geneva to incorporate this into the United States position.

NATO actions on INF represent a major success story. The alliance has been resolute in responding to the deadly new threat to the West sparked by the Soviet deployment of new triple-warhead SS - 20 missiles targeted against our allies. NATO has steadfastly implemented its 1979 double-track decision which countered this threat. It is the fact that NATO was willing to deploy its own INF missiles, while simultaneously seeking a balanced and verifiable arms reduction agreement, that brought the Soviets back to the negotiating table in 1985 and gave us the opportunity to achieve -- for the first time in history -- deep reductions in, and possibly the elimination of, an entire class of nuclear weapons.

Our actions on INF have always been characterized by close consultations with our friends and allies in both Europe and Asia. Chancellor Kohl's announcement today should be seen in that context. I commend the Chancellor on the leadership he has shown on this issue. I am determined to continue working closely with our allies on these issues and to sustain the strength of our alliance.

Good afternoon. I am speaking to you today from Venice, Italy, over the satellite channels of WORLDNET. I have come here to meet with the leaders of Japan, France, Canada, Italy, the United Kingdom, and the Federal Republic of Germany for the 13th economic summit. Our task: to determine what we must do as a community to prepare for the challenge of a new century. Our sights are on the future, and that is why, in these next few minutes, I would like to address my remarks especially to the young people of Europe. As someone whose life has spanned most of this century, permit me to offer some observations about the next, about a future of expanding hope and possibility where dreams can come alive if only we have the courage to pursue them.

Not so long ago, in the last decade, it was fashionable to talk about the age of limits. The world, we were told, was running out of resources, winding down, growing poorer. It was a time of diminishing expectations, when people would simply have to learn to make do with less. The West in those years experienced what can only be described as a crisis of confidence in our fundamental values. We increasingly heard talk about the so-called convergence of the free world and the Communist bloc. Some said our freedoms were a luxury we could no longer afford. Faced with the rigid necessities of a shrinking world, the free nations would have to sacrifice more and more of their economic and political freedoms and accept increasing government control.

I want to talk to you today about how and why the opposite happened, how the ``age of limits'' was swept away by a resurgence of political and economic freedom, how our economies are entering a new era in which they are transcending the limits of physical resources. Now, or how, I should say, instead of ``convergence,'' the contrast between the free and the unfree has become ever sharper, while the totalitarian states have come to talk of ``openness'' and liberalization, recognizing that, if only as a matter of survival, they must allow some freedom into their societies. And I want to talk to you today about how this divergence between democratic and totalitarian nations can only increase if the totalitarians don't reform, how the only course for the world as we approach the 21st century is to choose freedom and free societies that liberate mankind's full human potential.

Scientists talk of high-speed trains that will float above their tracks. Automobile companies are already planning for electric cars. Some think that solar energy may become competitive. Anything that uses electricity -- motors, generators, wires, magnets -- could suddenly become astonishingly more efficient. That means diminishing dependence on foreign oil, less pollution, and a cleaner environment. It will be like a shot of adrenaline in the world economy, spurring growth and job creation and improving the quality of life for all. Superconductivity will accelerate another revolution: the daily revolution that is taking place in the computer industry. One recent advance is the speciality semiconductor chip. On specific tasks, a handful of these chips, costing about $2 apiece, may outperform yesterday's multimillion dollar supercomputers. One scientist makes this comparison: If automotive technology had progressed as fast as semiconductor technology has in the past 20 years, he says a Rolls Royce would now cost less than $3, get 3 million miles to the gallon, deliver enough power to drive an ocean liner; and six of them would fit on the head of a pin.

Now, this is more than simply a productivity explosion. Operating in the mysterious world of quantum physics, today's computers signal a quantum leap in the world's economy. We are moving from the economy of the Industrial Revolution, an economy feeding on and tied to the Earth's physical and natural resources, to, as one economist titled his book, ``The Economy in Mind,'' where human imagination, creativity, and courage are the most precious commodities. Think of that little computer chip. Those chips are the driving force of the modern economy, but they are made from the silicon in sand, one of the most common substances on Earth. Their value doesn't come from the material that makes them up but from the microscopic architecture designed into them by ingenious human minds. Or take this WORLDNET telecast, which is transmitted by a satellite hookup. That satellite, the product of human invention, replaces thousands of tons of copper dug from the earth and molded into wire. We're moving from an age of things to an age of thoughts, of mind over matter. It is the mind of man, free to invent, free to experiment, free to dream, that will shape the economy and the world of the future.

Now, this is bad news for statism. The centrally planned state can dig metals out of the ground or pump oil. Though less productively than a free economy, it can run huge factories and assembly lines. But it cannot fabricate the spirit of enterprise. It cannot imitate the trial and error of free markets, the riot of experiment that produces knowledge and progress. No government can manufacture the entrepreneur, or light that spark of invention; all they can do is let their people go, give them freedom of mind and spirit.

Some believe that government planning is more efficient, so they rely on tax breaks and other subsidies to those businesses that already exist. But that never works. In America it's estimated that some 70 percent of the nearly 14 million new jobs that we've created have come from new, small, and growing firms. One of the most successful computer firms in America was started by two college students in the garage behind their house. The most fertile and rapidly growing sector of any economy is that part that exists right now only as a dream in someone's head or an inspiration in his heart. No one can ever predict where the change will come from or foresee the industries of the future. No government would have ever targeted those two young men working through the night making dreams come true in their garage.

So, as we hold the economic summit in Venice this year, we see around us a world economy that is in rapid transformation, and it is a transformation that demands freedom. What can governments do? What our summit partners have begun to do: starting with policies that promote opportunity and economic growth -- low tax rates, privatization, and deregulation. They must also move to dismantle trade-distorting subsidies and labor laws that promote unemployment.

Also high on our agenda in Venice will be ways in which we can improve cooperation between our nations. Agricultural subsidies, for instance, have been some of the worst culprits behind our growing trade frictions. Let's jointly diffuse this expensive farms race by setting a goal of a subsidy-free world for the year 2000. Meanwhile, we must make good our commitment to reduce instability in exchange rates and promote economic growth. The economy is slowing in Germany, and that slows growth across Western Europe. It is essential that Germany follow up on its commitment to revive its sluggish economy. Japan, too, could help right the imbalance in the world economy by righting the imbalance in its own economy. It's time for Japan to let free the pent-up consumer demand in their nation, allow the Japanese people to enjoy more of the benefits of the remarkable economy they have worked so hard to build. I know Prime Minister Nakasone recognizes this and has recently submitted a program for action to the Japanese Diet. The Japanese promise to extend more than $20 billion in financial support to the developing world to ease their enormous debt burden is also a positive step.

Regarding the U.S. budget deficit, we've made real progress, but we must do more. In the months ahead, I will be going directly to the American people, just like on tax reform. I'm going to say we've got the special interests out of our tax code, it's time to get them out of the budget. It's time to demand real budget reform.

Last but not least, all nations must resist calls for protectionism. So-called protectionism is like the evil of drugs: It will end up destroying all those who use it. And that's why I call it destructionism, because all it does is slow growth, wipe out jobs, and close the door on progress.

But as we approach the beginning of a new century, the problems that confront us are far outweighed by the possibilities. We look around the world, and we see freedom is rising. As free markets energize Asia, free elections spread across Central and South America. In Africa many leaders have agreed that freedom is the key to development. In China reform means the first taste of freedom for over 1 billion people.

Still, we cannot forget that there is an implacable reality that today stands against this freedom tide. Next week I'll be addressing the people of West Berlin. I will stand in front of the wall that runs like an open wound through the heart of Europe, the wall that represents all that is most hostile to our democratic values of freedom and human rights. A regime that so fears its own people it must imprison them behind a wall is a regime that will always be a source of tension in Europe. It will always be at odds with free people everywhere.

As it happens, this day, June 5th, marks the 40th anniversary of the inauguration of the Marshall plan. Those were days of great generosity and courage, when the countries of Europe rose from the ashes of war, put away their centuries-old animosities, and together with America built a new age of freedom and prosperity. In the spirit of the time, America offered the benefits of the Marshall plan to all the nations of Europe, East and West, including the Soviet Union. The ground rules were simple: openness and good faith. All countries had to open their books, and no country would be allowed to manipulate the plan for political profit. Some nations under Soviet control hoped to join the plan, but Stalin ordered their representatives home. The Soviets would not let them open their books, or their countries, to the fresh air of freedom and enterprise.

We've heard a lot lately about the Soviet desire to participate in the world economy, to no longer be the odd man out. Well, the ground rules remain the same as they were 40 years ago. No playing the spoiler. No manipulation of world organizations for political gain. Open your economy. Open your political system. Open your borders. Let your people go. Let them travel where they wish, live where they want to. Let them bathe in the light of freedom. And one thing further: Leave your weapons at home. Quit Afghanistan; you have no business there. Dismantle your weapons pointed at Europe. Then we will gladly welcome you as a constructive partner in our 21st-century enterprise.

When I last participated in an economic summit in Europe, there were many young people who came out to demonstrate. They wanted an end to nuclear weapons, they said. How I wanted to let them know that my heart was with them, that I, too, yearned for a day when mankind could live free of the terror of nuclear annihilation. But the task wasn't as easy as simply signing a treaty. The wall that divides Europe, put up in violation of Soviet promises and every human decency, showed us that much. We could not stake our freedom and our lives on such flimsy security. A treaty, in order to be worth anything at all, must be verified with on-site inspections. It must dramatically reduce the total number of weapons on both sides rather than simply codify a buildup, as treaties so often have in the past. Most important, it can't leave either side outmatched and vulnerable.

Well, our persistence and steadfastness could now pay off in an agreement very much in our interest and on our terms. We're not there yet, of course; some hard questions remain. But the prospects are good. It's important to emphasize: The INF treaty we are now negotiating will not be the end but the beginning of the arms reduction effort. Our top priority remains deep, equitable, and verifiable reductions in intercontinental nuclear arms. And as long as the Soviet Union stockpiles chemical weapons and maintains massive conventional forces poised in attack positions on its own territory and in Eastern Europe, the free nations of Europe must remain strong and ready. Indeed, given the Soviet superiority in these forces, we must improve our conventional defense capabilities, difficult and expensive as that might be. The United States will not waver in our commitment to the defense of Europe. We will sustain the credibility of NATO's doctrine of flexible response, which has served us well and remains the center of alliance strategy.

At the same time, our ultimate goal remains not just to reduce and confine nuclear weapons but to make them forever obsolete, to construct a high-tech defense that will destroy nuclear weapons before they can destroy people. The technological breakthroughs I mentioned earlier, superconductivity and supercomputers on a chip, could both speed along that day when man will no longer have to fear terror in the skies, when we can breathe free, confident, secure, and peaceful.

If I can leave the young people of Europe with one message it is this: History is on the side of the free. Hope and an unshakable belief in our basic values of freedom and human rights -- these are the only guides we need as we travel into not only the 21st century but the third millennium. The crisis of confidence in the West a decade ago has been replaced by strength and assurance. Now it is the East which talks of openness, of glasnost. We hope that the first few tokens of change in the Soviet Union signal a real desire to open up that closed society.

The choice is theirs: They can either participate in the advance of history or fall farther and farther behind into economic irrelevance. We can look forward to the day when technology may eliminate the threat of mutual nuclear terror, when simply amassing huge stockpiles of nuclear weapons does not make a nation a superpower. Then the Soviet Union will appear as it truly is: a country that has sacrificed individual liberty for an antiquated 19th century materialist philosophy and an unworkable economic system, an example to the world of how not to run a country. The contrast between totalitarianism and freedom will grow ever more stark.

Today as we celebrate the 40th anniversary of the Marshall plan, we can be proud of what we together have created: a new age of freedom, a new age of hope and prosperity unrivaled in human history, a model to all the world of what free men can accomplish. It is a different world today from 40 years ago. The younger generations of Europe, those of you born since the war, have not had to suffer the destruction and heartache of your parents' time. But your challenge is no less great; it is nothing less than to embrace the promise of the future and to extend the lessons of our freedom to a waiting world.

Your Holiness, I am truly grateful for the opportunity to visit with you again in this place of peace. You've always said that the power of love for our fellow man is stronger than the evils that befall mankind -- or humankind. And one feels the power of that strong moral force here in this holy city of Saint Peter, just as we see it in your courageous and compassionate leadership.

Your Holiness, on my last visit here, I urged you to carry your ministry to the Southern and Western sections of the United States, and you graciously agreed, and I know that all America looks forward to your arrival in September. You will find in our country a deeply religious people, a people devoted to the same ideals and values you so eloquently champion: a striving for peace and justice, human rights, and above all, our duty as fellow creatures of God to love one another.

Not long ago, Your Holiness, you visited Canada where you spoke passionately of the moral obligation of the wealthier nations to share with those less fortunate. Recently, I also traveled to Canada and said it's time that we take up that challenge, to share our prosperity with the underdeveloped nations, with generous aid, yes, but also in the most effective way we know: by sharing the conditions that promote prosperity. You have spoken eloquently of ``the moral causes of prosperity,'' among them hard work, honesty, initiative, thrift, spirit of service, and daring. In many countries today, we see economic revolutions founded on this basic tenet: that the sources of prosperity are moral ones, that the spirit and imagination of man freed of statist shackles is a revolutionary force for growth and human betterment.

In your travels, you've inspired millions, people of all races and all faiths, who have felt the intensity of your desire for peace and brotherhood among men. As you embark on a pastoral visit to the land of your birth, Poland, be assured that the hearts of the American people are with you. Our prayers will go with you in profound hope that soon the hand of God will lighten the terrible burden of brave people everywhere who yearn for freedom, even as all men and women yearn for the freedom that God gave us all when he gave us a free will. We see the power of the spiritual force in that troubled land, uniting a people in hope, just as we see the powerful stirrings to the East of a belief that will not die despite generations of oppression. Perhaps it's not too much to hope that true change will come to all countries that now deny or hinder the freedom to worship God. And perhaps we'll see that change comes through the reemergence of faith, through the irresistible power of a religious renewal. For despite all the attempts to extinguish it, the people's faith burns with a passionate heat; once allowed to breathe free, that faith will burn so brightly it will light the world.

Your Holiness, when I last visited you, our representative in Vatican City was a personal envoy. Now, I'm happy to say, America is represented here by a full-fledged diplomatic mission at the ambassadorial level. The consequence of our efforts deserves nothing less, for we join with the Holy See in our concern for a world of peace, where armaments are reduced and human rights respected, a world of justice and hope, where each of God's creatures has the means and opportunity to develop to his or her full potential. Your Holiness, I'm reminded of the passage from the Bible of Saint Peter walking out on the water after Christ. We know that as long as he kept his eyes on our Savior, as long as his faith was strong, he was held up, but as soon as his faith faltered, he began to sink. Your Holiness, with gentle chidings and powerful exhortations you have continually directed our thoughts to the spiritual source of all true goodness and happiness.

I know that today marks the beginning of a very important time for you personally and for the people of your faith, for it's this day that you begin the observance of a year of prayer and devotion to the Virgin Mary with a worldwide prayer for peace. I wish you great joy, happiness, and fulfillment in the coming months. And I thank you, your Holiness, and may God bless you.

I'm speaking to you from one of the most beautiful cities in the world, Venice, Italy, where I'll be meeting soon with the other leaders of the seven largest industrialized countries of the free world. It's time for our yearly summit conference on international economic issues. Now, all of this -- foreign leaders talking economics in the city of canals and gondolas -- may sound a bit distant from your daily concerns, but take it from me, the issues we'll be discussing next week directly affect your lives and your future. That's because continued economic expansion and growth throughout the world is crucial to our prosperity at home.

When I attended my first summit back in Ottawa in 1981, the global economy was in grave danger. We had inflation running at 10 percent in industrialized countries, not to mention high interest rates, excessive tax burdens, and too much government everywhere. Worse than all of this, there was no clear consensus among world leaders about how to set ourselves back on the road to recovery. In the 6 years since that conference, the United States has made tremendous progress. With the American economy leading the way, we showed what can be achieved with economic policies based on less government and more personal freedom. As we reduced the taxes, cut inflation, and brought down interest rates, we demonstrated that economic growth can be vigorous and sustained. So, too, the world leaders in Venice next week can look back on a solid record of accomplishment. Today inflation remains low, while interest rates are moderate, and prospects are favorable for growth to continue for a fifth year. So, you see, we did find that consensus for economic renewal and growth, a consensus that relied not on government but the dynamism of free peoples.

But there are challenges ahead, and what we do next week to meet those challenges will have a direct impact on all Americans. Those of you who listen to these broadcasts will know, for example, how often I've stressed the threat that high tariffs and other trade barriers pose to economic progress. Some of us who lived through the hard times of the 1930's can tell you about that danger. When one nation decides to erect these barriers, it leads inevitably to retaliation by other nations. Soon the trade war is underway. Markets shrink all over the world, and the result is economic slowdown and the loss of millions of jobs. That's why a summit conference with our major trading partners can be helpful. It's a chance to reaffirm our belief in free and fair trade, talk over the problems of protectionist legislation, and help provide a climate for the free flow of goods and commerce. It also gives us a chance to talk over other issues, like our goal of extending prosperity to the developing nations of the world. Right now the international community is helping these developing nations deal with the serious problem of heavy debt burdens. And just as this summit is helpful in coordinating our trade policies and our efforts to help spread prosperity to the rest of the world, our discussions in Venice will permit us to address such diverse topics as agricultural problems, terrorism, drug abuse, and the AIDS epidemic.

So, too, the relationship between the free nations of the world and the Soviet bloc will be much on our minds. You probably know, for example, some very serious negotiations on arms reductions are reaching a critical stage. These negotiations affect our allies, so it's essential that we maintain our commitment to their security as well as our own. We also need to reaffirm our pledge to a strong defense while exerting pressure on the Soviets for progress in such areas as regional conflicts, like Afghanistan, and human rights.

So, the agenda next week is a full one. But certainly one source of encouragement is our record of accomplishment not only for the past few years but during the past four decades. Forty years ago this week, then-Secretary of State George Marshall announced an economic recovery plan for the European nations devastated by World War II. The plan was not a giveaway program; it was instead an incentive-oriented effort to get European nations to work together and build a new prosperity, a prosperity built on self-help and mutual love of freedom. It's this same idea of freedom which has kept much of the world at peace for four decades and brought rising standards of living to the average person. That's what we'll be seeking to advance further in Venice. Our goal now is, together, to build on this record of growth and opportunity for the future, as we've done in the past.

As we open this economic summit, one of our primary concerns must be the removal of barriers that seek to maintain trade imbalances and lead to protectionism. Our pledge should be to free competition in a fair market environment. Almost 6 weeks ago, I signed an order placing sanctions on Japanese products resulting from their failure to comply with our antidumping and market-access agreement on semiconductors. The clear message was that we intend to be serious about fair trade; equally clear was our desire to lift these sanctions just as soon as the data showed ``clear and continuing evidence'' of compliance. Japan is a major economic partner as well as a staunch friend and ally, and we want to make every effort to resolve our differences as rapidly as possible.

Unfortunately, the initial review of the data relating to the semiconductors is not sufficient for me to remove the full range of sanctions which were imposed. However, in one area, there are strong indications that third-country dumping of [dynamic random-access memory devices] DRAM's has declined. Clearly, there has been marked improvement in this one area. I am aware of congressional concern that there be consistent, positive movement toward compliance.

Therefore, I have today ordered a proportional response. DRAM's account for 60 percent of the $135 million in sanctions related to dumping. The data for DRAM's show an increase from 59 percent to 85 percent compliance with fair market value, or more than halfway to an acceptable goal. I am directing a sanction release of $51 million, a 17-percent reduction in the total value. This release is strictly proportional to progress to date. The Japanese Government has given me assurances that this positive pattern with respect to third-country dumping will continue. If this does not prove to be the case, I will not hesitate to reimpose the partial sanctions that have been lifted.

The President. Andrea [Andrea Mitchell, NBC News], normally, I'm not taking questions on anything, but that question has to be answered. We're not doing something that is more -- we said from the very beginning that when they returned to abiding by the agreement that we thought we had, we would lift the sanctions. Well, they have started. And the amount of tariff that we have removed is just proportionate to the extent that they have so far returned to abiding by the agreement. And if they don't, if they go back the other way, we will again put the penalty on full, but if they continue, why, we proportionately will lift the tariffs.

Q. But, sir, both Senators Dole and Byrd, for instance, have argued that they shouldn't be lifted. There's a lot of feeling in Congress that this will lead to more rebellion in Congress on protectionism.

The President. Well, we were aware of that. We were aware that they might feel that way -- those, particularly, with the protectionist bent. But at the same time, we wanted to show that we really meant it, that those sanctions were put on for a particular reason. And we have to recognize that there are people in Japan, like Prime Minister Nakasone, who have worked very hard to oppose the action that they had taken, and we think that they ought to be rewarded for their effort.

Berlin, one of the world's great cities and the largest German city, this year observes its 750th anniversary. This is cause for celebration for Berliners and for all Germans, and also for the people of the United States and the rest of the world.

The history and character of Berlin and its people give powerful testimony about human nature and its capabilities. After three-quarters of a millennium and many shocks and reversals through the ages, Berlin is yet a young city -- young with all the capacity of the human spirit to renew itself, to strive and to seek, to build anew and create, and, most of all, to hope. Time and again, Berlin has overcome desolation and isolation with will, energy, and courage. Even now, its spirit towers over the wall that presently divides the city.

Today Berlin remains close to the spiritual center of the Western world. Americans have a special affinity for Berlin that goes beyond formal political or economic ties, because we feel a kinship with its spirit of strength and creativity and because we see our own hopes and ideals mirrored in the deep attachment of its people to freedom and its blessings. Thousands of Americans -- scholars, service men and women and their families, business people, diplomatic personnel, and so on -- live in Berlin and make vital contributions to the life of the city. We have helped Berlin grow, and we have shared its spirit.

In Witness Whereof,  I have hereunto set my hand this eighth day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The Heads of State or Government recall that in their Tokyo Statement on international terrorism they agreed to make the 1978 Bonn Declaration more effective in dealing with all forms of terrorism affecting civil aviation. To these end, in cases where a country refuses extradition or prosecution of those who have committed offences described in the Montreal Convention for the Suppression of Unlawful Acts against the Safety of Civil Aviation and/or does not return the aircraft involved, the Heads of State or Government are jointly resolved that their Governments shall take immediate action to cease flights to that country as stated in the Bonn Declaration.

The Heads of State or Government intend also to extend the Bonn Declaration in due time to cover any future relevant amendment to the above Convention or any other aviation conventions relating to the extradition or prosecution of the offenders.

We agree that new and concerted international efforts are urgently required to help bring the Iraq-Iran war to an end. We favour the earliest possible negotiated end to the war with the territorial integrity and independence of both Iraq and Iran intact. Both countries have suffered grievously from this long and tragic war. Neighbouring countries are threatened with the possible spread of the conflict. We call once more upon both parties to negotiate an immediate end of the war. We strongly support the mediation efforts of the United Nations Secretary-General and urge the adoption of just and effective measures by the UN Security Council. With these objectives in mind, we reaffirm that the principle of freedom of navigation in the Gulf is of paramount importance for us and for others and must be upheld. The free flow of oil and other traffic through the Strait of Hormuz must continue unimpeded.

I deeply regret the necessity, temporarily, to withdraw the proposal to sell modified Maverick air-to-ground missiles to Saudi Arabia because of strong congressional opposition. The seven leaders meeting here for the economic summit recognize the importance of that region to our mutual economic and security interests. Saudi Arabia is our staunchest ally in the Gulf in resisting the Soviet efforts to establish a presence in the Middle East. We need their support, and they have been cooperative. This action precipitated by Congress sends exactly the wrong signal.

To avoid further delays, I will undertake additional consultations with Congress and resubmit the necessary notifications at the earliest possible date. Arms sales which meet Saudi Arabia's legitimate defense needs and do not upset the military balance in the region are an important part of our relationship with that country. They are directly related to the protection of our long-term interests in the Persian Gulf.

Led by Attorney General Edwin Meese III, who also serves as the Chairman of the National Drug Policy Board, the multidisciplinary U.S. delegation will include representatives of 15 Federal agencies involved in all aspects of the President's national strategy to combat drug abuse: law enforcement, international cooperation, prevention, treatment, rehabilitation, and research.

All United Nations member states, United Nations specialized agencies, and numerous intergovernmental organizations have been invited to send delegations to the Conference. Over 3,000 people from approximately 100 countries are expected to attend. Nongovernmental organizations (NGOS) also will be well represented. A separate forum will be held concurrently with the Conference to focus on how nongovernmental entities can contribute to local, national, and global efforts to eliminate drug abuse and curb illegal production and trafficking. This is seen as particularly important in light of the considerable success they have had attracting attention and support for antidrug programs.

The President. I have an opening statement first. I'd like to begin by serving as a sort of unofficial spokesman for all of us who've been here this week. I'm sure we all agree our stay in Venice has been comfortable and productive, and I want to express our thanks to the Italian Government and especially the people of this lovely and historic city.

Although this may come as a partial surprise to some, this has been a summit on economic issues. For all the attention certain international developments have received, I think important steps were taken in the economic sphere. The summit Seven have put the capstone on a new process for enhanced cooperation and coordination and have agreed jointly to take the policy steps necessary to assure sufficient world growth.

Implicit in all of this is our common commitment to principles that mark a turning point in public policy. I refer here to our growing desire to seek economic growth and opportunity through less government and more personal freedom. And we've seen two direct applications of these principles at this summit. First, our resolve to work together against protectionism by correcting the imbalances which are the real cause of our trade deficit -- trade barriers and protectionism can only bring about a contraction of international markets and a slowing of economic growth. And second, we've taken further steps toward reducing government subsidization of agriculture and moving toward a day when market signals determine the supply and demand.

I said last year that the Tokyo summit was one of the most successful I'd attended, because we had launched new initiatives in the areas of trade, agriculture, and economic policy coordination. If that's the case, then Venice must be seen as going one better, because it put form, substance, and institutional framework on those initiatives and locked in a process which will better enable us to navigate the dynamic new world of international economics.

Now, let me add that, in addition to these economic matters, we also had an opportunity to deal with two other pressing international issues. First, I'm pleased with the support our allies have shown for a united position in the Persian Gulf. Actually, a commitment to keeping the sealanes open in that area is a vital strategic objective. As many of you know, America's allies have a very sizeable presence in the gulf. Great Britain, for example, has nearly 18 percent of its naval vessels committed there and has escorted more than a hundred ships since the beginning of this year through the straits. France, too, has a strong naval commitment there. And all of our allies have reaffirmed their support for keeping the trade routes open, the oil flowing, and moving toward a negotiated resolution of the Iran-Iraq war.

As most of you also know, we're currently engaged in a highly sensitive discussion with the Soviets that could lead to an historic arms reduction treaty on U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range missiles. Progress has been made here in Venice. And today and tomorrow Secretary Shultz will be meeting with the NATO foreign ministers in Reykjavik. I'll be anxious to have his report about the views and recommendations of our allies. So, I'm particularly grateful I had this opportunity in Venice, not only to discuss these arms reduction efforts with our allies but to agree again on the importance of reminding the Soviet Union of the progress that needs to be made in other arms negotiations, especially the reduction of strategic intercontinental nuclear forces. So, too, it's absolutely essential that we continue to seek progress from the Soviets in the human rights area as well as regional conflicts, especially Afghanistan. As we said in our statement, the new expressions of openness from the Soviets are welcomed, but it's time to see if their actions are as forthcoming .

Q. Mr. President, not to be a downer, but back home in recent congressional hearings, two key witnesses, General Secord and Albert Hakim, testified that they were under the firm belief that Colonel North and the NSC acted with your blessing and under the full authority of you. Did they dream this up?

The President. Well, however they got that impression -- and I've heard some of the testimony, also, and so much of it was hearsay -- one person saying about the other that I thought they had. I told you all the truth that first day after everything hit the fan: that how we had opened the negotiations that led to the things that were going on there, having nothing to do with the contras or the freedom fighters in Nicaragua, and that word had come to me that I had not been kept informed. So, evidently, maybe some people were giving the impression that they were acting on orders from me. Well, I wasn't giving those orders, because no one had asked or had told me what was truly happening there.

The President. I not only think it didn't, but I don't think that the law was broken. We're talking about a case of people that, on their own, individuals and groups in our country, sought to send aid to the freedom fighters. And this has gone on for quite a long time in other areas; we can go clear back to the Lincoln Brigade in the Spanish Civil War. I did not solicit anyone ever to do that. I was aware that it must be going on, of course, but never solicited either countries or the other, and would point to the law that is being cited -- one of the five versions of the Boland amendment -- that that specifically suggested that the Secretary of State should solicit help from our friendly neighbors.

The President. You trapped me a little bit there, because my long years in sports and sports announcing and all made me very superstitious about calling the pitcher as doing a no-hitter before the game was over. I hesitate to make optimistic statements, always have, but at the same time, I can't deny that I believe there is an increased opportunity for a summit conference and an increased opportunity for actual reductions of armaments, particularly of the nuclear kind.

The President. I can't give you a guess. All I know is that we have made it plain that they have the invitation, and we're waiting for them. We believe that they should state what would be the most appropriate or easiest time for them.

The President. I know the statement that was made by the Secretary of State, and that is the administration's position. And I know the reference that you're making to the particular point in which he himself volunteered that he had made a misstatement, but I accept the Secretary's statement on this.

Q. Sir, before you came here, many people on Capitol Hill said that they wanted you to ask our allies to help with more physical help in the Persian Gulf, and many of your officials said that you would do that. Did you specifically ask any of the leaders to give us more help in the way of ships or money to keep the sealanes open in the Persian Gulf?

The President. We spoke of the need for having a kind of single approach to maintaining the international waters there as international waters and so forth, and we're gratified completely by the response. I think it has been excellent that there was no criticism from any of our allies about this. And as I've told you, there were other countries -- as I've said here in my opening statement, England and France who have forces there -- two of the allies, it is true, are bound by their constitutions and could not do anything of that kind. But there was complete support for what we're trying to do, because they understood we're not trying to provoke any kind of hostility. We are trying to maintain peace, and we're all solidly together in our desire to bring about an end to the Iran-Iraq war.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to turn to economics, since we are at an economic summit. I'd like to ask you if you discussed with Alan Greenspan, the next Chairman of the Federal Reserve, the future course of interest rates. And in that discussion, or at anytime, have you agreed that you think they should remain low, or do you think perhaps they should rise in order to combat inflation and the fall of the dollar?

The President. Well, frankly, most of us believe that the dollar should remain stable. It could be within reason that there could still be some lowering of the value in relation to other currencies. But we do want to control inflation, continue to control it. We've had a miraculous 50-odd months of bringing inflation down. Now there is something of a little surge again, in large part, precipitated by energy prices. But I have perfect confidence in Alan Greenspan and his philosophy and that what he would do would be used to curb that and not let inflation get out of hand again.

Q. To follow up on that: Also at this summit, in a communique there are three different references to the countries that have big Federal deficits, that they should do more in order to reduce those deficits. What new initiative, new approaches, will you take to reduce the U.S. Federal budget deficit?

The President. I would like to continue and be more successful with the old methods that we've been trying, and that is to convince the Congress of the United States that our government is overspending. Our total tax burden is 19 percent of gross national product, and our total spending is 24 percent of gross national product. Now, if you go back through history, you will find that even in the prosperous times, and when deficits weren't large, 19 percent was the tax burden. It is the spending that has gotten out of line.

But I would also say that when this matter was mentioned in our discussions, and with regard to our very great deficit, our allies weren't aware that in 1983 our deficit was 6.3 percent of gross national product. Today it is only 3.9 percent of gross national product -- that we have made an 18-percent cut in that deficit this year -- $40 billion or more. Very likely we'll make something of the same size next year. But also they were interested to learn that our deficit was much lower as a percentage if we used their method of counting. In the other countries, they take total government spending and receipts; in our country, our deficit is just the Federal Government. But if we take into account Federal, State, and local spending and taxing, our deficit is only 2\1/2\ percent of gross national product.

The President. Well, the Soviet Union has some vessels there and has made it plain they're going to escort their own ships -- mainly carrying oil. And therefore, they have a stake, too, in peaceful shipping and the openness of the international waters.

The President. We would like to ask them, because we have appealed to the U.N. committee in which they are a member. We have appealed to the United Nations, to ask for, or demand, a peaceful settlement of this war that's been going on too many years, and that if there is not a peaceful settlement, that all of us will take action such as sanctions and so forth against them.

The President. No, I've never thought of them that way at all. But I think it should be pointed out that they are also there, because they have ships transiting that in commercial shipping. And this is what we're talking about.

Q. Mr. President, Mikhail Gorbachev seems to have had an enhanced image here among some of the other summit leaders who've met with him. And in late European polls, people seem to outrank him as a man of peace -- outranking you, in their opinion, as a man of peace. Why do you think that he has that very positive public image in Europe and you don't?

The President. Well, maybe because it's so unusual. This is the first Soviet leader, in my memory, that has ever advocated actually eliminating weapons already built and in place. And I shouldn't perhaps go out of the way to say that the thing that he himself has proposed, the zero-zero of intercontinental -- or intermediate-range missiles, that I proposed that 4 years ago and got in trouble with my then Secretary of State -- not the present one -- for saying such a foolish thing. But maybe most people have forgotten that we've been trying to get this for years. And I'm glad that he has suggested this. And we're going to continue, and we believe, as I said before, that we have a good chance of bringing about the beginning of reducing and eliminating nuclear weapons.

The President. As you know, I've had meetings with him. And I do believe that he is faced with an economic problem in his own country that has been aggravated by the military buildup and all. And I believe that he has some pretty practical reasons for why he would like to see a successful outcome.

Q. Mr. President, have you found that the disclosures of the Iran affair and your efforts to get the American hostages out of Lebanon have harmed you here in Europe in efforts to extradite Mr. Hamadei from Germany and, in general, in trying to get the Europeans to take strong action against terrorists?

The President. No, as a matter of fact, we have all been united, and we've even strengthened our purpose since we've been here with regard to terrorism. But with regard to Hamadei in West Germany -- who has been arrested there, as you know, for carrying some ammunition -- Helmut Kohl and I have had some talks about this. And I think it's interesting to note that the only question that remains is: Will Hamadei be tried for murder and hijacking in the United States or will he be tried for murder and hijacking in Germany? Because that is what they intend to do. Now, there's been no decision made yet as to whether there would be extradition or not. But whichever way, he is going to be tried for the crime of killing our young Navy man in that hijacking.

Q. If I could follow up, sir: Your spokesman told me yesterday that Mr. Kohl had, in fact, rejected the plea for extradition and that Mr. Hamadei would be tried for murder, but in West Germany. Was he incorrect in saying that?

The President. I do not know whether there's been a decision. He has never said outright to me, ``No extradition.'' He said this is what remains to be determined: just where is he going to be tried. But I have not attempted to put any pressure on him, either.

Q. Mr. President, you said there was no criticism of the other summit leaders of your Persian Gulf policy, but a French Government spokesman said that your policy was so confusing they didn't know what you are asking them to support. Can you tell us what your military policy in the Gulf is, and does it include the possibility of a preemptive strike if Iran does deploy the Silkworm missiles?

The President. I don't think they feel that way after they've had a chance to talk to me and hear what I'm saying about it. Why, I'm saying that all of us have a stake in maintaining that body of international water open to trade. It is of vital importance to a number of countries, more so than to us, because of their needs in the energy field. But also I think they are assured now that we're not there to, as I say, provoke some kind of increased hostility. We're there to deter that very thing.

Q. Mr. President, Robert McFarlane, your former national security adviser, testified that the plan to bribe -- or in the words of the White House, to rescue the American hostages in Beirut that involved the DEA [Drug Enforcement Administration] -- had not been the subject of an intelligence finding. My question then, sir, is why do you feel, if you approved it, that operation did not require a finding or notification of Congress?

The President. All I knew about that particular thing was that I was told that there was something going on in which it might be possible to free one or more hostages of ours and they would be delivered to the beach north of Beirut if we were able to take them off that beach. And I said, well, of course, with the Mediterranean fleet there, you bet we can take them off. And it wasn't until all of this exposure that then I heard that what it was about was supposedly some money for bribing some people that they thought could effect the rescue of one or more of our hostages and that had to be the thing. But it never happened, and no one ever arrived on the beach north of Beirut.

Q. Well, something else you also may not have heard, sir, during the testimony it became clear that Colonel North, in addition to spending money that had been raised, presumably, for the contras, also, apparently, was about to receive -- or arrangements had been made for him to receive $200,000 from the Secord-Hakim operation. Do you believe that North was on the take? Whether or not you do, do you believe he's still an American hero?

The President. One cannot quarrel with his military record, and it established him as such with the awards that he received for his heroism in combat. But I'm going to wait until he's had his day in court, also, and I'm not going to prejudge on the basis of all that has been going on for these countless hours.

Q. Mr. President, did you find it uncomfortable or difficult to talk to your summit partners about not selling weapons to Iran and Iraq when everyone at the table knew that the administration had done just that in the case of Iran?

The President. We were not dealing with the Government of Iran. And again, I want to point out that I did not believe -- I still feel as I always have -- you do not ransom hostages and thus create a market for more hostages. We had been approached by individuals, some in the Government of Iran, but who said that they were trying to establish a relationship with the United States that could go into effect when and if there was a succeeding government to the Khomeini.

And as a matter of fact, we were given to believe that they thought that might be sooner rather than later. And they asked for -- it was almost, in comparison to the normal sales of weapons, a token -- first of all, that would prove our sincerity in this but also, they frankly admitted, would enhance their ability to have the help of the military if and when this time came. And this was how we settled upon the $12 million worth of arms. But never -- and this has been, I'm afraid, misportrayed to many -- we were not doing business with the Khomeini's government. As a matter of fact, the operation was covert, because we believed that the people who were trying to contact us -- their lives would be in danger if it was ever found out in their home country what they were doing.

Q. A followup, sir: But nonetheless, there was the distinct possibility -- or is the distinct possibility that those weapons did end up as part of the war effort against Iraq. So, again, the question is how can the U.S. come to a meeting like this and ask other people not to do what it actually did?

The President. And because we won't do this any more -- but as I say, we were -- that amount of arms -- as nearly as we can determine, in the last few years, countries involving the Communist bloc, other countries in Europe and Asia, have probably provided $10 billion worth of arms to Iran and some $34 or $35 billion worth to Iraq. And we have been all of this time trying to bring the war to an end. And we're going to continue to try, and as I've said, this thing that did not come to fruition -- a new government and so forth. No, we will not engage in arms sales, nor do we think anyone else should. And we believe that if the U.N. Security Council should take the action that we're all asking them to take -- but then there should be sanctions against any nation that does sell arms to either of the combatants.

Q. Mr. President, you challenged the summit partners the other day to try to eliminate agriculture subsidies from the world by the year 2000. And I wondered if you are going to continue to press them to do that, and how are you going to convince them to do that?

The President. We're all very much agreed in this meeting on the fact that something -- as we decided a year ago in Tokyo -- something must be done worldwide with regard to agriculture, that governments, all of us, are subsidizing overproduction. There is no market for much of what is being produced. And the total subsidies -- our allies and ourselves right here in the summit -- total around $140 billion a year to bring this about. We are determined to go forward, and this, we have all agreed, will be continued at the Uruguay round of talks, the GATT talks that are going on. And this will be a major subject as to how we can bring back the marketplace as the determiner of production and price in farming.

The President. Well, the only reason we set a figure down the road was because all of us recognized that having for several decades now accustomed agriculture to government subsidies of various kinds you can't just suddenly pull the rug out from under them. It wouldn't be fair, and we're not going to do that. But we are going to move toward -- and with plenty of warning to them -- that the day is coming when the marketplace will determine the price and what is needed.

Q. Mr. President, as you know, the joint statement on the Persian Gulf did not mention the possibility of imposing sanctions on countries that violated the proposed Security Council resolution. Your Secretary of State told us that it was a common understanding among the seven heads of state that in fact you were talking about mandatory sanctions, but other spokesmen for other governments say that's not the case. What is your understanding, and if you all did mean to endorse mandatory sanctions, why didn't the communique or the statement say so?

It's a pleasure to be here today at the first Italian-American Conference on Private Sector Initiatives. Yesterday we concluded this year's economic summit. I looked around that table at the leaders of some of the world's great democracies, and I couldn't help thinking how precious our common heritage is. It was a great Italian who said, ``the natural rights of personality, family, and society exist before the state.'' Those words, spoken by an Italian, are as American as the Declaration of Independence -- for that matter, as British as the Common Law and as French as the writings of Montesquieu. They could be called the common credo of every democratic nation across the Earth.

Yet if freedom, democracy, and the rights of man are to be preserved through the ages, free men and women must accept the responsibilities that go with their freedoms. And this is why I wanted to take some time out after the summit to meet with you, because as business men and women, as citizens, you've been leaders in taking up the responsibilities of liberty. Again and again, over the years, all of you have volunteered yourselves and your corporations to causes that have helped make life better for the people of both Italy and America and of people all over the world. When you've seen a need to be filled, a job to be done, you haven't waited for government to lead the way; you've set out and got the work done yourselves.

And let me say that we can see all around us testimony to the strength here in Italy of voluntarism and of private giving, of what we in America sometimes call private sector initiatives. It was a private sector initiative by Fiat that restored this magnificent building, the Palazzo Grassi. And just down the Grand Canal are the noble horses of St. Mark's Basilica, which through an initiative by Olivetti have toured the world, showing something of the beauty of Venice to many who will not have the opportunity to come to this great city.

Yes, in country after country, private sector initiatives are teaching children, caring for the sick, helping the poor build better lives for themselves, and searching for ways to cure disease. Whether people are in sickness, sorrow, or in need, private sector initiatives have been created to answer the call. Last November in Paris, at the International Conference on Private Sector Initiatives, men and women from seven nations showed that yours is an international movement. Yesterday in Milan you continued the work you began in Paris with a new exchange of ideas.

In the meantime, of course, I have been meeting here in Venice with the leaders of the six leading industrial democracies. We've held productive discussions on subjects ranging from East-West relations to terrorism to economic policy and free trade. These meetings are important, and they have received, as they should, a great deal of attention from the press. And yet I can't help thinking that any true history of our times will show that your work, and that of millions of free men and women all around the world, has done as much to build the future of our civilization as have all the statesmen in all the summits over the years. History has shown that governments alone cannot possibly meet the challenges of a growing world. I believe that private sector initiatives will provide many solutions to the challenges of the 21st century.

They're already giving us lasting symbols of the friendships between democratic peoples and countries on which European and American peace and prosperity have been built over the last 40 years. In this regard, I'm pleased to commend the National Italian-American Foundation for their efforts in restoring a magnificent garden here in Venice. This Italian-American Friendship Garden will be a lasting reminder of this meeting in Venice. And Jim Robinson has just announced another step in Italian-American friendship. This innovative program will contribute to the restoration of other Italian national treasures. It's a fine example of private sector initiatives at work.

You know, all that we talked about, I just have to tell you one last little incident here that is really true of what brings us together here -- private initiative. I'm sure that our people have told you that there in Washington now, we have in the computers some 3,000 programs where some little hamlet or village or town has found a problem and a way to solve it themselves. And we keep this, because then when inquiries come from people that say what could we do about it, we go to the computers and are able to tell them how a program was set up privately by the people and made to work.

A little town in Texas had something for several years called Christmas in April. All year long the people of that town kept track and watched for homes of elderly people or homes of people that were handicapped or very poor; and if there were things like leaking roofs and plumbing that didn't work and so forth, they made a list during all the year. And then on April 1st the merchants that dealt in the products they needed -- building materials and paint and so forth -- would donate. But citizens of every calling, as volunteers, would show up on that April 1st, knock on the door, and say we're here to put a new roof on your house or paint your house or fix the plumbing or do what has to be done. That went on in that little town in Texas.

Well, a couple of years ago, I was amazed to see some people that didn't look like ordinary workmen in Washington, DC, nailing shingles on a roof and others painting a porch and so forth. I recognized a couple of judges among them. There were some professional people, some medical personnel and all. Believe it or not, Washington, DC, had discovered from that little town in Texas private initiative, and now had Christmas in April for the people, the poor that might be there in the Capital.

So, what's ahead for all of you, I think you're going to find, is most exciting, most wonderful, and just a blessing of freedom that a number of people in the world cannot have unless they see the error of their ways and turn to our way of life. Thank you all. God bless you.

The President. My message to Berliners, and indeed to all citizens of the world, is that freedom brings prosperity; freedom pays. That conclusion is inescapable for anyone who views the difference between East and West, so sharply visible in divided Berlin. Even the Soviet leadership seems to be coming to acknowledge the benefits of freedom. If they really do come to understand, then there is one step they could take that would be unmistakable: Tear down the wall, open the gates.

Today represents a moment of hope. We in the West stand ready to cooperate with the East to promote true openness -- to break down the barriers that separate people, to create a safer, freer world. And surely there is no better place than Berlin, the meeting place of East and West, to make a start.

I salute the people of Berlin for their history, courage, their steadfastness, and their dedication to freedom. We hope and expect that the Berlin of the future will be even more splendid than it is today. I intend to work with President von Weizacker, Chancellor Kohl, Mayor Diepgen, and our French and British colleagues to ensure that this future becomes reality.

Q. Are you in full harmony with the German standpoint on disarmament, as expressed in the statement of the Federal Chancellor Helmut Kohl in the Federal Parliament, especially about the connection between conventional and nuclear reductions?

The President. It is essential that we always keep in mind that the negotiations on intermediate-range missiles are only one of the negotiations in progress. These negotiations are not an end in themselves but part of a wider, more comprehensive process.

The NATO allies are working hard for progress in arms control on a wide front. We have proposed a 50-percent reduction in strategic nuclear arms which can strike targets at virtually any range. We have proposed the total elimination of chemical weapons. We are seeking to redress the current imbalance in conventional arms. Most importantly, we must have the vision to see these efforts as parts of a larger whole. In this context, I continue to favor the total elimination of all offensive ballistic missiles. However, achieving that objective must be accomplished in an orderly and realistic manner.

The President. Yes, of course. Both the United States and NATO have insisted from the very beginning that the INF negotiations must cover U.S. and Soviet missiles only. These negotiations are bilateral between the U.S. and the U.S.S.R. We have consistently maintained the firm position that the U.S. will not deal with third-country systems or change existing patterns of cooperation with its allies in such bilateral negotiations.

Further, our objective in these and other negotiations is to establish equality between the U.S. and U.S.S.R. at lower levels of arms. However, the Soviet Union has long tried to assert a right to equality with the U.S. and various other nations put together. To grant them this would threaten Western security and create a dangerous precedent across the entire front of negotiations.

Well, this is a celebration for all of Berlin. To those of you in the East who are watching on television but unable to attend in person, you're here with us in spirit. The traditional banners of Berlin's 20 districts, East and West, around this hall, remind me of the kinship that exists among all people of this city. By its very existence and character, Berlin remains the most compelling argument for an open world. We're reminded of the many traditions of openness and democracy that have marked the history of this city.

America -- missed me! [referring to a loud noise] [Laughter] America has a special relationship with Berlin that extends beyond formal political or economic ties. Like America, Berlin is a place of great energy. We see our own hopes and ideals mirrored in the energy and courage of Berliners and draw strength from our joint efforts here.

This sense is symbolized by the nearly 14,000 American soldiers, airmen, and their families who live and work in close cooperation with Berliners to ensure the defense of our common goals. And let me make one point clear: Our troops will remain here as long as they are wanted and needed by Berliners to demonstrate to the other side that force and coercion cannot succeed. Several thousand other Americans from all walks of life make an important contribution to the business and cultural life of this city. We've joined the centuries-old tradition of Berlin and, in a real sense, we have become Berliners.

A few moments ago here at Tempelhof, I shook hands with three men who testify to the way you Berliners and we Americans play such a proud role in each others' lives: Three former U.S. Air Force pilots, veterans of one of the most remarkable operations in modern history, the Berlin airlift. On his flights, Colonel Gale Halvorsen tossed small, candy-filled parachutes to the children of Berlin as his plane approached the Tempelhof runway. Yes, Colonel Halvorsen was one of the famous Rosinenbombers or bomber pilots who every Berliner of that generation still remembers with warmth and affection. Another airlift veteran, Captain Jack Bennett, has many friends here today; he lives in Berlin.

As for Colonel Allen Chealander, when the Soviets blockaded Berlin, Colonel Chealander had been back in civilian life for just 8 months. He and his wife had an infant son and another child on the way. Those precious 8 months were the first Colonel Chealander had been able to devote to his family since the long years of the war. Yet, when called up for the airlift, he never hesitated. Looking back on those days of constant hardship, of danger scorned, Colonel Chealander says simply this: ``We had a job to do, and we did it.'' In those few words, hear the understatement of a hero. I am especially pleased that Colonel Chealander and his son, who saw him only briefly before he returned to service to help fight the blockade and who is now my own military aide, are both with us here today.

Well, then, too, I have met Berliners whose actions speak with confidence of the city's present and future: A professor who has helped make Berlin one of the world's leading centers of research in the field of laser medicine, and the winners of the 1987 computer contest sponsored by the Berlin-U.S.A. initiative. In each face, I've seen abiding pride in this city and its accomplishments. Indeed, there's been something deeply moving, something humbling about meeting these heroes of Berlin. I feel your pride in what you've done for your city, your zest for life, your confidence and hope from having overcome so many obstacles, and the strength of your commitment to overcome those that remain. You've demonstrated to the world the value of human liberty, and perhaps the courage of your example is the greatest gift you can give to us every day of our lives.

Today when most Americans think of Berlin, they recall our postwar relationship with this city. And as we celebrate this 750th birthday, it's worth remembering that America's ties with Berlin go back many years. More than 20 American communities bear the name Berlin. Three of our Founding Fathers, Thomas Jefferson, Benjamin Franklin, and John Adams negotiated a treaty of friendship and commerce with Frederick the Great in 1785, establishing a basis for the special relationship that we enjoy today.

Americans were affected in other ways by this city when some of the best and brightest people active in Berlin came to the United States. Albert Einstein, George Grosz, Arnold Schoenberg, Kurt Weill, Mies van der Rohe -- the list of former residents of this city who changed the face of modern America is practically limitless.

So, we do celebrate with you today, remembering the heroic deeds of these -- all of them here on this platform and all Berliners, and the longstanding relationship between our two countries. But let's not forget the painful lessons of the not-so-recent past and draw on those experiences. Together, we can build a better future for this city, for Europe, and for the world. And as we look toward the 21st century, the ideals the world associates with the free part of Berlin are gaining in recognition. History did not come to an end in 1945, and it will not do so now. Berlin is a city of the future; it stands as a beacon for freedom and shines brightly for all Berliners to see.

In the name of the American people, I want to congratulate all three million Berliners on the occasion of your anniversary. And I'm proud to issue a Presidential proclamation today honoring Berlin. Perhaps more than the people of any other city, you, the free people of Berlin, have demonstrated to the world the value of human liberty. So it is that we have so much to celebrate today. And so it is that, on behalf of my nation, I thank you. Having witnessed your courage and determination for all these years, I am confident in extending the heartfelt best wishes of all Americans for your city's future. And for those of you here today who are with our Armed Forces and who are here; I want to tell you that nothing in the job I have has made me more proud than you, the men and women wearing our military uniforms.

My talks with Chancellor Kohl and his colleagues have fulfilled all my expectations. They confirm, as his words here have confirmed today, that relations between the United States and the Federal Republic are those of close allies and friends. Chancellor Kohl and I, together with other allies and partners, have already had the opportunity in Venice to address many of the major issues confronting the world today. There, important steps were taken to ensure the continued economic progress and freedom for our nations.

Here in Bonn, we talked, in particular, about progress in arms reductions and East-West relations. Chancellor Kohl and I agree fully on the necessity of continuing our close consultations as we pursue our common goals of reducing the danger to Europe posed by the threatening policies and military might of the Warsaw Pact. We share deep satisfaction with NATO's 1979 double-track decision on intermediate nuclear forces -- INF. It was controversial when the alliance first agreed upon it, yet time is proving it an unequivocal success. We hope to reach agreement with the Soviet Union before the end of 1987, which would drastically reduce and possibly eliminate a class of nuclear weapons that poses a particular threat to our friends and allies in Europe and Asia.

As we proceed in our quest for a safer and more stable peace, I look forward to continuing close cooperation and consultation with Chancellor Kohl and his government. And I would like to add something here also. Much is said each year about these economic summits with the heads of state of seven countries and our meetings and whether they accomplish much or whether they don't. I have to tell you, they would accomplish much if we did nothing but meet and just talk to each other -- because we have become close friends. We use our titles in public as protocol requires. But when we meet together we're on a first-name basis, and we're not meeting as much as heads of states, as we're meeting as close, personal friends who look forward to renewing our friendship with these meetings and with others in between when we can manage it.

So this has been a wonderful several days for us to be here, to be in Venice, then to be in Berlin earlier today and to be here, and to know that we're with dear friends. And so, we say goodbye to all of you, and we say a very personal goodbye to our dear friends, Chancellor Kohl and Mrs. Kohl, and the others that we've met.

Tomorrow is Flag Day, the anniversary of the first official American flag. Nancy and I hope that you'll join us and millions of other Americans tomorrow evening at 7 p.m. eastern daylight time as we participate in the annual ``Pause for the Pledge.'' The 31 words of the Pledge of Allegiance to our flag takes only a moment to recite, yet their meaning reaches across the many decades of our history as a free people.

Now, to turn for a moment to the trip abroad that we just completed. Monday evening, in a televised address from the Oval Office, I'll present to the Nation a full report on the Venice economic summit. I'll also speak about a matter of world importance: the just-ended meeting in Reykjavik, Iceland, of Secretary of State George Shultz and his counterparts from the countries that make up the NATO alliance. Secretary Shultz and the NATO foreign ministers reached a crucial consensus on our arms reduction proposals that could move us closer to an historic agreement, bringing about for the first time real and equitable reductions in U.S. and Soviet nuclear arms. And it is NATO's firmness and unity that made this possible.

For now, though, I'd like to talk with you about a matter that played a central role in the Venice summit: world trade. We in the United States hear much these days about balances and imbalances of world trade, about the whole question of how competitive our country is with the rest of the world. Congress in particular is paying a great deal of attention to this issue, and there are those on Capitol Hill who seem to think we can somehow make America more prosperous by putting up barriers and imposing tariffs -- that is, by not even trying to compete with the rest of the world.

Now, I don't doubt for a moment that when it comes to world trade our country could improve in a number of ways, and in just a minute, I'll speak about that. But first, it's terribly important for the American people and those in Congress to understand one fact: Despite the impressions you may have received, our economy is outperforming those of our trading partners. For example, consider these figures: In the 1970's Japan did consistently better than the United States in terms of real economic growth, but since late 1982, America's real economic growth has averaged 4 percent a year, about the same rate as that of Japan and a much better performance than that in Europe.

One measure of how an economy is doing is how well it creates new jobs, and by this standard the United States wins the world contest, hands down. Just since late 1982, our country has created more than 13\1/2\ million new jobs -- more than the number of jobs created during the past decade by Japan and Europe combined. Growth in the United States is more sustainable now than it was in the 1970's, because today our economic growth is much less inflationary. Indeed, the month our administration first took office, inflation was running at 12 percent, but since 1982 our country has averaged a rate of inflation of less than 4 percent.

One final fact -- our economic growth has prompted and sustained economic growth throughout the world. Without America's economic recovery, now into its 54th consecutive month, most of the rest of the world, and especially the export economies of Europe and Asia, would have grown considerably less. This means that we're already doing something right, that because of our policies of low taxes and deregulation the world economy is better off and America is already becoming more and more competitive.

We can do better, and we're working hard to remove foreign barriers to trade. When Japan failed to enforce an agreement on semiconductors, I imposed economic sanctions. The Japanese started showing positive movement in one area, and I was able to lift a proportional share of the sanctions. But it was a clear lesson for all who trade with our country: This administration will insist upon trade that is both free and fair. When we impose sanctions, we do so only so that trade can expand trade.

We want to work with Congress on a competitiveness package that will complement these efforts. For Congress to place severe restrictions on international trade with tariffs and barriers and to limit my ability to utilize our trade laws when necessary, would damage our own prosperity and that of virtually the entire world. I urge Congress to bear this in mind. As major trade legislation comes to the floor, the United States is already becoming more competitive. Now, it's up to Congress to show that it understands economic reality.

Historians of the 20th century will chronicle many a tragedy for mankind -- world wars, the rise of Communist and Nazi totalitarianism, genocide, military occupation, mass deportations, attempts to destroy cultural and ethnic heritage, and denials of human rights and especially freedom of worship and freedom of conscience. The historians will also record that every one of these tragedies befell the brave citizens of the illegally occupied Republics of Estonia, Latvia, and Lithuania. Each year, on Baltic Freedom Day, we pause to express our heartfelt solidarity with these courageous people who continue to prove that, despite all, their spirit remains free and unconquered.

Totalitarian persecution of the Balts, this time once again under Communism, has continued ever since. While enduring decades of Soviet repression and ruthless disregard for human rights, the Baltic people have continued their noble and peaceful quest for independence, liberty, and human dignity.

This year marks the 65th anniversary of the de jure recognition by the United States of the Baltic Republics. The United States Government has never recognized, nor will we, the Soviet Union's illegal and forcible incorporation of the Baltic states. The United States staunchly defends the right of Lithuania, Latvia, and Estonia to exist as independent countries. We will continue to use every opportunity to impress upon the Soviet Union our support for the Baltic nations' right to national independence and to their right to again determine their own destiny free of foreign domination.

Observance of Baltic Freedom Day is vital for everyone who cherishes freedom and the inalienable rights God grants to all men alike; who recognizes that regimes denying those rights are illegitimate; who sees, shares, and salutes the Baltic peoples' hope, endurance, and love of liberty.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirteenth day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Lawrence J. Siskind to be Special Counsel for Immigration-Related Unfair Employment Practices at the Department of Justice for a term of 4 years. This is a new position.

The President today announced his intention to accord Nicolas M. Salgo the personal rank of Ambassador in his capacity as Chief of the United States Negotiating Team for Property Negotiations with the German Democratic Republic.

When President Abraham Lincoln signed the legislation establishing the United States Department of Agriculture on May 15, 1862, he created an institution whose impact has been felt in every corner of our land and on every continent. During the past century and a quarter, the Department of Agriculture has forged a partnership with farmers that has given the American people a high-quality, wholesome, safe, and affordable food supply unequaled anywhere.

Through its many research activities, the Department of Agriculture has helped farmers in our Nation and elsewhere achieve truly incredible gains in production yields and quality. The Department has also greatly aided the agriculture industry and all Americans by preventing the introduction of pests and diseases across our borders and by investing resources and technology to preserve our soil and water supplies. The Department has also helped give the American people the opportunity to receive nutritionally balanced meals.

When the first Commissioner of Agriculture, Isaac Newton, prepared his initial annual report to President Lincoln, he wrote: ``I hardly deem it necessary to attempt to convince our intelligent countrymen of the vast importance of such a department, inasmuch as whatever improves the condition and character of the farmer feeds the lifesprings of national character, wealth, and power.'' We can all be grateful that the United States Department of Agriculture continues its vital mission today.

In recognition of the outstanding contributions of the Department of Agriculture, the Congress, by Public Law 100 - 46, has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation commemorating the 125th anniversary of the Department.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fifteenth day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The President. It's a pleasure to have you here today and a pleasure to have the opportunity to speak through you to the America that lies beyond the Potomac. I'm eager to get to your questions, but first let me just speak for a moment about three topics of vital importance.

First, the Venice summit. If I may, I'd like to highlight the accomplishments of this just-completed summit by harkening back for a moment to the first summit I attended, and that was in Ottawa, 1981. And I'm sure you'll recall when I left for that summit our own economy and that of virtually all the world stood in great danger. We had inflation running at 10 percent in the industrialized countries, not to mention high interest rates, excessive tax burdens, and too much government regulation and interference. And perhaps worse, there was virtually no agreement among world leaders on how to deal with this crisis.

We've come a long way since then, and the American economy leading the way. We started an international movement toward lower taxes and less government interference, toward more economic growth and greater individual opportunity. And last week in Venice, I saw overwhelming evidence that this consensus for less government and more individual opportunity continues to grow throughout the world.

Regarding the sometimes difficult issue of world trade, we made substantial progress in Venice in terms of both the commitment to remove barriers to trade, to work toward removing agricultural subsidies, and of an equally strong commitment to coordinate economic policies to remove some of the imbalances that have troubled the trading system in recent years. This represents further progress on the trade policy that I announced more than a year and a half ago -- a policy that's beginning to turn our trade deficit around. This profound movement in recent years toward more limited government and freer trade has not only kept the global economy moving along at a steady pace, it's made it possible for the democratic nations to stand together and keep our defenses strong, while we promote the growth of democratic institutions in the world spread of freedom and peace.

This brings me to the second point I'd like to discuss: the vitally important matter of arms control or, more exactly and more importantly, arms reduction. As I said last night, with the support of our allies, the United States will also formally propose to the Soviet Union the global elimination of all U.S. and Soviet land-based, shorter range INF missiles, along with the deep reductions and, we hope, the ultimate elimination of longer range INF missiles. I am now directing our INF negotiator to present this new proposal to the Soviet Union as an integral element of the INF treaty which the United States has already put forward in Geneva.

Finally, I'd like to address a matter that involves domestic politics, but that has worldwide implications -- the Federal budget. As you know, I discussed the budget in my address on Monday night, last night -- including the way in which an unreliable and inconsistent budget process here in the United States can damage the economy of the entire globe. So, for now let me just reduce to three simple sentences what the whole budget issue comes down to: Some in Congress want to bust the budget. I won't let them. And the American people won't either.

Two questions: First, it's not the problem of balancing the budget, it's disagreement over policy -- you favoring no tax increases and more defense spending, while many in Congress oppose, I mean favor, tax increases. And also, how would you respond to critics that say the budget deficit is caused by a lack of leadership?

The President. Well, the need for budget reform is very evident to anyone who's ever been a Governor, as I was for 8 years. And looking at that, and knowing about the other States and the manner in which their budgets are presented, I don't think there's a State that would put up with as Mickey Mouse an affair as we have at the Federal level.

Now, for example, in the State of California the Governor presents the budget. Why is this done? And why is the President required to submit a budget if no one's going to pay any attention to it? Well, the chief executive officer is the head of all the heads of the departments who must run the programs that have been adopted by the legislatures and the Congress. They pass a program, and they say they want to achieve the following goals and so forth. Now, we sit around for long hours here, day after day, and over a period of months every year, in the Cabinet Room with the people who are going to have to run the programs passed by the Congress.

And they then sit down and, without any knowledge or experience in running the programs, they set down the figures that they say should make up the budget. And when it comes back down, the President, in this case, has only one choice. He can veto the entire budget and the Government grinds to a halt and the checks stop going out -- no one's paid and so forth -- or he can, as he has to, accept it.

Let me contrast that if I can and take a minute to tell you what happened when you were Governor of California. Same thing happened with the Governor presenting the budget. And it had to be a balanced budget within the figures that were projected for the revenues of the coming year by a combination of private individuals and public. And never, in 25 years, had that group ever missed by more than 1 percent on their estimate on what the revenues in the following year would be.

Now, the Governor sends the budget up. The legislature must approve it by a two-thirds majority. They can take out things that the Governor has put in. They can add in things of their own. Two-thirds majority passes it on, and as of a certain date -- and they never can miss the date -- it comes back to the Governor. The Governor cannot put back in anything they have taken out. But the Governor can line-item vetoes of those things they have put in. And then, if they feel strongly enough about it, by a two-thirds vote, they can override his veto.

In 8 years, I line-item vetoed 943 such items. And never once did the legislature that had passed those budgets by a two-thirds majority ever put a two-thirds majority together to override my veto. Why? Because they could vote for things that were buried -- pork items buried in the whole budget. When they were revealed and stood out there all by themselves, and they had to vote for them, they couldn't get two-thirds that would do it. This is what I say is why there just is no process here. We need, first of all, a constitutional amendment that -- just like most of the States have -- that the Federal Government cannot deficit spend. And we need the line-item veto that 43 Governors in this country have. That's what's wrong with the system.

Q. Mr. President, Senator Baker has told us you are about to take this issue on the road -- the budget deficit and the budget. How can you take it on the road without having to blunt the political skeptics who say the President has to take an issue somewhere that will get the spotlight off the Iran-contra hearings here in Washington -- he has to take a significant issue to get the spotlight out of here?

The President. I think that spotlight has been growing so dim in recent days, that when you get a mile and half away from the Potomac River, there are an awful lot of people that have gone back to their favorite television shows. And I don't blame them. I've never heard so much hearsay in all my life that wouldn't be permitted in a courtroom for a minute and a half, and it's taken as gospel by those who want to go farther with this.

But I shouldn't get lost in that. No, the budget has been one of the most important things in my mind from the moment I came here. I inherited a situation in California when I became Governor, pretty similar to what I inherited here, with regard to the economy. Only there, the deficit had been hidden by bookkeeping tricks because the constitution of the State of California said there couldn't be a deficit. But you come in as a new Governor in the middle of the year, and you've got 6 months before the end of the year. And because of the constitution, I had 6 months in which I had to do something about that tremendous deficit that was hanging over the budget. The constitution said, come the end of the deficit year -- it's got to be balanced.

Well, from the experience that we had there and the things that we did, I came here with some ideas that I thought would be beneficial. We have been deficit spending for more than a half a century. And for 46 out of 50 years, the Democrats have had a majority in both Houses of the Congress. And when some of us out on the mashed-potato circuit complained about the deficit year after year after year, we were told that it didn't matter -- we owed the money to ourselves, and deficit spending was necessary to maintain prosperity.

Well, I'd be kind of being an ``I told you so'' if I told you that I made speeches 30 years ago in which I said they could not go on without one day the deficit going out of control. Well, in the 15 years from 1965 to 1980, the budget of the United States multiplied to five times what it had been, and the deficit multiplied to 38 times what it had been. And it is out of control, and it's structurally built-in. I'm talking too much on some of these.

Q. Kay Mann, from Milwaukee, Mr. President, Channel 6 from Milwaukee. Many people in Milwaukee are concerned because there are folks in Congress, including Republicans, who believe that excise taxes on products like cigarettes and beer and wine and other goods would be an effective way of fighting the budget deficit. Are you willing to fight excise taxes? And particularly, I'm interested in beer, because beer, as you know, is produced in Milwaukee.

The President. Yes. I'm opposed to taxing for this problem, or the solution to this problem, because if you look back in history, every major tax decrease has resulted in more revenues for the Government at the lower rates because of the stimulant to the economy. I believe the 54 months of recovery that we have had now, from the mess we inherited, is based on the changes we made in the tax policies.

When John F. Kennedy's tax program, that he recommended and which was not too dissimilar to ours -- when it was passed the same thing happened -- more revenues at lower rates. It happened back in Coolidge's administration, and they cut the taxes several times in that period. I can show you again where tax increases have resulted in lower revenues for the Government because of the harmful effect they have on the economy by reducing incentive and so forth.

So, what I have said about taxes is that unless we do the job of cutting the spending that has to be cut and getting government back to the point in which we can say: Now, there is no way that you can cut beyond this point -- these are the legitimate functions government must perform -- then, if you find that the revenues do not equal the percentage of gross national product that the spending does, then would be time to look at a tax so that you are even.

We're taxing at about the same level that has always been normal in this country -- 19 percent of gross national product are tax revenues. But we're spending 24 percent of the gross national product, and that's what's wrong. Now, to take Congress off the hook and give them more taxes, they'll just do more spending. You've got to force them and get back down to where we say this is it, now government is as economical as we can make it. And then if it isn't -- the taxes aren't enough -- then you look at getting more revenue.

The President. Well, I don't think there's anyone that's ever been in this job, ever, that has not gone to bed every night knowing that with the thousands of people that are out there, there could be somebody that's breaking the rules someplace. And you try to get at that and do something about it. But I challenge that there's been no violation of integrity in our administration, and I have tried to keep every promise that I made, and have kept a lot of them.

And I don't see how they can go around denying what has actually happened since we've been here. Interest rates were over 20 percent -- the prime rate -- when we came. Double-digit inflation was 13 or 14 percent. We know what the tax structure was; unemployment was high.

Today we have a higher percentage of the employment pool, potential employment pool, employed than ever in our history. The interest rates, we know, are down. Inflation has come down to less than 4 percent, after all of the years of having this rate of inflation. In fact, it's come down to lower than that until just recently because of fuel prices. I say that what they're doing is pure demagoguery.

The President. Yes, I remember when [former Secretary of Labor] Ray Donovan left, and I remember his sizeable plea the other day -- now, how does he get back his reputation? A number of people in our administration -- there have been things that have been uncovered by someone, let's say, that -- in the past, before they ever came here. But isn't it the very fact that we are uncovering, if there's something going wrong and something being done about it? We're not covering it up or hiding it.

Q. Mr. President, John Slack, from Boston. I don't really care to ask you if you've stopped beating your wife, Mr. President, but I would like to ask you an economic question. We didn't hear much from the economic summit in Venice about whether the leaders of the free world are really concerned about the deep threat to democracy that's posed by the heavy debt burden the LDC's are under. Is there any sense of urgency about this Third World debt, especially here in Latin America, and doing something about it -- a la a new Marshall plan?

The President. There was very much said about it, and it will now proceed with the other people in our administrations and the people concerned with that. Finance ministers and so forth are going to go forward looking for things we can do. For example, just one thing to throw out here that was discussed and that should be looked at -- the inability of some of these developing countries to pay back a debt to private banks.

Well, some of those banks have already transferred the debt into equity. Now, a number of those countries, those emerging countries, started out following statism. They organized at the top, and the government ran things. And this meant that there were nationally owned businesses and industries and so forth.

Well, if a bank takes over and accepts equity in one of those nationalized industries or businesses this is much the same as outside capital coming in. And no country has ever become great that didn't import capital and people. Then you suddenly have got a privatization, and you've got enlightened leadership here running it. And this can begin to help them because a great many of those countries are beginning to realize the faults of statism and are trying to move more toward the private sector. This is -- I'd just like to tell you -- this is one of the ideas that came into the discussion. It was discussed, and we are proceeding now through our ministers.

You see, the economic summit isn't a thing in 3 days. And this is why for 7 years I've -- as I said last night -- 7 years, I've always heard the same story: Nothing happened at the summit. A lot happens at the summit. But it isn't as if you were going to, say, the summit with Gorbachev and a treaty on arms to be signed or not signed. You go there and deal with all these problems and then make decisions that will be followed up, such as the one on agriculture and agricultural subsidies. And we pass on now to the Uruguay meetings that are going to be held, this problem that must be resolved. And we can agree on what we want accomplished, but there are a lot of technicalities involved that you now turn it over to the working staff for them to come up with how we can -- without pulling the rug instantly out from under farmers who have become used to this -- how we can get farming back to the marketplace for the determination of prices and production.

Q. Thank you, sir. Mark Fryburg, WBTV, Charlotte. When you take your proposal for budget reform on the road, if you come near Charlotte, you'll see people who've seen all these wonderful economic developments in 5 years and the deficit spending hasn't seemed to hurt them. At the same time, they're being told their local taxes are going up because Federal spending is going down. How are you going to persuade them?

The President. Well, for one thing, part of our whole reducing of the size and the power of the Government, under what we've called federalism, actually was a case of returning tax resources to local and State government at the same time that we gave them back responsibilities that we don't think belong to the Federal Government. Now, the Federal Government's whole history, dating back to the New Deal -- and I was a New Dealer then, out of the Great Depression -- the whole history was one of the Federal Government usurping functions that belonged at the local level. But they did it on the basis of first, they usurp the money. The Federal Government used to only take, well, about a third out of the total tax dollar, or less.

And then, suddenly, the Federal Government became the major taker of tax dollars, leaving very little to the States and local governments. And they, in turn then, had to turn to the Federal Government for help because they no longer had any sources they could go to for further taxing. We've tried to reduce that and give things back to the State level and, in turn, to the local level that belong there. And at the same time, give back to them, by the lowering of our taxes at the Federal level, the ability to -- if they need a local tax for some local function there -- to do that, to raise that tax.

Some figures that came up the other day and we used at the summit and that I used in the speech last night -- the one I could remind you here -- our system of government differs so from the others that in 1983, the deficit was 6.3 percent of gross national product. It's now only 3.9 percent of gross national product, but that's the Federal Government. And you compare those percentages to European countries, and they seem to see us as much heavier in debt than they are.

But they count differently than we do. They count the total cost of government, all government and all taxes, and figure out their percentage. Well, if we do that in the United States, our deficit is only 2\1/2\ percent of gross national product because the States and the local communities are in a lot better shape generally than the Federal Government is. Well, no, they tell me I can't take any more. If you'd like to write me a letter with a question -- [laughter] -- I'll guarantee you an answer.

Thank you all very much. I see that you've already been served, and you go right ahead and eat, and I'll talk loud. I thank you for inviting me here. I guess if this is Tuesday, this must be Capitol Hill.

I was going to say I know I'm keeping you all from lunch, but I see I'm not. By my internal clock, it's already past dinnertime, so I'll keep my remarks brief and, I hope, to the point. I must begin by thanking Bill Armstrong, your chairman, and Bob Dole, your leader. You've provided inspiration and leadership and initiative, keeping the party of ideas in the forefront of the policy debate, and I thank you both.

As you know, we just returned from the economic summit. The meeting was more than a success. It's clear that throughout the world the momentum is growing for progrowth, free-market policies. Economic freedom, increased opportunity, and less government -- that's the wave of the future. Certainly, there were areas of disagreement with our summit partners, but I believe we achieved all of our major objectives in Venice. We've put a new process in place to coordinate macroeconomic policy between our nations, and we agreed to take effective steps to spur world economic growth. We discussed progrowth, proopportunity policies -- how governments must liberate the creative energies of their people by lessening the dead hand of government interference in the economy.

We reconfirmed our strategy on the world debt problem, recognizing that special attention must be given to the poorest debtor nations so that their burden does not become simply unbearable, and we called on the banks to rethink and restructure their approach to the debtor nations. There was agreement, too, on the importance of removing the roadblocks that stand in the way of economic cooperation. We pledged to work against protectionism -- high tariffs, trade barriers, and trade-distorting subsidies that slow growth, shrink world markets, and destroy jobs.

Of course, the trade bill passed by the House recently flies in the face of the progress that we've made. Some of the provisions of this bill are so dangerous to America's economy, indeed to the world economy, that I would have no choice but to veto it in its present form. Its mandatory retaliation requirements could well plunge us into a trade war that would very quickly spiral out of control. Similarly dangerous provisions are proposed in the trade legislation that will be coming to the Senate floor soon. We've been working very closely with Senate committees to come up with a bill that would enhance prospects for U.S. exports without risking a trade war.

The ghost of Smoot-Hawley seems to be rising again, threatening our economic expansion, our prosperity, and our very livelihoods. We must eliminate the worst provisions of both the House and the Senate bills. I hope you'll keep these objectives in mind as the Senate talks up trade legislation. Unless you do, then I'm afraid the prospects won't be very good for my signing the final product into law. We must continue to go the positive route, opening up markets where they're closed, working to expand world trade and the millions of jobs that it creates, rather than shrink the global economy and throw millions out of work.

At the summit we also made real progress in the area of agricultural subsidies. Perhaps no other economic issue creates more tension between our countries. Disagreements in no other area so threaten the health of our world trading system. And now I've issued a challenge for all our nations to end the ``farms race,'' eliminate agricultural subsidies, and return to free markets in agriculture by the year 2000.

In our discussions, our allies pointed with some justification at our budget deficit. Now, it's true that deficits in Europe are sometimes just as big, or bigger, in proportion to their gross national product, but that doesn't let us off the hook. Deficits are simply a destructive economic force. They are a giant drain on the productive economy like a huge, disguised tax on the private sector. In fact, the only thing worse than deficits is high taxes. But we don't have to choose, and we're not going to choose, between them. Using taxes to cure deficits is like using leeches to cure anemia. We're not going to counter one evil with another; we're going to eliminate them both. Deficits are going the way of high taxes: They're both being mowed down to make way for a new era of growth and opportunity. As I said last night, we've reached the breaking point. Now it's decision time. Some in Congress are caving in to its old temptations, its old tax-and-spend addictions. And if we give in, it will ruin our economy.

The situation is urgent. So what do we propose? Well, to exceed their own spending limits, the Democrats propose to pay for this spending binge by cutting our national security programs to dangerous levels, by dumping $100 billion in new taxes on the American people over the next 4 years. So, that's why I'm stepping up my commitment to this cause and taking my case to the American people. It won't be a political campaign; it'll be a campaign of all Americans to bring back economic sanity.

Just as we did for tax reform, we're now going to do for the balanced approach in dealing with the budget process. And we're not going to be shy about pointing fingers and placing blame. The American people wanted a fair tax code, and despite all the expert opinion, they won. Now we're calling for reform on the budget process. We're demanding an end to the boondoggles, the waste, and the last-minute resolutions. We want every Member of Congress to stand up and be counted, to vote up or down, yes or no, on an amendment that once and for all will end deficit spending, to once and for all balance the budget.

Now, I know your job hasn't gotten any easier this year. We no longer have the Republican majority in the Senate that was fundamental in opening up a whole new era of pride, patriotism, and economic growth in this country. We may have lost our Senate majority, but the country must look to our side of the aisle for leadership. You're the bulwark that stands against those who would plunge our nation back into the malaise days of economic stagnation at home and weakness abroad. Well, we're not retreating into the past, and we're not hunkering down in defensive positions just trying to hold onto the ground we've gained. In the coming months, we're going on the offensive in a big way. We're going to be taking our case directly to the American people, because with the American people, there will always be a majority for a strong and growing America.

Now, there's one other development that I want to report to you on. As I told the American people last night, we've reached a full consensus with our allies on our arms reduction negotiating position. Six years ago the U.S. proposed a step called the zero option, the complete elimination of U.S. and Soviet land-based, longer range INF missiles. Many said our proposal was unrealistic. The Soviets, they insisted, would never accept it, and indeed the Soviets walked away from the table. Well, we remained firm and determined, and now the Soviets have adopted a similar position, and they're back at the table. With the support of our allies, we're now also proposing the global elimination of all U.S. and Soviet land-based, shorter range INF missiles, along with deep reductions in, and hopefully the ultimate elimination of, longer range INF missiles.

This is impressive progress, but as our allies agreed, this must be only the beginning of progress across the field, including an agreement to cut U.S. and Soviet strategic nuclear arms by 50 percent. We must redouble our efforts on regional conflicts, in Afghanistan, especially. It didn't take the Soviets very long to invade that country; they should be able to get out even faster.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Marjorie S. Holt to be a member of the General Advisory Committee of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency. She would succeed Donald Rumsfeld.

In claims between the two governments based on contracts, the Tribunal to date has made four awards in favor of the United States and three in favor of Iran. The Tribunal has dismissed two claims that had been filed by the United States and dismissed ten claims that had been filed by Iran. In addition, Iran has withdrawn 13 of its government-to-government claims (prior reports have overstated this number by two as a result of a clerical error), while the United States has withdrawn three.

American arbitrator Charles N. Brower was temporarily absent from the Tribunal in January, February, and March due to his appointment as Deputy Special Counsellor to the President. During his absence, American substitute arbitrator Carl Salans served in his place for several hearings. The Tribunal accepted the resignation of Iranian arbitrator Mohsen Mostafavi, to become effective upon the appointment by Iran of a replacement. Mr. Koorosh-Hossein Ameli served as the Iranian arbitrator on an ad hoc basis in a number of cases.

There remain 139 small claims currently under active Tribunal consideration. The Tribunal has held hearings in five of these claims since my last report, and the Department of State has filed additional pleadings in more than 50 such claims. The Tribunal has recently assigned the remaining small claims, totaling more than 2,500, to three-person chambers. We expect these chambers to make further selections of claims for active arbitration in the near future.

As noted in my last report, in August 1986 the Tribunal ordered the United States and Iran to negotiate in good faith on the terms of a transfer to Iran of some $500 million of Iranian funds that have been held by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York since 1981, and to transfer the funds as soon as an agreement had been reached. Following remarks by high-level Iranian officials linking U.S. compliance with the Tribunal order to the fate of hostages in Lebanon, the United States requested the Tribunal in January 1987 to take appropriate steps to clarify that no such linkage exists. On the following day, Iran filed a written submission with the Tribunal, accusing the United States of bad faith in the negotiations and requesting the Tribunal to resolve the technical issues.

On May 4, 1987, the Tribunal issued an award in which it orders the United States to retain about $65 million at the Federal Reserve Bank of New York to pay outstanding claims, and immediately to transfer the balance (about $454 million) to Iran's account at the Bank of England. The Tribunal adopted the substance of the release proposed by the United States that protects the United States against any possible future claims in connection with its administration of the account. The Tribunal stated that Iran has already publicly affirmed that there is no linkage between the United States' transfer of the funds and Iran's efforts to secure the release of hostages in Lebanon, and itself declared that ``there can be no room for any doubt that this Case . . . [has] no relation or link whatsoever to the issue of hostages held in Lebanon or any other political matter.'' The United States complied with the Tribunal's award on May 13, 1987.

President Reagan said in a meeting with Costa Rican President Oscar Arias today that the United States and Costa Rica share the same objective in Nicaragua: free, competitive, and regularly scheduled elections allowing the Nicaraguan people to elect their own leaders. The President said that the United States welcomes the initiative introduced by President Arias last February but noted that there remain concerns about specific parts of the plan. The greatest concern is the need for the Sandinistas to act on genuine democratization before pressure on the regime is removed in any way.

The President said he hoped that the Central American democracies will work together in the weeks ahead to strengthen the democratic aspects of the Arias plan. He said that the focus of the initiative on democracy in Nicaragua is the key to peace in Central America. The President said that the United States will continue to apply pressure on the Sandinista regime to democratize and his administration remains fully committed to obtaining renewed funding from the Congress for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance. The President met with Costa Rican President Oscar Arias for approximately 1 hour.

In the last several years, America's found a new way to talk about education, a way summed up in just one word, and you're an example of it: excellence. Now, it may sound strange to say that the emphasis on quality is new, but a few years ago it seemed that we'd lost sight of excellence as the goal in education. Too many schools had turned to fads like grade inflation and abolishing basic requirements. And then 4 years ago our National Commission on Excellence in Education issued its report card on American schools. They found that high school students then were scoring lower on achievement tests than at any point in the past 26 years and that 13 percent of all 17-year-olds were functionally illiterate. They said that if a foreign power had done the damage to our schools that we ourselves had permitted, we might have considered it an act of war.

Well, there's one thing about America: Once we recognize we have a problem, we pitch in, pull together, and solve it. In the past 4 years all 50 States have set up task forces on education. Many States have stiffened graduation requirements and begun to reward quality teaching. All across the Nation, communities have recognized that the key to a good education is not in the pocketbook, in how much we spend, but in the heart, in the values that guide learning. It's in mastering basics, the three R's -- reading, writing, arithmetic. And it's in what you might call the three F's, and those are faith, family, and freedom. The funny thing is, as schools begin to return to the basics of skill and character the test scores stopped falling and started up again.

But you also wrote about the values that have guided and inspired you and helped you in your achievements. And it's hard not to notice those three F's coming up again and again. You wrote about the values that your faiths have given to so many of you, values like respect for hard work and achievement, honesty toward yourselves and others, and compassion for humanity. You showed a clear sense of right and wrong, and that sense is the foundation of all true achievement.

Your writing also showed your dedication to your families. Secretary Bennett has told me that most of the time when you see a good student you will see devoted parents in the background. Well, you've shown your own devotion to them as well. One of you wrote: ``I am extremely grateful to my parents. Mom and Dad teach me by example -- their high moral code and their constant love, support, and humility.'' Another, who was brought up by his mother, told this story: ``Mother held down three secretarial jobs and managed to keep the house. And then, soon after my ninth birthday, she was diagnosed with multiple sclerosis. By the time the State disability ran out, she had completed vocational rehabilitation and was able to set up her own little business in our home. It has been nearly 9 years now, and my mother and I are still fine and still making it together very much on our own.'' All I can add to that is God bless her.

You know, if you haven't heard somebody say this -- I haven't known it too long myself -- but it was an observation someone made that I think all of us should be proud of. You can go to another country -- you can go to Japan and live there, but you can't become Japanese. You can go to France and live there, but you can't become French. Germany, Greece, name all the countries -- but anyone from any corner of the world can come to America and become an American.

Lately I've noticed some talk in some quarters about how America's become selfish. Those who say that seem to think that more big government and higher taxes are signs of an elevated moral state in our Union. Well, I believe that's dead wrong. The greatness of this land of freedom is not in the strength of government but in the strength and decency that we as free men and women bring to our daily lives. Your parents, your teachers, and you yourselves are the proof of that. Yes, every farm, every store, every factory, every home across our land is a monument to men and women who took into their hands the clay of America's opportunity and shaped it to their dreams. The great goal of my generation is to make sure the opportunities that you find when you finish school are as full as those that awaited us. Then America's future will be as great as your dreams. And let me say, it looks to me like that future will be in pretty good hands.

Now, I have to get back to my office right now. They've kind of got me scheduled pretty heavy today. In fact, Senator Baker's right here to make sure that I do get back there. So I'm going to turn the rest over to Secretary Bennett, and he will present the Presidential Scholar medallions on my behalf. So, all I can do is turn it over to him and say congratulations to all of you. Thank all of you, and God bless you.

Professor Ruder's expertise in the areas of securities antifraud provisions, insider trading, tender-offer regulation, and SEC enforcement ensures that the Commission will have the guidance of a steady hand. No one is better equipped to continue the fine work of Chairman John Shad in the area of insider trading enforcement. The Commission's vigilant efforts to enforce the antifraud laws have enhanced investor confidence in the Nation's securities trading markets, and under the leadership of David Ruder, we can expect the Commission will continue with that essential role.

One of the Nation's foremost experts on securities regulation and corporation finance, Professor Ruder has taught, written, and lectured on these subjects for more than 25 years. His knowledge and experience will be an enormous asset to the SEC. As dean of the Northwestern University School of Law until 1985, Professor Ruder designed and organized the Corporate Counsel Center to examine issues in corporate law and provide continuing professional education to corporate counsel. His scholarship is impressive, including more than 40 articles and 150 continuing legal education programs on corporate and securities matters that have provided practical guidance to all those involved in corporate finance. He has worked in private practice on securities matters with the Chicago firm of Schiff, Hardin & Waite and the Milwaukee firm of Quarles & Brady; served on the legal advisory committee to the board of directors of the New York Stock Exchange; and served as consultant to the American Law Institute's Federal securities code project, responsible for proposing new civil liability provisions of the Federal securities laws. Most recently, Professor Ruder's teaching has focused on securities regulation, takeovers, and insider trading.

America's securities markets -- the largest, most liquid, and efficient in the world -- have provided the investment capital that has helped fuel the creation of 13 million jobs since 1982. The work of the Securities and Exchange Commission is of enormous significance to the promotion of investor confidence in this market and to the smooth running of this vital engine of free enterprise. I know that David Ruder, who has devoted his professional life to improving the operation of our securities markets and to the education of those who rely upon them, will enhance the deserved reputation and tradition of the SEC as one of our finest Federal regulatory agencies. Teacher, author, lecturer, lawyer, dean -- Professor Ruder's career has well prepared him for his new task.

Science has always been an international enterprise. Today, as the rate of scientific discovery accelerates, the international character of science is even more pronounced than in the earlier decades of this century. Scientific progress and technological innovation underpin U.S. economic growth, trade, and our high standard of living. Our Nation's global competitiveness in the 21st century will depend on maintaining our comparative advantage in science and technology. If U.S. science and technology (S&T) is to remain the world's best, its participants must have full access to developments and scientific results produced elsewhere. In parallel, most countries see S&T expertise and capability as a key to their economic development and long-term competitiveness. They increasingly seek an S&T relationship with the United States to further their national goals. Accordingly, S&T cooperation is playing an increasingly prominent role in the conduct of our foreign relations and diplomatic initiatives throughout the world.

The Administration's international science and technology policy serves four primary objectives: (1) to strengthen the Nation's scientific and technological enterprise; (2) to enhance commercial relations and establish new trading partnerships; (3) to promote our foreign policy goals and improve our international relations; and (4) to protect and, where possible, enhance our national security. We believe that all of the industrialized countries of the world have a responsibility to apply a portion of their economic and manpower resources to basic research to advance human knowledge and ensure humankind's continued ability to meet the challenges of the future. In international scientific agreements, we are working with our global partners to emphasize and implement the principles of equity and reciprocity of access to research and training facilities, experimental sites, information, and data. As specific agreements are negotiated or renewed, we strive to incorporate specific assurances that intellectual property rights will be protected. Such protection exemplifies the general principle of maintaining an equitable balance of contributions and rewards. Protection of intellectual property is also an indispensable element of an investment climate that fosters the rapid development of useful technologies applying the results of international scientific cooperation.

The Technology Transfer Act of 1986 is an example of how these principles will apply to international cooperative activities carried out in U.S. Federal laboratories. Specific provisions of the Act address such factors as safeguards for intellectual property and incentives to assure equity and reciprocity of access in international research collaboration. To ensure that the international cooperation actively pursued at such centers of excellence is truly a two-way street, the Act permits directors of Federal laboratories to take into consideration whether a foreign government permits U.S. entities to enter into cooperative research and development (R&D) arrangements and licensing agreements with comparable institutions. We will certainly encourage the Federal laboratories to look very closely at this as they proceed.

To fully exploit developments in science and technology from overseas, I issued Executive Order No. 12591 on April 10, directing the Department of State to develop a recruitment policy that encourages scientists and engineers from other Federal agencies, academia, and industry to apply for assignments in U.S. embassies abroad. There is a wealth of qualified candidates whose professional careers bridge the domestic and international dimensions of science and technology. They can well serve the interests of our Nation as we collectively face the new challenges of the 21st century.

The task of formulating policies to harmonize international S&T activities with domestic programs and priorities poses a special challenge, given the decentralized nature of the U.S. R&D system. Recognizing the need for a mechanism to manage our resources in the international arena more effectively, my Science Adviser, in December 1985, established the Committee on International Science, Engineering and Technology (CISET) of the Federal Coordinating Council on Science, Engineering, and Technology (FCCSET). This interagency forum commenced operations in early 1986. It is bringing high-level scientific and technical expertise and responsibility in the government to bear on critical international issues. By ensuring that senior policymakers oversee key international S&T issues and activities, the CISET mechanism is helping to integrate international S&T activities into the framework of domestic R&D policy, consistent with the Administration's policy priorities and budget resources.

The United States formal S&T relationship with Japan dates back to the 1950's and to a large extent still reflects the relative scientific status of the two countries at that time. During 1986, the CISET conducted a coordinated U.S. Government review of that relationship and recommended a policy framework for the next phase of bilateral cooperation under the auspices of our Presidential Science and Technology Agreement. CISET's recommendations provided the foundation for negotiations with the Japanese that began in early 1987. We expect those negotiations to result in a more sharply focused program of joint research in areas of high priority and equitable benefits to both countries, with increased access by U.S. researchers to Japanese science and technology centers of excellence, commensurate with the range of access that our country has long afforded to Japanese students and researchers.

China and the United States first signed an umbrella agreement on science in 1979. As of the end of Fiscal Year 1986, 27 technical protocols have been implemented covering a wide spectrum of science and technology activities. The umbrella agreement was extended for a second 5 years during Premier Zhao Ziyang's visit to Washington in January 1984. These S&T activities have been the cornerstone of our relationship with China, opening the door to beneficial interchanges in many areas outside the S&T arena. Since last year new agreements have been signed in water resources, nature conservation, and transportation. The next meeting of the U.S.-China Joint S&T Commission is scheduled for June 1987 in Beijing. We expect to discuss with the Chinese ways that the umbrella agreement can reflect the maturing of scientific relations between our two countries in the years since 1979.

In September, President Jose Sarney of Brazil and I announced an initiative to establish a joint panel of eminent scientists, engineers, and industrial experts to determine priorities for cooperation in areas of mutual strength and benefit. The panel met in April of 1987 and will meet again this summer. The panel's recommendations will be used to formulate an initial agenda to implement the 1984 U.S.-Brazil S&T agreement. It is in the long-term strategic interest of the United States to strengthen ties that have been traditionally strong with Brazil, but which have suffered setbacks during the era of Brazilian military rule. Brazil is poised to become a major power of the 21st century, and believes that science and technology is key to her economic aspirations. Although our countries are at quite different stages of industrial development, President Sarney and I share the conviction that strength in science and technology is crucial for sustained prosperity. Cooperation in this area affords an important channel for dialogue with Brazil regarding her responsibilities as a mature player in the global economy.

At my meeting with Soviet General Secretary Gorbachev in Reykjavik, we explored the potential for increased interaction in a number of areas of science and technology. As we proceed with the Soviets, as well as the other Bloc countries, in such cooperative programs, our major objectives are to produce a scientific payoff for the United States, while protecting sensitive technology that could contribute to Soviet military objectives.

Bilateral cooperative agreements are only one facet of our scientific and technological activities in the international arena. To an increasing extent, issues of priority concern on the U.S. domestic scene also have international aspects and, thus, require coordinated attention and cooperation worldwide to achieve their solution.

Five years ago, a disease that has become known as AIDS was first identified in our country. Today, it affects all levels of society. Prevention and control of this devastating disease has become one of our Nation's highest public health priorities. However, AIDS is not a problem for the United States alone. AIDS is a worldwide epidemic. Alarm over its spread has spurred a concerted international effort to understand, control, and cure it. The United States is collaborating in the worldwide AIDS research and information dissemination campaign through direct bilateral activities and active participation in multilateral organizations.

The Chernobyl accident was an unprecedented international emergency that required urgent, immediate response and spurred international organizations to take action on many fronts. Notable among these was the action of the International Atomic Energy Agency to formulate conventions for notification and assistance. Through the leadership of the United States, there now is a better understanding of the incident and improved international cooperation on nuclear energy issues, including safety.

The year just ended saw continued close cooperation with the Soviet Union, the United Kingdom, and France to reduce the threat of nuclear proliferation. Five new signatories acceded to the Nuclear Non-proliferation Treaty during 1986. The United States was active in urging nations to institute and strengthen physical safeguards and urged cooperative programs to reduce the use of enriched uranium fuel in research reactors. In bilateral negotiations with several key countries, significant progress was made toward achieving U.S. non-proliferation objectives to help ensure the security of the world.

Cooperation in space remained an important element of our international S&T activities in Fiscal Year 1986, despite the Challenger accident. At the end of October 1985, NASA launched the Spacelab D - 1 mission for the Federal Republic of Germany. That mission marked the first dedicated Spacelab application and technology science mission launched for one of our allies. Participation of a Dutch payload specialist on the Spacelab D - 1 mission marked the entry of the Netherlands into the manned space arena. Negotiations with our international partners for the flight hardware phase of Space Station continued during this time period.

In issues concerning the environment and natural resources, some problems can be solved through national efforts alone, but there is an increasing awareness of a number of problems that threaten the future well-being of the planet, which demand international cooperation on a regional or even global scale. Examples in the environmental area include transboundary pollution, the global carbon cycle, and Antarctic atmospheric phenomena. The United States is addressing these problems through research programs and policy discussions under multilateral and bilateral auspices and through specific agreements with our nearest neighbors, Canada and Mexico. In the area of natural resources, the United States is cooperating with other countries through a wide range of multilateral and bilateral programs in addressing a number of important problems including: deforestation, the depletion of the world's genetic resources, and desertification. A related issue is concern over the environmental implications of recombinant DNA technology. A major milestone was achieved with the adoption in July by the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development Council (OECD) of a recommendation on recombinant DNA safety considerations. This recommendation is expected to foster harmonization of the regulatory infrastructures of OECD members and of other countries as well and help avoid barriers to international trade.

Our Nation's scientific and technological excellence is a great national asset that underpins our Nation's future economic prosperity and security. To make optimum use of this national asset, we must make wise and long-term investments at home and, at the same time, fully participate in the world's science and technology enterprise. Through international cooperation in science and technology, we can strengthen our future position in global markets and advance our foreign policy and national security goals.

This Administration is committed to strengthening our international relationships in science and technology to ensure that they advance our Nation's broadest interests as we approach the challenges and new opportunities of the 21st century. We shall continue to work closely with our international partners to generate the new knowledge and to apply the innovative technologies of the future to help solve the problems of mankind and ensure global prosperity and security.

Senator Hatch, I thank you and Senator Boschwitz and the lovely lady who is with us here on the platform and ladies and gentlemen. Let me begin by thanking each of you -- you've been thanked already, but I want to, too -- for being here in support of an individual who is one of the most responsible and hard-working Members of the United States Senate, a man of deep principle whom I admire and whom I back 100 percent for reelection, Senator Orrin Hatch.

Mark Twain once told a group of young people: ``Always do right. This will gratify some people and astonish the rest.'' Well, I don't know any elected official who has gratified and astonished more people than Orrin. He lives right, thinks right, and votes right, and he cares deeply about the people who sent him to Washington, and he's been working overtime on their behalf. Let me add that I have personal reasons to be grateful to the people of Utah. In 1984 they gave me a higher percentage of support than I received from any other State. We share the same western approach to life and liberty. We believe in limited government and unlimited opportunity, in low taxes and high growth, and we believe in a strong and prosperous America. And that's why the people of Utah elected Orrin Hatch, and that's why they're going to reelect him in 1988.

The opposition, of course, claims that there's an easy way out: raising taxes. Orrin, I know you agree with this: Raising taxes to bring down deficit spending is kamikaze economics. Raising tax rates, when all is said and done, would leave our government with less, not more, revenue. It would crash into our economy, sink growth and job creation, and lower the tax base. We could end up with the worst of all worlds: higher taxes, higher deficits, higher unemployment, and economic decline. And all of that that I've just described was true before we reduced taxes. With the help of courageous and responsible elected officials like Orrin Hatch, we're not going to let the liberals do that to America again. One would think that the advocates of tax, tax, spend, spend learned a lesson from the near catastrophe that they brought on our country in the 1970's. Big government, huge bureaucracies, and central planning aren't the solutions; they are the problem.

It's becoming more evident every day that collectivism is a dismal failure. Nowhere is that more clear than in Berlin, a bastion of freedom that I visited last week. The wall there divides a city, as you know, and imprisons a population. It's a monument to a repressive, stagnant system that today remains a force in the world only because of its military might and its power to subjugate and destroy.

The United States has been strong enough to deter aggression and maintain the peace, in no small degree due to the efforts of Orrin Hatch. He's been a champion of those who fight for freedom in Afghanistan, Nicaragua, Angola, and other Third World countries. He's been a strong voice for America and for preparedness. He's been a representative the people of Utah can be proud of. He's a dear friend and a talented public servant who's there when you need him. If I could ask the people of Utah, my fellow westerners, one last favor, to stand with me one last time, it would be in support of Orrin Hatch's reelection to the United States Senate.

Now, there's one thing I learned from ``President'' Dewey -- [laughter] -- was that you never count your votes before you have them. I've never taken Orrin Hatch for granted, and I would just hope that all of my fellow Republican friends in Utah never do that either. I know, Orrin, that you'll be running hard in this race, as you always have, presenting one of the best records in the United States Senate. And I thank you all for making certain that we keep him where he can do the most good for Utah and America. Keep him here in the United States Senate.

For the last several years, the United States has been involved in a fisheries dispute with several Pacific Island states as a result of conflicting laws regarding jurisdiction over highly migratory tuna. The Pacific Island nations claim jurisdiction over tuna within their 200-nautical-mile exclusive economic zones. The United States neither recognizes nor claims jurisdiction over tuna beyond 12 nautical miles. As mandated by the Magnuson Fishery Conservation and Management Act, the United States Government has prohibited imports of tuna from several countries as a result of seizures of U.S. tuna boats by nations exercising jurisdictional claims. This dispute has resulted in a cycle of tuna vessel seizures and consequential U.S.-imposed trade embargoes that has resulted in serious erosion of our good relations with the countries of the region and has provided the Soviet Union with an opportunity to exploit these differences through fisheries agreements.

United States policy under the Magnuson Act has been to negotiate international agreements to ensure the effective conservation and management of tuna and to secure access for U.S. fishermen to the stocks wherever they migrate beyond a narrow belt of coastal waters. The Treaty provides for the issuance of regional licenses for tuna fishing in some ten million square miles of the South Pacific Ocean. Data collected on tuna catch may provide a basis for future management and conservation efforts. It thus furthers U.S. fisheries policy goals while eliminating the primary source of bilateral friction between the United States and the Pacific Island states.

The President. Well, thank you, all of you, for being with us today on this third annual conferring of the National Medal of Art. Thanks also to the National Council on the Arts, for its work and for providing us with a fine list of nominees, and to our Committee on the Arts and Humanities and its Chairman, Andrew Heiskell, for their help in furthering our cultural life. Finally, let me thank the Congress -- in particular, Senator Edward Kennedy, who is graciously hosting the reception this evening -- for joining with us in supporting the arts and in celebrating the achievements of our best artists and their supporters.

We honor today seven artists and four patrons of the arts. We do this in the bicentennial year of our Constitution. The Constitution is the framework of our liberty and the guarantor of our rights. Its drafting two centuries ago was one of the few truly revolutionary acts in the annals of human government. And the great constitutional philosopher Herbert J. Storing has written that unlike any governing system before it the Constitution was ``widely, fully, and vigorously debated in the country at large; and adopted by open and representative procedure.'' Here in America, that is, the people gave powers to the government, not the other way around.

Well, today it is John Adams' grandchildren's great-great-grandchildren who have that right. And let us resolve that our schools will teach our children the same respect and appreciation for the arts and humanities that the Founders had. Why do we, as a free people, honor the arts? Well, the answer is both simple and profound. The arts and the humanities teach us who we are and what we can be. They lie at the very core of the culture of which we're a part, and they provide the foundation from which we may reach out to other cultures so that the great heritage that is ours may be enriched by, as well as itself enrich, other enduring traditions. We honor the arts not because we want monuments to our own civilization but because we are a free people. The arts are among our nation's finest creations and the reflection of freedom's light.

The National Medal of Arts is to recognize those among us who make this possible. So now, Nancy, who does such a fine job as honorary chairman of our Committee on the Arts and Humanities, will announce the honorees.

Ella Fitzgerald was born in Newport News, Virginia, and received her early music education in the public schools of Yonkers, New York. As a teenager, she won an amateur contest at Harlem's Apollo Theater, and within a year, she had an engagement with the Chick Webb Band. She's toured widely in this country and abroad, teaming with such greats as Louis Armstrong, Count Basie, and Duke Elllington. Ella Fitzgerald is indeed our First Lady of Song.

Howard Nemerov was born in New York City and graduated from Harvard University. He's authored over two dozen books and taught at several universities. His work covers the entire spectrum of American culture and rituals, including poems about trees, water, people, and science. He's also a scholar of Dante, Shakespeare, Wordsworth, and Blake. A Pulitzer Prize winner, Howard Nemerov is truly a great writer and scholar.

Alwin Nikolais was born in Southington, Connecticut, and received his first commission to choreograph in 1940. He served as director of the Henry Street Playhouse for 22 years, and there he developed his form of abstract theatre. His career has now spanned four decades. Considered by many a revolutionary figure in the art of dance, Alwin Nikolais is an extraordinary part of that extraordinary American art form.

Isamu Noguchi was born in Los Angeles, but received his early education in Japan. He later apprenticed as a Guggenheim fellow with Brancusi, and he collaborated with Martha Graham, designing the sets for ``Frontier.'' His unique sculpture bridges East and West. Committed to the art of our time, and yet an inspired reinventor of much that's ancient, Isamu Noguchi is a great artist and a great symbolic link between America and Japan.

William Schuman was born in New York City. He had his own jazz band and wrote popular songs in high school. And then he turned to symphonic music at 19, after hearing a concert of the New York Philharmonic. Mr. Schuman became president of the Juilliard School, establishing the Juilliard String Quartet and reforming the teaching of music theory. As a composer of 10 symphonies, 5 concertos, and many other works, and as a Pulitzer Prize winner, William Schuman's contribution to the music of America is enormous and lasting.

J. William Fisher was born in Marshalltown, Iowa, and was a composer in his early days. But he's best known as one who's spent a lifetime helping American opera, has been responsible for over 60 new opera productions throughout the country. He's also funded a theatre complex at Iowa State University, a professorial chair of music at the University of Iowa, and a fine arts and theatre center in his home town of Marshalltown. Bill Fisher, your generosity is in the American tradition, and the art of opera is the better for it.

Dr. Armand Hammer was born in New York City and trained as a physician. He began his business career in the Soviet Union while waiting for his medical internship. After his return in the 1930's, he organized the Hammer Galleries. As a philanthropist -- I seem to be having trouble with my words -- [laughter] -- Dr. Hammer has enriched the collections of many museums, and his humanitarian endeavors have had worldwide impact. Dr. Hammer couldn't be with us today, but he's asked Mr. William McSweeny, president of Occidental International Corporation, to accept for him.

Frances and Sydney Lewis have devoted a lifetime to supporting the arts. Frances was born in New York City, and Sydney in Richmond, Virginia, where they both now live. They've spent 25 years collecting contemporary paintings, sculpture, design, and decorative arts; and they've supported artists from all over the country. Their generosity and a portion of their collection provide the basis for the new wing of the Virginia Museum of Fine Arts in Richmond. Frances and Sydney Lewis, you continue the American tradition as great and sensitive volunteers for the arts.

The President. Well, now, Nancy, thank you, and thank all of you. Our honorees today have truly been leaders in writing the history of American freedom. So, all that's left for us to say now to all of you, in addition to congratulations to all of them, and a thank you to them for what they have contributed, and to all of you for being here also. Once again, thank you, and God bless you all.

My administration, with the kind of bipartisan congressional backing that I would certainly welcome for all our programs, remains dedicated to the long overdue modernization of our international broadcasting capability. Israel's fine gesture has now made a major contribution to that worldwide effort. With this signing, our special historical relationship will be given another dimension. We could not be happier in this partnership with Israel, because it will result in the broader dissemination of those values which we have in common. We stand now together in promoting the exchange of information and ideas throughout the world, as we have stood before and will continue to stand as partners in seeking the free movement of people and the promotion of democratic values and beliefs.

Our international broadcasts are dedicated to presenting, through news and features, an objective picture of American society and, through commentary, a clear statement of American policies and positions on major world issues. To those deprived of the right to express or experience a diversity of views in their own societies, we offer the chance to hear such. At the bottom of it all lies the conviction that the fewer the barriers to communication in the world, the better the chance for success in international relations. I have often expressed that as it's better to be talking to each other than instead of talking about each other.

We owe the Government of Israel our gratitude for being host to the site, and I ask its distinguished representatives here today to convey that to Prime Minister Shamir and others in their government who played major roles in advancing the project. To the negotiators on both sides, my congratulations. And to all of you, my best wishes for the future of this new cooperative venture.

On Monday night I called on the Congress to come up with a responsible budget and to offer meaningful reforms on the Federal budget process. Some of the response from Capitol Hill was that ``The President is playing politics.'' Well, the Congress heard part of the message, and yesterday reached an agreement on a spending plan. But it is clear that there are differences in our priorities. These differences will be resolved once we have a credible, reliable, and enforceable budget process.

The budget Congress is about to adopt raises taxes $21 billion next year and $73 billion over the next 3 years. On the spending side, there is an additional $43 billion for domestic spending and no new funding for defense. In fact, if Congress has its way, national security will decline in real terms for the third year in a row. Their price for meeting our national security needs is this: For every $1 of defense, it will cost $10 in new taxes; that's an offer I can refuse.

And what about reducing the Federal deficit? Only through new taxes, and not through spending restraint, can Congress come up with a plan. That is why I said we are at a breakpoint. The American people don't want more spending; they want better results. And anyone who tells you we can't cut the deficit without raising taxes or attacking defense is just not telling you the truth. This budget battle is all about making the next 4 and 8 and 20 years as good as the last 4. Continued opportunity and growth for a generation -- that's what is at stake.

The trade bill that was recently passed by the House of Representatives would move us exactly in the wrong direction: toward high tariffs and trade barriers, trade-distorting subsidies that slow growth and shrink world markets, destroy jobs. And I would have no choice but to veto that bill in its present form.

The administration has been working closely with the various Senate committees, as you know, to craft a bill that enhances prospects for U.S. exports. But we've some problems that we'll be discussing here today. And the United States cannot and will not allow itself to become party to a trade war. We must continue to go forward on a positive course, opening up markets where they're closed, working to expand world trade and the millions of jobs it creates rather than shrinking the global economy and sending millions out of work.

We can all be grateful for the significant contributions to our economy made by farmers and others who raise dairy goats and market dairy goat products. American farmers currently raise roughly 250,000 of these hardy animals, which can thrive even in harsh areas and have a long association with our country. Columbus and Cook and other famed explorers carried dairy goats aboard their ships for milk and meat, and pioneers and settlers transported them to every part of our land.

Dairy goat products are increasingly popular as items for export and for domestic use. The number of producers of goat cheese, or Chevre, is rising. An extraordinary variety of American-made goat cheeses is available, as are goat milk, ice cream, and yogurt.

Gospel music is a uniquely American art form, a fusion of the music and culture of Africa and Europe. The rich sound and vibrant rhythms of Gospel music have influenced the directions of popular music in America and indeed around the world. Born in black American church communities across our country, Gospel music has long been a popular influence, bringing joy to countless people, symbolizing a source of peaceful social change, and affirming the place of black American culture in our Nation's artistic heritage.

Today in churches, Gospel music enlivens and enriches the spirit of worship, a moving and expressive example of spontaneous celebration through song and prayer. The performance of Gospel music is a heritage well worth preserving for future generations, so they can know and share in one of our most beloved musical traditions.

In recognition of the importance of Gospel music to the history of American music, and of the traditional observance of June 19 as a special day of appreciation of the black American cultural heritage with which Gospel music is so strongly identified, the Congress, by House Joint Resolution 106, has designated June 19, 1987, as ``American Gospel Arts Day'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this event.

We Americans know that our efficient farmers each supply food and fiber for more than 100 people, including many who live abroad. We know too, sadly, that farming and ranching have always been hazardous occupations -- that every year agricultural producers suffer a disproportionate number of serious and often fatal injuries and illnesses during work, travel, and recreation, and that an additional toll is extracted in property damage, time loss, and medical costs. We do find that accident rates are declining, however, and this good news can help us further promote farm and ranch safety.

Most accidents and work illnesses can be prevented, often by simple and inexpensive or no-cost measures. Protective equipment, used in many industries to help assure worker safety and health, proves equally useful on farms and ranches if always used when jobs or working conditions call for it. Complex preventive measures are rarely required, and safety and health information is available from many local sources. But best of all, of course, is exercising appropriate care in all daily activities to protect ourselves from potential hazards ahead of time.

President Reagan. We welcome President Habre to Washington as the leader of a nation that has recently beaten back the violent aggression of an outlaw state. In winning its stunning victories, Chad has acted to preserve its freedom and handed a forceful message to aggressors. That message is: African nations will defend their sovereignty and foreign aggression will be defeated.

In our discussion today, President Habre and I reviewed some of the events that led to this aggression. We also discussed the current situation in Chad. The United States has proudly joined France, Zaire, Egypt, and other friends in the effort to provide President Habre's government the means to fight and win. Although the struggle is not over, we believe the victories on the Chadian desert bode well for peace and stability in Africa. Chad's triumph underscores the valor of the Chadian people and makes clear that they and other African peoples will remain free and independent.

Chad's accomplishment is admired by the free world and will benefit all of Africa. By shoring up regional stability, Chad has helped its neighbors, who now can focus more of their energy and resources on country-building endeavors. Unfortunately, Chad and neighboring countries must remain vigilant against new threats, but Chad now knows it can count on its friends. For our part, the United States is committed to maintaining an appropriate level of security assistance to Chad.

In our meetings, President Habre and I also looked to his country's future economic and development needs. Years of warfare have left Chad's economy in ruins. Reconstruction efforts have been set back by a cycle of severe drought, locust plagues, and other problems. For our part, the United States has tried to help to the degree possible in each emergency, yet the challenge remains great. Today we maintain an innovative, flexible program of development aid and budgetary support for Chad in an effort to move its fundamental economic situation.

Today President Habre emphasized that his government is committed to building a better life for the Chadian people, committed to reconstruction and economic growth. I assured him that we will continue to do our best, to work with France and other steadfast partners in the international effort to help reach President Habre's laudatory goals.

President Habre and I discussed a number of issues of international and regional concern, as well. We noted, for example, that this week marks the anniversary of the terrible riots in the South African township of Soweto. It is our mutual hope that the parties in South Africa will show the courage to work toward a peacefully negotiated end to the scourge of apartheid.

Finally, the friendship between Chad and the United States reflects our shared commitment to freedom and international cooperation. President Habre and I are convinced that the relationship between our countries will continue to be strong and productive, one which will serve the interests of both our peoples. It was an honor and a great pleasure to have had him here as our guest.

President Habre. Mr. President, may I, first of all, thank you for your very kind words directed to me and for my country. May I also express my thanks to you very sincerely for the invitation that you extended to me to visit your country and to tell you how honored I am by your very warm welcome and by the very special attentions bestowed upon my delegation and myself since we arrived in your great country, the United States, pioneer in the struggle for independence and champion of the defense of freedom. In this connection, Mr. President, may I say, at the risk of hurting your modesty, that your vigorous action at the head of the United States has enabled you to give new luster to these essential values: the independence of all people, liberty of all nations. Our visit is also an excellent illustration of the strong and very good relation of friendship, cooperation, and solidarity that are so active and so interactive between our two countries.

Mr. President, the constant and varied assistance and support of the United States has been very valuable to us in our legitimate struggle for the defense of our dignity, of our independence, and of the integrity of our territory against Libyan expansionism and colonialism. And this is, indeed, the place, Mr. President, to express our deep gratitude to yourself, Mr. President, to the American people, for your solidarity with the people of Chad, who were so unjustly aggressed and humiliated. It is, indeed, thanks to your firm commitment and that of our other friends on the side of justice and law -- it is, indeed, because of that that the Chadian people yesterday recovered the greatest part of the territories that had been taken away.

As you yourself have stressed so aptly, Mr. President, Chad remains under threat and must pursue its fight in order to put an end once and for all to encroachments upon our freedom and in order to live in peace. I know, therefore, with great gratification after my discussion with President Reagan, the reaffirmed determination of the United States to help Chad complete the national liberation task and tackle, in a lasting manner, the battle for the economic and the social development of our nation to foster the welfare of our people.

Mr. President, we in Chad, as you in the United States, cherish to the highest degree, peace, freedom, justice, protection of human rights; and we firmly believe in coexistence among nations and peoples. Because Chad has suffered and continues to suffer in body and soul from the lack of peace and the violation of these rights, we feel great solidarity with all those who are victims of oppression and racism -- wage their own liberating struggle. And we know what an important and determining role you, President Reagan, and your country play in this entire process so that mankind will be immune from the major threat against it.

That is why we are greatly confident to know that relations between the United States and Chad are of the most excellent character and that we are determined to work together to give them new impetus in strengthening our cooperation so that we may help bring about a world with greater justice and solidarity.

I am returning herewith without my approval S. 742, the ``Fairness in Broadcasting Act of 1987,'' which would codify the so-called ``fairness doctrine.'' This doctrine, which has evolved through the decisional process of the Federal Communications Commission (FCC), requires Federal officials to supervise the editorial practices of broadcasters in an effort to ensure that they provide coverage of controversial issues and a reasonable opportunity for the airing of contrasting viewpoints on those issues. This type of content-based regulation by the Federal Government is, in my judgment, antagonistic to the freedom of expression guaranteed by the First Amendment.

In any other medium besides broadcasting, such Federal policing of the editorial judgment of journalists would be unthinkable. The framers of the First Amendment, confident that public debate would be freer and healthier without the kind of interference represented by the ``fairness doctrine,'' chose to forbid such regulations in the clearest terms: ``Congress shall make no law . . . abridging the freedom of speech, or of the press.'' More recently, the United States Supreme Court, in striking down a right-of-access statute that applied to newspapers, spoke of the statute's intrusion into the function of the editorial process and concluded that ``[i]t has yet to be demonstrated how governmental regulation of this crucial process can be exercised consistent with First Amendment guarantees of a free press as they have evolved to this time.'' Miami Herald Publishing Co. v. Tornillo, 418 U.S. 241, 258 (1974).

I recognize that 18 years ago the Supreme Court indicated that the fairness doctrine as then applied to a far less technologically advanced broadcast industry did not contravene the First Amendment. Red Lion Broadcasting Co. v. FCC, 395 U.S. 367 (1969). The Red Lion decision was based on the theory that usable broadcast frequencies were then so inherently scarce that government regulation of broadcasters was inevitable and the FCC's ``fairness doctrine'' seemed to be a reasonable means of promoting diverse and vigorous debate of controversial issues.

The Supreme Court indicated in Red Lion a willingness to reconsider the appropriateness of the fairness doctrine if it reduced rather than enhanced broadcast coverage. In a later case, the Court acknowledged the changes in the technological and economic environment in which broadcasters operate. It may now be fairly concluded that the growth in the number of available media outlets does indeed outweigh whatever justifications may have seemed to exist at the period during which the doctrine was developed. The FCC itself has concluded that the doctrine is an unnecessary and detrimental regulatory mechanism. After a massive study of the effects of its own rule, the FCC found in 1985 that the recent explosion in the number of new information sources such as cable television has clearly made the ``fairness doctrine'' unnecessary. Furthermore, the FCC found that the doctrine in fact inhibits broadcasters from presenting controversial issues of public importance, and thus defeats its own purpose.

Quite apart from these technological advances, we must not ignore the obvious intent of the First Amendment, which is to promote vigorous public debate and a diversity of viewpoints in the public forum as a whole, not in any particular medium, let alone in any particular journalistic outlet. History has shown that the dangers of an overly timid or biased press cannot be averted through bureaucratic regulation, but only through the freedom and competition that the First Amendment sought to guarantee.

S. 742 simply cannot be reconciled with the freedom of speech and the press secured by our Constitution. It is, in my judgment, unconstitutional. Well-intentioned as S. 742 may be, it would be inconsistent with the First Amendment and with the American tradition of independent journalism. Accordingly, I am compelled to disapprove this measure.

Recently, Washington has been covered by miniplagues of insects. First, there were boll weevils and gypsy moths in '81 and '82; they were good guys. Now there are cicadas. Cicadas, it seems, come in cycles. Their larvae bury deep into the ground and only hatch out every 17 years. They're big, awkward, flying things and, in large numbers, make a loud, screeching sound that reverberates in the humid Washington air. I think most everyone would agree things will be much more pleasant when the cicadas go back underground.

Well, I'm afraid that, like the cicadas, the big spenders are hatching out again and threatening to overrun Congress. For awhile, they seemed to have gone underground. The deficit reduction law, Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, helped keep them under control and, well, nobody wanted to repeat the mistake of one Presidential candidate who called for higher taxes. Now, however, the tax-and-spend crew is back, and they seem to have lost all embarrassment about taking your money on a spending spree. And one Congressman has called for so many tax increases since January that his colleagues derisively refer to his Tax of the Month Club.

Last Monday, I called on Congress to come up with a responsible budget. Well, the House-Senate conference committee reached an agreement on a budget all right, but responsible it isn't. Forty-one billion dollars in increased domestic spending, with essential defense programs held captive to a $64 billion tax hike -- book-balancing gimmicks that will actually cost you $2 billion in the long run. And, by their own estimates, they're not even close to Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit limits. We're willing to work with those in Congress who will work with us in good faith. But this budget is as bad as they come -- like a bad sequel to the tax-and-spend follies of the 1970's.

Let me give you a few examples of the brazen waste of your money that's been going on in Congress. Take the [Urban Development Action Grant] UDAG program -- $5.7 million will go to build rental units in a development in Palm Beach County. Five million dollars will go to develop a hotel, a lakefront restaurant, office space, and condominiums on Seneca Lake. More millions will go to help build luxury apartments in Newburgh, New York, and residential housing in the Riverside section of Detroit. But some of the waste is even more absurd. Did you know that your Congress wants to spend millions of dollars to purchase submerged lands? That's right, thanks to your Representatives, the Federal Government could become the proud owner of a thousand acres of underwater property.

I've spoken frequently of the so-called demonstration projects in the highway bill, which don't demonstrate anything but the ability of some in Congress to bring home the bacon. But today I want to let you in on a naughty, little secret about agricultural subsidies: One of the biggest recipients of agricultural subsidies in America isn't even an American. He's the Prince of Liechtenstein, and he happens to own a few hundred thousand acres in Texas. Do you think that you and your hard-earned tax dollars should be feathering his bed?

And all of this is just the tip of the iceberg -- or the top of the pork barrel. The deeper you go, the worse it gets. Yet some in Congress can still stand up with a straight face and say that they can't find anywhere to cut except, of course, national defense. And, so, your taxes will have to be raised.

Some say the deficit is the responsibility of the President. Well, the fact is, according to the Constitution, the President can't spend one nickel. Congress appropriates every cent in the budget and every single cent that makes up our deficit. Every year we consult with the people in the Cabinet and the agencies, the people who actually run these programs. We ask them what they need and then put together a responsible budget. Each year, Congress announces -- sometimes before they even see it -- that our budget is dead on arrival. Then they put together their own budget. I have a choice: Take it, pork and all, or veto it, and see the entire United States Government grind to a halt.

This is no way to run a country. This is why, in the coming weeks, I'll be taking my case to you, the American people, asking for your support to bring fiscal sanity back to our government. I'll be talking about your economic bill of rights. The right not to be overtaxed, overspent, and overregulated -- and the mechanisms that can ensure those rights, like the balanced budget amendment with a tax limitation clause, the line-item veto, and other reforms of the budget process. I'll be counting on your support. Like tax reform, we can, and we will, win this one. Let's make the cicadas in Congress go back underground.

I didn't know I was going to be called upon, so I prepared. [Laughter] It is a pleasure for me to be here tonight, especially now that everybody knows I'm with the hottest date around. [Laughter] You know, that poll about all those young fellows who'd like to go out with Nancy didn't surprise me one bit.

Well, in our country people are free to speak and free to tell a joke, even if it tweaks the nose of a government official. And you thought that scar on my nose was from too much sun. [Laughter] Our good humor is one of our greatest national assets, and entertainment has been a lively part of the American scene from our earliest days. And for all those American entertainers of yesterday, today, and tomorrow, Ford's Theatre represents their important contribution to our way of life. This theater continues a great American tradition and broadens appreciation for the theater arts. So, Nancy and I extend to you our deepest appreciation for your help in maintaining this historic site.

Thanks to all those who performed for us tonight. When I saw David Copperfield hanging there in midair over that sword, I know that he now understands what it feels like to be a candidate for public office these days. [Laughter] Seriously though, this has been a wonderful evening for a worthy cause. A special word of appreciation to Joy Baker, Betty Wright, Millie O'Neill, Carol Laxalt, for their commitment to Ford's Theatre; and also to Mary Jane Wick and Frankie Hewitt for all the hard work they put into making this the memorable show that it has been.

Thank you all very much for coming out here on a very nice day -- but a nice warm day. I'm most grateful to you. You know, I think maybe I ought to tell you a little bit about what I'm doing traveling around right now and trips like this so that you'll understand. I think it's kind of decision time in Washington. And the decision that has to be made is how we're going to get our fiscal house in order without overburdening the people of this country with taxes. I've brought along your fine Congressman Bill Nelson, who's here with me. Of course, I'm taking a chance on getting him out of there when there's so many people up there on the other side. I know what side he's on, and he's on the right side with regard to taxes and what we're trying to do.

Very briefly -- because I know I have to move on -- very briefly, we think the time has come to recognize that there are some things lacking in the budget process in Washington. Over 80 percent of the people, if we believe the polls, believe that we should have an amendment to the Constitution that says the Federal Government cannot borrow money and go in debt. And so far, we haven't been able to get action on that. But if you show some interest in it to the people in Washington, we can.

The second thing is another one that I want to explain a little bit, because I've just been told that a lot of people don't know what I'm talking about when I say that the President ought to have a line-item veto. Well, the line-item veto simply means that when they're passing a piece of legislation that ordinarily the President would want to sign and be able to sign, but then somebody sticks a couple of spending measures in there that have nothing to do with the original bill, the President ought to have the right to sign that bill after he has vetoed those particular spending measures and gotten them out of the bill. Well, that's what I'm going to be talking about to the other people that I'll be meeting today.

But right now, once again, I just want to thank you. This is very heartwarming for this kind of welcome, and I'm most grateful -- try to be deserving of it. [Applause] All right. Thank you all. Goodbye, and again, thanks. God bless you.

The Europeans talk enviously of what they call -- to my face they have called it the American miracle. Well, I've seen an example of that miracle here today: a company where the entire staff has worked together as a team to create an impressive 70-percent increase in productivity in the last 4 years. Harnessing the latest technology, you've kept product costs down, boosted sales at home, and stayed competitive abroad; and in the process, this plant has been able to literally double its manufacturing jobs. Doubling employment, surging productivity, increasing competitiveness, a team spirit and shared goals -- you've got a miracle of your own going right here and something that you can all be very proud of. But this miracle -- all you've worked so hard to accomplish, all America has worked so hard to accomplish in the last 6\1/2\ years -- all of this is now in jeopardy. I've got something to say, and I'm going to use plain language. I'm not going to pull any punches. There are some people up in Washington who seem determined to destroy our economic expansion and send us right back into the ``malaise,'' as they called it themselves then, and the ``stagflation'' of the 1970's.

There are two dangers looming ahead. One is the trade bill passed by the House recently. It can only be described as antijobs, antigrowth, and anticonsumer. And the Senate will soon be taking up their own trade legislation. It's essential they go the positive route with a bill that opens markets rather than shutting them down, a bill that is projobs, progrowth, proconsumer -- in a word, protrade. The second danger confronting us will sound familiar: that old-time deficit spending. Some in the Congress are reverting to their old habits of tax and tax and spend and spend, and I have one Member of the Congress with me who's not one of those I'm just talking about. He's on the other side -- our side. Those others are squandering your hard-earned money on politically motivated spending projects and special interest payoffs. And to pay for it, they're proposing to saddle you, the American people, with a bill for an extra $100 billion in taxes over the next 4 years.

Well, I say: No way! No way are the American people going to be made to foot the bill for the tax-and-spend crew on Capitol Hill. Now, I have to tell you, some in Congress are standing against this tax tide. When I visited the Republican Senators last week, they gave me a giant veto pencil especially designed to take care of tax hikes. I'm keeping that pencil at the ready in my desk, and believe me, any tax hike bill that makes it into the Oval Office won't make it out alive. So, the tax-and-spend crew might as well just face the facts: There isn't going to be any tax hike in this administration. What there is going to be is a Capitol Hill cleanup, a radical reform of the budgetary politics that pays for today's excesses with tomorrow's money.

That so-called budget process has become an embarrassment to the American way of governing. You wouldn't put up with it in your plant here for a minute and a half. Last week I addressed the American people and said we have to put a stop to this kind of thing. We've reached breakpoint, decision time, and that's why I've come to you, the American people. I'm asking for your support to put pressure on Congress to bring the reliability and credibility to the Federal budget process. Just as we did with tax reform, we're going to be traveling the country, stumping for fairness for the American people. We got the special interests out of the tax code; now let's get them out of the budget. Let's demand an economic bill of rights so that congressional taxing and spending can never again endanger our livelihoods. Let's ensure your right to a free economy, an economy of growth and opportunity for you, your children, and your children's children. Let's make sure that miracles like the one taking place right here will keep happening across America, creating jobs and hope and a better future for all of us.

Now, what can you do? Well, you can write letters. You'd be surprised how important they are. Bill Nelson can tell you how important they are. Now, to some, you should be writing letters telling them to get off the dime and do what they should be doing. But it wouldn't hurt if you wrote some letters of ``thank you'' to your Congressman here, because he is doing what's right and trying to help all of you. And it won't hurt his colleagues to see that kind of mail coming to someone who is doing what's right. But I'm not going to take anymore of your time here. I've got another date moving on from here to talk to some others in your city. But I just want to tell you again how wonderful this has been to see you all here, and to see what you've been doing.

Governor Martinez, Congressman Nelson, Maxine Nohrr, I thank you, and I thank you all. This is a most heartwarming greeting, and well, it's good to be here in Melbourne, Florida, the city that just next year will be celebrating a hundredth anniversary of its founding. Come to think of it, maybe I ought to return next year for the celebration. As I said earlier today, it's not often these days that I get to go to a birthday party for something that's older than I am. [Laughter] But it's an honor to be able to address this luncheon hosted by the Greater South Brevard Area Chamber of Commerce. So many people have helped to make this event possible that I can't thank them all. But I do want to express my gratitude to the Melbourne Municipal Band and the new pride of Melbourne -- high school choir.

Now, I came down here today on very serious business: to tell you about an historic issue in Washington -- an issue that will shape the future of our entire nation and even the world -- and to ask for your help. In my address to the Nation from the Oval Office just last Monday, I spoke about the Venice summit and gave a statement of American policy in the Persian Gulf. But our polls showed that, of all the subjects I touched on in that speech, the American people listened with the greatest interest and concern to my discussion of the Federal budget and of the threat posed to our nation by deficit spending.

You may remember that when I ran for office back in 1980 the American economy was in the worst mess since the Great Depression. Government was everywhere, running up taxes, causing inflation, raising interest rates, and taking a bigger and bigger share of our earnings. So, when our administration was elected, we enacted an across-the-board personal income tax cut of nearly 25 percent. Then we indexed the tax brackets, making it possible [impossible] for inflation to push you into higher and higher tax brackets. Many people didn't understand that subtle way in which, without having to pass a tax bill, the Congress was getting a tax increase every year. People working in that inflationary period would get a raise to cover the cost of inflation, to keep them even with where they were in the previous year. But the Government's tax was based on the number of dollars, not their value.

Then in our second term, we enacted an historic tax reform, one that simplified the tax system, eliminated many loopholes and tax shelters, lowered most Americans' tax rates even further, and made the whole system more fair. In particular, this tax reform eliminated the complicated system of 14 tax brackets and replaced it with just 2. And under this new system, the individual income tax burden is being cut by an average 6 percent in 1988. In plain language, that works out to an average of about $200 in savings for everybody.

You remember the old formula that donated -- or dominated, I should say -- the Government doesn't donate anything -- [laughter] -- dominated Government for so many years, the formula that led to high inflation and economic stagnation: ``tax and tax, spend and spend.'' Well, the good news is that because of the economic reforms that I've just described ``tax and tax'' has become a thing of the past. We can take great pride in that, because it testifies to a fundamental fact about America: the ability of the people to make their own will prevail over that of big government. But there's some bad news, and that's why I am here today. You see, I'm afraid we still have our work cut out for us when it comes to ``spend and spend.'' Last year we got the special interests out of the tax code. Now it's time to get them out of the budget.

In this bicentennial year of our Constitution, I'm reminded that the Bill of Rights was adopted by our forefathers to protect the people from the threat posed by government of that age to our basic political liberties. Now, over 200 years later, the chief danger of big government is the threat to our economic liberties, to our basic right to earn our own keep and keep what we earn. Here the problem is a bloated Federal Government that overtaxes, overspends, overborrows, and overregulates. In this day and time, what Americans need is an economic bill of rights, and I'll talk more specifically about that next month.

For now, it's enough to say that the Federal budget process just plain isn't working, as your Governor has told you. Earlier this year I sent Congress a responsible budget -- I'm called upon to do that -- one that met our deficit reduction targets, preserved a strong defense, and added funds for critical domestic needs like AIDS research. But that budget was ignored. Instead, some in Congress want a budget that will, as a percentage of gross national product, put defense spending back on the path leading to the dangerous levels of the previous administration.

On the domestic side -- you guessed it -- Congress wants to spend more, $41 billion more. And they have even more spending in the pipeline for welfare and other programs, that we've only begun to get control of. We need to reduce spending, not increase it. And to pay for all of this, your taxes would be raised by $19 billion next year and $64 billion over the next 3 years. Raise taxes, cut vital defense programs, and increase domestic spending by tens of billions of dollars -- if you'll permit me, there they go again. [Laughter] Now, the amazing thing is that some in Congress seem to believe that spending more and more on behalf of this or that special interest group is actually good politics. But sooner or later, the answer will come not from the special interests but from you, the people.

This attitude in Congress reminds me of a lazy student who was flunking math. ``Teacher,'' he said, ``Dad told me that if my grades don't improve somebody's going to get a spanking. So, I'd watch out if I were you.'' [Laughter] Yet, just as together we conquered ``tax and tax,'' so too we can control ``spend and spend.'' I've agreed to have members of my administration sit down with Congress and talk about the budget process. Congress needs a way of ensuring that it will honor budget decisions once it agrees to them. I propose just three simple budget reforms -- and you've heard them mentioned already here today -- three simple reforms with the power to put the big spenders out of business forever.

And second, I need your help in getting Congress to agree to a responsible budget deficit reduction package this year and to stay with it. I've already shown that when Congress passes budget-busting boondoggles, the kind that give me heartburn -- well, let me just put it like this: How do I spell relief?  -- V-E-T-O. [Laughter] And we need to go beyond that, to build a consensus in Congress to hold spending down. And make no mistake: This is an issue that transcends party. Responsible Democrats, like your own Congressman Bill Nelson, have shown that for the good of the country they're willing to join forces with those who believe in limiting deficit spending. The only thing that makes me uneasy about him being here with me today is that -- who's tending the store while we're gone? [Laughter] But, we need many more Senators and Representatives to take this responsible position, and this is where you, the people, come in. As I said before, if we can't make them see the light, let's make them feel the heat.

And third, and once again, saying and repeating what the Governor said, there's something else I hope you'll ask for: the line-item veto. The line-item veto is simple; it would enable the President to go over those huge expenditure bills and just draw a line through the items that represent waste. Now, the Governors of 43 States already have the line-item veto. I had it myself as Governor of California and used it no fewer than 943 times without being overridden.

Now, how could that be? Well, in our State, two-thirds of the legislature has to pass the budget to begin with, and when it comes to me they can add things in. I can veto those things out -- as Governor of California, not as President -- and those same two-thirds majority that would vote the entire budget to send it to me, when faced with voting again to override the veto by two-thirds vote on those individual items -- no, they wouldn't stand up and vote for those. So, we had a clean record on that. I think you'll agree with what the Governor said: It's high time we gave the line-item veto to the President.

And incidentally -- I may stand corrected on this one -- I think that it's 44 of the States that have the balanced budget in their constitutions. And there are a host of other reforms Congress should undertake to improve the enforceability and credibility of the budget process: a 2-year budget, for example, as you do here; credit reform; firm limits on the amount of nondefense spending; tougher rules to prevent bills that bust the budget. I know that Congress is currently considering some of these changes, and I encourage them to move on with deliberation and come up with a package of reforms that will begin to correct the glaring deficiencies of the current process.

So, we did give the money back. And two or three times we didn't get into the clear enough that we could say, hey, look, we can actually now cut the tax rates somewhere. But in those few times that we got another surplus, I would go to the people first, before the legislature found out, and tell them that I was going give it back. And we did. And the last one was almost 10 times as much as the first one had been that we were going to give back.

The way we gave it back the first time was in the income tax. We figured out that the surplus was just about 10 percent of what the income tax would bring in. So, we told the people to figure out their income tax and then just send us 90 percent of it -- keep the other 10 percent. Well, when we got to the final one, which as I say was considerably bigger, I had the experience of one of our State senators striding into my office one day, and he said, ``Governor, I think giving that money back to the people is an unnecessary expenditure of public funds.'' [Laughter] You know, he really believed that money belongs to the Government and what you and I get to keep out of what we earn is just what they allow us to keep. Well, all I can say is: Government had darn well better remember where its money comes from in the first place.

With these three measures -- a balanced budget amendment, a firm commitment to hold deficit spending down this very year, and the line-item veto -- and with these three simple but powerful measures, we can see to it that the Federal Government begins to live within its means once and for all. Now, I know that the special interests and big spenders are opposed to all this, just as they were opposed to cutting your taxes. But sooner or later, they're going to have to answer to you, the American people.

Well, the time has come for me to leave the good town of Melbourne and head back to Washington. But in closing, let me just say this: In these past few years, we've come so far together, restoring our nation to greatness. For love of liberty, let us work together once again to enact these budget reforms, to leave to our children a nation in which the people, and not the Government, truly rule. And then we will all have done our job. Because there are three of us alone that I know sitting here -- the Governor, the Congressman, and myself -- you know, you're really the boss. We work for you. And let's keep it that way.

Nancy and I are deeply saddened by the loss of a very dear friend. Fred Astaire, an American legend, has died. We join the entire Nation in mourning his passing and our heartfelt sympathies are with his wife, Robyn, and his family.

Fred was, in every sense of the word, a ``superstar.'' He adapted a witty, sophisticated, casual air which belied the enormity of his talent. He was the ultimate dancer -- the dancer who made it all look so easy. But, we knew that when we watched him dance, we were seeing the absolute master of his terpsichorean muse.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Roland R. Vautour to be Under Secretary of Agriculture for Small Community and Rural Development and to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Commodity Credit Corporation. He would succeed Frank W. Naylor, Jr., in both capacities.

Section 1. The head of each Executive department and agency subject to the Freedom of Information Act shall, to the extent permitted by law, establish procedures to notify submitters of records containing confidential commercial information as described in section 3 of this Order, when those records are requested under the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA), 5 U.S.C. 552, as amended, if after reviewing the request, the responsive records, and any appeal by the requester, the department or agency determines that it may be required to disclose the records. Such notice requires that an agency use good-faith efforts to advise submitters of confidential commercial information of the procedures established under this Order. Further, where notification of a voluminous number of submitters is required, such notification may be accomplished by posting or publishing the notice in a place reasonably calculated to accomplish notification.

Sec. 4. When notification is made pursuant to section 1, each agency's procedures shall, to the extent permitted by law, afford the submitter a reasonable period of time in which the submitter or its designee may object to the disclosure of any specified portion of the information and to state all grounds upon which disclosure is opposed.

Sec. 5. Each agency shall give careful consideration to all such specified grounds for nondisclosure prior to making an administrative determination of the issue. In all instances when the agency determines to disclose the requested records, its procedures shall provide that the agency give the submitter a written statement briefly explaining why the submitter's objections are not sustained. Such statement shall, to the extent permitted by law, be provided a reasonable number of days prior to a specified disclosure date.

Sec. 7. The designation and notification procedures required by this Order shall be established by regulations, after notice and public comment. If similar procedures or regulations already exist, they should be reviewed for conformity and revised where necessary. Existing procedures or regulations need not be modified if they are in compliance with this Order.

Sec. 9. Whenever an agency notifies a submitter that it may be required to disclose information pursuant to section 1 of this Order, the agency shall also notify the requester that notice and an opportunity to comment are being provided the submitter. Whenever an agency notifies a submitter of a final decision pursuant to section 5 of this Order, the agency shall also notify the requester.

Sec. 10. This Order is intended only to improve the internal management of the Federal government, and is not intended to create any right or benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable at law by a party against the United States, its agencies, its officers, or any person.

It's a pleasure to have all of you here today to honor some of our fellow Americans who've made a difference, Americans who represent the very best of our country. In my first inaugural, I said: ``Those who say that we're in a time when there are no heroes, just don't know where to look.'' Well, I've been blessed over the years with having had the opportunity to meet many American heroes and to get to know the truly admirable people who make up our land.

Sometimes, because we spend so much time and energy on trying to solve our country's problems, we lose sight of the fundamental strength of character that abounds in our citizens. I recently visited Europe, and a great deal was said about the Marshall plan, something Winston Churchill called ``the most unsordid act in history.'' Those of us who lived through it understand how simple it would have been for us to have come home after the war and let the rest of the world fend for itself. Our people, after all, had sacrificed life and wealth to save mankind, and we could have easily justified sitting back and enjoying ourselves and our prosperity.

Well, the heroes in America reflect the positive and uplifting values of our people. That's why we call today's awards Medals of Freedom. The Medal of Freedom award, which we bestow on our Americans today, is this country's top civilian honor. The list of former recipients contains the names of military heroes, like General Omar Bradley, but also the names of distinguished individuals like Dr. Jonas Salk, Jesse Owens, Walt Disney, Helen Keller, and others. Today's recipients are of the same caliber. They exemplify the ideals of America. They have excelled in the arts. They have written works that touched our hearts. They've made us laugh. They've helped make our country more secure and provided for the less fortunate. They're some of America's best. And today we're proud to award them the Medals of Freedom. And now, it's my pleasure to announce this year's awardees.

Since her earliest days in grassroots politics, Anne Armstrong has been an intrepid fighter for the cause of freedom and liberty, and against the intrusions of big government. Her great talents and capacity for work catapulted her onto the national political scene, where she has served her party and nation with distinction, holding high offices in both. Her great skill and unstinting effort in the service of her country have earned her the gratitude of our nation.

A leading entrepreneur, Justin Dart has made vital contributions to America that will long be remembered. Considered a revolutionary by his trade, he was already head of the largest drug company in the world at the age of 35, and his sure hand would soon transform the business. Justin Dart became a leading force in politics and an adviser to the President, valued not only for his business acumen but his courageous championing of political and economic liberty. Justin Dart's life stands as eloquent testimony to the creative force of freedom.

An entertainer, humanitarian, and an individual who lifted the spirit of his fellow countrymen, his enthusiasm for life infected all who saw him. He spread laughter and good will, touching the hearts of people throughout the world, especially young people. He was a true professional, a star of film, stage, television, and radio. His dedication to helping less fortunate children is also remembered. He was a good man, a pro who cared, an example of the best in America's soul. And he will always be remembered around the world by millions of children for his unselfish willingness to serve every time the U.N. called upon him to do so.

A brave and dedicated military officer who served our nation in peace and war, General Lemnitzer's skill as a tactician, planner, and negotiator was instrumental in the Second World War. He fought in Korea, he served as U.S. commander in chief in Europe, and eventually became the Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff. His life has been one marked by high military skill and unselfish devotion to his country.

As Director of Central Intelligence between 1961 and 1965, John A. McCone guided our nation's intelligence community through some of its most difficult hours. He strengthened the Nation's critical capacity for effective intelligence operations, maintained the intelligence community's reputation for unbiased analysis, and played an active role in policy debates. Integrity, patriotism -- these qualities have marked his long and distinguished service to our nation.

For five decades, as president and president emeritus of Tuskegee Institute, Dr. Frederick D. Patterson has been one of America's outstanding educators. He is also the founder of the United Negro College Fund and the College Endowment Funding Plan, and through these, he has helped finance excellence throughout America's community of historically black colleges. By his inspiring example of personal excellence and unselfish dedication, he has taught the Nation that, in this land of freedom, no mind should be allowed to go to waste.

He once jokingly asked his mother why she had carried him longer than the usual 9 months. ``Slava,'' she answered, ``to give you such beautiful hands.'' Performing, teaching, and conducting, the beautiful hands of Mstislav Rostropovich have shared with millions his passion for music, especially the music of the homeland he has never ceased to love. He is a virtuoso not only of music but of heart and mind, as well.

Dr. William B. Walsh has spent a lifetime giving hope to others. For 14 years, in ports around the world, millions cheered the ship that Dr. Walsh's dreams launched, the S.S. Hope. Medical care and training -- these were the Hope's cargo, together with a message of good will from all Americans. Today Project HOPE has stepped ashore, and Dr. Walsh is reaching people wherever there is need and, as always, is giving of himself so that others might find hope. He is a credit to his profession and to his country.

Our country knows Meredith Willson as the composer-lyricist whose musicals and songs captured the joy and innocence of America. Meredith Willson's career embraced the musical life of his nation. His greatest hits, ``The Music Man'' and ``The Unsinkable Molly Brown,'' will forever stand as landmarks of the Broadway stage. As one critic said: ``His music is as American as apple pie and a Fourth of July oration.'' He will always be remembered affectionately and with respect for his virtuosity as our music man.

The President. Thank you very much, and let me say a special word of thanks to a long-time supporter of what we've been doing here in Washington, your president, John Sloan. It's a great pleasure to be here today. For 44 years the National Federation of Independent Business has spoken out for the most dynamic and creative force in our economy: America's independent businesses. For 6 years you've been a partner in the struggle to pull America back from the economic brink and get it back on the trail to the top.

You remember those days before we came into office. Inflation was the highest since World War II; interest rates were the highest since the Civil War; growth had ground to a stop; and the income of the typical American family was on a decade-long roller coaster ride to the cellar, while taxes shot for the sky. Those were particularly hard times for America's entrepreneurs, as venture capital for starting new businesses virtually evaporated and a flood of regulations began to sweep away the great American spirit of enterprise.

How had the greatest economy in the world been brought to its knees? Well, as one prominent historian of our times has written -- he said, ``The most detailed analysis of this stagnation and decline suggested the causes were mainly political.'' They were, he said, ``failure to control the money supply, excessive tax burdens, and government intervention and regulation'' -- in short, big government: its rules and its spending and the taxes and monetary policies it used to finance its spending.

Well, before we came into office, many entrepreneurs thought Federal regulators and paperwork would never go away. But we've ripped 40,000 pages from the Federal book of regulations. We've eliminated what seems to be about 600 million man-hours a year of filling out government paperwork. We came into office with a strategy: lower tax rates, less regulation, monetary stability, and controlling Federal spending through a constitutional amendment to balance the budget. Now, we put three of those four parts into practice, together with reducing the rate of growth in Federal spending, and you know the results: 4 of the best years in our history.

Today we're in the 55th month of uninterrupted growth. That's just 4 months shy of the longest peacetime expansion in American history. Now, in this expansion we've created more than 13 million new jobs -- that's more new jobs than Europe and Japan combined. Today if you drive down a street in the typical American neighborhood, you'll find more people at work than ever before in our history. We brought interest rates to the lowest level in a decade, inflation to the lowest in a quarter of a century. Real family income has risen strongly and steadily.

Now, I say ``we,'' and I mean just that. You have been our partners every step of the way, and I don't mean just by supporting us in our battles with the big spenders, those tax-and-spend trolls under the Capitol dome. Our policies were designed to give you a chance to do what you do best. They were intended to release the American dream from its cell so that enterprising visionaries like you could tune up the accelerator, fill up the tank, and step on the gas of the greatest machine for beating poverty and building prosperity the world has ever known: the American free enterprise system. And sure enough, you came through. According to the foremost authority on job creation in America, between 1981 and 1985, businesses that were less than 5 years old and businesses that had fewer than 20 employees created more jobs than America as a whole. Without you and entrepreneurs like you, America would have lost millions of jobs in the last 6 years, instead of the large gains we in fact enjoyed.

Well, all the old repetitious doomsday talk about our strong economy has caused one noted British columnist on economics to shake his head at what he calls the ``morbid search of the U.S. economic tea leaves for bad news.'' But as Robert J. Samuelson, Newsweek's economics columnist, has warned: ``The danger in believing these myths and enacting policies based on them is that we will damage a job-creation process that has been a success.'' And that's just the point. Our critics know -- and we should, too -- that we've come to what I called in my television address the other night a breakpoint in time of choosing. Our critics have their own agenda, and they're pursuing it in every possible way.

Whether it's talk about lameducks or phony statistics, to make a strong economy look weak, our critics in Congress are trying to railroad tax-and-spend policies and all that goes with them back into the saddle here in Washington, and you know what that means. Congressional proposals like mandatory health plans and parental leave, a higher minimum wage, plant closing laws, double-breasted legislation which the House passed last week -- though not by enough to override a veto -- [applause] -- thank you -- and opposition to meaningful tort and product liability reform have led one commentator to say that ``Congress is at war with small business as almost never before.'' But since so many jobs come from your kind of entrepreneurial businesses, I'd put it another way: Congress has declared war on American jobs, and I'm not going to stand for it.

Now, anyone who tells you we can't cut the deficit without raising taxes and attacking defense is not telling you the truth. Last year we got the special interests out of the tax code. Now it's time to get them out of the budget, and that's just what I mean to do. Last week I spoke to the Nation about an economic bill of rights, including a line-item veto and a balanced budget amendment. Some said that I was singing golden oldies -- nothing new. Well, the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment may be oldies, but they're also goodies. And those who don't think they stand a chance on the charts had better keep their dial tuned to this station. [Laughter] It's rock 'n' roll time again at the White House.

It's just this simple: Ever since the middle seventies, when Congress shoved the President out of the way and took over the budget process almost entirely, deficits have soared. Congress' own laws require it to pass all appropriations bills by the beginning of the fiscal year. It has been 11 years since they have done that. It's been 10 years since they've passed every appropriation bill by the end of the fiscal year. I've agreed to have members of my administration talk with Congress about the budget process, but let me say, the problem here goes deeper. Our founders intended the President to represent the broad national interest, including the interest in an overall limit on spending. They feared an imperial Congress, one that would become a den for special interests. That's why they gave the President the veto. But in recent years, Congress has found ways to weaken the Presidential veto power.

Well, this is why I've said over and over again it's time to give the President what 43 Governors have, what I had when I was Governor of California: the ability to veto spending project by project, a line-item veto. We also need a constitutional provision that 44 States have written into their own constitutions. Polls show that 85 percent of the American people favor a balanced budget amendment and have for years. But we can't even get an up and down vote in Congress. The reason: The big spenders don't want to face a balanced budget -- pure and simple.

Line-item veto, balanced budget amendment -- these are parts of the economic bill of rights that I'll be discussing in the weeks ahead. And this is the choice we have: Go back to the days of tax and spend, stagnation and inflation, or finish the work we began 6 years ago and keep the prosperity we've known for the last 55 months, going not just for the next year or two but into the next decade and into the next century. Now, our choice is not right or left but forward or back, up or down. All over the world, nations are finding that less government spending, lower taxes, and freer markets means greater prosperity, less poverty, more opportunity for all people. In Peru, a developing country very different from our own, it's been found that the only real paths out of poverty and to opportunity are in those parts of the economy that are least taxed and least regulated. There's an old and simple principle here: Man soars highest when he is most free.

And the next time you hear one of those fellows on the Hill say that I'm doubletalking because I haven't submitted a single balanced budget since I've been here -- well, the answer to that is, of course not. With the budget deficits that we've had, there is no way that you could balance the budget in a single year without causing great damage and harm to people that you don't want to hurt, including those farmers I mentioned a moment ago. So, of course not. But the thing we have is what Congress passed and now won't obey: Gramm-Rudman-Hollings. The answer to a balanced budget is: Get on a path of declining deficits until you point to a specific date at which the balanced budget amendment will be in effect, because we will have brought our spending down to within our income.

The President. It's a great pleasure to be here with all of you today. Your work this summer is going to be a great opportunity for both you and our country. You'll have a chance to get to know the other peoples and cultures, and a chance to perhaps bring some of both back with you.

I just returned from Venice where I had a chance to address the young people of Europe in a speech over WORLDNET. I mentioned then, as I mention to you now, that we're a country of peace, interested not just in controlling nuclear arms but in dramatically reducing them in number. When we first made such proposals a few years ago the critics were in full cry, saying we were impractical and our steps were unacceptable. Today the Soviet Union is publicly agreeing with those suggestions, and for the first time we have before us a chance to radically reduce the number of weapons. And this, together with new defensive systems like SDI, offer the world an historic chance to escape the cloud of nuclear terror that has hung so heavily over the last part of the 20th century.

In my WORLDNET speech, I also pointed out that the United States is for world freedom as well as world peace. I tried to convey the excitement that is freedom and the growing realization that the only way for political freedom to prosper is to guarantee the equally important right to economic freedom.

You know, we take it so for granted, this freedom of ours. I've never forgotten the story told to me by a book publisher who was of German extraction. Now, he had been growing up and at your age in Germany when it was -- this was long before Hitler. This was in the era of the republic. Now, we have a republic, and they had a republic. And I asked him once -- because as a publisher, I noticed that he went out of his way to publish the writings of people who were writing on events and on philosophy of our country and so forth and political works of that kind -- and he told me why. And he said, ``Can you imagine what it was one day in a classroom to hear a professor define freedom for us, and he used the United States.'' He said, ``Imagine that you have arrived in the United States. You're standing on the Atlantic shore. Ahead of you is 3,000 miles of country.'' He said, ``You are absolutely free to take off through those 3,000 miles on your own, stop anyplace you wanted to stop for as long as you wanted to stop, and finally pick where you wanted to live and decide to settle down there.'' And he said, ``He was talking to a class of us who lived in a society where if you wanted to move from where you lived in one town just across to the other side of town you had to go to the city hall and get a permit. And then you had to explain why you were moving and where you were going and so forth.'' And he just never forgot that. And so, he ended up as a publisher of books in the United States.

Well, it is true. And as you look around at yourselves, and if we took all the lists of all your names and started analyzing the background of those names, it would turn out that literally every part of the world is your heritage. Here you are, all Americans, and you trace your heritage to, as I say, every corner of the world. In other words, those that we follow, our ancestors, happen to be people with a special belief in freedom and courage in their hearts that made them tear up roots wherever they lived, leave family and friends if need be, and travel to this new land where -- most cases they didn't even know the language before they got here -- and do it because of that extra urge for freedom that just the rest of their neighbors didn't have. And we are kind of a miracle. I have always said -- you may call it mysticism if you will -- but there had to be some divine plan that placed these great continents here between the two great oceans to be found by that kind of people. And that, maybe, is our purpose in life.

Now, we all have a kind of an affinity, even though we aren't the original immigrants, but some as grandparents, some great-grandparents, and further back than that are parents. And in America, the only place where you meet somebody and the first thing you know, you find out -- saying, well, what are you? Well, I'm German-American, or I'm -- and usually it's a mix anymore, because we've all lived here long enough that we get together and marry across what might have been national lines. And, yes, it's all right to have an affinity for what was the mother country for all of us, because if a man takes a wife unto himself, he doesn't stop loving his mother because of that. But at the same time, we're all Americans. I'll get back to that a little later on, and some more about that.

But if you look at history, I think you'll find that the first signs of decline in great nations were economic ones, decline brought on by governments that spend too much of their citizens' hard-earned money and then burden them with excessive taxation and inflation in order to foot the bill. All around the world today, there's an increasing appreciation of this lesson, an increasing realization that growth and opportunity means getting big government out of the way and letting free peoples reach as far and as high as their talents and ambitions will take them. Now there's more and more understanding that just as we have the right to speak and publish and assemble and vote, we also have rights to enjoy the fruits of our labor and not be overtaxed and overburdened by government.

I once had an adventure with a State senator in California when I was Governor who didn't understand that. We turned up with a surplus one year of $850 million. And the legislature had all kinds of ideas of what to do with it, and I had an idea, too, as Governor. I went before the people publicly and said, we're going to give it back to you. One day this senator stormed into my office. He said, ``I think giving this money back to the people is an unnecessary expenditure of public funds.'' [Laughter] Where did he think it came from in the first place? But there are some that begin to think that it's government's money and they just let us keep a little of it. Well, in many ways, this is a reflection of what's been happening here in our own country during the past 6\1/2\ years. All the way along, the choice has been the same: more taxes, more spending, more regulation, more deficits or the other choice, less of all four and a lot more growth, opportunity, and a bright economic future for my generation and yours.

When I was in Europe, several leaders spoke to me about the threat that too much deficit spending posed to the world economy. We're that important anymore economically. We can cause hard times in other countries by things we do. Here in America in the last few years, the Congress adopted something called Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, and that was a plan to gradually reduce the deficit, to set a goal down here and say each year we will come closer and finally we will reach the balanced budget, because for more than 50 years we've been deficit spending. We made progress, but now there are signs that some are going back on that commitment -- the very commitment that so many other nations in the world are concerned about because they know how important our economic strength is, as I said, to their own well being.

Well, as I said the other day, we've reached breakpoint, decision time. And lately, some on Capitol Hill have been upset with me for mentioning this. They've been counseling me through the media that the people aren't listening, that they don't care any more. Well, I have to politely reject this advice. I know these decisions are important now, and they lay the foundation for our country as it faces the challenges of the 21st century, the century where you will be taking charge of this country.

I mention all this because some of those you meet abroad will ask you about this matter and our sometimes noisy arguments over here. And I hope you'll mention to them that our capacity for arguing, and arguing it all out in public, is actually the strength of our system, that dissent is not disunity. It's true there aren't many secrets here, but it's also true that that's what democracy is all about and why it's stronger over the long run and why freedom has a staying power. I guess what I'm hoping that you'll convey to our friends abroad is that sometimes in order to understand this country, you have to step back and give it a little perspective, like the cowboy who one day rode into the Grand Canyon, looked around, and exclaimed, ``Wow, something happened here!'' [Laughter] Well, point to America and her history, and something happened here.

No, you don't want to do that. But I'll tell you what is unique about us, and it's here in this room, present with all of you. You can leave here and move to Japan, but you can't become Japanese. You can move to France; you can't become a Frenchman or a Frenchwoman -- Greece and not become a Greek, Turkey -- all of these. But anybody, anyplace, from any corner in the world can come to live in America and become an American. And I guess that we're the only place where that is true, and that's what we're all about. You know, it's the magic and the mystery and the majesty of freedom. It's your heritage, and wherever you go, be proud of it.

And now, my very best to each of you before you go there, not only this summer but in all the days ahead. And my watch tells me that the little 11-year-old girl who wrote me a letter one day was right. Soon after I got here, I was amazed -- at 11 years old -- she told me all the important things I was going to have to deal with and what the great problems were. And then she wound up with a P.S. She said, ``Now, get back over to the Oval Office and go to work.'' [Laughter] That's what I have to do.

But I wish we could stay here and visit, and I wish that we could have a meeting when you come back again. I would like to hear your assessment of the countries that you've been in and what you've seen and what you've learned from them. But also, let them learn a little bit about us, that we're not against anybody and we want peace and we want to be neighbors with all the world. And for one thing, we've proven to all the world that the old hatreds that used to exist and the rivalries on opposite sides of borders of other countries -- Look at us; we've crossed all those borders. We're a melting pot, and we've found out we're all human beings, and it works.

Section 1. Establishment. (a) There is established the Presidential Commission on the Human Immunodeficiency Virus Epidemic to investigate the spread of the HIV and the resultant AIDS. The Commission shall be composed of 11 members appointed or designated by the President. The members shall be distinguished individuals who have experience in such relevant disciplines as medicine, epidemiology, virology, law, insurance, education, and public health.

Sec. 3. Administration. (a) The heads of Executive departments and agencies, to the extent permitted by law, shall provide the Commission, upon request, with such information as it may require for purposes of carrying out its functions.

The President today announced his intention to appoint W. Eugene Mayberry to be a member of the Presidential Commission on the Human Immunodeficiency Virus Epidemic. Upon appointment, he will be designated as Chairman.

Thank you very much, and welcome to the White House. One of the pleasures of this job is being able to meet individuals who are contributing to our country and, yes, bettering all of mankind as well. And that is, of course, the ultimate goal of technology and science: a quest for bettering the human condition. So, today it's a great pleasure for me to honor some champions of progress, some American heroes of technology and science.

One of the advantages of being my age -- and believe me my birthday cake is beginning to look more like a celestial phenomenon every year -- [laughter] -- is that it provides a perspective that can't help but lead one to be optimistic about the future of our country and the direction of the human race. I've already lived some 23 years longer than was projected when I was born. That's a source of consternation in certain circles. [Laughter] But I'm still here, as are other people, because during the intervening years, men and women of science have made enormous strides combating diseases, bolstering health, lengthening the lifespan, and improving the quality of living.

I remember when I was in high school we were still being taught about the predictions of a 19th century economist named Malthus who calculated that by now mankind would be suffering catastrophic shortages of food and the necessities of life. Over the last 200 years there've been a number of experts like him who've made their reputation, earned a living, forecasting planetary gloom and doom. Well, the people we honor today are among those who make their living seeing to it that those dire predictions will never come true. You see, what the pessimists rarely take into account is the potential of human intelligence and ingenuity to overcome problems. The most vital factor in maintaining man's environment and ensuring that the needs of the Earth's population are taken care of is human freedom. It's freedom that energizes the creative spirit of mankind to meet the immense challenges of our modern age. If you believe in freedom and see what the people have accomplished in just one lifetime you can't help but be optimistic.

Our Founding Fathers were just such people, and as Jefferson wrote: ``I like the dreams of the future better than the history of the past.'' Benjamin Franklin once wrote: ``I have sometimes almost wished it had been my destiny to be born two or three centuries hence. For invention and improvement are prolific and beget more of their kind. The present progress is rapid. Many of great importance, now unthought of, will before that period be produced; and then I might not only enjoy their advantages but have my curiosity gratified in knowing what they are to be.'' Well, after reading of the accomplishments of those we honor today, I couldn't help but feel like Franklin and wish that I were going to be around to see where we're headed -- let us say 100 years from now.

The recipients of this year's National Medals of Science and Technology, I'm certain, have had to overcome a variety of obstacles. Yet with diligence and dedication, they persevered. They put their genius to work, and the results are phenomenal. This year's recipients include individuals who have made contributions in agricultural biochemistry, magnetic resonance imaging, advanced mathematics, causes and treatments of diseases, geotechnical engineering, semiconductors, communications satellites, and much, much more. These individuals have been on the front lines of the battle for national competitiveness and productivity. They and their colleagues are keeping America in pace and, in many cases, out front. These are the dreamers, the builders, the men and women who are the heroes of the modern age.

Our country's greatest asset is not our vast expanse of land and not our abundant resources or our temperate climate. Instead, what will serve America most in the years ahead, our most precious possession, is the genius of our people. It will be the inventions, the ideas, the innovations developed by our fellow Americans, like those we honor today, that will not only keep us competitive but enable us to beat the competition. That's one of the reasons we've taken care to pay them the tribute that they deserve.

The Supplementary Treaty adds to and amends the Treaty Between the United States and the Federal Republic of Germany Concerning Extradition, signed at Bonn on June 20, 1978. It represents an important step in improving law enforcement cooperation and combatting terrorism by excluding from the scope of the political offense exception serious offenses typically committed by terrorists, e.g., murder, manslaughter, kidnapping, use of a destructive device capable of endangering life or causing grievous bodily harm, and attempt or conspiracy to commit the foregoing offenses.

Several U.S. fishing industry interests have urged prompt consideration of this Agreement. Because of the importance of our fishing relationship with Korea, I urge that the Congress give favorable consideration to this Agreement at an early date.

Since 60 calendar days of continuous session, as required by the legislation, may not be available before the current Agreement is scheduled to expire, I recommend that the Congress consider passage of a joint resolution to bring into force the Agreement of May 13, 1987.

More and more Americans are discovering a uniquely American food delicacy -- farm-raised catfish. In 1986, catfish comprised the third highest volume of finned fish consumed in the United States. Ninety-nine percent of all these catfish were farm-raised. Between 1975 and 1985, production of farm-raised catfish increased by 1200 percent. Most observers expect that production will continue to increase in 1987. Production costs of catfish farming, which have averaged only 65 cents per pound over the past 8 years, have resulted in a stable income for growers and an economical food product for consumers. The accompanying growth of the catfish processing industry also has created thousands of permanent jobs.

Farm-raised catfish have come a long way from their bottom-feeding ancestors. The catfish that are available today, fresh or frozen in markets nationwide, are products of state-of-the-art methods of aquaculture. They thrive in clean freshwater ponds on many American farms, where they are surface-fed soybean meal, corn, fish meal, vitamins, and minerals. Farm-raised catfish not only furnish American consumers with a tasty delicacy but also provide a nutritious, low-calorie source of protein that is also low in cholesterol.

Given the level of objectionable interference to U.S. stations from various countries in the Region (particularly Cuba), the United States, at the time of signature, submitted a statement (No. 14) on this subject for inclusion in a Final Protocol to the Agreement. The statement, with reasons, is given in the report of the Department of State.

I believe that the United States should become a party to this Agreement, which has the potential to improve the utilization of medium frequency broadcasting services in the Western Hemisphere, and it is my hope that the Senate will take early action on this matter and give its advice and consent to ratification of the Agreement, with annexes, and a Final Protocol (containing a statement of reservation made by the United States).

I have been advised today that, after 16 years on the Supreme Court bench, Justice Lewis F. Powell, Jr., has announced his retirement. Throughout his career, Justice Powell has won a reputation for intellectual balance and fair-mindedness. He is known for his courtliness and courtesy and is truly a Justice's Justice.

These past 16 years have been among the most momentous in the Court's history. Justice Powell's personal role in the Court's decisions on a wide range of issues has led one commentator to say that he ``has had as powerful an influence as anyone alive'' in interpreting the law of the land. I speak for all Americans in saying that his has been a wise and generous influence and one that will be greatly missed.

The President's responsibility under article II, section 2 of the Constitution to nominate Justices of the Supreme Court is one of the most significant duties of my office. I believe that the Court should enter the next term at full strength, and so I will soon be submitting to the Senate my nomination for Justice Powell's successor.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Armand Hammer to be a member of the President's Cancer Panel for a term expiring February 20, 1990. This is a reappointment. Upon appointment, he will be designated Chairman for a term of 1 year.

Nancy and I are saddened to learn of the passing of Dr. Arthur F. Burns. Dr. Burns was among the most brilliant economists of his generation. He had an enduring belief in the strength of individual enterprise and the wisdom of a free people.

For 35 years Arthur Burns helped guide the economic policies of our country. As Chairman of the Federal Reserve Board in the 1970's, he contributed to the shaping of American monetary policy during a difficult and critical period. As Chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers during President Eisenhower's first term, he helped return stability and growth to the American economy of the early fifties. During the first 4\1/2\ years of my administration, Dr. Burns served with great distinction as Ambassador to the Federal Republic of Germany. There he proved a wise and skillful diplomat as well as a trusted adviser. He was also a friend to the West German people and their leaders.

America has lost one of its most dedicated and able public servants, a man of great gifts who gave those gifts freely to the Nation he loved. Nancy and I send our sympathies to his wife, Helen, and to their entire family, who are in our prayers.

A quarter-century ago, in Colorado, Outward Bound began to provide rigorous outdoor recreational programs to young people to improve their self-confidence, sense of social responsibility, physical fitness, and outdoor skills. Since then, across our land, more than 150,000 people of all backgrounds, ages, and abilities have tackled the challenges offered by Outward Bound, and many similar experience-based programs have come into being.

Every American can rightly celebrate the anniversary of this remarkable nonprofit organization, because it fosters love for the wilderness and strengthens our Nation by stressing the perseverance, teamwork, leadership, and goal-setting we all need to overcome obstacles and adversity and to discover our potential for achievement.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-sixth day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

With all the sideshows and hoopla in Washington these days, you may sometimes wonder if anyone's paying attention to what really matters. Keeping inflation, unemployment, and your taxes down and growth up, and getting control of our Federal deficit so the economy will stay healthy -- these are among Washington's most important jobs.

In the last few weeks there's been good news and bad news out of Washington about our nation's economic future. The good news is that our economy is strong and getting stronger. Just a week ago we learned that in the first 3 months of this year, our economy had its best quarter in almost 3 years. We're now in the 55th month of what will soon be the longest peacetime economic expansion in history. And the improvement in the trade deficit, which we've been talking about for several months, is now being certified on the front pages of many of our nation's newspapers. As things look today, the good times will keep rolling for as far as the eye can see.

Because of this growth, we continue to create jobs at a breakneck pace -- an average of about 245,000 a month, more jobs in the last 4 years than Europe and Japan combined. More people are at work today than ever before. Family income is growing, poverty is falling, and the middle class is strong. Not only that, but the inflation report we got this week is also good. As one analyst said, ``The numbers indicate that no spurt of inflation is likely.'' That's the good news.

The bad news is that there are some here in Washington who are on a course that could undo all the work that made that good news possible. When we came into office 6\1/2\ years ago, we had a four-part plan to lower taxes, reduce regulations, stabilize monetary growth, and balance the budget. We put three of those four parts into action and lowered the growth of government spending to boot. The result has been four of the best years in our history. Balancing the budget by reducing government spending is the one piece left to put into place if we're to keep our prosperity going strong in the years to come.

For years, we've piled deficit on top of deficit, mortgaging our future and that of future generations. To continue on this path is to court disaster. Yes, we can go ahead and keep borrowing. We can spend beyond our means. But one day the bills will come due. And even before they arrive, we'll be living with a government whose uncontrolled spending robs families and enterprising men and women of the savings and incentive to build for themselves, for our nation, and for the future. That's our choice: Close the deficit and lock economic expansion in place for the years ahead, or return to the days of inflation and stagnation. We must answer the call to action now if we are to preserve and protect our economic expansion. The answer is clear: Get on and stay on the road of declining deficits.

When we look to Capitol Hill, however, the picture on the screen is all too familiar. It's an old rerun called ``Business as Usual.'' Congress drifts through the process of drawing up a budget, missing its own deadlines, even failing to pass individual spending bills. In the last 11 years, Congress hasn't once enacted all 13 of the Government's spending bills by the beginning of the fiscal year, although the law requires it. It's been 10 years since they've passed every one of those bills by the end of the fiscal year. Last year, Congress proved beyond all questioning that, with the current process, it can't manage fiscal affairs. Even under the discipline of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, it failed to pass a single one of the regular 13 appropriation bills. Instead, Congress sent me a catchall, desperation move called a continuing resolution that jammed all appropriations into one bad piece of last-minute legislation and dangerously underfunded defense and foreign affairs. It favored domestic spending, especially pork-barrel projects ranging from subsidies for luxury apartments to roads that literally go nowhere. I had an all-or-nothing choice: Take it or close the Government down.

Now, the first few of this year's regular 13 appropriation bills are heading my way. Two passed the House this week. And if all Congress' spending measures turn out like these, this year's 13 appropriations bills won't be a baker's dozen; they'll be a dirty dozen. What's in this one? More pork; more shortchanging of defense. They even managed to throw in dangerous protectionist measures. I need your help if we're to make Congress face the fact that its budget process is broken and needs fixing. At stake is reliability in government spending and the economic future of our nation.

But we've been together for a long time and fighting for the same cause for a long time. Far back as we go, the cause that unites us goes back much further. It's a simple thing, really -- as old as the ages and as new as the hope in each morning's dawn. Call it the ideals of the Declaration of Independence, call it the principles of the Constitution, or call it the wisdom of the founders or of the prophets or the philosophers and the saints. Our stand is today what it's always been -- for the enduring cause of the human spirit against all who would stifle or oppress it. Our stand is for freedom.

Archimedes said: Show me the spot to stand, and I will move the world. And with our stand for freedom, we have moved the world. Today big government is in retreat all over the world. We said lower taxes, fewer regulations, and more enterprise were the way to prosperity. And today America is in its 55th month of economic expansion, an expansion that's just a few months away from being the longest in our peacetime history. Yes, we said that the surest road to prosperity was to let the American people tune up the carburetor, fill up the tank, and step on the gas of the greatest energy for -- or the greatest engine, I should say, for beating poverty and building prosperity the world has ever known -- the American free enterprise system.

We said that in relations between the superpowers, it was time for realism: Nations don't distrust each other because they're armed; they're armed because they distrust each other. And we said that this realism was the first step, not toward controlling the growth of the number of arms, but of bringing about what all mankind prays for -- real and verifiable reductions in the number of nuclear weapons. And we said that the tide of history was not the tide of oppression. The tide of history is a freedom tide. In the last 6 years, not 1 square inch of ground has been lost to communism, and a small nation -- Grenada -- has been liberated.

This is what our crusade has meant to America and the world. But let's be clear about one thing. All those who talk about lameducks and the post-Reagan era are dead wrong. I can't help noticing that they're the same gurus whose mantra for the last 6 years has been, ``This too shall pass.'' [Laughter] There will be no post-Reagan era, because there's been no Reagan era in the way those people mean it. This has been the era of the American people. Leaders may come and go. When it comes to the American people, their truth keeps marching on. The challenge for us today is to use the next year and a half to secure the progress that we've made so far, to ensure that America's legacy to the 21st century is one of prosperity, strength, peace, and freedom. We can prepare America for entering the decade and the century ahead.

And the first job before us is right here at home. It's just this simple: Some in Congress want to cut defense spending, raise taxes, and go back to the days of big government, and I won't let them. We've fought long and hard to bring down the American people's tax rates. We worked for over 2 years to reform our antiquated tax system and to bring down the taxes families pay. I can't help but remember that just recently at the economic summit I whispered, while we were sitting around the table, to one of my colleagues there, the head of one of our allied trading partners, about what was the lowest tax rate in their income tax. It was only 1 percentage point less than our highest rate is going to be as of next year when our reform is fully implemented -- 27 percent, they start at; we finish at 28. So, well, I know you've heard me say this before, but it bears repeating. I will veto any tax bill that reaches my desk.

Last week Congress passed a budget resolution that would repeal much of the progress we've made in the last 6 years. The Republican Senate Staff Committee on the Budget estimates that this resolution nearly doubles the rate of growth in total spending over this year. The resolution calls for new taxes, more than $19 billion next year alone. And on defense, the House Armed Services Committee wants the Defense Department to put off paying its bills for the last 12 days of the year, which pushes $6 billion into 1989. It might make 1988 look a little better for 12 days, but to get a full defense appropriation, also under their bill, I have to agree to raise taxes -- that even this so-called full appropriation is a cut in defense spending after inflation. Well, I have just three words to describe appropriation bills that come to the White House reflecting that budget resolution, three words: dead on arrival. The business I used to be in taught you to, if you hear a good line, repeat it. [Laughter] And I heard that line up on the Hill, but it was in a different context.

In the months ahead, I'll be talking about how we can lock in and expand on the gains we've made in the last 6 years. I'll be talking about an economic bill of rights, including a line-item veto and a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution. You know, the polls indicate that more than 80 percent of the people in this country want that balanced budget amendment. The first Bill of Rights took 2\1/2\ years to pass. So, this will be a long road, but we owe it to our children to be sure that, by the end of the decade, they have an economic bill of rights.

No, this isn't the time to move backward; it's the time to move forward. Our strong national defense has brought us close to an arms reduction agreement with the Soviets. And make no mistake about it, I think that's the principal thing that brought them to the table to, for the first time in their history, actually themselves suggest reducing the number of weapons they already had. Before the end of this year, we could have an agreement to reduce intermediate nuclear weapons, and as I say, this will be the first true arms reduction agreement ever. When we first talked about reducing arms rather than controlling their growth, we were told that we were naive, we couldn't be serious. Well, now an agreement is in sight, and that is because we've been strong. And this is not the time to backtrack.

And there's someplace else we shouldn't backtrack. Democracy is on the march throughout the hemisphere. Ten years ago, only a third of the people in Latin America and the Caribbean lived in democratic countries or countries moving towards democracy; today 90 percent do. In Central America, only Nicaragua stands against the democratic tide. Nothing has been said in the last 6 months that changes one basic truth: For our nation and for the cause of freedom and democracy around the world, America must stand by the freedom fighters in Nicaragua.

Our crusade has come so far. Yet in the months ahead, we still have far to go. We must hold the White House in 1988. And let me just say, I don't plan to sit on the sidelines. I plan to campaign for our party's nominee next time around. And I also plan to work for our senatorial, gubernatorial, and congressional candidates. And I hope all of us here will be working together. We should also remember how important seats in the State legislatures are to the future of the Congress. The State legislatures draw the lines for Congressional districts. In 1984 we just about tied the popular vote for the House. Think of it. Just about as many people voted for Republican candidates as Democratic candidates, but we lost the seat count, and that was because of the way the districts were drawn. In 1970, when I was still Governor of California and they drew up the redistricting there, I think the only Republican district they left us was south of the border. [Laughter] We have a duty to make sure that next time around, when the district lines are drawn, they are done in a way that will let the people's voice be heard.

So, this is my call to you today. We've come this far together, but the journey isn't over. We've won many battles and our brows are covered with sweat and our bodies have wounds, but let our hearts remain full and strong. We have more battles yet to win, and standing shoulder to shoulder, we'll win them. And in that context, I have to ask you for something to do. I know how hard you're going to continue working, as you always have. But back in 1966, we gave birth to something in California that turned out to be so successful in the whole history of our party politics -- the 11th commandment: ``Thou shalt not speak ill of another Republican.'' And we observed it. And I think in California that year it was observed because the Federated Republican Women's Club passed a resolution in advance that they would support no candidate who had violated in the primaries the 11th commandment. And we all did observe it as candidates. I was a candidate, myself.

And somehow, over the past years, we've begun to forget about that. And now we've got a number of candidates out there contesting with each other. It is up to all of us and other groups and organizations around to start doing what the Federated Women did and make sure that all of our candidates, even our own very favorite candidate, whoever he may be, must not violate that commandment. We must be ready so that when the election is over, without any blushing or hesitation, we can all come together in support of whoever was the nominee.

This Fourth of July, as in years past, Americans celebrate the Declaration of Independence and our Nation's 211th birthday with parades down Main Street, ceremonies at town halls, worship at churches and synagogues, and patriotic moments at picnics and fireworks shows and baseball games. Americans overseas pause in thoughts of home and what our country means to them. All of us remember with wonder and gratitude that we celebrate a profound conception of freedom, one our countrymen have asserted and defended over and over.

That conception of freedom is expressed with eloquence and wisdom in the Declaration of Independence and in the Constitution whose bicentennial we observe this year. The Declaration affirms our belief that government exists to secure our God-given rights to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness. The Constitution provides for a system of limited government which secures these blessings of liberty, ensuring that We the People remain truly in charge.

On this Independence Day, let us recall our Founders' pledge to make any sacrifice as they fought for liberty and freedom. Let us remember that millions of Americans have struggled to pass on to us the precious gift of Independence -- that it is from them that the light of this great national anniversary is truly drawn, and that it is in their name today that we pledge ourselves anew to keep that light burning proud and strong.

I'll have a brief statement on behalf of the President, and Secretary Shultz and Secretary Weinberger will follow me to take questions. Secretary Shultz has to leave very soon to attend a funeral, so we will proceed rapidly.

The President just finished meeting with the bipartisan leadership of the Congress on our policy in the Persian Gulf. It was agreed that the United States has vital interests in the Gulf, that we cannot permit a hostile power to establish a dominant position there, that we must remain a reliable security partner for our friends in that region, and that continued close consultation between the administration and the Congress is essential.

The U.S. strategy for protecting our interests in the Gulf must continue to focus on the urgent need to bring the Iran-Iraq war, now in its seventh bloody year, to the earliest possible negotiated end, leaving no victor and no vanquished. In the weeks ahead, the administration will be pursuing diplomatic efforts to reduce tensions in the Gulf and help end the Iran-Iraq war. As the President emphasized yesterday in letters to all members of the U.N. Security Council, the United States urges that the Security Council meet before the middle of July to pass a strong, comprehensive resolution calling for an immediate cease-fire and withdrawal to borders, exchange of prisoners, establishment of an impartial body to determine responsibility for the conflict, and an international postwar reconstruction effort. The President directed Secretary of State Shultz to personally represent him at that meeting, as well as to manage our overall diplomatic effort. United Nations Secretary-General Perez de Cuellar supports this effort.

In the meantime, the United States will be consulting at the United Nations on a second resolution that would place effective sanctions to bear against any party which refuses to comply with the cease-fire withdrawal resolution. The President is sending Ambassador Walters to several capitals for consultations on Security Council action. As we pursue this major diplomatic initiative, we will continue efforts to bolster the security of our friends in the Gulf.

We are moving forward with preparations for registration under U.S. flag of 11 Kuwaiti-owned tankers, as well as with careful security arrangements to protect them. We expect those arrangements to be in place by mid-July, at which time we plan to proceed. When we begin this operation, those tankers will be full-fledged U.S.-flagged vessels, entitled to the protection the U.S. Navy has historically accorded to U.S.-flagged vessels around the world. We will also continue to work closely with our friends and allies and with the Congress on meeting and reducing the security threat in the Gulf.

The administration's overriding goals in the Persian Gulf today are to help our moderate Arab friends defend themselves, to improve the chances for peace by helping demonstrate that Iran's policy of intimidation will not work, to bring about a just settlement of the Iran-Iraq war that will preserve the sovereignty and territorial integrity of both parties, to curtail the expansion of Soviet presence and influence in this strategic area, and to deter an interruption of the flow of oil. The administration will continue to pursue these aims with forceful and energetic diplomacy in the weeks ahead.

Well, thankfully, that kind of thinking is about as alien as you can get, not only to the people gathered here today but to the American character in general. Perhaps the most striking thing about Americans is their generosity of spirit. The famous chronicler of early 19th-century America, the Frenchman de Tocqueville, remarked upon this quality. He went back after visiting America, and he said: These Americans are the most peculiar people in the world; no sooner do they recognize a need that isn't being met than they round up their neighbors, form a committee, and start addressing that need.

Well, it's a remarkable fact -- one I've often said that philosophers should contemplate -- that the freest nation on Earth is also the most altruistic, its people among the most generous anywhere. You know, when you've been around for as long as I have and have lived through most of the 20th century, there's not a whole lot that surprises you. Some time ago, however, I saw something that really touched my temperature control. It was one of those TV commentators going on and on, scolding the American people, saying we'd become selfish, we were only out for ourselves, had lost our dedication to community and country. Well, I don't know what crowd he's hanging around with, but they sure aren't representative of the American people.

A recent poll by George Gallup found voluntarism in this country has reached a 10-year high and is on a steady upswing. And the report found that ``despite the high mobility of families in the United States, the increase in women in the work force and charges that Americans are increasingly preoccupied with their material well-being, voluntarism continues to grow in this nation.'' Last year it set another new record, as it does just about every year. Private giving to worthy causes in this country was somewhere in the neighborhood of $87 billion last year. It's interesting to note the Gallup Polls have also found that voluntarism to be a particularly American trait, with charitable activity here far outstripping other countries. So, all I can say about those who pontificate about the new selfishness in this country -- maybe they should get out of their TV studios and introduce themselves to the real America.

Of course, what a lot of these people mean is not that the American people should give more, but that the Government should take more. Somehow freely given, personal charity doesn't count for them; only the public dole, bureaucratic largess that is backed up by coercive powers of the state. Well, government, of course, has its place, but we've seen in the last two decades that the impersonal giving of government can often do more harm than good, creating a welfare trap from which the poor and under privileged can rarely escape.

The fact is, it's probably more important to give well and wisely than to simply give. And that kind of intelligent giving, thoughtful charity, and volunteer spirit is what you, the recipients of this year's Volunteer Action Awards, so perfectly exemplify. I wish I had time to mention each and every one of the individuals and organizations that are here by name. But let's just say that the good you do reaches beyond your specific projects and all the many people that you've helped. You're part of an American tradition of neighbor helping neighbor; you're keeping it alive and making it grow. Your work touches all of our hearts, embraces all Americans, and draws them into one community of caring. As that same Alexis de Tocqueville said: ``These Americans, so generous and always ready to volunteer, are a peculiar people.'' And we can be awfully proud of that fact.

As you know, this great American spirit has caught the attention of people around the world. In fact, last November the first International Conference on Private Sector Initiatives took place in Paris, France, where leaders of six other countries got together to hear about our success in America. And earlier this month, while I was at the economic summit in Italy -- they must have had a terrible spring there, because when we went over in the helicopter, I looked down -- all the streets were flooded. [Laughter] I attended there in Venice an Italian-American Conference on Private Sector Initiatives. And as a result of that conference, Italian leaders have formed their own national task force to try to establish programs in their countries like the ones that you've organized here. And it was wonderful. I went to that meeting -- I was asked if I would come and address this group a little bit -- and I looked out, and I was seeing old familiar faces there, the Americans who had come from here over there to help them as they got this task force established. Incidentally, one of their first projects was there in Venice. They built an American-Italian park, and that's what it's called -- the American-Italian Park.

So remember, when you return to your hometowns and you tell your coworkers about this trip, let them know what they're doing is not just making their town a better place but our nation and the world as a whole.

Because of progress by Brazil in its computer-related trade policies, the President has decided to suspend one of two remaining parts of the unfair trade practice case concerning these informatics policies and to continue discussions on the other part.

In the first part of the case, which was brought under section 301 of the Trade Act of 1974, the President has determined that sufficient progress has been made in that portion of the case dealing with copyright protection for computer software. Last week the Brazilian Chamber of Deputies passed legislation that adequately addresses U.S. concerns about software copyright protection. The President believes this represents a good-faith effort by Brazil to solve this part of the case. The President is therefore suspending the software part of the case for now and monitoring it until the copyright bill is enacted into law.

The other remaining unresolved issue in the section 301 case concerned the ability of foreign computer companies to invest in Brazil. The President has determined that the United States will continue discussions with Brazil in order to achieve improvements in Brazilian investment policies.

In addition, the United States will continue to monitor those parts of the case that were suspended by President Reagan on December 30, 1986. These involve the administrative procedures involved in the informatics law and the scope of the market reserve. The President believes that although U.S. concerns have not been completely satisfied in any single area of the section 301 case, Brazil has made significant improvements since this case was first initiated in September 1985. As a result, the President has determined not to take any remedial action at this time. However, the United States reserves the right to reopen any part of this case if progress does not continue or if any actions are taken that would further impede trade in computer-related products.

At my direction, the Trade Representative initiated this investigation in September 1985. Based upon favorable developments regarding Brazil's administrative procedures and ``market reserve'' practices, I suspended those parts of this investigation on December 30, 1986. I indicated that those parts of the Section 301 investigation could be terminated if the improvements on which the suspension was based were properly implemented and had the expected effect of reducing the burdens or restrictions on U.S. commerce. The Trade Representative will continue to monitor developments in this area, with a view to terminating or reopening these parts of the investigation as appropriate based on developments.

Last December I directed the Trade Representative to continue negotiations with the Government of Brazil to address our concerns regarding Brazilian restrictions on U.S. investment in the informatics sector and the lack of adequate and effective protection for intellectual property, including computer software. Recently the Government of Brazil's lower house passed legislation that, we believe, would provide adequate copyright protection to computer software. Although enactment of this legislation still requires favorable action by the upper house, progress to date and the likely enactment of legislation adequately protecting computer software from piracy warrants suspension of the intellectual property portion of this investigation. The Trade Representative will continue to monitor developments in this area as well, with a view to terminating or reopening this part of the investigation as appropriate based on developments.

Regarding the Government of Brazil's restrictions on U.S. investment in the informatics sector, we have been asked to judge its performance in this area based upon a favorable ``track record'' in approving U.S. investment proposals. I am directing the Trade Representative to pursue this part of the Section 301 investigation as appropriate.

The General Secretary. Esteemed Mr. President, esteemed Mrs. Reagan, distinguished ladies and gentlemen, comrades, we are approaching the end of the meeting between the leaders of the Soviet Union and the United States of America, the fourth such meeting in 3 years. The visit of the United States President to our country is drawing to a close.

President and I have summed up the results of a dialog between our two countries at the highest level. We have discussed both the immediate and longer term prospects for Soviet-U.S. relations. We have signed documents which record what has been achieved and provide guidelines for the future. Among them, an historic place will belong to the ratification documents which give effect to the treaty on intermediate and shorter range missiles. The exchange a few minutes ago of the instruments of ratification means that the era of nuclear disarmament has begun.

Assessing the work done over these past few days, we can say our satisfaction, say that what has been happening these days in Moscow is big politics, politics that affect the interests of millions and millions of people. Each such meeting dealt a blow at the foundations of the cold war. Each of them made huge breaches in the cold war fortress and opened up passages to modern, civilized world politics worthy of the truly new times.

Weighing carefully each one of our new steps, we measure it against the security interests of our two nations and of the world as a whole, for that is the only way to achieve truly substantial results with the necessary margin of viability. Big politics also means big responsibility, and so it cannot be built on pursuing only one's own interest, which is always inherently one-sided. Such politics also needs a great idea. Humankind has conceived that idea in the pangs of wars and disasters, tragedies and calamities, strivings and discoveries of the 20th century. This, in our view, is the idea of a nuclear-free and nonviolent world. It is that idea that is inscribed in the mandate which the Soviet people give to their representatives at the start of any negotiations. This particularly applies to our negotiations with the United States of America.

Addressing the Soviet people and the Americans, addressing all nations from these hallowed steps of the Moscow Kremlin, I hereby declare we have been working honestly and with perseverance, and we shall continue to do so to fulfill that historic mandate.

The first lines have already been written into the book of a world without wars, violence, or nuclear weapons. I believe that no one can now close that book and put it aside. President Ronald Reagan and I have agreed that the immediate task before us, which is to conclude a treaty on a 50-percent reduction in strategic offensive arms, can and must be accomplished. In our joint endeavors and discussions, we have learned to understand each other better, to take into account each other's concerns, and to search for solutions. The atmosphere in our relations is improving. We're working to make it a constant not only in our official contacts but also in the day-to-day management of Soviet-U.S. relations. In this, too, we are guided by a mandate from our peoples.

Thanks to the atmosphere of the meetings in Washington and in Moscow, and as a result of the agreements reached, Americans and Soviet people now have more opportunities for communication and for getting to know each other. I'm convinced that scientists, students, schoolchildren, cultural personalities, ordinary tourists, athletes, and of course businessmen will continue to enlarge and add new colors to the fabric of cooperative and even friendly relations. Sometimes, they can do that better than politicians.

Historians who will one day describe and evaluate what is now being done have probably not yet been born. But every day, babies are being born who will live in the 21st century and to whom we must bequeath a safe and humane world. On behalf of the Soviet leadership and the Soviet people, I wish to tell all those who are concerned, and yet hopeful about the future, we shall work to achieve that goal, and we can only do it by working together. Thank you.

The President. Mr. General Secretary, these are historic moments. As we exchange these documents, the instruments of ratification, this treaty, the terms of which we formally agreed to last December in Washington, enters into force.

General Secretary, you know that our way here has not been easy. At crucial moments your personal intervention was needed and proved decisive, and for this we are grateful. So, too, Mr. General Secretary, you are aware of how important the objective not just of arms control but of arms reduction has been to my own thinking and to the policy of my administration since its outset. Seven years ago, when I first suggested the concept of a double-zero treaty, there were those who said that this was so unrealistic an idea that it was irresponsible to even propose it. Others simply dismissed the concept as a propaganda ploy or a geopolitical gambit. But skepticism and doubt bring a barren harvest. And today, on this table before us, we see the fruits of hope, evidence of what candor and realism can accomplish. We have dared to hope, Mr. General Secretary, and we have been rewarded.

For the first time in history, an entire class of U.S.-Soviet nuclear missiles is eliminated. In addition, this treaty provides for the most stringent verification in history. And for the first time, inspection teams are actually in residence in our respective countries. And while this treaty makes possible a new dimension of cooperation between us, much remains on our agenda. We must not stop here, Mr. General Secretary; there is much more to be done. As will be seen in our joint statement later today, more progress has been made toward a strategic arms treaty during our meetings. We must try to move forward in the months ahead to complete this START treaty as soon as possible. So, let us continue to expand the frontiers of trust, even as we verify, Mr. General Secretary -- even as we verify.

General Secretary, we've agreed many times that there remain differences, important fundamental differences, between us. Yet as we work over the long run to narrow these differences, as we work for what I hope will be a new era of peace and expanded human freedom, we must also acknowledge our solemn responsibility to take steps now to reduce the chances of conflict and to prevent war. This we have done today, a first step toward a brighter future, a safer world. America's allies and friends welcome this treaty, too. We consulted them fully during its negotiation. We made clear that we would never put their security or their interests at risk, that on the contrary we would sign a treaty only if it enhanced their security, as this one does.

And finally, if I may, I would like to take a moment to thank the United States Senate for their work on this treaty. The way of democracy is sometimes a complicated way and sometimes trying, but it is a good way, and we believe the best way.

President and the General Secretary view the Moscow summit as an important step in the process of putting U.S.-Soviet relations on a more productive and sustainable basis. Their comprehensive and detailed discussions covered the full agenda of issues to which the two leaders agreed during their initial meeting in Geneva in November, 1985 -- an agenda encompassing arms control, human rights and humanitarian matters, settlement of regional conflicts, and bilateral relations. Serious differences remain on important issues; the frank dialogue which has developed between the two countries remains critical to surmounting these differences.

The talks took place in a constructive atmosphere which provided ample opportunity for candid exchange. As a result, the sides achieved a better understanding of each other's positions. The two leaders welcomed the progress achieved in various areas of U.S.-Soviet relations since their last meeting in Washington, notwithstanding the difficulty and complexity of the issues. They noted with satisfaction numerous concrete agreements which have been achieved, and expressed their determination to redouble efforts in the months ahead in areas where work remains to be done.

Assessing the state of U.S.-Soviet relations, the President and the General Secretary underscored the historic importance of their meetings in Geneva, Reykjavik, Washington, and Moscow in laying the foundation for a realistic approach to the problems of strengthening stability and reducing the risk of conflict. They reaffirmed their solemn conviction that a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought, their determination to prevent any war between the United States and Soviet Union, whether nuclear or conventional, and their disavowal of any intention to achieve military superiority.

The two leaders are convinced that the expanding political dialogue they have established represents an increasingly effective means of resolving issues of mutual interest and concern. They do not minimize the real differences of history, tradition and ideology which will continue to characterize the US-Soviet relationship. But they believe that the dialogue will endure, because it is based on realism and focused on the achievement of concrete results. It can serve as a constructive basis for addressing not only the problems of the present, but of tomorrow and the next century. It is a process which the President and the General Secretary believe serves the best interests of the peoples of the United States and the Soviet Union, and can contribute to a more stable, more peaceful and safer world.

President and the General Secretary, having expressed the commitment of their two countries to build on progress to date in arms control, determined objectives and next steps on a wide range of issues in this area. These will guide the efforts of the two governments in the months ahead as they work with each other and with other states toward equitable, verifiable agreements that strengthen international stability and security.

President and the General Secretary signed the protocol on the exchange of instruments of ratification of the Treaty between the United States of America and the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics on the Elimination of Their Intermediate-Range and Shorter-Range Missiles. The two leaders welcomed the entry into force of this historic agreement, which for the first time will eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear arms, and which sets new standards for arms control. The leaders are determined to achieve the full implementation of all the provisions and understandings of the Treaty, viewing joint and successful work in this respect as an important precedent for future arms control efforts.

The two leaders noted that a Joint Draft Text of a Treaty on Reduction and Limitation of Strategic Offensive Arms has been elaborated. Through this process, the sides have been able to record in the Joint Draft Text extensive and significant areas of agreement and also to detail positions on remaining areas of disagreement. While important additional work is required before this Treaty is ready for signature, many key provisions are recorded in the Joint Draft Text and are considered to be agreed, subject to the completion and ratification of the Treaty.

In connection with their obligations under the Protocol, the sides have agreed in particular to use the Nuclear Risk Reduction Centers for transmission of relevant information. The leaders directed their negotiators to prepare the Joint Draft Text of a separate agreement and to continue work on its associated Protocol.

The draft Treaty also records the sides' agreement that as a result of the reductions the aggregate throw-weight of the Soviet Union's ICBMs and SLBMs will be reduced to a level approximately 50 percent below the existing level and this level will not be exceeded.

During the negotiations the two sides have also achieved understanding that in future work on the Treaty they will act on the understanding that on deployed ICBMs and SLBMs of existing types the counting rule will include the number of warheads referred to in the Joint Statement of December 10, 1987, and the number of warheads which will be attributed to each new type of ballistic missile will be subject to negotiation.

In addition, the sides agreed on a counting rule for heavy bomber armaments according to which heavy bombers equipped only for nuclear gravity bombs and SRAMs will count as one delivery vehicle against the 1600 limit and one warhead against the 6000 limit.

Data exchanges, to include declarations and appropriate notifications on the number and location of weapons systems limited by START, including locations and facilities for production, final assembly, storage, testing, repair, training, deployment, conversion, and elimination of such systems. Such declarations will be exchanged between the sides before the Treaty is signed and updated periodically.

Short-notice inspection, in accordance with agreed upon procedures, of locations where either side considers covert deployment, production, storage or repair of strategic offensive arms could be occurring.

Prohibition of the use of concealment or other activities which impede verification by National Technical Means. Such provisions would include a ban on telemetry encryption and would allow for full access to all telemetric information broadcast during missile flight.

Enhanced observation of activities related to reduction and limitation of strategic offensive arms by National Technical Means. These would include open displays of treaty-limited items at missile bases, bomber bases, and submarine ports at locations and times chosen by the inspecting party.

During the course of this meeting in Moscow, the exchanges on START resulted in the achievement of substantial additional common ground, particularly in the areas of ALCMs and the attempts to develop and agree, if possible, on a solution to the problem of verification of mobile ICBMs. The details of this additional common ground have been recorded in documents exchanged between the sides. The Delegations in Geneva will record these gains in the Joint Draft Text of the START Treaty.

Reagan and M.S. Gorbachev expressed their joint confidence that the extensive work done provides the basis for concluding the Treaty on Reduction and Limitation of Strategic Offensive Arms which will promote strategic stability and strengthen security not only of the peoples of the USSR and the USA, but of all mankind.

Guided by this fundamental agreement, the U.S. President and the General Secretary of the Central Committee of the CPSU agreed to continue their efforts in this area energetically and purposefully. The Delegations of the two countries have been instructed to return to Geneva on July 12, 1988.

The agreement between the U.S. and the USSR on notifications of launches of Intercontinental Ballistic Missiles and Submarine-Launched Ballistic Missiles, signed during the Moscow summit, is a practical new step, reflecting the desire of the sides to reduce the risk of outbreak of nuclear war, in particular as a result of misinterpretation, miscalculation or accident.

The leaders reaffirmed the commitment of the two sides to conduct in a single forum full-scale, stage-by-stage negotiations on the issues relating to nuclear testing. In these negotiations the sides as the first step will agree upon effective verification measures which will make it possible to ratify the U.S.-USSR Threshold Test Ban Treaty of 1974 and Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty of 1976, and proceed to negotiating further intermediate limitations on nuclear testing leading to the ultimate objective of the complete cessation of nuclear testing as part of an effective disarmament process. This process, among other things, would pursue, as the first priority, the goal of the reduction of nuclear weapons and, ultimately, their elimination. In implementing the first objective of these negotiations, agreement upon effective verification measures for the U.S.-USSR Threshold Test Ban Treaty of 1974, the sides agreed to design and conduct a Joint Verification Experiment at each other's test sites.

The leaders therefore noted with satisfaction the signing of the Joint Verification Experiment Agreement, the considerable preparation underway for the Experiment, and the positive cooperation being exhibited in particular by the substantial numbers of personnel now engaged in work at each other's test sites. They also noted the substantial progress on a new Protocol to the Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty and urged continuing constructive negotiations on effective verification measures for the Threshold Test Ban Treaty.

Expressing their conviction that the progress achieved so far forms a solid basis for continuing progress on issues relating to nuclear testing, the leaders instructed their negotiators to complete expeditiously the preparation of a Protocol to the Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty and to complete the preparation of a Protocol to the Threshold Test Ban Treaty as soon as possible after the Joint Verification Experiment has been conducted and analyzed. They confirmed their understanding that verification measures for the TTBT will, to the extent appropriate, be used in further nuclear test limitation agreements which may subsequently be reached. They also declared their mutual intention to seek ratification of both the 1974 and 1976 Treaties when the corresponding protocols to the Threshold Test Ban Treaty and the Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty are completed, and to continue negotiations as agreed in the Washington joint summit statement.

The two leaders noted that this year marks the 20th Anniversary of the Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty, one of the most important international arms control agreements with over 130 adherents. They reaffirmed their conviction that universal adherence to the NPT is important to international peace and security. They expressed the hope that each state not a party to the Treaty will join it, or make an equally binding commitment under international law to forego acquisition of nuclear weapons and prevent nuclear weapons proliferation. This will enhance the possibility of progress toward reducing nuclear armaments and reduce the threat of nuclear war.

The leaders reviewed the status of on-going multilateral negotiations and bilateral U.S.-Soviet consultations toward a comprehensive, effectively verifiable, and truly global ban on chemical weapons, encompassing all chemical weapons-capable states. They also expressed concern over the growing problem of chemical weapons proliferation and use.

The leaders reaffirmed the importance of efforts to address, as a matter of continuing urgency, the unique challenges of a chemical weapons ban and to achieve an effective convention. While noting the progress already achieved in the talks and the difficult problems with regard to effective monitoring of the global prohibition of chemical weapons and the non-use of dual-capable chemicals for chemical weapons purposes, the leaders underlined the need for concrete solutions to the problems of ensuring effective verification and undiminished security for all convention participants. They gave instructions to their respective delegations to this effect.

Both sides strongly condemned the dangerous spread and illegal use of chemical weapons in violation of the 1925 Geneva Protocol. They stressed the importance of both technical and political solutions to this problem and confirmed their support for international investigations of suspected violations. Noting the initial efforts being made to control the export of chemicals used in manufacturing chemical weapons, the leaders called on all nations with the capability of producing such chemicals to institute stringent export controls to inhibit the proliferation of chemical weapons.

The leaders emphasized the importance of strengthening stability and security in the whole of Europe. They welcomed progress to date on development of a mandate for new negotiations on armed forces and conventional armaments. They expressed their hope for an early and balanced conclusion to the Vienna CSCE Follow-Up Meeting. The President and the General Secretary also noted that full implementation of the provisions of the document of the Stockholm Conference on Confidence- and Security-Building Measures and Disarmament in Europe can significantly increase openness and mutual confidence.

They expressed their commitment to further development of the CSCE process. The U.S. and USSR will continue to work with the other 33 participants to bring the Vienna CSCE follow-up meeting to a successful conclusion, through significant results in all the principal areas of the Helsinki Final Act and Madrid Concluding Document.

President and the General Secretary engaged in a detailed discussion of human rights and humanitarian concerns. The leaders reviewed the increasingly broad and detailed U.S.-Soviet dialogue in this area and agreed that it should be conducted at all levels in order to achieve sustained, concrete progress. They noted that this dialogue should seek to maximize assurance of the rights, freedoms and human dignity of individuals; promotion of people-to-people communications and contacts; active sharing of spiritual, cultural, historical and other values; and greater mutual understanding and respect between the two countries. Toward this end, they discussed the possible establishment of a forum which, meeting regularly, would bring together participants from across the range of their two societies. They noted steps already taken to establish the exchange of information and contacts between legislative bodies of both countries, as well as discussions between legal experts, physicians and representatives of other professions directly involved in matters pertaining to human rights, and between representatives of non-governmental organizations.

President and the General Secretary thoroughly discussed a wide range of regional questions, including the Middle East, the Iran-Iraq war, southern Africa, the Horn of Africa, Central America, Cambodia, the Korean Peninsula, and other issues. They expressed satisfaction with the April, 1988, conclusion in Geneva of accords on an Afghanistan settlement. Although the discussions revealed serious differences both in the assessment of the causes of regional tensions and in the means to overcome them, the leaders agreed that these differences need not be an obstacle to constructive interaction between the U.S. and USSR.

They reaffirmed their intention to continue U.S.-Soviet discussions at all levels aimed at helping parties to regional conflicts find peaceful solutions which advance their independence, freedom and security. They emphasized the importance of enhancing the capacity of the United Nations and other international institutions to contribute to the resolution of regional conflicts.

President and the General Secretary reviewed progress in further expanding bilateral contacts, exchanges and cooperation since their meeting in Washington, D.C. in December 1987. They noted the increasingly important role that mutually beneficial interchange between the two countries can play in improving mutual understanding and providing stability in the U.S.-Soviet relationship. They stated their intention to intensify such ties.

President and the General Secretary welcomed the conclusion of a number of bilateral agreements which open new opportunities for fruitful cooperation in the following fields: cooperation in transportation science and technology; maritime search and rescue; operational coordination between U.S. and Soviet radionavigation systems in the Northern Pacific and Bering Sea; and mutual fisheries relations.

They expressed satisfaction with the recent signing of a new protocol under the bilateral Housing Agreement for cooperation in construction research relating to extreme geological and unusual climatic conditions.

They reviewed the status of negotiations between the two countries concerning maritime shipping, the U.S.-USSR maritime boundary, basic scientific research, and emergency pollution clean-up in the Bering and Chukchi Seas. They instructed their negotiators to accelerate efforts to achieve mutually acceptable agreements in these areas at the earliest opportunity.

The two leaders welcomed the start of bilateral discussions on combatting narcotics trafficking. They noted with satisfaction ongoing consultations between the two sides concerning law of the sea, air and sea transportation safety, and areas of mutual interest in the field of law.

Noting the expansion of exchanges in the areas of education, science, culture and sports under the General Exchanges Agreement, the two leaders welcomed the signing of a new implementing program for 1989 - 91 under the Agreement and expressed their intention to continue expansion of such exchanges. During the time in which this program is in force, the two sides, taking into consideration their mutual interest as well as financial and technical conditions, will conduct negotiations on the opening of culture/information centers in the U.S. and the USSR with the aim of signing an appropriate agreement on behalf of the governments of both countries.

They expressed satisfaction that, over the course of their dialogue, people-to-people contacts and exchanges between non-governmental organizations have significantly increased and become one of the most dynamic elements in the bilateral relationship. They reaffirmed their commitment to further growth of such exchanges, which contribute to mutual understanding, and welcomed plans for increased exchanges of young people in the future. In this context, they expressed their readiness to consider in practical terms the idea of further developing exchanges of high school students. They cited recent joint U.S.-Soviet initiatives on culture, theater and the cinema as examples of new opportunities to engage those involved in the creative arts.

Noting the rapidly growing sports ties between the two countries, including their national Olympic committees, the two leaders expressed their support for the International Olympic movement, which promotes international cooperation and understanding through athletic competition.

President and the General Secretary noted the successful expansion of scientific cooperation within the framework of bilateral agreements in Environmental Protection, Medical Science and Public Health, Artificial Heart Research and Development, Agriculture, and Studies of the World Ocean, and expressed their intention to continue to expand activities under these Agreements in areas of mutual benefit to the two sides.

President and the General Secretary noted with pleasure the commencement of work on a conceptual design of an International Thermonuclear Experimental Reactor (ITER), under the auspices of the International Atomic Energy Agency, between scientists and experts from the United States, Soviet Union, European Atomic Energy Community, and Japan. The two leaders noted the significance of this next step toward the development of fusion power as a cheap, environmentally sound, and essentially inexhaustible energy source for the benefit of all mankind.

Both leaders reaffirmed their support for the WHO/UNICEF goal of reducing the scale of preventable childhood death through the most effective methods of saving children. They urged other countries and the international community to intensify efforts to achieve this goal.

The two leaders expressed their satisfaction with activities since the Washington summit in expanding cooperation with respect to global climate and environmental change, including in areas of mutual concern relating to environmental protection, such as protection and conservation of stratospheric ozone and a possible global warming trend. They emphasized their desire to make more active use of the unique opportunities afforded by the space programs of the two countries to conduct global monitoring of the environment and the ecology of the Earth's land, oceans and atmosphere. They underscored the need to continue to promote both bilateral and multilateral cooperation in this important area in the future.

Recognizing the long-standing commitment of both countries to space science and exploration, and noting the progress made under the 1987 U.S.-USSR Cooperative Agreement in the Exploration and Use of Outer Space for Peaceful Purposes, the two leaders agreed to a new initiative to expand civil space cooperation by exchanging flight opportunities for scientific instruments to fly on each other's spacecraft, and by exchanging results of independent national studies of future unmanned solar system exploration missions as a means of assessing prospects for further U.S.-Soviet cooperation on such missions. They also agreed to expand exchanges of space science data and of scientists, to enhance the scientific benefit that can be derived from the two countries' space research missions. They noted scientific missions to the Moon and Mars as areas of possible bilateral and international cooperation.

Taking into account the unique environmental, demographic and other characteristics of the Arctic, the two leaders reaffirmed their support for expanded bilateral and regional contacts and cooperation in this area. They noted plans and opportunities for increased scientific and environmental cooperation under a number of bilateral agreements as well as within an International Arctic Science Committee of states with interests in the region. They expressed their support for increased people-to-people contacts between the native peoples of Alaska and the Soviet North.

President and the General Secretary noted the positive role played by the multilateral Antarctic Treaty and emphasized the importance of U.S.-Soviet scientific and environmental cooperation in that region.

They reiterated their belief that commercially viable joint ventures complying with the laws and regulations of both countries could play a role in the further development of commercial relations. They welcomed the results of the meeting of the Joint U.S.-USSR Commercial Commission in April and noted with satisfaction that working groups had been created under the Commission to further the establishment of better conditions under which mutually advantageous trade can develop. Taking note of the 1974 Joint Statement and Protocol amending the Long-Term Agreement between the United States of America and the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics to Facilitate Economic, Industrial and Technical Cooperation issued at the conclusion of the Joint Commercial Commission, they agreed that the Commission should continue to meet to build upon the forward momentum which has been generated.

The two leaders cited expanding relations between Aeroflot and Pan American Airlines under the government-to-government Civil Air Transportation Agreement as a positive example of mutually beneficial cooperation.

The two leaders discussed questions relating to ensuring adequate and secure conditions for U.S. and Soviet diplomatic and consular establishments and their personnel in each other's territory. They agreed on the need to approach problems relating to such matters constructively and on the basis of reciprocity.

President and the General Secretary, recognizing the importance of their personal involvement in the development of relations in the months ahead, instructed Secretary of State Shultz and Foreign Minister Shevardnadze to meet as necessary and to report to them on ways to ensure continued practical progress across the full range of issues. Expert-level contacts will also continue on an intensified basis.

First, if just this one time I might speak for all of you as well as myself, I would like to extend my thanks to General Secretary Gorbachev, all of his associates in the Soviet Government, and the people of Moscow for all they've done to make our stay here a pleasant one and this summit conference the success it has been.

This is my fourth summit. For some in our governments and some of you in the media, the number is higher. But a good deal of important work has been accomplished here in Moscow. And the relationship between Mr. Gorbachev and me, and the various members of our respective delegations, has continued to deepen and improve. But personal relationships and hopes for peace are not by themselves enough. I think history will note that in our approach to the summit process the United States has sought a consistency of expression as well as purpose. While at every turn I've tried to state our overwhelming desire for peace, I have also tried to note the existence of fundamental differences. And that's why it's a source of great satisfaction that those differences, in part as a result of these meetings, continue to recede.

In addition, spokesmen for the Soviet Government have noted the change of policy, indeed, the profound change of policy that has occurred in their own government. The United States is fully cognizant of this change and aware of its implications. In noting the differences that still stand between us, therefore, my desire has not been to sound a note of discouragement but one of realism, not to conduct a tutorial but to give the kind of emphatic testimony to the truth that, over the long run, removes illusion and moves the process of negotiation forward.

From our standpoint, this approach has borne fruit at previous meetings and at this summit conference. And here, permit me to go back for just a moment to our first summit meeting at Geneva. There we agreed on certain fundamental realities that would govern our relations: that a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought, that the United States and the Soviet Union bear special responsibilities for avoiding the risk of war, that neither side should seek military superiority over the other. We affirmed our determination to prevent war, whether nuclear or conventional, and our resolve to contribute in every way possible, along with other nations, to a safer world.

We also set out a broad agenda and initiated a new process of dialog to address the sources of tension in U.S.-Soviet relations. Since Geneva, we have achieved, through a sustained effort, progress across this broad agenda. Our first discussions here in Moscow focused on the important matter of human rights, individual freedoms. The United States views human rights as fundamental to our relationship with the Soviet Union and all nations. From the beginning, we've stressed this point and are encouraged by recent signs of progress in the Soviet Union. I believe that where people have the right to speak, write, travel, and worship freely, creative energies are released. On several occasions I've said that nations do not distrust each other because they're armed; they are armed because they distrust each other.

For the past 3 years, General Secretary Gorbachev and I have worked to build a relationship of greater trust. And we both recognize that one way to do that is to improve understanding between our two countries through broader people-to-people contacts. A series of agreements to expand U.S.-Soviet bilateral cooperation, including cultural exchanges, have been concluded. We agreed to expand our student exchange programs, with a goal of allowing hundreds, and eventually thousands, of Soviet and American high school students to study in each other's classrooms. For our future relations, academic, cultural, and other exchanges are of greater importance.

Turning to regional issues, Mr. Gorbachev and I agree that there must be peaceful solutions to these conflicts. Our goal is to advance independence, security, and freedom. The Soviet decision to withdraw from Afghanistan is significant, and we agree that building on the Afghan settlement leads to an approach to other regional problems. Our discussions also dealt with Cambodia, Angola, Ethiopia, the Middle East and the Persian Gulf, and Central America.

Each of our summit meetings moved us farther toward an INF treaty, capped by today's exchange of ratification instruments, which now makes it a reality. Each meeting has also moved us farther toward meeting the even greater challenge of crafting a treaty to reduce our strategic nuclear arsenals. In Geneva, the General Secretary and I agreed on the concept of 50-percent reductions; and in Reykjavik, on numerical limits for warheads and delivery vehicles; in Washington, on intensive work to complete a START treaty, including comprehensive verification provisions building upon those in INF.

Here in Moscow, we've made important additional strides toward that objective. Verification is one of the most important and most difficult issues for us, and I'm pleased to report progress in this area, too. We've moved forward in other areas as well, including agreements on an experiment to improve the verification of existing nuclear testing treaties and on notification of strategic ballistic missile launches.

The monks of Danilov, the dissidents and refuseniks, the writers and artists, the students and young people have shown once again that spiritual values are cherished in this nation. It's my fervent hope that those values will attain even fuller expression.

Mr. President, I know you've touched on this, but at your first news conference in 1981, you said that the Soviets lie and cheat and pursue their ends of world domination. What has really changed your mind? Can the American people really trust the Russians now? And I'd like to follow up.

The President. Well, Helen, that was the first press conference that I'd held since being elected President. And the question that came to me was: Could we believe the Russians, or would they lie to us? And my answer at that time was not expressing my opinion. I said, I will answer that with their own words. And then I cited some of the leaders of the Communist movement in the Soviet Union that said that the only immorality was anything that slowed the growth of socialism and that there was no immorality in lying or cheating or doing anything of that kind, as long as it advanced the cause of socialism. Now, that was my answer. So, it wasn't an opinion. I was quoting what their leaders themselves -- the beginners of that particular system -- had said.

The President. But I think that there is quite a difference today in the leadership and in the relationship between our two countries. And we have held very productive meetings that I think were productive for both sides.

Q. Mr. President, on the START treaty, what are the areas of progress, and what's the specific progress that you achieved here? And why do you think that you can conclude a treaty this year, when Senate leaders are urging you to go slow, and this summit, with all its momentum, wasn't able to break the impasse?

The President. Well, the Senate leaders themselves brought the verification -- or the ratification papers here that we just received today on the INF treaty. It meant changing their own schedules a great deal and speeding up the ratification process. I think that we could count on them to feel the same if we are coming to final agreement on a START treaty.

START treaty is infinitely more complex than the INF treaty, and therefore, there is going to be continued negotiation on a number of points. And then it will depend on the Senate once -- if we have agreed upon a treaty, it is their responsibility to thoroughly study that treaty and then issue ratification of it if they find it satisfactory.

We can hope. I would hope that before the year is out that we could eliminate the differences that still exist. But if not, I would hope that my successor would continue because here we are getting at, I think, the most important reduction that should take place in nuclear weapons. The most destabilizing are the intercontinental ballistic missiles in which someone pushes a button and minutes later a part of the Earth blows up. And the thing that I express my hope about is that not only have we said 50 percent, but in that first meeting in Geneva the General Secretary proposed the idea also of reducing by half our nuclear missiles.

Is there something in Soviet-American relations that you would advise your successor to leave behind, and is there something specific that you would advise him to take to the future? To follow up, yes.

The President. Yes. If these negotiations and so forth are still going on, I will do everything I can to persuade my successor to follow up and to continue. And as a matter of fact, I think I'll tell him that he will find the Russian people most warm and hospitable and friendly.

Mr. President, Soviet officials have told us they have dossiers on all of the dissidents and that some of those people -- in fact, they've said that all those people are not the best people representing Soviet society. How do you feel about the fact that they have kept dossiers on these dissidents with whom you met, and doesn't that contradict your view that there have been improvements here and that this is a more open society under Mr. Gorbachev?

The President. Well, no, the figures themselves reveal that improvements have been made. Some 300 people have been freed from imprisonment. The lists that we bring are names that have been brought to our attention by relatives or friends -- their own relatives, for example, living in our country now -- and I have brought those names to the General Secretary and explained the personal interest that we have in them. And a great many of them have since been allowed to come to our country or to other countries that they preferred, such as Israel. And so, I think there has been a sizable improvement, and we still are going to continue doing that.

But, sir, what about the fact that the very people with whom you met have now been investigated by Soviet authorities and might be subject to some form of retaliation? Mr. Gorbachev said today that you no longer feel that this is the ``evil empire,'' that you told him that within the Kremlin walls. Doesn't this contradict your new feeling of optimism about the Soviet Union?

Sir, yesterday you did say you no longer believed the Soviet Union is an ``evil empire.'' You said that was another time, another era. What's changed? Is it just Mr. Gorbachev's succession to the General Secretaryship, or have you yourself changed or expanded your view of the Soviet Union?

The President. No, I think that a great deal of it is due to the General Secretary, who I have found different than previous Soviet leaders have been; but that also as we have pursued this, we have found them willing to enter into negotiations with us. And I think that enough progress has been made that we can look with optimism on future negotiations.

Sir, I suppose I'm asking if you think that there's anything that you have learned, that you personally have expanded or changed your views because you've had an opportunity to learn more about this country over the years and about their system so that you think you are part of the process; or is it just Gorbachev?

Mr. President, Mr. Gorbachev said in his news conference that he thought you could have achieved more in this summit. Specifically, he went on to say that on the issue of the ABM interpretation of the treaty -- said that you had gone back on your word, that in Geneva you had agreed that you would no longer seek military superiority, and that by holding to the development of SDI you were seeking superiority in outer space, and that, therefore, you had gone back on your word. Are you seeking superiority in outer space? Can you reach a START agreement without some accommodation on SDI and the ABM question?

The President. SDI, in my mind -- maybe some of my people wouldn't agree with me -- but the whole thing was my idea to see if there could not be developed a defensive weapon that would make it virtually impossible for nuclear missiles to get through to their targets in another country. And from the very beginning, I have said that if and when such a system can be developed I would support the idea of making it available worldwide, because since we all know how to make nuclear missiles, sometime there could be a madman come along, as a Hitler came along, who could then make those missiles -- but that my idea would be the sharing of the knowledge of SDI as a defensive weapon -- would be accompanied by the total elimination of nuclear weapons. And I happen to believe that this will be a lot better world if we get rid of all the nuclear weapons. And that is what my dream of SDI is: that it can be the tool by which we eliminate.

The President. Well, maybe he just doesn't know me well enough. But from the very first, I have said that that is my goal for that defensive weapon. There is nothing offensive about it. It cannot hurt or kill anyone. It can just make it impossible for missiles to get through the screen.

Mr. President, I want to ask you about this effort you again stated today to try to get a START treaty before you leave office. You have less than 8 months left in office. Mikhail Gorbachev could have 20 years. By setting up any kind of deadline, no matter how unofficial, aren't you putting all the pressure on the U.S. side?

You don't make a treaty just to simply have it be achieved at a certain point in time. The treaty is ready when it is a good treaty and good for all sides involved. And that's what we'll do instead of setting a deadline and then saying, well, let's sign it because we've reached the deadline. It has to be good.

If I might follow up, sir: There is also talk about a fifth summit sometime this year to sign a treaty, which might come sometime in the fall. To prevent U.S.-Soviet relations from being mixed up in politics, are you willing to rule out a summit until the Presidential campaign is over in November?

Mr. President, you were asked by one of the students at Moscow University yesterday about the practice in the United States of limiting Presidential terms. I believe you said you were going to go out on the mashed-potato circuit next year and campaign for repeal of that constitutional amendment. Were you aware that Mr. Gorbachev, as part of his reforms, is promoting the idea of limited terms for the leader of the Soviet Union? And do you think it's a good idea for the Soviet Union?

The President. Well, I would hesitate to comment on that. I mean, this system of government here -- you do not have a national election in which all of the people vote to see who would be the leader. My objection to the constitutional amendment that was passed in our country limiting a President to two terms was the fact that that is the only office in the United States in which all the people vote for the candidates for that office. And it seems to me that it is an infringement on the rights of our people in a democracy to tell them that they can't vote for someone because of a time limit. I think it impinges on their right to vote for whoever they want to vote for as many times as they want to vote for them. That is the principle of democracy.

Mr. President, if I may just ask one more question on the students, you talked a lot about how it is a positive thing for students from both countries to mix and mingle, to get to know each other, to understand each other. Do you think part of your positive feeling about the Soviet Union these days comes as a result of greater tolerance that you've developed as a result of your meetings with Mr. Gorbachev over the past few years?

Mr. Gorbachev and I have, I think, a very satisfactory relationship. But at the same time, I am never going to relax my belief in the need for verification of agreements that we might make, and I'm quite sure he feels the same way.

The President. No, this proposal -- that was just -- been a suggestion made of the removal of a half-a-million men on the NATO line in the European front. This has to be considered. We think that we are coming to a point -- and that he himself is willing to -- of reductions in conventional weapons along that front, and conventional forces as well as the nuclear forces. But the simple removing of a half-a-million men would not be exactly equal because his military would be moved a short distance back away from the front. Well, there's a 3,000-mile ocean between where our men would have to be moved, and in the event of an emergency, we'd have an ocean to cross to get our men back there and equal. So, that has to be considered.

Mr. President, General Secretary Gorbachev, in his remarks earlier this afternoon, was talking about your comments here on human rights, and he said, ``I did not have a lot of admiration for that part of the trip.'' When you met with the General Secretary privately, we know, of course, that you discussed human rights. Did he say anything to you specifically about the meeting with dissidents or your remarks at Danilov Monastery or the remarks yesterday at the Writers Union?

The President. No, but I do know that he and others have had a feeling that in some way our concern with this is interfering with your internal government policies. I have explained to him, and I think maybe he has seen the point. Our country is very unique. All of us, either by ourselves or through our ancestors or our grandparents or parents, came from someplace else -- about the only nation in the world that can say that. As a matter of fact, the estimate is that one out of eight Americans trace their parentage and their heritage, if not their own immigration, to the Eastern bloc.

And so, I have put it this way: that you don't stop loving your mother because you've taken unto yourself a wife. So, the people in America do have a feeling for the countries of their heritage. In my case, it was a great-grandfather on one side and a grandmother and grandfather on my mother's side. Well, Americans retain that feeling of friendship and loyalty to the countries that, as I say, are their heritage. And so, when we feel that people are being unjustly treated -- imprisoned for something that in our country would not be a crime, calling for such a sentence -- our people get aroused, and they come to us, and they want help. They want something done.

A wife, who's been waiting for 8 years for her husband to be allowed to leave this country to join her -- things of this kind we don't think are really interfering with someone else's business. We think it's very much our business to bring it to the attention where we feel that there is an injustice to the Government. And I have explained this to the General Secretary, and I think he has seen the justice of what I've said because many of the individuals that we've brought to his attention have now been released from confinement here and have been allowed to emigrate -- come to other countries, to our country.

Mr. President, Mr. Gorbachev says that he proposed a draft statement that would use the words ``peaceful coexistence.'' And he said that your first response to that was, ``I like it.'' But that when you came back from meeting with your aides, you seem to have changed your mind. Did you, and why?

The President. Well, I liked the whole tone, the general tone of it, and what it was seeking to achieve was what we're both seeking to achieve. But I said at the same time, I would take it to our people. And I took it there, and they studied it and saw where there could have been certain ambiguities in there that would not achieve the general thought of what was being proposed. We were in agreement with the general thought. So, some rewriting was done by our own people. And when the total statement is released to you, I think you will find that we have achieved what it was he had with the paragraph that he proposed. And it's been achieved and improved to the point that it is clear and unmistakable, that it achieves the purpose that he had in mind.

Well, if I could follow up, sir: You've sort of teased us now. If you could give us some sense of what you've proposed to substitute for peaceful coexistence? What's the better term that your aides had advised you to use?

The President. No, peaceful coexistence -- both pieces achieve the same end, but the other one had ambiguities in it. And I don't think they were intentional, but they could have been used to justify doing something else that was not in keeping with the entire goal of the statement here.

Mr. President, if I could follow up on your comments on emigration: Yesterday when you were talking about a family denied the right to emigrate, you called it a bureaucratic problem; you said you blamed the bureaucracy. Do you believe that essentially it is just bureaucratic lethargy that has caused that problem in the Soviet Union?

Yesterday, when you spoke to the students about -- you were talking about emigration and a family in particular that had been denied the right to emigrate, and you said you blamed the bureaucracy. Do you view the emigration problem from the Soviet Union as essentially a problem of just a lethargic bureaucracy?

The President. I'm afraid that I have to confess to you that I think one of the sins of government, and one with which we must deal and never have been able to be completely successful with, and this includes our own government, is that the bureaucracy once created has one fundamental rule above all others: Preserve the bureaucracy. And I think that governments will always find that they are having to check on bureaucracy and make sure that it is not abiding by its own rules and taking the easiest course. And so, I wouldn't -- picking on one government other than another.

If I could follow up: You said that you believed you persuaded Mr. Gorbachev on some of these emigration questions. But he said on human rights in the United States that you -- he did not find your arguments convincing. Do you consider that a failure in this summit?

The President. I think that there is a mistaken view, and, oh, how I yearn to have him come to our country for long enough to see some of our country. I think there is a mistaken view about the things that occasionally dominate the press about prejudice, racial or religious, in our country, about the so-called street people that apparently have no place to live. And I think these are socioeconomic problems in our land; we have them, of course. We also try to deal with them. But I don't think he quite could understand a recent situation. A young lady living on the sidewalks of New York, living out there on the sidewalk, winter and summer. And so, for her own sake, the police picked her up to bring her to where she could be placed in a shelter. And she took her case to court and won her case in court that she should be allowed to go back and sleep on the sidewalk where she had been because that's what she preferred to do. Well, when you have a free country, how far can we go in impinging on the freedom of someone who says this is the way I want to live.

Mr. President, in this room on Monday, you heard moving stories of people who had been -- [inaudible] -- and you wrote it off to bureaucracy. Is that really your view that it is only the bureaucracy? It is not a willful policy of the Government here to keep these people from emigrating?

Once during the war, I happened to be involved in a situation in which one level of the military wanted a warehouse full of filing cabinets -- wanted permission to destroy the files so they could use those filing cases. And they were able to prove that the documents had no historic value. They had no bearing on present-day government at all. They were just useless. And so, the message went up through the ranks, requesting permission to destroy these obsolete files. And then, back down through the ranks, from the top command, endorsed by each level of command, came the reply: Permission granted, providing copies were made of each file destroyed.

Thank you, sir. You said starting at the beginning of this year and going into this summit that if there was this progress toward a START treaty you would be willing to come together a fifth time and sign it, but only if it was a good treaty. You've referred to that today again several times. What is your judgment, your best judgment, on the basis of this summit: Have you made enough progress that you now think that a START treaty is likely within your term?

Washington Post] -- and I honestly cannot answer that. I don't know. Let me just give you what the mechanics are: that our people have been steadily in Geneva -- both sides, Soviet people and our people -- working on this treaty, knowing what we hope to achieve, and they're working there. And as I say, they've made progress. There is no way to judge, and there is no way that I would give them a date and say, please, you have to get this by such and such a time because that's not the way to get a good treaty. I want a good treaty.

The President. Well, you can't rule out. Something else might come up that necessitates our getting together and settling something other than that particular treaty. So, no one can say, no, there will be no need for a summit.

The President. I'm going to do one answer because I've wanted to say this, and I say it anytime I get a chance. I think that one of the most wonderful forces for stability and good that I have seen in the Soviet Union are the Russian women.

Committee has been informed of the contents of a letter from the President of the United States of America to the Secretary General of the North Atlantic Treaty Organization and Chairman of the Committee, in which the President asked the member governments to agree to release Admiral Baggett. The Committee agreed with great regret to release Admiral Baggett from his assignment as Supreme Allied Commander, Atlantic. They expressed to Admiral Baggett, in the name of the governments represented on the Committee, lasting gratitude for his distinguished service.

Committee requested that the President of the United States of America nominate an officer of the United States Navy for appointment by the Committee as Supreme Allied Commander, Atlantic, to succeed Admiral Baggett. In response to this request, the President of the United States informed the Committee of his nomination of Admiral Kelso for consideration by the Committee as successor to Admiral Baggett. Admiral Kelso is now serving as Commander in Chief, U.S. Atlantic Fleet/Deputy Commander in Chief, U.S. Atlantic Command. At its meeting today, the Committee adopted a resolution appointing Admiral Kelso Supreme Allied Commander, Atlantic, as successor to Admiral Baggett with the same powers and functions.

The General Secretary. Esteemed Mr. President and Mrs. Reagan, 1 hour from now you will be leaving Moscow. In the first place, I want to thank you and your colleagues for cooperation, openness, and a businesslike approach to the talks that we've had here. I believe that both of us have every reason to regard this meeting and your visit as a useful contribution to the development of dialog between the Soviet Union and the United States.

President, you and I have been dealing with each other for 3 years now. From the first exchange of letters to the conclusion of this meeting, we've come a long way. Our dialog has not been easy, but we mustered enough realism and political will to overcome obstacles and divert the train of Soviet-U.S. relations from a dangerous track to a safer one. It has, however, so far been moving much more slowly than is required by the real situation, both in our two countries and in the whole world. But as I have understood, Mr. President, you're willing to continue our joint endeavors. For my part, I can assure you that we will do everything in our power to go on moving forward. Now, with the vast experience of Geneva, Reykjavik, Washington, and Moscow and backed up by their achievements, we are, in duty, bound to display still greater determination and consistency. That is what the Soviet and American peoples, international public opinion, and the entire world community are expecting of us.

American people best wishes from the peoples of the Soviet Union. Over the past 3 years, our two nations have come to know each other better. They have now taken a really good look in each other's eyes and have a keener sense of the need to learn to live together on this beautiful planet Earth. I wish you good journey back home, Mr. President and Mrs. Reagan. To you and to all members of the U.S. delegation, I wish good health. Goodbye.

Mrs. Gorbachev, this is an emotional moment for Mrs. Reagan and me. We have been truly moved by the warmth and the generous hospitality that we've received from all of our Soviet hosts during this brief visit -- but most especially from the two of you.

During this meeting, as in all of our previous meetings, I appreciated and valued our exchanges and the long hours of hard work that we and our experts put in to make progress on the difficult issues we face. But this meeting has added something else for Mrs. Reagan and me. Our time here has allowed us to know, if only briefly, your art treasures and your people: artists, writers, individuals from all walks of life -- people who were willing to share with us their experiences, their fears, their hopes.

General Secretary, it is fitting that we are ending our visit as we began it, in this hall, named for the Order of St. George. I would like to think that our efforts during these past few days have slayed a few dragons and advanced the struggle against the evils that threaten mankind -- threats to peace and to liberty. And I would like to hope that, like St.

Secretary, if you will permit me just one more proverb, I think a very old and popular saying you have here about last Sunday, the day of our arrival, spoke to the promise that we've seen fulfilled at this summit in this Moscow spring. Truly, then, Troitsa: ves' les raskroitsya [At the Feast of the Trinity, the whole forest blossoms].

And now, if I might just conclude on a personal note, earlier this week at Moscow State University I mentioned to the young people there that they appeared to my eyes exactly as would any group of students in my own country or anywhere else in the world; so, too, did Nancy. And I find the faces, young and old, here on the streets of Moscow. At first, more than anything else, they were curious faces, but as the time went on, the smiles began and then the waves. And I don't have to tell you, Nancy and I smiled back and waved just as hard.

General Secretary, I think you understand we're not just grateful to both you and Mrs. Gorbachev but want you to know we think of you as friends. And in that spirit, we would ask one further favor of you. Tell the people of the Soviet Union of the deep feelings of friendship felt by us and by the people of our country toward them. Tell them, too, Nancy and I are grateful for their coming out to see us, grateful for their waves and smiles, and tell them we will remember all of our days their faces: the faces of hope -- hope for a new era in human history, an era of peace between our nations and our peoples.

Nancy and I want to thank Ambassador Price, his lovely lady, and all the members of the Embassy staff for your extraordinary efforts to assure the success of this visit, as you have done so before. This, as you've been told, is my third visit to London and probably my last as President, and I know how much time and hard work must be devoted to a Presidential visit. I also know that a visit like this is an exceptional one, one that takes you away from your day-to-day business.

And let me express my deep appreciation for the work you do to represent United States interests in the United Kingdom. I know you spend long hours working to secure our foreign policy objectives, to strengthen our economy, to enhance our national security, and to protect United States citizens overseas. And I know the many times when you have been called upon for some individual citizen to overcome something that is upsetting them at the time when they're far away from home and here in this land. Your work here in London has proven invaluable in ensuring that the special relationship we enjoy with Great Britain continues to bear fruit.

Nancy and I wish to thank you, all the men and women of the Embassy, not just the American employees, but also the Foreign Service nationals without whose hard work and support this visit and the execution of our foreign policy would not be possible. And, Charlie, I just -- there are no words to express the appreciation that we have. You have a great staff, and now it's coming time for me to say so long.

God bless all of you. And on behalf of Nancy and myself now, we've got to take the walk down to the helicopter, and we'll be on our way home. But we'll be on our way home with the warmest of memories and feeling of gratitude to all of you. Thank you. God bless you all.

America, welcome home, and well done! Everyone in America watched your historic trip and hoped for the best and pulled for you. And now it's over, and we can all say that you've made a historic contribution to peace in the world.

On arms control, Mrs. Thatcher probably put it best when she said that you have bravely gone forward in spite of the voices of denial and doubt. You showed the only way to succeed is by retaining your resolve and speaking with conviction.

As for the latter, I suspect you know, Mr. President, that you caught a little flack for bringing up the issue of human rights so forcefully right there in the heart of the Soviet system. But most Americans felt as I did: We have a tradition of freedom and a history of free speech, and what's wrong with telling the other guy how you feel?

The fact is you made us proud. This week an American President strode the hard ground of Red Square and reminded the world through the sureness of his step and the lilt of his words what a bracing thing freedom is -- what a moving and bracing thing. So, welcome back, Mr. President. It's good to see you. God bless you and Nancy.

The President. Well, thank you all very much. As some of you may have heard, Mr. Gorbachev and I've been trading Russian proverbs this week. [Laughter] But you know, flying back across the Atlantic today, it was an American saying that kept running through my mind. Believe me, as far as Nancy and I are concerned, there's no place like home.

We want to thank all of you for coming out today. We're grateful for your enthusiasm and for the warmth of your welcome. And take it from me, all this red, white, and blue scenery hits these two weary travelers right where we live. If I might paraphrase George M. Cohan: Some may call it a flag-waving, but right now I can't think of a better flag to wave.

We're a little tired, but we're exhilarated at what has happened -- exhilarated, too, at the thought of the future and what may lie ahead for the young people of America and all of the world. The events of this week in Moscow were momentous -- not conclusive perhaps, but momentous. And believe me, right now momentous will do just fine.

You know, it's occurred to me that time does have a way of sorting things out. For many years now, Americans have seen the danger of war and pleaded the cause of peace. And other Americans have seen the danger of totalitarianism and pleaded the cause of freedom. So, I was just thinking, why don't we just agree today on something that maybe we should have been saying to each other all along: that we're all Americans and that we all have one and the same burning cause in our hearts -- the cause of world peace and the cause of world freedom.

Peace and freedom are what this trip was about, and we saw some real progress in several areas in Moscow -- on human rights, on regional conflicts, on greater contacts between the people of the Soviet Union and the United States. We exchanged the documents that put into force an historic treaty that eliminates for the first time an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear weapons and establishes real breakthroughs in verification procedures. And we made tangible progress toward an even more historic treaty on strategic weapons -- yes, a 50-percent reduction in nuclear weapons. All of this was good and promising for the future.

But there's something else I want to tell you about. I wish you could've seen the faces we saw in the Soviet Union. As I said to the young people at Moscow State University, it was hard, really, to tell them apart from any other group of students -- in our country or anywhere else in the world. And as I told Mr. Gorbachev, there were also the faces, young and old, we saw on the streets of Moscow. At first, more than anything else, they were curious faces, but as time went on, the smiles began and then the waves. And I don't have to tell you Nancy and I smiled back and waved just as hard. The truth came home to us once again. It isn't people, but governments that make war. And it isn't people, but governments that erect barriers that keep us apart.

Much is happening in the Soviet Union. We hope and pray that the signs of change continue there. Our pledge -- Mr. Gorbachev and I -- is to work to continue building a better understanding between our two countries. But let's remember, too, that just as our forward strategy of peace and freedom anticipated positive changes, it remains ready to take us over any bumps in the road. And that's because our strategy is based on faith in the eventual triumph of human freedom.

That faith in freedom, that abiding belief in what the unfettered human spirit can accomplish, defines us as a people and a nation. And you know, I've been told that even a few veteran journalists said a chill went through them this week at a sight they never thought they would see in their lifetime: an American President there in the heart of Moscow talking about economic, political, and individual freedoms to the future leaders of the Soviet Union; explaining that freedom makes a difference, and explaining how freedom works; talking, too, about the possibility of a new age of prosperity and peace, where old antagonisms between nations can someday be put behind us, a new age that can be ours if only we'll reach out to it.

Ladies and gentlemen, all across our country during these weeks of spring it's graduation time. And I hope our young graduates know what a sudden, startling future may now be before them, a future brought about by a technological and information revolution based on a growing understanding of the nexus between economic growth and creative freedom. But I hope, too, that young Americans -- and all Americans -- will always remember that this revolution is only the continuation of a revolution begun two centuries ago, a revolution of hope, a hope that someday a new land might become a place where freedom's light would beacon forth. That faith in freedom, that belief in the unalienable rights of man begun in Carpenters Hall in Philadelphia, traveled last week to the Lenin Hills in Moscow.

It was the selflessness of so many Americans that brought it there, selflessness by Americans for over two centuries, but especially by those Americans who fought what has truly been called the twilight struggle of the postwar years, a struggle where national interest was not always clearly defined or adversaries easily identified or sacrifice fully appreciated. Now, more than ever, we must continue. The judgment of future generations will be harsh upon us if, after so much sacrifice and now at the hour of hope, we falter or fail. Let us resolve to continue, one nation, one people, united in our love of peace and freedom, determined to keep our defenses strong, to stand with those who struggle for freedom across the world, to keep America a shining city, a light unto the nations.

And let us remember, too, that there's work remaining here at home, that whatever the accomplishments of America, we must never be prideful toward others. We have much to learn from peoples of foreign lands and other cultures, nor should we ever grow content.

And yet if patriotism is not the only thing, it is one of the best things. And we can be grateful to God that we have seen such a rebirth of it here in this country. And you know, it's true, frequently when such moments happen in a nation's history, there's a popular saying or song that speaks for that time.

I also include my determination that continuation of the waivers applicable to the Hungarian People's Republic and the People's Republic of China will substantially promote the objectives of section 402. The attached documents also include my reasons for extension of the waiver authority, and for my determination that continuation of the waivers currently in effect for the Hungarian People's Republic and the People's Republic of China will substantially promote the objectives of section 402.

People's Republic of China. Although China's population will shortly exceed 1.1 billion persons, only 10 percent of the country's land area is suitable for farming. China's standard of living is low -- per capita GNP was under $300 in 1987; urban overcrowding is endemic; and unemployment is a growing problem. In consequence, China faces exceptional challenges to adequately feed and house even its present population.

China's population will exceed 1.25 billion by the year 2000. These circumstances contribute to the maintenance of a relatively open emigration policy. In addition, the Chinese Government, as part of its policies of economic reform and opening to the outside world, continues to encourage students, scientists, and industrial managers to travel to Western countries for training and orientation. The principal limitation on increased emigration appears not to be Chinese policy, but the ability and willingness of other nations to absorb Chinese immigrants.

It was just yesterday that I returned from my historic Moscow summit meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev. And it so happens that later this month I'll be visiting Canada for an economic summit with the leaders of the world's industrialized nations. I thought I'd take a few moments to tell you about both.

First, my meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev in Moscow -- the event that held perhaps the most immediate historic importance took place on Wednesday. It was then that General Secretary Gorbachev and I exchanged the instruments of ratification, bringing into effect the INF treaty. The effect of this treaty will be, very simply, to eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range nuclear missiles. The significance of the INF treaty can hardly be overstated. For the first time ever, the levels of nuclear arms will actually be reduced rather than having caps placed on their growth. These missiles will not simply have been shuffled around on the map or placed in storage; they will have been destroyed.

The exchange of these instruments of ratification alone would have made the Moscow summit a success, but the General Secretary and I made important progress in other areas as well. We moved ahead on START negotiations, negotiations that would lead to a dramatic reduction in both sides' arsenals of strategic nuclear arms.

On bilateral issues, I'm especially pleased by our agreement to hold increased exchanges involving high school students. The number of students will at first be in the hundreds, but could grow into the thousands. Imagine it -- hundreds and then thousands of young people who have firsthand knowledge of each other's country and, yes, who have made friends. Turning to regional conflicts, Mr.

A key part of my agenda for this Moscow summit, as for my previous meetings with the General Secretary, involved human rights. Recently, the Soviets have begun to show somewhat more respect for human rights. In the past year, for example, they have released some 300 political detainees from detention. It's my hope that what took place on my Moscow visit will lead to still greater individual freedom for the peoples of the Soviet Union.

You see, in addition to my meetings with Mr. Gorbachev, I held other meetings -- with monks at a monastery in Moscow; with nearly 100 dissidents and refuseniks, men and women who have worked for years for the freedom to speak, to worship, to assemble, and to travel; and at Moscow University with students, indeed, with the very students likely to become the Soviet Union's next generation of leaders. To the dissidents and refuseniks, I was able to say: The people of the United States and elsewhere support you. To the students, I suggested: there is another way to live and govern your country, a way of democracy and economic growth, a way in which creative human energies are released. If anyone had suggested, even as recently as 10 years ago, that an American President would one day be able to meet with Soviet dissidents inside Moscow itself or be able to speak to Soviet students in their own university about human freedom, well, I think you'll agree that a prediction like that would have been dismissed. But this past week, it happened. Seeds of freedom and greater trust were sown. And I just have to believe that, in ways we may not even be able to guess, those seeds will take root and grow.

Accompanying these new political freedoms are a series of economic reforms that may begin to inject elements of free enterprise into the Soviet economy. In 2 weeks, I'll be attending my final economic summit in Toronto, where the Western countries will celebrate the success of free markets. It's my belief that liberty should be as important a concern in Toronto as it was in Moscow. Liberty in the economic sphere means low taxes. It means paring away needless regulations and reducing counterproductive government planning and interference. And it means keeping down barriers to international trade, here and around the world.

But before I report in any detail on the events that took place in Moscow, I want to recognize Secretary of Energy John Herrington. The Department of Energy recently completed an important study that greatly adds to our knowledge of natural gas.

Progress has been made, but much still remains to be done. Congress must act now to decontrol the wellhead price of natural gas and to provide more efficient pipeline transportation. These measures, coupled with the access to Canadian natural gas supplies that is ensured by the U.S.-Canada free trade agreement, will do a great deal to reduce the demand for imported oil.

But to turn now to the events that took place last week in Moscow, permit me to begin with perhaps my strongest impression: an impression of change in the Soviet Union; an impression of new possibilities, of new hope. Indeed, Soviet officials have themselves spoken of the profound change of policy that has taken place in their own government. Differences remain, and it is still much too early to tell just where the changes in the Soviet Union itself will lead. But when a President of the United States is able to meet on Soviet soil with dissidents and refuseniks, able to exchange thoughts with cultural and intellectual leaders, able to discuss with Soviet young people the importance of individual freedoms, well, there is, as I said, a sense of new hope -- a powerful hope.

The event in Moscow of the most immediate impact on East-West relations took place last Wednesday. It was then that General Secretary Gorbachev and I met in the Kremlin to exchange the instruments of ratification of the INF treaty. And the moment we exchanged those instruments, that historic treaty entered into force. For the first time ever, an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles is being eliminated. And with the treaty's stringent verification measures, a new dimension of cooperation and trust will open between us.

The world can also take satisfaction at the continued progress we made on 50-percent reductions in strategic ballistic missiles -- a treaty we call START. And on this issue, permit me to review for just a moment the four summit meetings between myself and Mr. Gorbachev. For in assessing their impact, it's important to see them as a whole.

Geneva the General Secretary and I agreed on the concept of 50-percent reductions; in Reykjavik, on numerical limits for warheads and delivery vehicles; in Washington, on intensive work to complete a START treaty, including comprehensive verification provisions building upon those in the INF treaty. And in Moscow, we made important additional strides toward that objective. Verification in particular represents one of the most important and difficult issues. In Moscow we moved forward in reaching an agreement on a joint experiment in each other's country to improve the verification of existing nuclear testing treaties, and another agreement on notification of strategic ballistic missile test launches. When will the START treaty be completed? We still do not know. But I can say that we are moving forward on the treaty and its associated documents with renewed vigor and cooperation. I won't set deadlines. I've said that many times.

I am also gratified that this summit has borne out again the wisdom of our approach, which has been to expand the agenda of Soviet-American relations beyond just arms control or, more to the point, arms reduction. Too often in the past, the full weight of our relations hinged on this one issue while other fundamental issues were not raised. As I never tire of saying, nations distrust each other not because they are armed; they are armed because they distrust each other.

Getting at those fundamental problems is essential. And that's why I am pleased to report to you that in the areas of human rights, regional conflicts, and bilateral and people-to-people exchanges, the Moscow summit has moved our full agenda forward.

Beginning with bilateral exchanges, I am deeply pleased that the Soviets agreed to take an important step toward expanding people-to-people exchanges, not just making occasional, symbolic gestures that involve a few carefully selected groups. Our goal is to have an ongoing series of widespread exchanges involving a cross section of citizens from both of our societies. In this connection, we agreed on an exchange each year of hundreds of students of high school age. This is a far larger number than in the past, and this is an inaugural step, not a final one. So, too, there is a new dimension to our cultural exchanges. In the spirit of glasnost and perestroika, the [Secretary] General and I expanded and updated an earlier cultural agreement and agreed to a plan that will establish culture and information centers in each other's capital.

Turning to regional issues, Mr. Gorbachev and I had a full and frank exchange. We agreed that the Soviet decision to withdraw from Afghanistan set a positive precedent for the resolution of other conflicts, and I expressed my expectation that the Soviet withdrawal would proceed on schedule, bringing peace to the region and self-determination to Afghanistan. We discussed Southeast Asia, both of us welcoming Vietnam's recent commitment to remove some of its troops from Cambodia. I noted, however, that a solution there required the withdrawal of all troops and a dialog between Prince Sihanouk and Vietnam. We also discussed the new prospects for a solution in southern Africa. This will restore an early target date for the removal of Cuban troops and all foreign troops from Angola and national reconciliation within Angola.

Other regional tensions were not neglected. I once again pressed the Soviets to support a second U.N. Security Council resolution, to enforce Resolution 598, calling for a negotiated end to the Iran-Iraq war. I pressed Mr. Gorbachev to help avert a manmade famine in Ethiopia. I stated my interest in moving forward our initiative in the Middle East peace process, again pressing the Soviets to play a more helpful role. And I emphasized our concerns about Central America, calling on Moscow to stop its vast supply of weaponry to the Communist Sandinistas in Nicaragua and the Communist guerrillas in El Salvador.

And finally, in the area of human rights, I am encouraged. Our discussions here focused on the recognition of the right to speak, write, travel, and worship freely. Our joint statement reaffirms the need to assure the rights, freedoms, and human dignity of individuals; the promotion of people-to-people communications; and an active sharing of cultural, historical, and spiritual values. Here I want to stress that those increased bilateral contacts I noted earlier include steps to establish wider exchanges among the leaders of human rights organizations, as well as lawyers, physicians, and representatives of other professions involved in this work. I think the growth of such contacts, under the aegis of the summit process, could over the long run become one of the most fruitful products of these discussions.

And there, perhaps, lies the greatest significance of what took place in Moscow last week, not that Ronald Reagan spoke there. I was only giving voice to the abiding beliefs of the American people, indeed, of free people everywhere. No, it was that the words that were spoken were words of faith, words of freedom, words of truth, words, well -- and in power that unarmed truth is irresistible. So, thank you all, and, yes, God bless you all.

Yesterday, with the sudden death of Clarence Pendleton, America lost a leading apostle of a just and colorblind society. Clarence Pendleton early in life took up the banner of equal rights for all Americans and boldly carried that banner forward. It was my good fortune to have known Penny, to have shared his good will and good humor, to have traversed time and Earth with him on the path to a more just society for all Americans. With Penny's passing, I have lost a loyal friend and a compatriot deeply committed to my administration and its commitment to fight against discrimination wherever it exists. And the loss to our nation is no less.

In his uncompromising articulation of the ideal of a colorblind society open to all without regard to race, giving no quarter to either prejudice or preference, Penny insisted that the full brunt of the law should be brought to bear on discrimination. At the same time, he understood that the law must itself not deviate from the Constitution's mandate of nondiscrimination for any reason lest it become a double-edged sword, harming the innocent and poorly serving those most in need of protection. And it was in part through his participation in the public discussion of civil rights that the racial quota has been vanquished from our society.

I am pleased to sign into law S. 1989, the South Pacific Tuna Act of 1988. This bill implements the South Pacific Regional Fisheries Treaty by making U.S. domestic legislation consistent with our treaty obligations. The treaty is historic in both its complexity and scope and culminates over 2 years of difficult negotiations. Its successful implementation will set a tone of cooperation rather than confrontation in our fisheries relations with 15 island nations of the South Pacific.

Under the terms of the treaty, U.S. tuna fishermen may purchase regional licenses to fish in some 10 million square miles of tuna-rich waters in the South Pacific Ocean, including waters under the jurisdiction of the Pacific Island signatories. It will set to rest the fisheries-related problems we have experienced stemming from our differing juridical positions concerning highly migratory species of tuna.

In addition, the license fees and the economic assistance agreement associated with the treaty will further the economic development and strengthen the democratic traditions of the Pacific Island states participating in the treaty.

The peoples of the United States and the South Pacific have a long history of contact and cooperation. Beginning in the early 19th century when American seamen first ventured into the region, through the dark days of World War II when we fought side by side in defense of our homes and freedom, to today when we sit together at the negotiating table to work out mutually beneficial solutions to complex problems, our peoples have together faced and overcome adversity and challenge. I am proud of that history and of the fact that through the peoples of Hawaii, American Samoa, Guam, and the Northern Mariana Islands the United States has contributed to the rich cultural and spiritual traditions of the Pacific Islands. I am pleased that my signature on this legislation will reinforce the bonds of friendship and affection that unite our peoples.

President today announced his intention to appoint Douglas A. Riggs to be a member of the Panel of Conciliators, International Centre for the Settlement of Investment Disputes, for a term of 6 years. He would succeed James Coffin Greene.

Prior to joining the White House staff, Mr. Greenberg served as administrative assistant and legislative director for Senator Paul Trible of Virginia. He was also chief of minority staff of the ways and means committee in the Massachusetts State Legislature.

Greenberg graduated from Kenyon College and received a master of arts degree from Claremont Graduate School and completed course work on his Ph.D. at Boston College. Mr. Greenberg is married, has one child, and resides in Alexandria, VA.

On October 29, 1987, after prior consultation with the Congress, I issued Executive Order No. 12613 invoking, inter alia, the authority of the International Security and Development Cooperation Act of 1985 to prohibit the importation of goods and services from Iran. As reported to the Congress on that date, this action was taken in response to the actions and policies of the Government of Iran in support of terrorism and acts of aggression against U.S. forces, U.S.-flag vessels, and other merchant vessels of nonbelligerent nations engaged in lawful and peaceful commerce in international waters of the Persian Gulf and territorial waters of nonbelligerent nations of that region. The Executive Order and my report noted that the import prohibition was in response to actions of the Government of Iran taken after the conclusion of the Claims Settlement Agreement of January 19, 1981 (the ``Algiers Accords'').

ITRs provide, by general license, an exception to the import embargo for goods in transit at the October 29, 1987, effective date of the Embargo Order. Additionally, the ITRs provide for importation pursuant to specific FAC license for several categories of goods of Iranian origin, including those (a) imported prior to January 1, 1988, pursuant to a contract predating the Embargo Order, (b) located outside Iran as of the effective date of the Embargo Order and for which no benefit or payment would accrue to Iran after the effective date relating to the sale or importation, or (c) received by U.S. claimants pursuant to an award of, or in settlement of claims brought before, the Iran-United States Claims Tribunal (see paragraph 2 of this report).

In the period ended April 30, 1988, FAC issued 74 specific licenses for imports of goods under preexisting contracts and 94 specific licenses for goods located outside Iran on the effective date of the Embargo Order. We believe that nearly all goods eligible for importation pursuant to the ``in transit'' exception were admitted within this reporting period.

Customs Service detentions and seizures of Iranian-origin goods (including carpets, caviar, dates, pistachios, and gold) have taken place, and a number of FAC and Customs investigations into potential violations of the ITRs are pending. Several of the seizures have led to forfeiture actions and imposition of civil monetary penalties. An indictment relating to the importation of 1.7 tons of Iranian caviar was returned on April 21, 1988, in Miami, Florida.

Of that total, 259 have been awards in favor of American claimants: 154 of these were awards on agreed terms, authorizing and approving payment of settlements negotiated by the parties, and 105 were decisions adjudicated on the merits. The Tribunal has dismissed a total of 25 other claims on the merits and 52 for jurisdictional reasons. Of the 24 remaining awards, two represent withdrawals and 22 were in favor of Iranian claimants. As of April 30, 1988, total payments to successful American claimants from the Security Account held by the NV Settlement Bank stood at approximately $1.051 billion.

As stated in my last report, the Tribunal continues to make progress in the arbitration of claims of U.S. nationals for $250,000 or more. Over 64 percent of the nonbank claims have now been disposed of through adjudication, settlement, or voluntary withdrawal, leaving 184 such claims on the docket. The largest of the large claims, the progress of which has been slowed by their complexity, are finally being decided, sometimes with sizable damage awards to the U.S. claimant. Since the last report, 21 large claims have been decided. One U.S. company received an award for $54.4 million.

The Tribunal continues to process claims of U.S. nationals against Iran of less than $250,000 each. As of April 30, 1988, a total of 210 small claims have been resolved, 71 of them since my last report, as a result of decisions on the merits, awards on agreed terms, or Tribunal orders. Eight contested claims have been decided since my previous report, raising the total number of contested claims decided to 21, 12 of which favored the American claimant. These decisions will help in establishing guidelines for the adjudication or settlement of similar claims. To date, American claimants have also received 25 awards on agreed terms reflecting settlements of claims under $250,000.

Since my last report, the three Tribunal Chambers have selected 53 small claims for active arbitration, bringing the total number of small claims currently under active Tribunal consideration to 185. The Tribunal has held hearings in six of these claims since my last report. The Tribunal has recently decided three significant ``wrongful expulsion'' test cases. The general thrust of the holdings in this area is that claimants may recover for losses associated with expulsion from Iran only when officials of the Islamic Revolutionary Government perpetrated specific acts directed at the claimant and the claimant clearly left Iran as a result of those acts.

In coordination with concerned government agencies, the Department of State continues to present U.S. Government claims against Iran, as well as responses by the United States Government to claims brought against it by Iran. Since my last report, the Department has filed pleadings in 12 government-to-government claims based on contracts for the provision of goods and services.

In five related government-to-government claims, the Tribunal awarded damages to Iran Air for aircraft services and supplies it found to be owed by U.S. agencies. With these decisions, the Tribunal to date has made five awards in favor of the United States and nine in favor of Iran. The Tribunal has dismissed 12 claims that had been filed by the United States and three claims that had been filed by Iran. In addition, Iran has withdrawn 13 of its government-to-government claims, while the United States has withdrawn five. No government-to-government claims have been finally settled since my last report, so 26 remain pending.

One interpretive dispute brought by Iran was withdrawn by Iran and terminated. Iran recently filed an interpretive dispute in which it challenges a claimant's right to attach Iranian assets abroad in advance of an award by the Tribunal. The Department of State has filed two pleadings in interpretive disputes since my last report.

The situation reviewed above continues to implicate important diplomatic, financial, and legal interests of the United States and its nationals and presents an unusual challenge to the national security and foreign policy of the United States. The Iranian Assets Control Regulations issued pursuant to Executive Order No. 12170 continue to play an important role in structuring our relationship with Iran and in enabling the United States properly to implement the Algiers Accords. Similarly, the Iranian Transactions Regulations issued pursuant to Executive Order No. 12613 continue to advance important objectives in combatting international terrorism. I shall continue to exercise the powers at my disposal to deal with these problems and will continue to report periodically to the Congress on significant developments.

Jeffrey W. Colyer, 28, of Kansas. Dr. Colyer is currently a surgical resident at the Washington Hospital Center. He has worked with the International Medical Corps, designing surgical medic training programs and setting up surgical clinics for the Afghan freedom fighters. In addition to his medical background, he received his master's degree in international relations from Cambridge University.

Alan W. Marty, 31, of Texas. Mr. Marty is currently a regional sales manager for Applied Materials, Inc., where he has generated record sales. After receiving his bachelor's degree in materials science engineering from Iowa State University, he earned master's of business administration and education degrees at Stanford University.

U.S. Military Academy. A graduate of the U.S. Military Academy, he earned a master's degree from the Massachusetts Institute of Technology. His articles on civil-military relations have appeared in professional journals and on the editorial pages of the Wall Street Journal and the Washington Post.

L. Simms, 31, of Massachusetts. Mr. Simms is currently a manager with Bain and Company in Boston. He is a summa cum laude graduate of the University of Pennsylvania, where he earned degrees in economics and applied science. He is a graduate of the Harvard University joint J.D./M.B.A. program. He has served as a trustee of the University of Pennsylvania and on the management board for Christians for Urban Justice/Habitat for Humanity.

I am pleased to transmit for your immediate and favorable consideration the ``President's Pro-Life Act of 1988.'' This important legislation carries out my commitment to protect the rights of unborn children by prohibiting any Federal dollars from being used to fund abortion unless a mother's life would be physically endangered by carrying the fetus to term.

Since the legalization of abortion on demand in 1973, there have been an estimated 21 million abortions in this country. The bill I am sending you has been named the ``President's Pro-Life Act of 1988'' to emphasize the urgent need to reduce the number of abortions in this country and to reaffirm life's sacred position in our Nation.

The findings that would underlie the mandate of the statute point out that abortion takes the life of a living human being, that there is no right to abortion secured by the Constitution, and that the Supreme Court erred in its decision in Roe v. Wade in failing to recognize the humanity of the unborn child.

The key provision of the bill would enact, on a permanent and government-wide basis, the anti-abortion provision -- commonly known as the Hyde Amendment -- that is included annually in the appropriation act for the Department of Health and Human Services. Enacting this prohibition on the funding of abortion in general legislation will extend its application to all agencies and to all Federal funds.

The President. Well, if you don't feel welcome already, welcome to the White House. There's a story we had in Hollywood about Cecil B. deMille, the producer of all those great historical spectacles. It was after the big earthquake in March 1933. And a famous actress of that time, Janet Gaynor, had been in one of the studio buildings when the quake began and all the shaking took place. And when it was over and the ground had stopped moving, she turned to a friend and said, ``I thought for a moment we'd dropped into one of those deMille pictures.'' That's just how I felt last week, during the Moscow summit -- dropped into a grand historical moment. I know that you have questions to ask about the summit, and I don't want to take too much time at the start, but I thought I'd quickly review what we set out to do and what we did.

As you know, our relationship with the Soviets is like a table. It's built on four legs: arms reduction, resolving of regional conflicts, improvement of human rights within the Soviet Union, and expansion of bilateral exchanges. The Soviets have indicated many times that they'd prefer the discussions be confined to the arms issues alone, but we believe that sustained improvement in relations can't rest stably on one leg. We saw what happened in the detente period of the early seventies. There were arms and trade agreements and what was billed as a general thaw, but because of Soviet behavior in so many areas, these could not be sustained. Weapons are a sign of tensions, not a cause of them. I know all of you have heard me say this time and again, but let me repeat it here: Nations do not distrust each other because they're armed; they are armed because they distrust each other.

Strengthening America's defenses was and is part of it. Our zero-option proposal for intermediate-range nuclear missiles was part of it, coupled with NATO's deployment of Pershing II and ground-launched cruise missiles. It was a carrot-and-stick response to the highly destabilizing deployment of the Soviet INF missiles. Our policies regarding emigration from the Soviet Union, human rights problems, and the Soviet presence in a variety of Third World conflicts were also aspects of it.

Progress was stalled for a long time. The Soviets tested our resolve, and that of our allies, at the bargaining table and in the deployment of INF weapons. They also went through a series of leaders, none of whom lived long enough to change the longstanding Brezhnev-era policies. That was one of my problems, my delay in getting started in dealings with the Soviet Union -- they kept dying on me. And now, under Mr. Gorbachev, the Soviets have a leader who appears to want to change things and who may actually be able to change things. Internally, his promotion of perestroika and glasnost gives us hope, although we remember that old American political adage: ``Trust everybody, but cut the cards.'' In foreign affairs, he's begun the withdrawal from Afghanistan and agreed to our zero option for INF, something the Soviets spent a number of years denouncing.

I hope you'll forgive me for saying this, but too often in the past, it's appeared to me that coverage of summits has been geared more to the hunt for headlines than to the realities of business. If there wasn't the blockbuster agreement, a summit was dismissed. In fact, each of my four meetings with Mr.

Gorbachev has produced significant steps forward. Take just one area: reduction in the level of strategic arms. In Geneva the General Secretary and I agreed to the concept of 50-percent reductions; and in Reykjavik, on numerical limits for warheads and delivery vehicles; in Washington, on intensive work to complete a START treaty, including comprehensive verification provisions building on those in the INF treaty. And in Moscow, we moved forward in reaching an agreement on an experiment to improve the verification of existing nuclear testing treaties, and another agreement on notification of strategic ballistic missile launches.

I've heard repeated many times the old rule that you should never go to a summit unless everything has been fully scripted in advance. Well, as you might have guessed, I don't fully accept that. I can't tell you the shock the first time when they said that we should put out the statement in advance that we were going to finish the summit with. I believe that if relations between the United States and the Soviet Union are genuinely to improve, from time to time the top leaders must step in and exercise leadership. They must agree on a common set of broad goals so that those under them have a clear and common green light to move forward. That's been the purpose and the accomplishment of these four summits.

And now, rather than going on, I know that you have questions that you want to ask and that I want to answer. Think of what a refreshing change this will be for me -- to hear someone shout a question and realize it's not Sam Donaldson.

With the administration coming to a close, and in your own mind and the mind of many others, so much accomplished at the summit, how are you going to prepare for the transition -- whether it's a Republican or Democratic administration -- so that you can continue what you've started? And I have a followup I'd like to ask.

George Bush, who has been a part of everything that we've accomplished in these several years -- why, I would want to point out to my successor the things that we didn't get accomplished that are still needed: the improvement in the whole budgeting process, the line-item veto and what it means. As a Governor for 8 years, I did 943 line-item vetoes without ever being overridden once, and we left the State with a surplus, not a deficit. But, no, I'll want to be of help if I can, but there are a number of things that in these succeeding months we're still going to try to get forward.

My followup is: Nothing is going to be accomplished in terms of an arms agreement without your support, even after you're out of office. Do you think there should be some kind of formalized relationship between yourself and the next President and next administration so that you could be privy to what's being prepared along the way?

The President. Well, let me say, there is such a situation or arrangement now. Regularly we keep each of the former Presidents informed in writing with the policies and where we are and things like the summit and all of that. That goes on regularly, and they're all kept completely informed. And I think that's all that an ex-President should ask for.

Mr. President, Paul Linnman, from KATV in Portland, Oregon. Acknowledging that you are pleased with the progress made in Moscow and your administration -- there is the possibility of agreement before your term ends. Will you press for that if it becomes realistic to include going so far as to invoking your powers to recall Congress for ratification?

The President. Oh, I wouldn't mind recalling them for anything. [Laughter] No, the thing is -- let me make clear that we have refrained from setting deadlines. I think the idea to set down some line and then you find yourself tempted to agree to something less good than it could be, but because of the deadline -- so, if it isn't, I'd think it would be great if the START agreement could be finished, the negotiations go on between our representatives. If that could be done before I left office and it could be signed, that would be fine, because then we could move on to some other things that need dealing with -- conventional weapons and so forth. But if it isn't, why, we'll just keep on negotiating and then try to impress on whoever comes in next where we are.

The President. Well, I hate to give any suggestions that might be of help to the other side. But there's no question that he has impressed a great number of followers. And I want to say -- and without any inference to any racial difference or anything -- I would have to say that I find myself in great disagreement with policies that he has proposed, as well as those of the other candidate, Dukakis. But I think that goes with the game. They obviously have different goals in mind than we have. But I think he's certainly been a viable candidate all the way.

The President. Everything I can. I've had to be neutral for a long time -- until there was a definite candidate -- because in this job you are titular head of the party, so you have to remain neutral. But as I say, he's been a part of everything that we've accomplished in this administration.

The President. There are several people at my table here that are going to have to listen again. One of the most exciting things -- I couldn't believe it, after all the years of propaganda that we're all villains on this side of the ocean and everything. The Soviet people were the warmest, friendliest, nicest people you could ever meet. Every place we went, whether it was night or day, the streets would be lined with thousands of them, as if there was going to be a parade -- and their friendly waves. And then in the opportunities when we did have a chance to get out in the street and come in contact with them, and they all wanted to shake hands and visit. They were really wonderful. And I'm going to add something in there that you didn't ask, but that I had said once before up here. I voiced this a few times when I had a chance publicly in the Soviet Union: that not only were they all so wonderful and friendly, but I think the women of the Soviet Union are the biggest and most powerful stabilizing force in that society. They're just wonderful.

Mr. President, my name is Cameron Harper. I'm from KTVK Television in Phoenix. And I heard you say in speeches that the summit was a turning point in East-West affairs, and you've said that it planted the seeds of freedom and liberty. Vice President George Bush, as recently as yesterday, was saying that he's not so sure, that he's not sure it represents a fundamental change in direction in the Soviet Union and its relations with this country. Is he reading a different set of briefing papers, perhaps?

There will be, I think, sixty-some Americans permanently stationed in the Soviet Union, and they will have as many of theirs permanently stationed here. And that's never been attempted in any treaties before.

Mr. President, you know Mikhail Gorbachev probably better than any American, have had four summits with him, spent many hours one-on-one with him. If he has the good fortune to have your good health and stamina, he could conceivably be the Secretary General for 20 to 25 years. I'd like first your impressions of the man and any advice you might offer to the next President on going toe-to-toe with Mikhail Gorbachev.

We've gone too long without people like you being here. I started in the beginning having, several times a year, people like yourselves from all over the country here in this same room and doing what we're doing right now, because I recognize that your only sources of information were coming from certain elements of the press within the beltway and in the East here. And I sometimes have found some of those sources biased. And I thought that you had a right to be able to ask, and you ask good questions, too.

Chandler, from WITI - TV in Milwaukee. I'm wondering, with the approaching election, you knowing Gorbachev, if you had talked at all -- certainly we know your preference in the Presidential race -- if he had expressed one way or another which candidate he might appreciate negotiating with in the future.

The President. No, I think he's been very careful to not ever get into that subject, and he's never brought that up or not. But I've made it plain to him that I'm going to do everything I can to impress upon my successor where we are and what the goals should continue to be.

Mr. President, some remarks you made in Moscow caused great consternation among Indian leaders. One of the kinder assessments was by Navajo Tribal Chairman Peter McDonald, who happens to be a Republican and suggested it might behoove you to visit the Navajo reservation this fall. I'm wondering whether you have any regrets about the remarks you made about American Indians in Moscow and what the chances are of you visiting the Navajo reservation this fall.

But, no, I don't regret that, and I do think that there were mistakes made back in the very beginning of our country with regard to the Indians and the manner of handling them. But the question that I was answering was in effect -- was that somehow I had refused to meet with them. I've never refused to meet with any Americans and certainly haven't refused to meet with them and have on a number of occasions. And I don't know just what the specific complaint is, but I know that we've been doing for a long time our utmost to provide education for those who wanted to maintain Indian life as it was on the reservation, in contrast to those who leave and come out and join the rest of us and become more like us.

The President. Yes, there's no question but that the Challenger tragedy has put us behind, and we are back of where our schedule called for -- because we wanted to be underway on a space station by this time. With regard to the Mars trip -- incidentally, we've already sent a craft to Mars, as you know, in the past -- taken some pictures that make you wonder why anyone would want to go there. [Laughter] But they've specified theirs would be unmanned, also. I have turned that over to our people in that field because I don't know just exactly what the scheduling problems are for getting us back into operation again and whether that would set us back. But I'm going to wait for their reporting before making a decision on whether we do something jointly.

The President. Well, as I say, we were set back by that tragedy and then the extensive research and all that went on so that we wouldn't have a repeat. And so, we're behind. There's no question, we're behind schedule in all of our space activity other than the things that we put aloft, such as the satellites that can give us the weather and that can photograph the Earth as if they were -- [laughter] -- just on the second floor and so forth, that type of thing. But generally we are behind schedule, and right now, as I understand, we're having a little problem -- since the explosion in one of our rocket fuel plants -- we're having trouble.

Mr. President, Bill Bayer, from Miami. You're coming to Miami later this month, I understand, but some of the Cuban-American community and many of the people down there say that the Reagan administration has betrayed us. You've heard this, of course.

The President. I would answer that they're misinformed. We certainly haven't betrayed them, nor is there anything to this idea that we've softened up our relationship with Castro. As you know, we were instrumental -- in fact I would think that we were the ones that got the United Nations to authorize a team to go to Castro -- or to Cuba and look into the charges of violation of human rights there. So, no, we're not doing anything of that kind. Since Cardinal O'Connor went down there, if it is true that he is going to release several hundred of their political prisoners, I have firsthand knowledge of what those prisoners have been going through, and some of them for more than 20 years, and the torture that they've gone through. But before I would take Castro's word as to the number and that he's releasing the bulk of them -- only a few -- no, I'd want somebody else to be there counting.

We think that there is a big improvement -- the Afghanistan thing that has happened. We think that there is a probability -- maybe I should say possibility, but I believe even a probability -- of, now, relief in Angola from this same kind of a situation. But, yes, they know our feelings, and we have laid out the places where we believe that something must be done.

The President. Oh, we have told him that we believe that they're in violation. We know they're in violation of the ABM treaty, particularly with Krasnoyarsk. And we've made it plain that we know that and that that is going to be factored in in any of our dealings, and particularly with SDI.

We know that they have been spending far more on defensive programs than we have with SDI. But evidently their technology must not have kept pace with ours, because our system is one that I think, in spite of some of the pessimists who claim otherwise, that it is a research program aimed at a target. And the research has -- there have been a number of breakthroughs that has made most of our scientists optimistic that it is a system that can work. And if it can, I have often said -- and have said to General Secretary Gorbachev -- that this could be the answer to the dream of no more nuclear weapons if we could make them obsolete with this kind of defensive system. And I have said that I would be pleased to share it with the world if we had such a thing because someday -- you know, we know how to make those nuclear missiles, and someday there could be a madman come along, another Hitler or something, and try to blackmail the Earth. But not if we all had a protective system against them that was almost invulnerable. And we're very optimistic about it.

The President. I'd say, George, wait till you and I get out there on the trail and start pinning him down on the things he claims which we know are not true. And then we would say such things as some of our own accomplishments. You know, if I listened to him long enough, I would be convinced that we're in an economic downturn and that people are homeless and people are going without food and medical attention and that we've got to do something about the unemployed. Do you know what the potential pool of employment is in the United States? I didn't till I got here. It is everyone, male and female, 16 years of age and up. That is the potential employment pool -- all of those students, all of those retired people, everything. Today the highest percentage of that pool is employed than ever in our history.

There were other things we wanted to do. We wanted to get the Government to act a little bit more like business and do things more effectively and efficiently than it can. I put George Bush in charge of a task force to see how many Federal regulations could be eliminated. The book containing those regulations now is only half as big as it was when we came. And our estimate is that the people, the communities, the States, and businesses have now been able to reduce the amount of time spent on government-required paperwork by 600 million man-hours a year.

And there are other little items, like just the other day some figures came in: that it used to take 43 days to get a passport; it only takes 10 now. And there's one that used to take 100 days to get an urban renewal loan set in motion.

And it doesn't take 100 days anymore; it takes about 16. I may be getting some of these figures inaccurate, but that's how much the improvement has come in businesslike ways and things that we've done to imitate business instead of attack business.

I know that I'm way past my schedule, and Elizabeth isn't -- she could hit me over the head if I don't say -- there's one thing that's typical of this, as well as the regular press conferences. And that is that, darn it, I always have to walk away with about 30 hands that have been waving that I haven't been able to get to. I just try to point in directions here and not play any favorites. And since you're all new to me, I couldn't play any favorites, but I'm grateful for your being here. And maybe if you feel like writing some questions and handing them to our people, we can send you back some answers if we didn't get to them at all. But I have to get back to the office now. Thank you all very much.

Sec. 2. In order to effectuate the purposes of the Act, the Secretary of Defense is hereby authorized to delegate any or all of the functions, responsibilities, powers, authority, or discretion devolving upon him in consequence of this Order to any person or persons within the Department of Defense.

I am pleased the Senate voted to sustain my veto of H.R. 3, the Omnibus Trade bill. As I said in my veto message on the bill, I am committed to enactment of a responsible trade bill this year. I am directing my senior advisers to stand ready to assist the congressional leadership on a new trade bill -- one that will strengthen America's international competitiveness and create even more new jobs for Americans.

Well, thank you, Irwin Lerner. Thank you all very much. And I join you in recognizing Congressman Ben Gilman for all that he has been doing up on the Hill in regard to this problem. It's a pleasure to be here with you, this National Conference on Corporate Initiatives for a Drug Free Workplace, and I am delighted by the strong leadership that the business community is showing in this vital effort.

You know, I've been speaking out about the problem of illegal drugs for a very long time now. When I began doing so as Governor of California, the times were very different. In fact, a conference of this type would have been unlikely, and had it been held, there probably would have been pickets out in front. Well, when I arrived here today there were no pickets and no petitions, no demonstrators, no protests. I circled the block a couple times while we checked to make sure it was the right hotel. [Laughter] The truth is that attitudes toward illegal drugs really have changed. We can see it in the media. We can see it among our youth. And we can see it on the floor of Congress.

Though the struggle for a drug free America has not yet been won, the moral and cultural battle to define the threat of illegal drugs is clear. And it's all of us who are on the winning side, part of the overwhelming consensus against illegal drugs in America. An important symbol of that consensus and of the distance that we've traveled as a society is that our drug policy today is one of zero tolerance. That means absolutely, positively none -- no exceptions.

I have to tell you that I am especially proud of the antidrug work that Nancy, who you so generously mentioned, has done that's changed the way we talk and think about illegal drugs. It was not that long ago that the message to our young people was that experimenting with illegal drugs was not only harmless but was kind of a good thing, an instant path to popularity and sophistication. The social stigma all too often was not on the drug user but on the young person who refused to try drugs. As I've said before, the tragic fact is that many young people began using drugs not to rebel or escape but just to fit in.

In many ways our country is still paying for the erosion of our values and the decline in self-responsibility that occurred in the 1960's and the 1970's. The students of that period who used illegal drugs in high school or college have, in many cases, taken their destructive drug habits with them into their places of employment. What we've found is that drug users at work pose a threat to their coworkers and represent a corporate crisis and a national catastrophe.

The good news is that there has been a major change of attitude in America, and the work that you're doing now is an important part of it. The momentum has shifted from those who celebrated the drug subculture to the people who just say no and help others to do the same. Illegal drugs and drug use are not being tolerated anymore. Yes, the enemy, illegal drug use, is still out there and still a threat. But today illegal drug use is an enemy that has no defenders. Not only is an ever-increasing number of Americans personally rejecting the use of illegal drugs, but the country as a whole is moving to deglamorize and depopularize their use.

Law enforcement authorities, such as the police, the Coast Guard, the Drug Enforcement Administration, and the Customs Service, are critical players in the war on drugs -- but there are limits on what can be accomplished on the supply side. There must also be stern social sanctions on the user of illegal drugs and broad societal support for individuals being drug free. It is this change in attitudes that, I believe, makes total victory in the war on drugs not just possible but ultimately certain.

The glamorizing of drugs in film and music that was so much a part of the ``progressive'' culture has declined, and instead the most popular entertainment stars and sports celebrities are warning our young people that using drugs is dangerous for their health and bad for their image. Now, it just seems the other day, a quite popular motion picture, a comedy starring several feminine stars, one of the big comedy scenes was all of them sitting around and passing the joint around, and then the hilarity and so forth, and that was considered just fine to get laughs in the theater and all. Well, thank heaven we don't see that anymore. The entertainment world has joined your club.

We're also becoming increasingly intolerant of illegal drugs on our college and university campuses. And employers are stating right up front that illegal drug use will be hazardous to their workers' careers. Some very encouraging news about the prospects for a drug free work force came in last year's annual survey of high school seniors. The survey showed that the Just Say No message is getting through to the new generation of workers. Almost all students said it was wrong to even try a drug like cocaine. And the percentage of students who indicated that they were currently using illegal drugs was lower, much lower, than in previous years.

You in the business community are playing a critical role in America's transition to a drug free society. You're providing drug education to your employees. You're offering counseling and treatment to help men and women escape from drug dependency. You're providing drug testing to help deter and detect illegal drug use. And you send a strong message to your work force and community that your company has zero tolerance for illegal drugs and that users must be held responsible for their illicit drug use. You make it clear that not only are drug users not part of the ``in crowd,'' but unless they quit taking illegal drugs they'll be part of the out-of-work crowd.

We're convicting more drug dealers and giving them longer sentences. We're eradicating more drug fields around the world, devoting more resources to drug enforcement than ever before, and bringing the military into an unprecedented level of support in the battle against illegal drugs. But in the final analysis, the focus must be on the user, because so long as there's a demand for illegal drugs, there will be a powerful financial incentive for drug traffickers to satisfy that demand. Ultimately, the solution requires transforming illegal drug users into nonusers. And the antidrug programs you're conducting in the workplace are an essential part in this effort.

I hope that the leading role taken by American business to get illegal drugs out of the workplace will be expanded here at home and duplicated abroad. Some people may look at the drug problem and throw up their hands, not knowing where to begin. Then there are people like you who look at the drug problem and roll up their sleeves and get to work. What you're doing is making a real difference. Drug education, counseling, treatment, and testing -- these are powerful tools. I'm proud that American business has willingly taken on this vital effort. By doing this, you're helping your coworkers, you're helping your companies, you're helping the American economy, and you're helping to bring us closer to fulfilling our goal of a drug free America.

President's Volunteer Action Awards. When we came to Washington 7 years ago, one of our goals was to restore the promise of hope upon which our great nation was founded, to once again have communities where neighbor helps neighbor and the spirit of caring is put into action by ordinary citizens.

Through your lives and the principles that you uphold, you set an example, not just for your communities but the Nation and the world. You've made the words ``I can't'' obsolete and have brought hope that doesn't disappoint to those in need. To many of you, service to your fellow man is not just part of your life but has become your life's work.

As the wife of an Army colonel stationed in Korea, Harriet Hodges was just trying to help one family in 1972, when she arranged for their child to be flown to the United States for lifesaving heart surgery. But when other mothers with their little ones gathered at her door for help, she responded, and one by one, Harriet Hodges has arranged, without cost to their families, for 2,000 Korean children to have the surgery they need in the United States.

Following a routine she established almost 70 years ago, she's up every day volunteering. During her life she's raised the funds and gathered the support to build a nursery for the children of low-income mothers, acted as a community leader to bring harmony during the racial turmoil of the 1960's, and served on the board of countless nonprofit organizations. In fact, ``Mama'' Williams has done so much during her lifetime to help others it would be impossible to mention every project now, but I think it's sufficient to say that, if you think about it, you know that she isn't called ``Mama'' without reason. And I like another thing about her, too. She did a little personal job on me.

Eisenhower said: ``There is nothing wrong with America that the faith, love of freedom, intelligence, and energy of her citizens cannot cure.'' It's this optimism put into action through our private sector initiatives that differentiates America from much of the world.

The 18 Americans that we honor today demonstrate that spirit. I think that each of you would be interested to know that the banner of hope that you wave is being recognized around the world. Recently, his Royal Highness, the Prince of Wales, and Prime Minister Thatcher addressed a conference of American and British business leaders gathered to discuss what they could do to increase private sector initiatives internationally.

Today's the last time that I will bestow these prestigious awards, so before I close, I'd like to recognize two gentlemen who have dedicated themselves to promoting voluntarism in our country, Governor George Romney and W. Clement Stone. W.

Clement Stone, born into poverty in Chicago at the turn of the century, rose from his humble beginnings to become one of our country's greatest businessmen and philanthropists. In addition to giving away hundreds of millions of dollars to needy causes, Clem has demonstrated through his personal service and leadership the formula for success in America. He's done a magnificent job as chairman of the ACTION Advisory Board. Governor Romney, the founder of American Motors Company and former Governor of Michigan, has spent a lifetime in service to his fellow man -- stopping not even at retirement. In 1973 he helped form what we now know as VOLUNTEER: The National Center [for Citizen Involvement]. Through his efforts, volunteer centers across the country have helped assist those who wish to volunteer their time.

American people from the beginning of your administration to reach out and assist their neighbors and according to the inspiring example of volunteer service to the Nation that has been set by that extraordinary lady who is ever at your side, I am pleased to introduce to you the 18 outstanding volunteers you have selected to receive the 1988 President's Volunteer Action Awards.

Verlyn and Martha Roskam founded Educational Assistance Unlimited, a unique barter program which matches goods contributed by corporations with colleges which need the items with the cash value of the contributions given as scholarships by the colleges in the name of the companies. Accepting for Verlyn and Martha Roskam is their son, Peter Roskam.

W. Evans founded the Mentor Program, which matches high school students with law firms to teach them the workings of the law and has led in the development of the National Symposium on Partnerships in Education. Thomas W. Evans.

Kiker was instrumental in the formation of Alabamians for a Clean Environment and has been the leader in educating local residents about the impact of the Nation's largest toxic-waste landfill located in their county. Kaye Kiker.

Air Ministries, founded in 1981, provides no-cost air transportation to hospitals and medical centers for over 200 patients each year. Mission Air pilots and medical personnel are among the more than 400 volunteers involved in this program. Accepting for Mission Air is Donald Simpson, founder.

Gallimore, who has worked in nursing for 24 years, has housed over 20 people with AIDS in the house adjacent to her own home, providing meals, care, and support and serving as their adopted family. The home is the only facility for nonambulatory people with AIDS in the Dallas area. Margaret Gallimore.

Arnolta ``Mama'' Williams has been a volunteer leader in her community of Jacksonville, Florida since 1920. She was a founder and president of Gateway Nursery and Kindergarten for underprivileged children and is the chairperson of the Jacksonville Foster Grandparent Program.

Incorporated, an organization of 100 women from the entertainment industry, annually raises over $1 million through special events to provide grants to 28 organizations that serve mentally disabled and abused children. Accepting the award is Miriam Nelson Meyers, one of SHARE's founders.

Mosbacher, Jr., was instrumental in the development of the InfoNet Task Force, which provides referral and information services to the unemployed in the Houston, Texas, area, and the After School Partnership, which assists latchkey children at 14 sites. Rob Mosbacher.

Hodges, who resides with her husband in Seoul, Korea, has developed a network of 15 hospitals across the United States that has provided lifesaving heart surgery for over 2,000 needy Korean youngsters in the past 15 years. Mrs. Hodges is known as the Korean heart lady. Harriet Hodges.

Luis Gomez has been providing no-cost medical care to more than 50 people with leprosy in Juarez, Mexico, since 1980 and founded the Father Damien Fund to help purchase medicine and equipment for the work.

R. Roper founded the Stephanie Roper Committee and Foundation in memory of her daughter, in order to develop and guarantee victims' rights in the court system and to provide assistance to crime victims and their families. Roberta Roper.

Comeback is sponsored by Valencia Community College to involve college students as counselors for court-referred young people who participate in community service projects as a way of providing positive experiences and building self-esteem. Accepting is Dr. William Prentiss, founder of Operation Comeback.

Incorporated, Time to Read Program involves over 500 employee volunteers who tutored more than 600 functionally illiterate adults and young people in reading at 20 sites in 1987, using specially designed curriculum and popular reading material published by Time, Incorporated. Accepting for Time to Read is Donald M. Wilson, corporate vice president.

And finally, the Barberton Free Clinic was developed by the Council of Labor to provide free medical assistance to unemployed residents of the Ohio community, which has a 33-percent unemployment rate. Accepting the award is Charles Lemmon, president of the Barberton Council of Labor.

And now, Mr. President, we have a special addition to the program, which may come as a bit of a surprise to you. For the past 6 years, Presidential Volunteer Action Awards have been conferred at ceremonies here in the East Room of the White House. This program was created by you to recognize and reward the best in America -- our volunteer spirit. And as a result of the executive order which you signed, this will become a permanent Presidential program. For years to come, outstanding volunteers from across this country will receive the personal thanks from future Presidents of the United States.

Mr. President, the volunteer community of this country would like to do some thanking of its own. To represent the millions of volunteers across this country, we have asked Mr. Bobby Trimble to join us today. Bobby was recognized at the very first President's Volunteer Action Awards Luncheon for a program he created called Christmas in April. It did not have much national recognition back then in 1982, but through your assistance, it has spread all across America. Through Christmas in April programs across the Nation, thousands of volunteers work each year to rebuild homes and indeed lives of those who are in need. Now, may I ask Bobby Trimble to please come forward.

It feels good. I'm president of the Christmas in April program in Midland, Texas, which has been going on for 16 years, and from this humble beginning 16 years ago, has spread out to a number of other cities in the United States. We did not grow very much until after the 1982 awards, which I was very fortunate to receive this from Mrs. Reagan. She was volunteering also that day for her husband because he was out of town. [Laughter] And so I appreciated that very much.

Let me give you just a little bit -- so many people say, well, what is Christmas in April? So, I always like to explain just a little bit in a short, short way. We take volunteers from all walks of life, buy the materials for them, and let them overhaul an old, beat-up house. And it's amazing what volunteers who've had no experience of being a carpenter or a roofer or a plumber or a painter -- to see what they can do to an old house. But then you get the question: ``I have no skills.'' So, the first thing you do -- put them on the trash details.

Your leadership has helped to renew an old American tradition of neighbor helping neighbor. You have inspired the Nation to reach for the best in itself, and to devote its energies to making our communities, our nation, and the world a better place. Under your Presidency, voluntarism and charitable giving in our country have reached an all-time high. And it hasn't stopped here. In the past few years, we have seen a tremendous interest by other countries who have observed what has happened in America, then duplicated it beyond our shores. Over the past 5, 6, 7 years, I have had requests of how to get a Christmas neighbor program started from all over the United States, Canada, and as far away as Israel. So, you can see what good publicity does.

The President. Yes. [Laughter] Well, again, God bless you all. Thank you all for what you've done. And this is -- and as you've heard here today and those that have spoken already -- all of this is going around the world, too, because there have been meetings abroad. And as a matter of fact, at the economic summit a year ago in Venice, Italy, between meetings, I was invited to a house and found myself looking at some Americans who were there, and who were helping Italy with their implementation of a private enterprise program of their own, so that they could do things as you do, without waiting to see if government's going to do them first. And this is spreading all over the world, and it all started right here under that grand old flag.

During the past 4 months, the Senate has performed its constitutional duties with respect to the advice and consent to this Treaty in an exceptionally serious and diligent manner. On the Administration's part, we spared no effort to respond to the Senate's needs, and to do our best to ensure that the Senate had all the information it needed to carry out its constitutional responsibilities.

Administration witnesses appeared in more than 70 formal hearings and many more informal briefings; we provided detailed written answers to over 1,300 questions for the record from the Committees and individual Senators; and we provided access to the negotiating record of the Treaty, comprising 31 bound volumes.

In short, I believe the Executive branch and the Senate took their responsibilities very seriously and made every effort to work together to fulfill them in the common interest of advancing the national security of the United States and our Allies and friends. The Treaty will bear witness to the sincerity and diligence of those in the Executive branch and the Senate who have taken part in this effort.

Senate condition relating to the Treaty Clauses of the Constitution apparently seeks to alter the law of treaty interpretation. The accompanying report of the Committee on Foreign Relations accords primacy, second only to the Treaty text, to all Executive branch statements to the Senate above all other sources which international forums or even U.S. courts would consider in interpreting treaties. It subordinates fundamental and essential treaty interpretative sources such as the treaty parties' intent, the treaty negotiating record and the parties' subsequent practices.

Treaties are agreements between sovereign states and must be interpreted in accordance with accepted principles of international law and United States Supreme Court jurisprudence. As a practical matter, the Senate condition only can work against the interests of the United States by creating situations in which a treaty has one meaning under international law and another under domestic law. Unilateral restrictions on the United States should be avoided, especially in a treaty affecting vital national security interests. With respect to U.S. law, the President must respect the mutual understandings reached with the Senate during the advice and consent process. But Executive statements should be given binding weight only when they were authoritatively communicated to the Senate by the Executive and were part of the basis on which the Senate granted its advice and consent to ratification. This is in accordance with the legal standards applied by our courts in determining legislative intent. I commend the thoughtful statements made during the Senate debate by Senators Specter, Roth, Wilson, and others which amplify these concerns.

Administration does not take the position that the Executive branch can disregard authoritative Executive statements to the Senate, and we have no intention of changing the interpretation of the INF Treaty which was presented to the Senate. On the contrary, this Administration has made it clear that it will consider all such authoritative statements as having been made in good faith. Nonetheless the principles of treaty interpretation recognized and repeatedly invoked by the courts may not be limited or changed by the Senate alone, and those principles will govern any future disputes over interpretation of this Treaty. As Senator Lugar pointed out during the debate, the Supreme Court may well have the final judgment, which would be binding on the President and Senate alike. Accordingly, I am compelled to state that I cannot accept the proposition that a condition in a resolution to ratification can alter the allocation of rights and duties under the Constitution; nor could I, consistent with my oath of office, accept any diminution claimed to be effected by such a condition in the constitutional powers and responsibilities of the Presidency.

I do not believe that any difference of views about the Senate condition will have any practical effect on the implementation of the Treaty. I believe the Executive branch and the Senate have a very good common understanding of the terms of the Treaty, and I believe that we will handle any question of interpretation that may arise in a spirit of mutual accommodation and respect.

In light of the current political and economic crisis in Panama and the actions of Manuel Antonio Noriega and Manuel Solis Palma and their forces that engendered this crisis and are preventing the legitimate government of President Eric Arturo Delvalle from restoring order and democracy to that country, I have determined that it is in the interests of the United States to restrict the entrance into the United States as immigrants and nonimmigrants of certain persons who formulate or implement the policies of Manuel Antonio Noriega and Manuel Solis Palma.

Section 1. The entry into the United States as immigrants and nonimmigrants of Panamanian nationals (and their immediate families), who formulate or implement the policies of Manuel Antonio Noriega and Manuel Solis Palma and who are designated by the Secretary of State or his designee, is hereby suspended.

Sec. 2. Nothing in this Proclamation shall be construed (1) to derogate from United States Government obligations under applicable international agreements or (2) to prohibit the entry into the United States of individuals for the purpose of submitting to legal proceedings initiated by the United States Government.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this tenth day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

In the June 7 - 9 round of talks, the resistance proposed specific steps to implement a calendar of previous Sandinista commitments for establishing democracy in Nicaragua in conjunction with the cease-fire process. However, it became clear that the Sandinistas were not interested in democratization and national reconciliation. Their sole goal was the disarmament of the resistance. Deeds, not more words, are needed. Those who insisted that the best way to achieve peace and democracy in Nicaragua was to withdraw military pressure on the Sandinistas now bear a special responsibility to press for democracy in Nicaragua.

State, had scheduled visits to the Central American democracies to brief their leaders on events at the recent summit in Moscow, including the summit discussions on regional issues. The President now has directed that the Ambassador seek the views of the leaders of the democracies on the current situation in Nicaragua as well.

In one week, I go to Toronto for the annual economic summit with the leaders of the major industrial democracies. The United States along with our strong allies -- Canada, France, Germany, Great Britain, Italy, Japan, and the European Community -- form the industrial and technological backbone of the free world.

Perhaps foremost will be the worldwide economic revolution that has unleashed ever greater levels of prosperity with lower tax rates. America led the way with major tax cuts and tax reform, and the other major industrial democracies have either cut their tax rates or are now in the process of doing so. I'm proud to say that we now lead the world with the lowest top personal tax rate of any of the major economic powers. We are also leading the way in creating jobs, providing employment for a greater percentage of our labor force than any of the other major industrial democracies. In fact, U.S. employment is at its highest level ever, and we've also brought down inflation and interest rates.

It's not surprising that country after country has followed us on the path to greater economic freedom and begun to replace their statist policies with deregulation, privatization, and freer trade. One of the great lessons of the last 7 years is that when people in free economies are allowed to trade with one another around the world the result is greater prosperity for us all. Certainly, the United States has been one of the biggest gainers in the global economy. You've probably heard that we're now in the longest peacetime economic expansion in U.S. history. But this is also the first economic expansion in the postwar period in which the U.S. economy has grown faster than most of its major trading partners. So, yes, we're doing particularly well, but when free countries trade and invest with one another, there are no losers, only winners.

Of total foreign direct investment in the world, nearly 40 percent, by far the largest share, consists of Americans investing overseas. But it's not a one-way street. At the same time, the United States also receives more foreign investment from abroad than any other country. So, we truly are the investment capital of the world. The same thing is true regarding trade. We import more and export more than any other country on Earth.

With that in mind, I want to reaffirm my commitment to enactment this year of responsible trade legislation. To help achieve positive trade legislation, I've directed my senior advisers to stand ready to assist the congressional leadership on a new trade bill -- one that will strengthen America's international competitiveness and create even more new jobs for Americans. And make no mistake, the global economy is the basis of our prosperity and the foundation of our economic future. I can think of no surer way of derailing our economy than to try through protectionist measures to seal America off from trade and investment with the other countries of the world.

One of the historic events of our time is the U.S.-Canada free trade agreement that I entered into this year with Prime Minister Brian Mulroney. This agreement between the world's two greatest trading partners will eliminate tariff barriers between the United States and Canada by the year 1999 and establish the largest free trade area on Earth. The advantages to both our countries will be enormous in terms of jobs and prosperity. But as much as this pathbreaking agreement does for the people of the United States and Canada, this agreement, looked at in the sweep of history, is truly a gift to the world. It creates a model that can be imitated and expanded and ultimately made universal among free nations. And that's something we can truly be proud of.

U.S.-Portugal Agreement is similar in objective to the social security agreements already in force with Belgium, Canada, the Federal Republic of Germany, Italy, Norway, Spain, Sweden, Switzerland, and the United Kingdom. Such bilateral agreements provide for limited coordination between the United States and foreign social security systems to overcome the problems of gaps in protection and of dual coverage and taxation for workers who move from one country to the other.

And we are against totalitarianism. We're for freedom and democracy -- for them without hesitation or apology, and virtually, I would venture, without division. This is the first great truth to keep in mind. There may be divisions within our countries as to methods, but there are none as to fundamental goals.

In the last decade and a half, we in the democracies have, in true democratic fashion, tested the various propositions about the methods for best approaching East-West affairs. Now that we have an INF treaty, the first agreement ever to eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles and with the most stringent verification procedures in arms control history; now that the Soviets have begun withdrawing from Afghanistan; now that we've begun to see internal changes within the Soviet Union -- can there be any doubt that we were right about a forward strategy for freedom, right about the importance of candor regarding the differences between our systems, and right to say that the road to peace is not through weakness, division, or preemptive concession, but through unity, confidence, and strength?

In just a few days I will attend another summit, the economic summit in Toronto, as the General has told you. And this is an excellent forum before which to talk about our hopes for that summit. I know that the Atlantic Council is examining how to best integrate economics and security. The International Management and Development Institute is meeting to discuss economic challenges facing us.

Over the years, the economic summits have been a cornerstone of cooperation among the major democratic economies. They're part of the superstructure of Western strength and East-West affairs. And here again, our democracies have, as democracies do, tested among ourselves various propositions about economic growth and vitality since the first of the summits that I attended in 1981.

Everywhere in the democratic world we're seeing the emergence of a new consensus: that growth and opportunity must go hand in hand. Consider taxes. In the past 3 years, Britain, Canada, Japan, and France, among others, have all let their top tax rates tumble. Why? Well, here's what Nigel Lawson, Britain's Chancellor of the Exchequer, said not long ago, in his words: ``The reason for the worldwide trend toward lower top rates of tax is clear. Excessive rates of income tax destroy enterprise, encourage avoidance, and drive talent to more hospitable shores overseas. Far from raising additional revenue, over time they actually raise less.'' And he concluded, ``By contrast, a reduction in the top rates of income tax can, over time, result in a higher, not lower, yield to the Exchequer.'' Well, it seems I've heard somebody else say that before, somewhere.

Paying for the excesses of government spending with high inflation has all but stopped. And at least in the United States, deficit spending by government is falling. The idea that connects all this is the market. The industrial world, the entire world, is turning away from state control of economies and returning to the marketplace. From India to Argentina, from Africa to China, and even in the Soviet Union, the shackles of state economic domination are beginning to loosen. And you know something's happening when there's talk of lower taxes in the Soviet Union.

Third World countries or responding to the tremors in the world financial markets last October, we work together. Today we use a common set of books to tell how our policies are doing, and we're working in common for balance in trade and capital flows and government budgets and for surefootedness in the world's financial markets. Starting with the United States, the summit countries have had nearly 6 years of uninterrupted growth. I'd like to make it 60 and more.

But it can't happen if we try to live as if we're the only economy on Earth. The summit nations are working together as never before because our economies are tied together as never before. To give an example of this, someone pointed out to me recently, while the New York Stock Exchange does $8 billion of business on a good day, the foreign exchange markets do over 25 times as much business every day. In this global marketplace, industries around the world rise and fall together. The decline in the worldwide demand for steel was felt in the Rhine Basin of Europe in just the same way it was felt in our Lehigh Valley. Thousands of jobs disappeared in both places, and not just to foreign competition. Here in America, high-tech minimills melted down the business of many old, integrated producers.

We lost the same kind of jobs other countries lost, but unlike those European nations that lag behind in cutting taxes, regulations, and government ownership, we created new jobs in place of the old ones. Allentown in Lehigh Valley was once a home of heavy industry. Then the steel mill and the truck factory shut down. Many people wrote off Allentown -- too soon. In place of a few big, old companies, dozens of new companies started up. Small companies that were already open grew. Entrepreneurs created what David Birch, MIT's authority on job creation, calls a hidden economy. He adds that all across America ``the small companies, not the big ones that get so much attention, are building a new economy that is providing jobs and making the country competitive again.'' And that's why today Allentown has an unemployment rate of only 5.4 percent.

For all of us, what's happening in Japan or Germany, Britain, France, Italy, or Canada is as momentous as what's happening in California, Florida, New York, or Illinois. There's a lesson in all this -- in the story of Allentown and one of the so-called Rust Belt, as well as the globalization of trade and finance -- and the lesson is that the future belongs to the flexible. It belongs to those who look at the problem and see an opportunity, to those who look at the unknown and see an adventure, to those who look at the untried and see a challenge, to those who have shed the weight of structural rigidities and protective subsidies and face the future with energy and excitement.

Well, it's time that we in the summit nations forget about quitting time and join in a great venture to progress -- a joint venture that opens the international marketplace and that also strengthens the weak links in the international economy. Let's join together to help restore the economies of two countries: one, the Philippines, an heroic democracy ravaged by Communist-led insurrection; the other, Afghanistan, a victim of brutal aggression. Let's join together to bring the newly industrialized countries into the full and mature place in the world trading system that they have earned. Let's join together in helping the countries of sub-Saharan Africa work out their debt problems. We'll take up their problems, as we have those of other debtor nations, on a case-by-case basis, working to help develop economic policies that promote growth and opportunity. The United States has already indicated its willingness to consider new ways of rescheduling the debt of the poorest countries, ways that can produce substantial new relief. And let us join together to attack the lifeblood of one trade that should never be part of international trade: the international narcotics trade. At this summit, we should join in a common offensive against money laundering and the flow of drug profits through the world's financial institutions.

Pushing forward the trade negotiations, a joint venture for progress, strengthening the system of policy coordination -- this is the agenda of the Toronto summit. We'll be building on a decade of progress, on the new economic consensus in our countries. We'll be looking to continue the building of the global marketplace.

I know there are some who want to turn back, who want to return to the more insular and isolationist days of old. I vetoed the trade bill last week because I don't believe we can or should turn back. Critics of our policies complain that, on one hand, America is, as they say, ``exporting jobs,'' which is to say our companies invest overseas, and on the other hand, that America is ``selling itself to foreigners,'' which is to say that foreign companies are investing here. Put it together, and what they're really saying is ``turn back.'' The isolationism of their foreign policy walks hand in hand with the isolationism of their economic policy, and both will lead us to disaster.

We're in a new age of invention and exploration, a time when the vast capacity of the human imagination is opening new universes for exploration. ``To see the universe in a grain of sand'' is no longer a poetic metaphor, but the daily reality of the silicon chip. F. Scott Fitzgerald wrote that when the early explorers just looked on this land, they must have held their breath. They had, for the last time in history, come face to face with something commensurate to man's infinite capacity for wonder. Yet it was not for the last time. We, too, stand on the shores of something as vast: of an economic and technological future immense with promise.

If we seize it, if we don't turn away from it, that future will transform the democratic world and, I am confident after my visit to Moscow, the countries of the Soviet bloc as well. I believe that the house of democracy's current consensus for strength and growth will usher in a new age of which we can only dream. But if we have the courage and the resolve, I believe that age will give us a world of peace and freedom, of opportunity and hope for generations to come. And I believe that even more after the summit that we've just been to and what I saw on the faces of the rank and file, the people of the Soviet Union.

Senator Howard H. Baker, who has asked the President's permission to return to private life at this juncture in the administration. The President has enjoyed a close, personal working relationship with Senator Baker since his appointment as Chief of Staff on February 27, 1987. The President has known Senator Baker for many years, having worked with him as Senate majority leader to implement so many of the Reagan initiatives of the first term.

Ken has been Deputy Chief of Staff since March 23, 1987, and has been a close confidant and adviser since that time. In addition, Senator Baker recommended him for this new position. I have known Ken since the earliest days of my administration, when he served in our Office of Legislative Affairs. I welcome his leadership in the next several months, as we attend the eighth economic summit of industrialized nations and conduct the affairs of government for the next 7 months.

Ken will be my principal aide and will lead the White House staff as we head into the homestretch. He is an outstanding manager and skilled strategist, who has been fundamental to the significant accomplishments, foreign and domestic, we have achieved since Ken returned as Deputy Chief of Staff in March 1987. Ken has given me firm and effective counsel, and I look forward to his tenure as Chief of Staff.

The President. Yes. It would be a happy comment because it shows that we have continued to bring down the trade deficit. It has been on a pretty continual decline, and it's been brought about this time by not only an increase in exports but a decrease in imports.

The President. We already have that, and we have a number of plants that have relations with their unions, that in their union labor contract have provisions for that. It is just that I believe that excessive controls and regulations by government -- well, we've seen a comparison with some of our trading partners that have too much of that, and they've not been able to match our economic expansion.

As we discussed previously, I would like to leave your Administration before the end of the term. I think this is a particularly good time to do that and, therefore, I ask that I be relieved of my responsibilities as Chief of Staff as of the close of business on June 30th.

When you asked me to undertake this job in February of 1987 we discussed a number of objectives. First and foremost was to navigate the troubled waters of the Iran-contra affair. I believe that task is now behind us, and I think your representations have been fully supported by the record. I especially pay tribute to Arthur B. Culvahouse, Jr., White House Counsel, and his staff for their excellent work in these matters. The second item was to see that, notwithstanding the hearings and inquiries related to Iran-contra, we were able to carry forward your agenda. I believe that has been done; indeed, I think that far from being immobilized, the past 16 months have been among the most energetic and successful of your Administration. I particularly wish to single out Tom Griscom, your Assistant for Communications and Planning, for his excellent assistance in planning the schedule and events that made this possible. And finally, we discussed the foreign policy opportunities that lay before you, particularly in the field of arms control. I think the completion of the INF treaty and its ratification by the Senate followed by a successful Moscow Summit ranks among the most historic of your achievements during your Presidency. I believe that we owe a special debt of gratitude, first, to Frank Carlucci as your National Security Adviser and later, Colin Powell, as well, of course, as Secretary Shultz for these accomplishments.

There is still much to be done, particularly a full legislative schedule as well as continuing negotiations in the arms control field. However, you have a good staff in place, and I am confident that they can continue to receive your guidance and carry out your wishes for the remaining months of the Administration. I recommend Ken Duberstein, my able and experienced Deputy, to take my place as Chief of Staff. Therefore, Mr. President, for these reasons and for personal reasons, I make this request effective June 30th.

It has been my pleasure to work with you as fellow politicians dating from 1966, when you were elected Governor and I was elected U.S. Senator, as Majority Leader in the U.S. Senate during your first term, and now as your Chief of Staff. I will always treasure that experience and be grateful to you and the First Lady for your historic contribution to this country.

The President. Ladies and gentlemen, it's been my great pleasure to meet today with Prime Minister De Mita of Italy, who is no stranger to the White House. But this is the first time that he comes as Prime Minister, and I want to begin by offering our warmest congratulations.

I regard this visit as extremely important. As members of the Atlantic alliance and as major industrial states, the United States and the Republic of Italy have much to discuss and much to do. Accordingly, our discussions today were wide-ranging and extremely useful. Although our agenda was far too long for me to discuss in detail, let me just give you some of the highlights. First, I gave the Prime Minister my views on where our relationship stands with the Soviet Union and where it is going.

I told him that we're very pleased with the progress that we've made on the broad agenda and, of course, with the entry into force of the INF treaty. I also told him of my firm belief that without Italy's courage, determination, and support throughout INF deployment and negotiations there would have been no treaty. In arms reductions and the other areas on our agenda, much work remains to be done. We will continue to depend, and gratefully so, upon Italy's support as an ally and advice as a friend.

One of the important issues before our alliance is where we will redeploy the 401st Tactical Fighter Wing, the F - 16's. Italy's willingness, at NATO invitation, to consider accepting the planes on its soil is typical of Italy's serious approach toward its alliance commitments. Its willingness to do its part, to share the risks and responsibilities as well as the benefits of NATO membership, is exemplary.

Prime Minister and I will meet again shortly in Toronto, where we'll participate in our economic summit. We reviewed some of the issues that we expect to discuss there, including Italy's welcome initiative to strengthen international environmental protection activities. Prime Minister De Mita and I also talked about our mutual desire for a peaceful end to the conflict between Iran and Iraq and for a comprehensive peace in the Middle East.

Another issue of great concern to all of us is international terrorism. In the last 6 months, Italy has been the victim of two shocking incidents: the death of one of your close friends, Mr. Prime Minister, in which I want to extend again my deepest condolences, and an attack on a USO club in Naples, in which an American servicewoman was killed. These incidents, terrible as they are, only serve to strengthen our resolve. And they remind us of the importance of our cooperative efforts against the human scourge of terrorism.

U.S.-Italian relations could hardly be better, but remarkably, they are. In fact, I believe that we've made significant progress in a number of areas, and I'm confident that we'll continue this trend for the foreseeable future. Mr.

I have once again expressed to the President the admiration and esteem of the Italian Government for the courage and determination with which he has pursued his farsighted plan to effectively ease the tensions between East and West during his recent discussions with the General Secretary of the Soviet Communist Party, Gorbachev. Italy warmly welcomes the outcome of the Moscow summit and believes that it is a prelude to further and more wide-ranging agreements along the paths of peace.

I reaffirm the fact that Italy will continue with conviction to share in the commitments and undertakings of the alliance which binds us, safeguards our freedoms, and underpins the development of the West.

The prospects for a lasting peace which are now emerging in the world require us to prevent any weakening of Atlantic solidarity, to refrain from any actions of unilateral disarmament, and to ensure that differential security zones are not created in Europe. I also stressed to President Reagan the importance we attribute to strengthening the relationship between the United States and Europe -- that Europe which represents the other major goal of the Italian Government and the major contribution which a strong, united, and prosperous Europe -- coupled with a solid Euro-American partnership -- can make towards the peace and development of the whole world.

We expressed a shared concern at the protracted states of crisis in the Middle East, Southeast Asia, southern Africa, and Latin America. We also expressed the hope that the improved climate of trust which now characterizes the dialog between East and West may exercise a favorable effect on these crises and help lead to peaceful and fair settlements.

Particular attention was devoted to the preparations for the summit of the seven most industrialized nations in Toronto in relation to economic growth, trade issues, and problems of international indebtedness. In Toronto, the seven will have to demonstrate their political farsightedness in order to withstand any backward protectionist tendencies and any selfish inward-looking attitudes. I also reminded President Reagan of the particular importance which Italy attaches to the risks connected with the deterioration of the environment and the fight against the worldwide scourge of drugs.

Lastly, we reviewed bilateral relations between the United States and Italy and expressed our satisfaction at how well they are faring, along with the hope that cooperation and exchanges in every sector will continue to increase and intensify. There is a fundamental bond which unites Italy and the United States in this respect, and that is represented by Americans of Italian origin. They continue to make a growing contribution to strengthening the ties between our two countries.

Today's conversations have enhanced my personal conviction that there exists a special relationship between Italy and the United States, a permanent political solidarity from which our two countries will greatly benefit in their commitment to the pursuit of a future characterized by peace, justice, and progress.

President today accorded the personal rank of Ambassador to C. Paul Robinson, of New Jersey, in his capacity as the United States Negotiator for the Nuclear Testing Talks, and nominated him for the rank of Ambassador while so serving. The accordance of the personal rank of Ambassador is an interim measure pending his confirmation by the Senate.

Americans have become increasingly aware of health and environmental problems associated with the careless or improper management of municipal solid waste. In many densely populated regions, increasing waste volumes, shrinking landfill capacity, and rising costs of disposal have added to our concerns about the need for proper waste management.

Recycling is becoming increasingly important in municipal solid waste management. Many communities have recognized the value of recycling in waste management for some time. Volunteer programs exist in many towns and counties, and some States have recently enacted mandatory recycling laws. In addition, the recycling of scrap metals, paper, and glass has become a well-developed industry. Despite these efforts, however, only 10 percent of our Nation's municipal solid waste is recycled; nearly 80 percent of municipal solid waste is disposed of in landfills and the remaining 10 percent is incinerated.

The benefits of recycling waste materials are substantial. Recycling saves energy and thus preserves important fuel resources. It also avoids the pollution created in extracting resources from their natural environment. Through recycling, wastes are diverted from landfills and our limited landfill space is preserved.

These benefits can only be realized through more recycling. The Environmental Protection Agency considers feasible a recycling level of 25 percent nationally by the early 1990's through the efforts of States and municipalities and the cooperation of individual households and businesses in separating recyclable materials from their waste and in not generating unnecessary waste.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourteenth day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

June 1940, acting under the color of a secret protocol to the infamous Ribbentrop-Molotov Non-Aggression Pact signed the previous year, Soviet forces occupied the independent Baltic States of Estonia, Latvia, and Lithuania. These small, democratic republics were crushed by the armies of their expansionist neighbor and illegally incorporated into the Soviet empire. In the aftermath of the Soviet takeover, tens of thousands of Balts were imprisoned, deported, or killed. Their religious and cultural heritage was denigrated and repressed. An alien political system, inimical to the ideals of individual liberty and self-determination, was imposed upon them.

The end of World War II saw the defeat of ambitious empire-builders in Germany and Japan, but foreign domination of the Baltic States that resulted from the collusion of Hitler and Stalin remained in place. For nearly five decades, the Soviet Union has tried in vain to convince the Baltic peoples to accept its hegemony, but its efforts are doomed to failure.

The situation has improved for some Soviet human rights activists in recent months, but Baltic men and women still suffer imprisonment, banishment, and persecution for daring to protest the continuing suppression of their national independence and cultures. Yet, despite the risks, they continue to speak out, to plead, and to claim their rights to religious, cultural, and political freedom.

Our government has never recognized the forcible incorporation of the Baltic States into the Soviet Union, and we never will. The American people, citizens of a land conceived in liberty and dedicated to equality under God for all, support the aspirations of the Baltic people to regain the freedom that was theirs and to chart their own course. To this goal we pledge anew our unswerving commitment.

Reagan has urged the Justice Department to make a thorough and exhaustive investigation of allegations concerning fraud and bribery associated with defense contracts. The President received a briefing from Secretary of Defense Carlucci on Tuesday afternoon concerning the investigation. The FBI confirmed Tuesday that an investigation has been underway for some time regarding fraudulent activity within the Department of Defense contracting process.

At the President's direction, Senator Baker called the Attorney General this morning to discuss the President's conviction that the investigation by the Department of Justice and the FBI must be pursued thoroughly and conclusively.

National Science Foundation has been and will remain a key part of the national effort to expand our research achievements and productivity and to remain competitive in world markets through innovation and new discoveries.

Mr. President, Jim Gerstenzang, Los Angeles Times. I'd like to shift to the domestic arena and ask if you think that Speaker Wright's book deal might mute the political impact of the ethics questions in the Presidential campaign, and also, just generally what your thoughts are on these reports now?

The President. Well, this is -- once again, I'm going to fall back on the same thing I've done when it's been with other people. I think it is proper that there is an investigation going forward with regard to these charges, but I don't think that anyone should give an opinion until we know whether they are just accusations or whether they have really happened.

The President. I have to wonder if it should not be an independent counsel from the standpoint of the relationship of the Speaker to the majority of the committee. And I think everyone would feel that it was more proper if it was done by an appointed investigator.

Mr. President, on the issue of the assistance for the Nicaraguan resistance, you're coming under renewed pressure to provide that assistance on the one hand from the State Department. There are those who are saying that you won't be able to get it through Congress. Have you reached any decision? What's your thinking at this point on what's needed? Is it time for more military assistance to push the negotiations back on track?

The President. I think it is so apparent that that is what is necessary it would be ridiculous for anyone to oppose it. We went along with the peace plan that was agreed to among all the Central American states and to give it a chance. It is apparent that the Sandinistas are not going to democratize. They're resisting at the same time that they demand the contras set a date for laying down their arms. But they won't set a date for when they will meet the other terms of that peace plan, which were a pluralistic, democratic society in Nicaragua, a government in which the people had a decision to make in elections and so forth. And it seems to me that the efforts that have been made in the Congress and succeeded in reducing and eliminating our ability to help the freedom fighters -- that that has literally given a signal to the Sandinistas that they can continue to hold out.

Now, if we want them to continue meeting and arriving at the settlement that the peace plan was supposed to bring about, which had as one of its aims democracy in Nicaragua, well, I think then that we've got to restore the threat to the Sandinistas, that they must see that the people of Nicaragua do have a force there that can be used to bring about an equitable settlement.

The President. We're discussing -- I'm not going to give any answer to anything right now. We're discussing where we go from here and what we're going to do. And some of their leaders, as you know, are here in Washington right now. But I think it is evident that the Sandinistas were encouraged into thinking that maybe they could continue to hold out.

Remember that when the revolution was going on against Somoza the revolutionaries went to the Organization of American States and asked them to ask Somoza, the dictator, to step down in order to end the killing. And the Organization of American States asked the revolutionaries what were the goals of the revolution, and they were provided in writing. And they were democracy and freedom for the people and all the things that the rest of us have and believe in. And this is what was promised, and Somoza stepped down. And then the only really centrally organized group in the revolution, the Sandinista organization, a Communist organization, began getting rid of the other revolutionaries, either by exile or execution or whatever. And they established their Communist government, not a democracy.

And what this whole fight is about is to bring them back to the promises that were made to all the rest of us here in America about what kind of a democratic government they would have. But as I say, when the help was denied to the freedom fighters and it looked like if the Sandinistas just held out longer the freedom fighters would have to give up -- this isn't good enough.

It is with deep regret that today I ask to be relieved of my duties as Assistant to the President for Communications and Planning effective June 30. There is never a good time to make such a request. But after careful consideration of both personal and professional obligations, I have reached this decision.

Over the past seven years, I have had the opportunity to be involved -- either directly or indirectly -- in implementing many of the policies that you have advanced. As an aide to then-Senate Majority Leader Howard Baker, I was able to observe the early steps that you took to chart a new spirit in America and to begin the longest peacetime economic expansion in history. In February 1987, I was privileged to be asked to become part of the White House team that was put together by your new chief-of-staff, Senator Baker. This was a period of great challenge, but also of great promise. With your direction, the past 16 months have been a time to finish the work of today, and to look ahead to tomorrow.

To have been part of the team that worked on the Washington and Moscow summits will remain as the high points of my tenure at the White House, because not only did you achieve the first agreement to reduce U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles, but you also laid the foundation for a continued, broad relationship between our two countries.

So when I think back to these last several months, it will be with fond memories and a sense of pride to have been on this team. I feel the White House staff under Senator Baker's leadership has performed extremely well. I am confident that same performance will continue under the leadership of Ken Duberstein, because much remains to be done over the next seven months.

How do you do? Thank you all. I'm delighted to have all of you here today. And I want to thank Ronna Romney and the commissioners and the program sponsors for their generous contributions that make all this possible.

We do have something in common though this morning: All of you are seniors, and I'm a sort of senior myself. [Laughter] Believe me, when you get to be my kind of senior status there's no greater fun than a chance to meet your kind of senior. All those cliches you've been hearing from your commencement speakers about how much you mean to us and how you represent the future and hope and the best in our lives -- well, they're more than just cliches. So, having all of you here today is a morale boost, and I thank you for coming by.

So, you can see that I don't have to do much reminding. You're wise to remember your parents and teachers and counselors and principals who worked so hard with you for this moment. And I hope you know that gratitude isn't mentioned by us old folks just because we want to get in on the action and take a little credit for your success. Really it's another way of trying to pass along to you something valuable we've learned, something that will help in the future.

Secretary of Education Bennett has quoted a scholar who said that he sometimes worried about young people because while many of them know ``where they are in space, they don't know where they are in time.'' Well, he meant simply that many young people have a sense of the dynamics of the modern world, but may not be quite as aware of the older values and deeper wisdom that made the creativity of this modern world possible.

I got a sense of that hunger, by the way, 2 weeks ago, when I was in Moscow talking to the young people there at Moscow State University. And you know, I told them about a gathering much like this one that had occurred just before I left for the summit meeting. We had here in the East Room a group of students about your age, half of them Russian and half of them American. They had been in a joint conference together. And I made the point then that really it was very difficult to tell any of them apart, that young people are much the same all across the world, as are people of every age. It's just our governments that are based on different principles.

And that's the job before you and those students in Moscow for the remainder of this century and into the next one: to bring peoples of other cultures together in that common bond of humanity and to understand that the best way to do this is to stand forthrightly for the values of our whole way of life and what it is based upon, to speak for freedom, to argue the cause for democracy, and always to bear in mind those fundamental, moral distinctions between systems of government that believe in the dignity of the individual and other systems that simply see the individual as a cog in the great machine of the state.

I know all of this strikes a very serious note on what is and should be a tremendously joyful moment for all of you. So, that's why I want to tell each of you that we're grateful to you, too. We're grateful for all the hard work you've done, but also for believing in yourselves, for reminding us that there are such things as the future and hope and capable young hands to take up the great tasks that we must leave unfinished.

So, congratulations to all of you. From one senior to another, I wish you all the best as we both set out to begin yet another chapter in our lives. I'm nearing the epilog, and you're barely through the introduction. But I'm grateful for this moment in which we could come together. Now, I'm going to go back inside and do what a little girl told me to do in a letter she wrote to me the first week I held this job. She wrote all the tasks that confronted me, and believe me, she had the problems down just about in proper order, too. And she urged me to get ahead with the business and solve them. Then she wound up with the last line in the letter that said, ``Now get back to the Oval Office, and go to work.'' [Laughter] And she was right all the way.

Maseng has served President Reagan in the White House on two separate occasions during this administration. She was Director of the Office of Public Liaison from May 1986 to July 1987 and was a member of the President's speechwriting staff from January 1981 to November 1983. Most recently Ms. Maseng served as press secretary for the Dole for President campaign. She was Assistant Secretary of Transportation for Public Affairs from November 1983 to April 1985 and was also vice president of the Beatrice Companies in Chicago, IL. Mari Maseng has served the President and the administration with distinction in three important capacities in the past 7 years. Her close relationship with the President during this period and her previous service in the White House should ensure a smooth transition in the Office of Communications.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this sixteenth day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Scleroderma, which literally means ``hard skin,'' is a painful and debilitating connective tissue disease characterized by excessive deposits of collagen in the skin. The hallmark of this disease is skin thickening, but scleroderma can also involve other organs such as the gastrointestinal tract, lungs, heart, or kidneys. The disease can begin at any age, but it usually affects people in their most productive years, and women more frequently than men.

New research findings and new approaches to diagnosis and treatment are being developed to combat scleroderma. Research studies on scleroderma include investigations of various causes of the disease, research on vascular alterations, research on regulation of collagen synthesis, and development of diagnostic probes. Such fundamental research may lead to new and improved treatment strategies that will effectively attack the disease itself.

If this work is to continue and we are to take advantage of knowledge already gained, public awareness about scleroderma and about continuing scientific research is crucial. Private voluntary organizations and the Federal government are working together to achieve this goal.

As the Congress prepares to consider the HUD-Independent Agencies Appropriations Act for fiscal year 1989, I want to emphasize the importance to the Nation's future of full funding and support for science, space and technology programs.

Timely restoration of the Nation's Space Shuttle capability is critical to national security. Establishment of the Space Station will advance the frontiers of scientific knowledge and strengthen cooperation in space among the United States and its Allies.

Deployment of the CDSF will begin to tap the commercial potential of space to serve the Nation's economic needs. The program initiatives of the National Science Foundation to increase the number of research awards, to improve undergraduate science and engineering programs, and to establish new Science and Technology Centers all are essential ingredients for improvement of the Nation's science infrastructure.

We have considered the full range of Federal programs and their competing demands on scarce taxpayers' dollars and have concluded that full funding of science, space and technology programs must remain a top priority. I urge the Congress to provide full funding and support for these programs.

Canada Free Trade, and in particular, let me thank Jim Robinson for taking the lead in this effort. I know you've already heard from Jim Baker and Clayton Yeutter. I think you know the key role that they've played in achieving this historic agreement, which will mean greater jobs and prosperity for generations to come.

If there was ever a case of being on the right side of history, it's certainly true of the Americans and the Canadians who have helped achieve our free trade agreement. I think people on both sides of the border realize that this mutually beneficial agreement is part of a shared destiny, but it's the hard work of people like you, in both countries, who made it happen and who are now helping to finish the job.

The truth is that the biggest winners in this agreement are the citizens of both the United States and Canada: Both will get more jobs, faster growth, lower prices, and come out miles ahead of the protectionist countries of the world. Under this trade pact, Americans and Canadians, the world's two greatest trading partners, will, by doing business with each other, have an alternative to the tariffs and trade barriers that we both face in doing business with other countries. So, in creating the largest free trade area on Earth, both of our countries can become more competitive.

What the U.S.-Canada agreement accomplishes on a bilateral basis is a tremendous example of what we can, and ultimately must, achieve multilaterally. In that sense, this agreement is a gift to the world. It creates a model that can be imitated and expanded and, ultimately, made universal among free nations.

America has been performing strongly in world markets. In a report released this week, the Nation's April trade deficit fell by 15.5 percent, bringing it down to $9.9 billion, which is the lowest monthly figure in more than 2\1/2\ years. These results continue the progress that's been underway for several quarters. In fact, in the first quarter of this year, U.S. exports in goods and services rose at an annual rate of over 20 percent. Now, this is the kind of good news that I'm delighted to carry to the Toronto summit.

I meet in a few days with the heads of the major industrial democracies, I will urge that we continue to work together to open our markets. We need to give the Uruguay round of GATT [General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade] negotiations another push forward.

Trade-distorting subsidies are so pervasive around the world that no single nation -- or two nations -- can afford to give up these practices unilaterally or bilaterally. We must seek a multilateral solution.

In the important new areas of trade in services and trade-related investment, the agreement with Canada breaks new ground and shows the way to a multilateral accord. The multilateral trade talks are scheduled to go for 4 years. But we can't afford to let those talks languish now, as we near the halfway point. In Toronto, we, the heads of the major industrial states, should push our ministers to lay down specific goals and a timetable to the finish line by the end of this year -- no excuses. Our goal must be universal free trade among free people and free countries, and that's the shape of the future.

We import and export more than any other country on Earth. Of total foreign investment in the world, nearly 40 percent, by far the largest share, consists of Americans investing overseas. But it's not a one-way street. At the same time, the United States also receives more foreign investment from abroad than any other country. So, we truly are the investment capital of the world.

One of the reasons world capital has been drawn to the United States is that we have led the world in reducing tax rates. Back in the 1970's, the top personal income tax rate in the United States was 70 percent. That was even higher than the average of the other leading democracies -- industrial democracies. Well, today, instead of taxing our citizens more heavily than those other countries, our top Federal rate of 28 percent is the lowest, most progrowth, most competitive top personal rate of any of the leading industrial democracies in the world. And when the people around the world see the American economy booming, it's not surprising that they want to join in.

I had that experience. My first time was in Canada at the first summit. My freshman year here was held in Ottawa. And I was kind of a new kid in school. And they didn't listen much if I did talk, and I didn't talk too much and all. But it was a great thrill a couple of years later when our -- economic plan had started working. When I appeared at the table for the next summit meeting, and my six colleagues across the table were looking, and all they wanted to hear was how did we explain the American miracle that was taking place. And I took great delight in telling them about -- well, to follow our lead by cutting taxes and excess regulation and opening things up to freer trade.

America has produced nearly 17 million jobs over the last 5\1/2\ years, putting employment at an all-time high. And we're providing jobs for a larger percentage of our population than any of the other major industrial democracies. Since 1982 we've created jobs in the United States at twice the rate of Japan and Britain, 8 times the rate in Italy, and 14 times the rate of West Germany. So, anyone who thinks that we've somehow lost jobs through trade not only has it wrong, they've got it upside down and backward.

You know, I don't know whether you've known this. I had to get this job to learn that the statisticians have as our potential employment pool everyone in the United States 16 years of age and up, both sexes. Now, that includes all the youngsters still getting education; that includes all of the people retired and everything else. But that's our potential employment pool. And today, when I said the largest rate of employment -- 62.6 percent of that entire pool is employed in America today. I used to get upset not too many weeks ago at some of the Presidential candidates and things that they were saying about how we must do something to get jobs for people.

Well, we're now in the longest peacetime expansion on record, the first in the postwar period in which we've grown faster than most of our major trading partners. And after 65 consecutive months of growth not only have we kept inflation under control but the inflation rate is a good deal lower than it was before the expansion began. And with the American economy booming, not only is the end not in sight but I believe that the best is yet to come.

Well, what we're offering is the real thing -- real jobs, real growth, real prosperity for America and for Canada. And again, I want to thank you for all that you're doing to support the U.S.-Canada free trade agreement and for taking the time this year to be a part of history. I can't thank you enough, and without you, I don't think we'd be where we are today. I told a few of you just a little earlier today, a few of you, that really what we did that I think made all of this happen was we just got out of your way. As long as I'm around, we're going to keep on staying out of your way as much as we possibly can.

Thank you all very much, and welcome back to the White House. I would like to begin by thanking Charlie Wick for bringing you all together today. As many of you know, Charlie has served as Director of the USIA longer than any other Director in our history. And Charlie's been not only a trusted adviser but a good personal friend. Thank you, Charlie.

As you know, I'll be leaving on Sunday for Toronto to attend the 14th annual economic summit. These annual meetings of the leaders of the major industrial democracies have proven invaluable in setting broad policy guidelines. And I can't resist pointing out that when I attended my first economic summit in 1981 my views on the need to strengthen free markets were not exactly popular. Today things have changed. Statism and socialism are now on the defensive, even in the Communist world. There's global understanding that, yes, the free market is the engine of economic growth.

Thomas Jefferson: ``Our interest will be to throw open the door of commerce and to knock off all its shackles, giving perfect freedom to all persons for the vent of whatever they may choose to bring into our ports, and asking the same in theirs.'' In short, protectionism in any country does damage to all. And so, the goal of the administration has been to open the markets of other countries, not to close America's markets.

So, our administration, working with Congress, eliminated many, but not all, of the protectionist measures from the recent omnibus trade bill. And I'm looking forward to signing an improved version of this bill as soon as Congress sends me a bill that will strengthen America's international competitiveness and create even more new jobs for Americans. One of the central components of this bill, and this is crucial, is negotiating authority that will allow us to forcefully pursue open markets everywhere. After all, that was the original intent of the framers of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade 40 years ago.

These negotiations will build on the achievements of previous trade rounds and provide a much-needed framework for expanding trade in services, investment, and intellectual property. And they will also focus on the crisis in world agricultural trade.

I've enjoyed economics ever since I started studying it during my college days. And, no, it's not true that I was able to tell you the story of the prisoners and the lions because I was an eyewitness. [Laughter] But there's one quotation about world trade that I especially cherish. It comes from the 18th century French economist Frederic Bastiat, who wrote that protectionism ``is the sacrifice of the consumer to the producer, of the end to the means.'' And I guess that's what a belief in free trade comes down to: keeping the ends in view. The ends of continued world growth, that the lives of individuals -- of men and women and children -- might become even better. Those are the ends that brought me to this high office, and those are the ends I'll continue to fight for until the very day I leave this grand old house.

I appreciate the personal commitment that each of you has made to be a part of the USIA International Council. Through you, the business and opinion leaders of the world, we are better able to understand international perceptions of our country and directly communicate our message. And again, I thank you all, and thank you for being here, and God bless you all. You'll forgive us, but we've got to get back to work.

For many centuries, dating perhaps to prehistoric times, dairy goats have provided mankind with a reliable and abundant source of milk and milk products, meat, and clothing. Here in the United States, goats have been valued throughout our history primarily as dairy animals. Because of their ability to thrive in either lush or arid country, efficiently converting a wide variety of vegetation into nutritious milk and meat, these animals often accompanied American pioneer families in the days of westward expansion. Goats have long been a part of the typical mix of animals on farms in every region of the United States.

Today, among the contributions of dairy goat farming to our Nation's economy is an impressive array of dairy products. The interest of both domestic and foreign consumers in U.S. domestic goat cheeses, or Chevre, continues to increase, as does awareness of all dairy goat products. These trends deserve every encouragement.

America, do hereby proclaim the period beginning the second Saturday and ending the third Saturday of June 1988 as National Dairy Goat Awareness Week. I call upon the people of the United States to observe this week with appropriate programs, ceremonies, and activities.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventeenth day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Lyng summarized the severity of the drought, using a chart of the United States, color-coded to indicate the areas of greatest severity. Secretary Lyng indicated the largest area of severe drought is in the North Central States. He indicated the drought severity of that region stretched well into Canada, including the provinces of Saskatchewan and Alberta, and that Prime Minister Mulroney will undoubtedly share our concern for the drought at the Toronto summit. The Secretary also summarized actions already taken to relieve the shortages of grazing land for livestock.

Reagan asked to be kept informed on a regular basis. Secretary Lyng will provide daily reports on drought conditions to the White House. In addition, the first meeting of the Interagency Drought Policy Committee will be held Monday at the Department of Agriculture.

Seven years ago, as a newly elected President, I traveled to Canada for my first economic summit with the leaders of the other major industrial democracies. Tomorrow I will attend my eighth and final economic summit, and it's remarkable to think how much things have changed.

I took office, unemployment was climbing, inflation was soaring, Federal spending was out of control, and interest rates had topped 20 percent. The economic mess we faced was clear. And it was also clear that without a recovery in the United States there was little chance for the world economy to get back on its feet. The world stood, as one foreign leader put it, in the ``trough of the recession,'' faced with the ``twin evils of inflation and unemployment.'' It was, as another head of government said at the time, ``one of the most difficult periods of the Western industrial countries.'' The question was what to do.

And that was when we presented a bold new program of cutting tax rates and excessive regulation, opening world markets, and letting the private sector lead the way to economic recovery. Today we're in the longest peacetime economic expansion on record. We have created nearly 17 million jobs in the last 5\1/2\ years. That's twice as many new jobs as the other six summit countries combined, and those countries have a working-age population that's over 60 percent larger than the United States.

But our own prosperity is only part of our achievement. We have also led the world toward a remarkable consensus: that economic freedom, not state planning and intervention, holds the key to growth and development. Yes, the other industrial democracies have joined us on this path. But it goes further than that. From India to Argentina, from Africa to China and even in the Soviet Union, the shackles of state economic domination are beginning to loosen. So, in winning this battle of ideas, we're helping to enrich and liberate the working people and entrepreneurs of the entire world.

That means further opening the international marketplace and increasing the coordination of our policies. That means bringing the newly industrialized countries into the full and mature place in the world trading system that they have earned. And it also means working together, however, to put an end to one type of trade: illegal drug trafficking. So, these topics and others, such as the rebuilding of Afghanistan and the Philippines, international debt, and agricultural subsidies -- these will be on the Toronto agenda.

But before I travel across our northern border to Canada, I'd like to talk for a minute about a situation south of our border, in Central America. This is a problem that's close to home and that demands our strong attention.

Back on February 3d this year, the Congress, by just an 8-vote margin, took a dangerous gamble with our national security and the prospects for democracy in Central America. You see, on that day the House of Representatives voted down my request to continue effective support for the Nicaraguan freedom fighters. The opponents of aid argued that they were giving peace a chance by unilaterally disarming the freedom fighters.

Sandinistas' bad faith and Congress' bad judgment. The leaders of the resistance who courageously went to Managua to seek concrete democratic freedoms were instead subjected to lies, abuse, harassment, and threats of physical harm by the Communist government. Costa Rican President Arias said that the democratization that was required of Nicaragua ``has not happened,'' citing Sandinista ``intransigence.'' The Sandinistas have proved repeatedly that they will not democratize without pressure. As they've shown at Contadora, Manzanillo, San Jose, Esquipulas, and Sapoa: Peace talks for them are just political theater, a way to weaken the democratic resistance while consolidating their militant Communist regime.

I've warned that if we fail in Nicaragua we could one day face a Communist Central America spreading subversion northward and southward. As I said in 1984, this would pose ``the threat that 100 million people from Panama to the open border of our South could come under the control of pro-Soviet regimes.'' That is why we must work for a free Nicaragua. Even the Washington Post, in an editorial last Sunday, urged one key faction of House Democrats to ``stop chasing ghosts and playing political games.'' We can still secure peace and freedom in Central America, but time is growing short, and the stakes ever larger. If we fail to act in time, the American people will demand to know why.

The President. Prime Minister Takeshita and I have just signed a new agreement on cooperation in research and development in science and technology. This agreement provides for joint initiatives to strengthen our bilateral science and technology relationship. It's based on the principles of mutual and equitable contributions and benefits. In it, we set forth the policy framework for this overall relationship. Our hope is to strengthen the relationship for peaceful purposes.

United States and Japan have a long history of scientific and technological cooperation. This cooperation has benefited both our nations. It has included joint government-to-government research projects, exchanges of students and scholars, and private industry research. When we look to the future, it is clear that science and technology will grow even more important to our mutual well-being. With this in mind, and recognizing the great contributions both of our scientific establishments have to offer to world prosperity, we seek to enhance cooperation in a number of research areas of national importance. Under this agreement we will establish a joint high-level committee to meet at least annually for the purpose of reviewing matters of importance in the field of science and technology. This joint committee will also review and discuss policy issues related to the overall science and technology relationship between our two countries and the cooperative activities under this agreement. I might add that this new agreement is already bearing fruit, and I thank the Prime Minister for his efforts in this regard.

The Prime Minister. It is my deep pleasure to join you, Mr. President, in signing this Japan-U.S. Science and Technology Cooperation Agreement. This agreement lifts our sights to the 1990's and beyond, establishing a practical framework for cooperation between Japan and the United States, two leading nations on the cutting edge of the pursuit of new knowledge. I wish to stress that our collaboration under this agreement is not exclusive. It is open to be shared by all the world. Indeed, I cherish the hope that our joint endeavors, particularly on the frontiers of advanced science and technology, will bear rich fruit and will contribute significantly, not only to the well-being of our two peoples, but also to peaceful progress and prosperity throughout the world. I offer my sincere appreciation to you, Mr. President, and I extend my warm thanks to all those in both our nations whose vision and efforts have shaped this important understanding.

The news from Tokyo of an agreement on beef and citrus products was most welcome. Ambassador Yeutter, our Trade Representative, advises that agreement was reached to eliminate Japanese import quotas on beef and citrus products. I am pleased that Prime Minister Takeshita's government has joined us in liberalizing agricultural trade. We made tough choices in order to open these markets. This important achievement strengthens the U.S.-Japan relationship and demonstrates our mutual commitment to an open trading system.

Community, uphold common principles of freedom, respect for individual rights, and the desire of all men to live in peace under the rule of law. Our peoples stand in solidarity within the framework of our existing alliances for the cause of freedom, to safeguard democracy and the prosperity which it has produced. In our discussions we considered how these goals and values could be pursued in the field of foreign affairs, particularly with regard to East-West relations.

We confirmed our belief in constructive and realistic dialogue and cooperation, including arms control, human rights and regional issues, as the way to build stability between East and West and enhance security at lower levels of arms.

Western countries and the Soviet Union since we last met. For our part this evolution has come about because the industrialized democracies have been strong and united. In the Soviet Union greater freedom and openness will offer opportunities to reduce mistrust and build confidence. Each of us will respond positively to any such developments.

Afghanistan. It must be total and apply to the entire country. The Afghan people must be able to choose their government freely. Each of us confirms our willingness to make our full contribution to the efforts of the international community to ensure the return of the refugees to their homeland, their resettlement, and the reconstruction of their country. We now look to the Soviet Union to make a constructive contribution to resolving other regional conflicts as well.

Since our last meeting, progress has been made between the United States and the Soviet Union in agreeing to reduce nuclear weapons in a manner which accords fully with the security interests of each of our countries. The INF Treaty, the direct result of Western firmness and unity, is the first treaty ever actually to reduce nuclear arms. It sets vitally important precedents for future arms control agreements: asymmetrical reductions and intrusive verification arrangements. We now look for deep cuts in U.S. and Soviet strategic offensive arms. We congratulate President Reagan on what he has already accomplished, along with General Secretary Gorbachev, toward this goal.

Nonetheless, the massive presence of Soviet conventional forces in Eastern Europe, the ensuing conventional superiority of the Warsaw Pact, and its capacity to launch surprise attacks and large scale offensive operations, lie at the core of the security problem in Europe. The Soviet military buildup in the Far East is equally a major source of instability in Asia. These threats must be reduced. Our goal is enhanced security and stability at lower levels of forces, after having eliminated the present imbalances. We seek the early establishment of a comprehensive, effectively verifiable and truly global ban on chemical weapons.

Genuine peace cannot be established solely by arms control. It must be firmly based on respect for fundamental human rights. We urge the Soviet Union to move forward in ensuring human dignity and freedoms and to implement fully and strengthen substantially its commitments under the Helsinki process. Recent progress must be enshrined in law and practice, the painful barriers that divide people must come down, and the obstacles to emigration must be removed.

We take positive note of Eastern countries' growing interest in ending their economic isolation, for example in the establishment and development of relations with the European Community. East-West economic relations can be expanded and serve our common interests so long as the commercial basis is sound, they are conducted within the framework of the basic principles and the rules of the international trade and payments system, and are consistent with the security interests of each of our countries.

We strongly reaffirm our condemnation of terrorism in all its forms, including the taking of hostages. We renew our commitment to policies and measures agreed at previous Summits, in particular those against state-sponsored terrorism.

We strongly condemn recent threats to air security, in particular the destruction of a Korean airliner and the hijacking of a Kuwaiti airliner. We recall the principle affirmed in previous declarations that terrorists must not go unpunished. We appeal to all countries who are not party to the international conventions on civil aviation security, in particular the Hague Convention, to accede to those conventions.

Aviation Organization aimed at strengthening international protection against hijackings. We welcome the most recent declaration adopted by the ICAO Council which endorses the principle that hijacked aircraft should not be allowed to take off once they have landed, except in circumstances as specified in the ICAO declaration.

We reaffirm our determination to continue the fight against terrorism through the application of rule of law, the policy of no concessions to terrorists and their sponsors, and international cooperation.

The illegal use of drugs and the illicit trafficking in them poses grave risks to the peoples of Summit countries as well as the peoples of source and transit countries. There is an urgent need for improved international cooperation in all appropriate fora on programs to counter all facets of the illicit drug problem, in particular production, trafficking, and financing of the drug trade. The complexity of the problem requires additional international cooperation, in particular to trace, freeze and confiscate the proceeds of drug traffickers, and to curb money laundering.

We supported the initiative of the Government of the United States for a special task force to be convened to propose methods of improving cooperation in all areas including national, bilateral and multilateral efforts in the fight against narcotics.

We express our deep concern at the increasing instability in the Near East. The current violence in the Occupied Territories is a clear sign that the status quo is not sustainable. An early negotiated settlement to the underlying Arab/Israeli dispute is essential. We declare our support for the convening of a properly structured international conference as the appropriate framework for the necessary negotiations between the parties directly concerned.

In this perspective we salute current efforts aimed at achieving a settlement, particularly the initiative pursued by Mr. Shultz since February. We urge the parties to cooperate fully in the search for a solution.

We have pursued our consultations about the continuing war between Iran and Iraq, which remains a source of profound concern to us. We reaffirm our support for Security Council Resolution 598, which was adopted unanimously. We express our warm appreciation for the efforts of the Secretary General to work for a settlement on this basis and reiterate our firm determination to ensure implementation of this mandatory resolution by a follow-up resolution. We condemn the use of chemical weapons by either party, deplore proliferation of ballistic missiles in the region, and renew our commitment to uphold the principle of freedom of navigation in the Gulf.

As the recent message from Prince Sihanouk has reminded us, the continuing Cambodian conflict and the suffering of the Cambodian people is of deep concern. We join the vast majority of the nations of the world in calling for the prompt withdrawal of all Vietnamese troops. We support a political settlement in Cambodia which will provide for Cambodian self-determination and lead to the re-emergence of a free and independent Cambodia.

Over the past fourteen years, the world economy and economic policy have undergone profound changes. In particular, the information-technology revolution and the globalization of markets have increased economic interdependence, making it essential that governments consider fully the international dimensions of their deliberations.

We observed a sharp contrast between the 1970s and 1980s. The former was a decade of high and rising inflation, declining productivity growth, policies dominated by short-term considerations, and frequently inadequate international policy cooperation. In the 1980s inflation has been brought under control, laying the basis for sustained strong growth and improved productivity. The result has been the longest period of economic growth in post-war history.

However, the 1980s have seen the emergence of large external imbalances in the major industrial economies, greater exchange rate volatility, and debt-servicing difficulties in a number of developing countries. Our response to these developments has been an increased commitment to international cooperation, resulting in the intensified process of policy coordination adopted at the 1986 Tokyo Summit and further strengthened at the Venice Summit and in the Group of Seven.

Summits have proven an effective forum to address the issues facing the world economy, promote new ideas and develop a common sense of purpose. Especially in the 1980s they have helped bring about an increasing recognition that the eradication of inflation and of inflationary expectations is fundamental to sustained growth and job creation. That recognition has been underpinned by a shift from short-term considerations to a medium-term framework for the development and implementation of economic policies, and a commitment to improve efficiency and adaptability through greater reliance on competitive forces and structural reform. Over this period we have also singled out for concerted attention a number of other issues of decisive importance: the overriding need to resist protectionism and strengthen the open, multilateral trading system; to maintain and strengthen an effective strategy to address the challenge of development and alleviate the burden of debt; and to deal with the serious nature of the world agricultural problem.

The Tokyo and Venice Summits have developed and strengthened the process of coordination of our economic policies. Developments in the wake of the financial strains last October demonstrate the effectiveness and resilience of the arrangements that have emerged. The policies, the short-term prospects, and the medium-term objectives and projections of our economies are being discussed regularly in the Group of Seven. The policies and performance are assessed on the basis of economic indicators. We welcome the progress made in refining the analytical use of indicators, as well as the addition to the existing indicators of a commodity-price indicator. The progress in coordination is contributing to the process of further improving the functioning of the international monetary system.

Fiscal, monetary and structural policies have been undertaken to foster the adjustment to more sustainable economic and financial positions in the context of non-inflationary growth. Efforts in those directions, including continued reduction of budgetary deficits, will continue. We need to maintain vigilance against any resurgence of inflation. We reaffirm our determination to follow and, wherever feasible, strengthen our agreed strategy of coordinated efforts to reduce the growth of spending in countries with large external deficits and to sustain the momentum of domestic demand in those with large external surpluses. The reduction of large external imbalances, however, will require not only our cooperative efforts, but also those of smaller economies, including newly industrializing economies, with large external surpluses.

The exchange rate changes in the past three years, especially the depreciation of the U.S. dollar against the Japanese yen and the major European currencies, have played a major role in the adjustment of real trade balances. We endorse the Group of Seven's conclusion that either excessive fluctuation of exchange rates, a further decline of the dollar, or a rise in the dollar to an extent that becomes destabilizing to the adjustment process, could be counterproductive by damaging growth prospects in the world economy.

International cooperation involves more than coordination of macroeconomic policies. Structural reforms complement macroeconomic policies, enhance their effectiveness, and provide the basis for more robust growth. We shall collectively review our progress on structural reforms and shall strive to integrate structural policies into our economic coordination process.

We will continue to pursue structural reforms by removing barriers, unnecessary controls and regulations; increasing competition, while mitigating adverse effects on social groups or regions; removing disincentives to work, save, and invest, such as through tax reform; and by improving education and training.

We welcome the further development of the OECD's surveillance of structural reforms. Such surveillance would be particularly useful in improving public understanding of the reforms by revealing their impact on government budgets, consumer prices, and international trade.

One of the major structural problems in both developed and developing countries is in the field of agricultural policies. It is essential that recent significant policy reform efforts undertaken by a number of parties be continued through further positive action by all Summit participants. More market-oriented agricultural policies should assist in the achievement of important objectives such as preserving rural areas and family farming, raising quality standards and protecting the environment. We welcome the OECD's increased emphasis on structural adjustment and development in the rural economy.

Financial and technological innovations are rapidly integrating financial markets internationally, contributing to a better allocation of capital but also increasing the speed and extent to which disturbances in one country may be transmitted to other countries. We will continue to cooperate with other countries in the examination of the functioning of the global financial system, including securities markets.

A successful Uruguay Round will assure the integrity of an open, predictable multilateral trading system based on clear rules and will lead to trade expansion and enhanced economic growth. At Punta del Este, Ministers committed themselves to further trade liberalization across the wide range of goods and services, including such new areas as trade-related intellectual property and trade-related investment measures, to strengthen the multilateral trading system, and to allow for early agreements where appropriate. Countries must continue to resist protectionism and the temptation to adopt unilateral measures outside the framework of GATT rules. In order to preserve a favourable negotiating climate, the participants should conscientiously implement the commitments to standstill and rollback that they have taken at Punta del Este and subsequent international meetings.

We strongly welcome the Free Trade Agreement between Canada and the USA, and the steady progress towards the target of the European Community to complete the internal market by 1992. It is our policy that these developments, together with other moves towards regional cooperation in which our countries are involved, should support the open, multilateral trading system and catalyze the liberalizing impact of the Uruguay Round.

We attach major importance to strengthening the GATT itself. It is vital that the GATT become a more dynamic and effective organization, particularly in regard to the surveillance of trade policies and dispute settlement procedures, with greater Ministerial involvement, and strengthened linkages with other international organizations. GATT disciplines must be improved so that members accept their obligations and ensure that disputes are resolved speedily, effectively and equitably.

Trade plays a key role in development. We encourage the developing countries, especially the newly industrializing economies, to undertake increased commitments and obligations and a greater role in the GATT, commensurate with their importance in international trade and in the international adjustment process, as well as with their respective stages of development. Equally, developed countries should continue to strive to ensure more open markets for the exports of developing countries.

In agriculture, continued political impetus is essential to underpin the politically difficult efforts at domestic policy reform and to advance the equally difficult and related process of agricultural trade reform. Although significant progress was made in 1987 in the Uruguay Round negotiations, with the tabling of major proposals, it is necessary to ensure that the Mid-Term Review in Montreal in December, 1988 adds impetus to the negotiations in this as in other fields. We support efforts to adopt a framework approach, including short as well as long-term elements which will promote the reform process as launched last year and relieve current strains in agricultural markets. This would be facilitated by a device for the measurement of support and protection. Also, ways should be developed to take account of food security and social concerns. To move the issue forward, and noting among other things the diversity of our agricultural situations, our negotiators in Geneva must develop a framework approach which includes short-term options in line with long-term goals concerning the reduction of all direct and indirect subsidies and other measures affecting directly or indirectly agricultural trade. The objective of the framework approach would be to make the agricultural sector more responsive to market signals.

As the Uruguay Round enters a more difficult phase, it is vital to ensure the momentum of these ambitious negotiations. The Mid-Term Review will provide a unique opportunity to send a credible political signal to the trading world.

The greatest possible advance must be made in all areas of the negotiations, including, where appropriate, decisions, so as to reach before the end of the year the stage where tangible progress can be registered. To this end, we support efforts to adopt a framework approach on all issues in the negotiations, i.e. reform of the GATT system and rules, market access, agriculture and new issues (such as trade in services, trade-related intellectual property rights, and trade-related investment measures). For our part, we are committed to ensure that the Mid-Term Review establishes a solid base for the full and complete success of the negotiations, in accordance with the Punta del Este Declaration.

We all recognize the critical and expanding role of international investment in the world economy and share a deep concern that increased protectionism would undermine the benefits of open investment policies. We resolve to progressively liberalize international investment policies and urge other countries to do likewise.

Asia-Pacific region have become increasingly important in world trade. Although these economies differ in many important respects, they are all characterized by dynamic, export-led growth which has allowed them to treble their share of world trade since 1960. Other outward-oriented Asian countries are also beginning to emerge as rapidly-growing exporters of manufactures. With increased economic importance come greater international responsibilities and a strong mutual interest in improved constructive dialogue and cooperative efforts in the near term between the industrialized countries and the Asian NIEs, as well as the other outward-oriented countries in the region. The dialogue and cooperative efforts could centre on such policy areas as macroeconomic, currency, structural and trade to achieve the international adjustment necessary for sustained, balanced growth of the world economy. We encourage the development of informal processes which would facilitate multilateral discussions of issues of mutual concern and foster the necessary cooperation.

The performance of developing countries is increasingly important to the world economy. Central to the prospects of the developing countries are a healthy global economic environment and an open trading system, adequate financial flows and, most important, their commitment to appropriate economic reform. The problems of many heavily-indebted developing countries are a cause of economic and political concern and can be a threat to political stability in developing countries. Several countries find themselves in that situation in various regions of the world: Latin America, Africa and the Pacific, particularly the Philippines, and that merits our special attention.

A number of highly-indebted middle-income countries continue to have difficulties servicing their external debt and generating the investment necessary for sustainable growth. The market-oriented, growth-led strategy based on the case-by-case approach remains the only viable approach for overcoming their external debt problems.

We are encouraged that many indebted countries have begun the difficult process of macroeconomic adjustment and structural reform necessary for sustained progress, encouraging the return of flight capital and new investment flows.

Paris Club (US $73 billion of principal and interest have been consolidated since 1983) and the flexible policies of export credit agencies. The international financial institutions will continue to have a pivotal role. We endorse the recent initiatives taken by the International Monetary Fund to strengthen its capacity to support medium-term programs of macroeconomic adjustment and structural reform and to provide greater protection for adjustment programs from unforeseen external developments. We strongly support the full implementation of the World Bank's US $75 billion General Capital Increase to strengthen its capacity to promote adjustment in middle-income countries. We also support greater awareness by international financial institutions of the environmental impact of their development programs.

Commercial banks have played an important role in supporting debtor countries' reform efforts through an expanded menu of financing options which has facilitated the channelling of commercial bank lending into productive uses. Their continued involvement is indispensable to the debt strategy. In this regard, the World Bank and IMF can play an important catalytic role in mobilizing additional financing from private (and official) sources in support of debtor countries' adjustment programs.

We note that in recent years there has been increasing recourse to innovative financing techniques. The important characteristics of these techniques are that they are voluntary, market-oriented, and applied on a case-by-case basis. The ``menu approach'' has engendered new financial flows and, in some cases, reduced the existing stock of debt. The flexibility of the present strategy would be enhanced by the further broadening of the menu approach and the encouragement of innovative financing techniques to improve the quality of new lending, but particular initiatives would have to be carefully considered.

International direct investment plays an important role in spurring economic growth and structural adjustment in developing countries. Thus it contributes to alleviating debt problems. Developing countries should welcome and encourage such investment by creating a favourable investment climate.

We welcome proposals made by several of us to ease further the debt service burdens of the poorest countries that are undertaking internationally-approved adjustment programs. We have achieved consensus on rescheduling official debt of these countries within a framework of comparability that allows official creditors to choose among concessional interest rates usually on shorter maturities, longer repayment periods at commercial rates, partial write-offs of debt service obligations during the consolidation period, or a combination of these options. This approach allows official creditors to choose options consistent with their legal or budgetary constraints. The Paris Club has been urged to work out necessary technicalities to ensure comparability by the end of this year at the very latest. This approach will provide benefits over and above the impressive multilateral agreements to help the poorest countries over the past year. We also welcome the action taken by a number of creditor governments to write-off or otherwise remove the burden of ODA loans, and also urge countries to maintain a high grant element in their future assistance to the poorest.

The report of the World Commission on Environment and Development has stressed that environmental considerations must be integrated into all areas of economic policy-making if the globe is to continue to support humankind. We endorse the concept of sustainable development.

Further action is needed. Global climate change, air, sea and fresh water pollution, acid rain, hazardous substances, deforestation, and endangered species require priority attention. It is, therefore, timely that negotiations on a protocol on emissions of nitrogen oxides within the framework of the Geneva Convention on Long-range Transboundary Air Pollution be pursued energetically. The efforts of the United Nations Environment Program (UNEP) for an agreement on the transfrontier shipment of hazardous wastes should also be encouraged as well as the establishment of an inter-governmental panel on global climate change under the auspices of UNEP and the World Meteorological Organization (WMO). We also recognize the potential impact of agriculture on the environment, whether negative through over-intensive use of resources or positive in preventing desertification. We welcome the Conference on the Changing Atmosphere to be held in Toronto next week.

Community, believe that the Economic Summits have strengthened the ties of solidarity, both political and economic, that exist between our countries and that thereby they have helped to sustain the values of democracy that underlie our economic and political systems. Our annual meetings have provided the principal opportunity each year for the governments of the major industrialized countries to reflect, in an informal and flexible manner, upon their common responsibility for the progress of the world economy and to resolve how that responsibility should have practical manifestation in the years ahead. We believe that the mutual understanding engendered in our meetings has benefitted both our own countries and the wider world community. We believe, too, that the opportunities afforded by our meetings are becoming even more valuable in today's world of increasing interdependence and increasing technological change. We have therefore agreed to institute a further cycle of Summits by accepting the invitation of the President of the French Republic to meet in France, July 14-16, 1989.

We note the successful conclusion of Japan's feasibility study on the Human Frontier Science Program and are grateful for the opportunities our scientists were given to contribute to the study. We look forward to the Japanese Government's proposal for the implementation of the program in the near future.

We note that, as part of the continuing review of the ethical implications of developments in the life sciences, the Italian Government hosted the fifth conference on bioethics in April 1988, and we welcome the intention of the European Communities to host the sixth conference in the spring of 1989.

Today's ceremonies, as you know, mark the end of my eighth economic summit. And over the years, I've come to regard the summit process as extremely important in forging a coordinated economic approach for the United States and the other industrialized democracies. It's helped return the nations represented here to steady growth and helped to establish a consensus among us that only free and open markets and only free and open societies foster economic progress and opportunity.

Maybe one of the best ways to view these economic summits is to compare discussions at them, whether heralded in our communiques or not, with later results. For example, our 1981 communique from Ottawa said the primary challenge we addressed at this meeting was the need to revitalize the economies of the industrial democracies. Revitalization, of course, has been achieved in part because the common commitment at Ottawa inaugurated a search for consensus on how to work together to release the productive energies of our peoples. And today gross national products are growing, as are employment numbers and real personal incomes. Our economic expansion in the United States got the ball rolling and helped crystallize the new consensus. And now everyone is part of the act.

To take another example, in our 1986 Tokyo economic communique, we said there should be close and continuous coordination of economic policy among the seven summit countries. Today policy coordination is a major pillar of the economic policies of all our countries.

So, here we are celebrating this summit with a measure of pride. Some significant items are still in need of attention, but all in all, how things have changed over the years! The economies of the summit countries have come roaring back, driven by a common commitment to replace government control with market-oriented policies. These summits are building blocks for tomorrow. Goals we set in earlier years have borne fruit. I believe that the goals we're setting now will become the landmarks for the future.

Looking back at how much has been achieved since the last time the summit was in Canada, is it any wonder that our seven free democratic industrialized nations are turning with confidence to the future, to the challenges and opportunities that new technology, more closely knit global markets, and a free world will bring in working together.

During our meetings here, we discussed the international economic and political situation. We reviewed the economic policy coordination process; the world debt situation, particularly that of the poorer countries; the state of the Uruguay round of trade negotiations, particularly in agriculture; and international cooperation to stop the production and flow of illegal drugs. We also had a fruitful exchange of views on East-West relations, terrorism, and regional political issues.

Yesterday afternoon Prime Minister Mulroney organized an informal session, where leaders shared their thoughts on the economic future of the summit countries. In that session, I said that I believe that the expansion of global markets and the enormous technological advances that are coming in the years ahead will demand even closer coordination of economic policies. All of our economies must be flexible and open, not burdened by excessive regulations, high taxes, and all the other rigidities that too many economies have known too well.

Last night my colleagues and I spoke of the future; of the education of our children; of assisting those displaced by the rapid pace of economic change, most notably our farmers; of removing structural impediments in our economies so that we're all flexible enough to meet the challenges of the rapid technological changes and economic integration that is the hallmark of the future.

The summit nations can be partners in a great ``venture to progress.'' Yes, we can seize our opportunities, or we can watch the world go by. I'm confident which path our nations will choose. As I said before leaving Washington, the future belongs to the flexible. Eight years ago, you'd have heard arguments about that; today it defines the consensus among the seven nations that meet at these economic summits.

The President. Well, I think all of us are disappointed and upset that such things could happen. I think that Cap Weinberger was just being -- or trying to join in here. I think he was one of the finest Secretaries of Defense this country has had, and I think he was doing all that he could to bring a national security out of chaos -- the kind that we inherited. For him to take some responsibility -- of course, he was heading up there, and I suppose I could do the same thing. Except that you have to look at what is being unveiled here. That one tip came from one individual, and immediately the Naval intelligence -- or investigative unit began an investigation based on that single tip and then called for help from the Federal Bureau of Investigation. They joined in, and for 2 years they've been tracking this down to, finally, the place where they have come to the point in which they feel they can serve indictments.

I have to say that I think it should be understandable how such things can happen in something as big as our government is. But I think we also ought to recognize that within our government -- and the minute there was one tip of something of that nature was going on, the units to which we entrust such things, this Naval unit and the FBI, set to work and now is ready to act.

The President. I don't think it really gives him any at all. I don't think this is a case apparently at high levels. I think the very fact that it was investigated -- let me just point something out: that there's almost an accusation in the fact of why didn't some of us know.

I think the tip that came and the investigation that was started reflected that there wasn't anyone, up to and including me, that the investigators could feel free to inform of this. They had no idea where this leveled off or how far it went or how high it went. So, they set out keeping their own decisions to themselves and investigated. And now they have come forth with this, and some of us have been notified now about what was going on. But I think they were proper -- the danger of leaks and everything else and not knowing where this investigation might take them -- to do just as they did.

Iran-contra scandal. Weinberger doesn't know about all of this alleged rampant bribery, fraud. Who's in charge? I mean, where does the buck stop? Why aren't you accountable to the public trust? And I'd like to follow up.

The President. We are accountable. On the other hand, I think there are some things you can see. And something as complex as that whole process and the number of corporations and all -- corporate heads probably are surprised at what they're learning also -- because you can't be down there watching several million people and the total of all of the companies and of the Defense Department every day, and what they're doing, or what phone calls they're making. And I'm quite sure that no one would think that we should be tapping all of those phones and listening in on conversations of everybody just on the suspicion that someone might be out of line.

Mr. President, in terms of the scandals, Senator Mitchell has asked that you specifically -- that you not pardon Colonel North [former National Security Council staff member] and Admiral Poindexter [former Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs] before they are tried, because he said that otherwise there might be a perception of purchasing silence. Are you willing to give that commitment?

The President. Well, I have said already that while I don't think that those men were guilty of any lawbreaking of any kind -- but of course, the new case has to go forward, or they would live the rest of their lives under a shadow of guilt. So, I have no intention of -- now, wait a minute! Let me move back for some of our visitors.

Mr. President, do you plan a visit to the areas of the country that have been afflicted by the drought and recognized just by the drought? Do you plan a visit to the drought areas of the country, sir? And recognizing that your Interagency Committee on the Drought has not made its report, could you give us an idea what specific steps you are considering to help the farmers in view of the drought?

Secretary of Agriculture has taken his place, and we have a task force out there, taking a firsthand look at the situation. And we're going to have to see what we can do. We don't underestimate the seriousness of this at all. And I'm here in this summit; they're out there finding out. And outside of praying for rain, there isn't anything I can do until we hear from them.

Thank you, Mr. President. You suggested the other day, and you seem to be suggesting today, that the Pentagon scandal is just the case of a few people gone wrong. But in fact there are 200 subpoenas out in this case. A number of the top procurement officers of the Pentagon are under investigation, and so are almost all of the top defense contractors. Isn't the greater likelihood that this is a very widespread scandal?

Department of Defense, is the one that uncovered and then proceeded to investigate and pin down where there was guilt. But we now have to wait and find out under the due process of law that it definitely is guilt on individuals' part. There may be some people that are falsely suspected, and we should know that, too. But, no, I'm not taking this lightly at all. But I do think that you all ought to pay attention to the fact that it wasn't an outside investigation.

If I may follow up, sir: It's been suggested that contracts with some of these defense contractors may have to be suspended until the investigation proves out. Are you concerned about the impact on the national security, either in terms of slowing down the defense buildup or the further erosion of support for your defense buildup?

The President. Well, I'm concerned about anything that affects our national security. At the same time, however, I recognize that we have established a national security system that we didn't have a few years ago and that we have produced enough strength that resulted in things like the INF treaty with a potential adversary, the Soviet Union. And that has to be taken into account, too. But I haven't seen any -- we can't judge yet whether there's something specific in all of these things that might have in some way lessened the recovery of our defensive strength.

Mr. President, I'd like to ask about the savings and loan industry. This year there were record losses in the industry. Close to $4 billion has been spent bailing out savings and loans. It's estimated that it will take $75 billion to get it on its feet. Is there a crisis in the savings and loan industry, and will the American taxpayer have to bail it out?

The President. Well, I certainly hope not, and I don't think so. And I don't believe there's a crisis. The market today went up 25 points, and our growth is still continuing, and there's no sign of inflation and things of that kind -- or panic. But, yes, there is a problem there, and we're trying to deal with the problem.

Mr. President, recently, Washington columnist Carl Rowan believed he was threatened by people in his backyard. He took a gun which was unregistered, and he shot -- he said as a warning shot. A young man was nicked in the wrist. Do you think it's a good idea for citizens to have guns in their home and to go out and to use them if they feel threatened?

On the other hand, I try to keep thinking this was 2 o'clock in the morning. Someone is coming toward him. He had that -- but you asked the question in general, not just about him. You asked whether people should have -- Sam, I'm going to answer by way of a letter, a very interesting letter that I received when I was Governor of California.

It came from a burglar who was serving time in San Quentin prison. And there was a big movement on in California at that time, as there continually is everyplace, to eliminate the citizens having weapons. And this burglar, prisoner, wrote to me and said, ``I just want to tell you that if that goes through, that law, there will be hundreds of very happy people here in San Quentin.'' He said, ``We case a place that we've planned for robbery or burglary. We get to know the habits of the people and their comings and goings and so forth.'' But he said, ``The one thing we never can know in advance is in that household, in a drawer by the bed, does the householder have a gun.'' And he says, ``If you can ever tell us that none of them do, that they don't have them, then I can assure you that all us burglars are going to be very happy.'' I think we ought to pay heed to that.

Well, sir, is it worth it? Statistics show that when homeowners or citizens use handguns, normally they shoot themselves, their loved ones, or strangers who are not engaged in a criminal act by mistake. Is it worth all these lives in order to attempt to try to shoot one burglar?

The President. Well, Sam, I'll tell you, there's some certain things I would go for. For example, in California, for a citizen to buy a gun, that citizen has to come in and lay down the money, of course, name, address, and so forth, and then doesn't get the gun. And this goes to an agency in the State Government that looks into that person's entire background as to who and what they are, and then they come back after that investigation, and if they don't have a record of any crimes or mental problems or anything of that kind, they are allowed to take their gun home. Now, I would like to see that generally, and I think that all States ought to take a look at that system. But in addition, I think that maybe we could tie to that making sure that they aren't just totally absent of any knowledge of weapons. I taught my entire family out at the Ranch how to shoot a gun in case they ever had to. And I think maybe there could be some restrictions, that there had to be a certain amount of training taken.

Mr. President, have you given up on doing anything forceful about the continuing chaos in Panama and Nicaragua and now, once again, in Haiti since you have not used up all of your options, including the option of military force? And is there any prospect at all in the rest of your administration for resuming military assistance to the resistance fighters?

The President. Well, Jerry, on the first thing of Panama, I have to say to you that there are many things I can't comment, that we still have some of our economic measures in place. We still feel, as we always did, that a military dictatorship in Panama under General Noriega is not what we want to see continue, but I can't speculate or even hint at what might be options that are being considered or anything of that kind because I just don't think it would be suitable and I don't think it would be helpful. But we have not changed our minds about the fact that Panama should return to a civilian democracy.

The President. Well, I certainly don't think it would change the relationship that the Prime Minister and I have. And I also don't think that it would do away with the friendship that exists between Americans and Canadians. We're pretty unique in the world. There's no place quite like -- well, there isn't any place like this -- 5,000 miles of border, as your Prime Minister has said, without a loaded gun along that border. I think we're very proud of that.

I've had an idea here. I know that in your Parliament there are critics; there are in our Congress. And I've had it figured out that if I could get what the critics in the Parliament are saying about maybe this bill favoring the United States and take it down and show it to our Congress, and in turn send what our Congress are saying about this favoring Canada up here to the Parliament, I think it would be passed in a minute and a half. And I'm not going to do that, but I'm optimistic that we can get it. And I think it will have an effect on the entire trade of the world. We are the two biggest trading partners in the world. And for us to establish the biggest free trading area in the world is right in keeping with all the things that we've been doing.

Mr. President, during the Iran-contra scandal, America learned that there were people in the White House making foreign policy, in effect, without your knowledge and that of some of your other senior officials. Now we have the situation in the Pentagon, sir, where there is apparently a burgeoning scandal which happened without the knowledge of you or your Secretary of Defense.

Reflecting on this, sir, have you thought that you might have changed your style of management? Would you wish to have had a more hands-on approach now that you're at the end of your term? Would that have changed things? Would it have helped?

The President. I don't think it would have changed anything in this present situation at all. I don't think there's any way that anyone at higher levels could have had access to this information on what was going on. With regard to the Iran-contra affair, I would just like -- I haven't had a chance to do this for a long time -- I'd like to remind you all that I'm the one who told all of you of what had just been discovered. And it was discovered after the leak came out of a newspaper in Lebanon, charging the trading of hostages for arms and that I was dealing with the Ayatollah. Let me say with great emphasis and to all the rest of you who aren't as close to Washington as some of the people here: There's no scandal.

We were not doing business with the Ayatollah. We were keeping the operation covert because -- by way of a third country -- some individuals from Iran who were heeding the warnings that we were being given at about that time that the Ayatollah might not live out the week and there was factionalism rising as to who was going to have to do with the new government. These individuals, we were assured, were pretty responsible by that third country, which -- much closer to the situation. And they wanted to meet to discuss with us what might be the future relations between our two countries when the Ayatollah was gone, and I sent a team. Now, you couldn't send the Secretary of State or people of that kind there because it wouldn't be covert any longer -- they're recognizable. I don't mean that he'd tell. [Laughter] He's just -- you know, he can't be anonymous anymore, or people like him.

But anyway, we sent them there to make contact, and now back came this request from them that what it would do for them in the event of forming new government and so forth -- more or less -- token shipment of a type of weapon. I sent word back that we didn't do business with countries that supported terrorism. Well, they sent back reminding us that they weren't representing the country; they weren't that government. And they wouldn't, if they were -- be a government -- they wouldn't do these things. And so, then was when I sent word back and said, well, all right, but I know that there are connections in Iran with the Hizballah [radical terrorist group in Lebanon] who are holding American hostages. We'll do this if you will use your influence, if you have any, to see if you can get our hostages back. And they said yes.

Well, they got two of them back, and we were supposed to get two more within 48 hours. Now, all of this I told to you when, after it broke and the news had broken that we were doing this, our own investigation began and we found one memorandum that indicated that there was more money than we had received for our weapons. We got the money that we had coming to us, but suddenly we had -- and I told you that, and that we were trying to find out, and that I was appointing a commission under Senator Tower to find out how could there be additional money there. And after all the months of investigation by the Congress, I still haven't found out how there was extra money.

The President. I don't see how I could have without endangering the people we were doing business with. If they were identified, they could be executed. They weren't representing the Government, and to tell you the truth, I don't know whether they're alive today. And as a matter of fact, when this all broke, one of our hostages had just been released, Jacobsen, and he pled with you one day out in the Rose Garden at that time to please not talk about this because we could get some people killed.

Mr. President, but in this case, you have said that Cap Weinberger helped take the national security out of chaos. Can you really disagree with both Republicans and Democrats who are saying that your administration threw so much money at the Pentagon and hired people to manage it who were hired for their conservative values rather than their management skills, and that in this administration there was a different structural approach to controlling the spending of these billions of dollars?

I had made statements many times during the campaign that I didn't want people that were out looking for a job in government. I wanted people that would make a sacrifice to work for government, then take them for as long as they could stay there. And this we did. But with regard to throwing this money at the Pentagon, I'd like to call your attention to something.

I took office, on any given day, 50 percent of our military planes couldn't take off for lack of spare parts and fuel. Half of our naval vessels couldn't leave port for the same reason, or in addition, and lack of crew. I had promised during the campaign in answer to questions from just people in audiences over and over again that with regard to deficit spending and all -- where did this figure, the military thing -- and I said, if it comes to a choice, the prime responsibility of government is the defense of the Nation. I have to do that. But I would like to call attention to this fact. President Carter evidently realized the situation before he left office. And as you know, a President leaving office gives you a 5-year projection of his plan -- what his budget -- the first budget when I came in was passed by the previous President, but then, where it goes. We have not yet spent as much money on defense as he had advocated should be spent for the next 5 years.

But, sir, how do you feel about the fact that, even though you pride yourself on cutting government spending and regulations, that the legacy you may well leave is a counterreaction, where there is an erosion of public support for defense spending and a public reaction that actually hurts rather than helps national security?

The President. Well, you're just saying some things that -- I don't know how I would answer that. But I think if people will listen and get the explanation and exactly what the situation was and wait until the facts are in, for example, on this particular investigation, that I don't think that they will find that we were derelict in our duty.

The President. Well, more have been apprehended in this past year or so than ever before. And more thousands of, literally, tons of illegal drugs seized, more airplanes, more ships, more trucks and automobiles, and more money has been seized than ever before. But we have come to the conclusion, with boundaries like ours and coastlines like ours, the only answer that is ever going to win this war for us -- we keep this up; we keep doing that, of course -- but the real answer is going to be a bigger effort at taking the customer away from the drugs.

That's why we're going to implement all the programs we can about appealing to the people and getting former drug addicts who are -- many of them in the entertainment world and the athletic world are doing more than their duty to speak to young people about their ex -- they're ex-addicts and about this. But that is going to be the only way we can really succeed. But we have stepped up this interception thing, and I think more than has ever been intercepted before.

The President. Oh, well, you're talking about the summit and our -- oh, well, listen, we were all in agreement here. And I think we've discussed this today, and we thought of a number of things. And we're going to be working on this and putting a team together that will represent more than us. We're going to do such things, and we're agreed.

But it's a pleasure to join you. And for 3 days now, I've enjoyed the beauty and vibrancy of your magnificent city. Your mayor recently said that Toronto has excitement, but hasn't lost civility, and I can vouch for that.

Brian has told me about Toronto's extraordinary dynamism and spirit of enterprise, its low crime and high quality of life. But as an old sportscaster, what says the most to me is the way this hometown cheers its Blue Jays. Toronto, like Canada itself, is brimming with strength, vitality, and self-assurance.

Those qualities, together with our similar heritages and common values, have made the relationship between the United States and Canada unique in world history. We have been best friends, important trading partners, and allies for more than a century and a half. In many ways, America's relationship with Canada has been the vanguard of our relations with other nations. Our first environmental treaty, over boundary waters, involved Canada. Our first permanent mutual defense relationship was with Canada. And the agreement to remove ships of war from the Great Lakes was our first arms reduction pact. You may have heard me say that nations don't distrust each other because they are armed, they are armed because they distrust each other. With the longest undefended border in the world, Canada and the United States are proof of the flip-side of that: When nations live in trust and friendship, they live in peace.

Today our relations are better than ever. Over the last 4 years, the Canadian-U.S. partnership has grown and strengthened. That's all for the good. In a world that's changing before our eyes, we need each other's friendship as never before. And in many ways, that is what, for Brian and me, the last 3 days here in Toronto have been about: the changing world and the role of North America in it.

You know, as I said, economic summits are not intended to produce blockbuster announcements. They are regular business meetings. They give those of us around the table a feel for what the others are thinking. They're a forum for us to raise issues or to advance the many ways in which our governments work together.

In economics at this summit, we advanced the process of coordinating policy. From now on, our seven governments will examine structural reform issues in their talks and will include a commodity price indicator in coordinating policy. We also reviewed our commitment to achieving progress in the Uruguay round of trade negotiations. Finally, we agreed to work together to ease the debt situation in the poorest countries of Africa.

Turning from economics, in East-West relations we reaffirmed a common position on human rights, on the need to reduce the massive conventional forces imbalance in favor of the Soviet Union and its allies, and the conditions by which we're ready to expand economic ties with Eastern countries. In other areas, we underscored the need for a common fight against terrorism and the international narcotics trade. And I'll have more to say about the drug trade in a moment. And finally, we said once again that we would work to resolve regional conflicts in the Middle East, the Persian Gulf, Cambodia, and South Africa.

You'll see a great deal about our discussions in tomorrow's headlines. But sometimes, maybe most of the time, history is not made in headlines, and we don't recognize great turning points until they're long past. This was an economic summit, and in economics I believe that today history is made at summits, yes, but in broader and more profound ways as well. This summit was held against the backdrop of a transformation as dramatic as the one you find at the place on the prairie where the Rockies meet the Plains. Less than a decade ago, inflation, as Brian told us, stagnation, decline, and despair characterized, in one measure or another, the economies of nearly all the summit nations. And today we live in a time of hope.

I know that I don't need to tell you this because, as it was in the summit, Canada is a leader. In the last 4 years, among industrial nations, only Japan matched Canada's economic growth, while Canada created more than a million jobs and, confounding the experts of just a few years ago, did it while keeping inflation in check. How? One answer, of course, is that you've been deregulating industry, moving government out of the ownership and management of industry, and reducing marginal tax rates.

But another, and I believe truer, answer is that you have reaffirmed an old faith -- faith in the abiding, universal truth that economic growth does not spring from the numbers and graphs in government bureaus but from the hopes and aspirations of ordinary people. You have said, in effect, that the key to the future is in a simple human face. It's not the face of someone famous, someone whose name is likely to appear in the history books, but of someone, a man or a woman, who carries in his or her heart a dream, an excitement, a drive. And despite others calling that person impractical, he or she goes out and builds a dream into a business. Sometimes the dream is technologically sophisticated.

Sometimes it's as simple as the store on the corner. Either way, this person, this dreamer, this entrepreneur, whether on his or her own or as a determined leader within a firm, is the driving force behind all growth. And because he or she can come from any part of society with ideas that will often seem eccentric, at least until they are tested, we in government cannot help this individual. We can't effectively target money or other assistance. We can only keep out of his or her way. We can, as you have, reduce taxes and regulations and open markets. We can give freedom.

Like you, we in the United States have always rediscovered that human face, that enduring truth. And as it has been for you, the spark from this faith in freedom has rekindled our fires of opportunity, invention, and growth. It's transforming life on this great, splendid continent we share, and more and more it's transforming life throughout the world.

Yes, as I looked around that summit table these last 3 days, it seemed to me we've come to a moment in which, as it must have when John Cabot landed on the shores of Newfoundland nearly 500 years ago, humanity stands on the shores of a new world and for a moment holds its breath in awe and wonder. Each of the summit nations has turned away from statism and toward the market. This movement toward freer enterprise is worldwide, stretching from India to Argentina and beginning to reach even into China and, now, the Soviet Union. And everywhere there are those who say we must dim this light of opportunity and turn back from this frontier of the future. And the question is, will we?

Already on this continent that light has ignited a bonfire of entrepreneurship and technological innovation unlike anything mankind has ever seen. As one physicist noted not long ago: ``The entire Industrial Revolution enhanced productivity by a factor of one hundred. The microelectronic revolution has already enhanced productivity in information-based technology by a factor of more than a million.'' And he added, ``the end isn't in sight yet.'' Today a phone call, a television report, or a currency transaction bounces from Toronto to Tokyo by way of satellite, often starting from a dish antenna that fits on the top of a truck. Satellite and dish replace tons of wire and miles of cable that once carried those signals. And they do the job better.

The heart of the technological revolution that produced them, that has, at the same time, put desktop computers in homes across our continent while making North American industry vastly more productive -- the heart of this revolution is a tiny silicon chip that you can hold on the tip of your finger and still see most of the finger. Today a single chip has the incredible power of a million transistors, that is, of the biggest computer of the 1960's. Yet one of North America's most prominent research directors predicts that in less than 15 years, the power of a billion transistors will be packed on a chip. That's the power of 20 of today's most advanced supercomputers, all in a laptop computer, available to every entrepreneur and executive.

Already this new technology is transforming our offices and factories, creating many jobs, eliminating others. And for that reason, some people fear it. I understand that. I remember returning to Hollywood from the service.

It seemed that with wartime excess-profits tax, everyone started to think of production costs as mostly government money, so why not share the wealth. They started leaving early and loosening standards. Pretty soon, though, Hollywood had to shape up. It faced a new challenge from a new technology called television. Within a few years, studio employment dropped by thousands and many predicted Hollywood would die -- but Hollywood adapted. Many Hollywood people found work in TV, and that included a certain actor. The studios themselves discovered new markets, and among them the television market. And today almost as many people have jobs in the movies as at the peak, and even more work in broadcasting, which now faces the new technologies of video and cable.

This story of challenge and growth is not just the story of movies and television but of all humanity in its long climb from the swamp to the stars. Do we dare stop climbing? Would we want to stop, especially we North Americans, we who, as Winston Churchill said when he addressed your Parliament during the bleakest days of the Second World War, have not journeyed all this way across the mountains, across the prairies, across the centuries because we're made of sugar candy? Nothing could turn us back faster from the new technological horizon and the morning of its promise than to do what some would have us do and hide from the growing global marketplace.

Your Prime Minister and I want to keep the world on the path of hope. And that's why we've joined together in pressing for a new round of international trade talks, in working for reform of the agricultural policies of the summit nations, and of course in negotiating a Canada-U.S. free trade agreement. That historic agreement, once approved by your Parliament and our Congress, will throw open the doors to the world's largest free trade area.

Well, with the European Community scheduled to remove internal barriers by 1992, we can hope that the two great continents of Europe and North America will become the dynamic engines of an even faster, expanding, open, world economy. Our free trade agreement will create in North America the world's most powerful market, a market that includes many of the most exciting centers of commerce and invention on Earth, a market that brings together two of the freest peoples on Earth. In the past, whenever we North Americans have lowered trading restrictions, we have seen our economies bloom like mountain meadows after a spring rain. Well, hasn't the moment come for another flowering?

Some say that open trade and easier access will lead to an erosion of cultural distinctions. But I believe that to find North America's true future under this agreement we need to look no farther than Canada itself, where distinct cultures have lived, worked, and traded together while respecting each other's differences for generations.

With protectionist storms brewing everywhere, the choice in both our nations and among all the summit countries is between moving forward toward freer trade or backward toward the protection and isolation that are relics of another age. We cannot, for example, expect the limited free trade of today to remain secure if trade in other products becomes more and more restricted. We cannot stand still, but then we North Americans never have. We've always risen to meet a challenge. Our hearts quicken to the call; our eyes brighten; our pace picks up.

Let's remind those who call for sweeping separation that we have long worked in common for common goals -- to protect our common security and peace, for example. Of course, some have criticized this security partnership, often saying that if we build weapons we're bound to use them, which makes me wonder where they've been for the last 40 years.

In my country's Air Force museum there is an entire B - 36 bomber, one of the first planes used for mutual security in an early part of NATO's nuclear umbrella. It has wings two-thirds the length of a football field, six rear-mounted propeller engines, four jet booster engines, and lots of vacuum tubes. At one time it could carry a 10,000 pound bomb load and fly 10,000 miles. Three hundred and eighty-five were built. Most have been junked. None was ever flown in combat.

These last 40 years, whole generations of missiles and nuclear weapons have been built and dismantled. Their only job was to keep the peace. It was kept. And now, because of NATO's strength and steadfastness, the Soviets have agreed for the first time to join us and eliminate an entire class of nuclear weapons. Is there any better answer to those who, in the name of peace, oppose a strong defense partnership?

From Cyprus to the Sinai, from pressuring the Soviets to get out of Afghanistan to supporting democracy in the Philippines, we have worked together. I saw one of the fruits of our partnership during my recent visit to Moscow. I had some contact -- not enough -- with the Soviet people. They lined the streets by the thousands.

I said at Guildhall, I found Mr. Gorbachev to be a serious man seeking serious reform. And he and I talked about those reforms, as well as about regional conflicts, human rights, and arms reduction. Our discussions focused on freedom of choice and other individual freedoms and on the fact that recognition of these basic rights must never be taken for granted. I know I speak for all of us in saying our prayers go with the Soviet peoples. But as I also said at Guildhall of the security partnership between North America and Europe in NATO, let us stay strong.

Over the last 3 days, the summit partners here in Toronto discussed East-West relations. And we took up another threat to the security of our nations, a comparatively new but frightening one: illegal drugs. Drugs have only once before been on our agenda. A North American dialog between Prime Minister Mulroney and Vice President Bush put them there this time. Over breakfast in Washington in April, the Prime Minister and the Vice President exchanged thoughts on how our countries could work together to fight the drug kingpins. One area they discussed was appropriate for the talks at this summit: how to prevent the laundering of money across international borders. Handling of money is proving the drug trade's weakest point. The drug trade is conducted primarily in cash and needs international banking to move and launder its money. Canada's strong support for the Bush initiative is reflected in the historic commitment endorsed by all the summit leaders in the Toronto communique.

So, yes, in ensuring the security not only of our nations but our ideals, in fighting the drug scourge, in leading the world economy to a future of opportunity and growth, the partnership between our countries is at the center.

And so, today, mankind -- standing on the shore of a new continent, a new age of invention, adventure, and growth -- holds its breath and for one lingering moment wonders: Go forward or go back? And what we North Americans decide together will, to a large measure, answer that question for the entire world.

Let us choose life. And let us choose hope. And let us turn to the horizon and greet the morning and continue the adventure that our forefathers started so many years ago when, with faith and freedom, they landed on this great, strange continent and began to build a new world.

I leave completely, with regard to what I have said about drugs and all the things that is going forward, I couldn't help but think very proudly today at the table -- with all of that being accomplished between our seven nations -- I couldn't help but think that one tiny young lady a few years ago, moving to Washington, set out on her own on a crusade against drugs. And today she's got a lot of company.

And now, I thank you. And since this is my last official visit to Canada, let me add here publicly to Brian Mulroney, a colleague for 4 years and a friend for life, a particular thank you. Brian and Mila, God bless you, and God bless you all. And I have to tell you -- you've probably guessed from what he said and what I said -- that in this summit business, the head man in the country where you're meeting is the chairman of all the meetings. And I have to tell you that on a performance rating of, say, from 1 to 10, your Prime Minister, in my book, gets an ``11''.

President is encouraged that the Fish-Michel-Sensenbrenner amendment will be adopted by the House during the consideration of H.R. 1158, the bill to amend the Fair Housing Act. This legislation, as amended, will go a long way to strengthen laws against discrimination in housing, a goal we all share. Among other things, the bill achieves a longstanding legislative objective of the President: to prohibit invidious discrimination in housing against those with handicaps.

Americans to jury trials in civil lawsuits. This amendment is a major step forward on the road to timely enactment of fair housing legislation. We are also encouraged by the amendment Congressman Clay Shaw plans to offer to protect the rights of older Americans and Americans without children.

Among our remaining concerns are two particular problems for which we would support corrective amendments: (1) preserving executive branch discretion in instituting civil lawsuits, thereby avoiding constitutional separation-of-powers litigation that could delay effective enforcement, and (2) maintaining litigation authority in the Department of Justice. The action anticipated by the House will advance major civil rights legislation which is long overdue.

Director of the On-Site Inspection Agency, and members of the first team of U.S. inspectors who will be monitoring Soviet compliance with the INF treaty. The team is departing today for its staging area in Japan so that it will be in position to begin the on-site inspections by July 1. These will be the first of the extensive on-site inspections called for in the INF treaty, which entered into effect on June 1, 1988.

The first inspections -- the baseline inspections -- are to take place during July 1 - September 1 and will cover 133 Soviet facilities. The Soviets will simultaneously conduct inspections of 26 U.S. INF facilities in the U.S. and in our allied basing countries. On July 1, we will also begin resident on-site monitoring of the Soviet missile facility at Votkinsk. U.S. inspectors will also be watching the elimination of Soviet INF missiles and associated equipment.

These inspection activities are an essential element of our verification regime for the INF treaty. In addition, the experience gained will be useful as we develop verification provisions for a strategic arms reduction agreement. Full and faithful implementation of the INF treaty will contribute to the confidence necessary to make further progress in arms reductions.

John was first elected to the House in 1964 to the seat held by Howard Baker's father and then his mother. He set the highest standards of excellence and integrity in public service. The Nation and the people of the State of Tennessee have benefited beyond measure from his statesmanship and commitment to the national well-being.

In anticipation of the Senate Appropriations Committee meetings this week, I am writing to urge your support for the Space Station program while preserving the integrity of the budget agreement we reached with the bipartisan congressional leadership last November.

Senate is now at a critical decision point. The FY 1989 appropriation bill as marked by the HUD-Independent Agencies Subcommittee would provide only $200 million for the Space Station and effectively force termination of the Space Station program. This would be totally unacceptable.

Equally unacceptable, however, would be any plan that takes critical funds away from another national priority, our country's defense budget. I understand that the Defense Appropriations Subcommittee has proposed to do just that by transferring more than $600 million from Defense research and development into an account to pay for the Space Station. Not only is this counterproductive to our goals for both Defense and the Space Station, but funding the Space Station at the expense of national security violates the budget agreement.

We all know that the space program has been the source of innovation and technological growth here on Earth. The Space Station is an important vehicle of international cooperation -- the largest cooperative science and technology project ever undertaken. We need the Space Station for all these reasons and for an even more important, but less tangible, reason: our Nation's leadership role in the peaceful exploration and use of space.

Meanwhile, our closest friends and allies in Europe, Japan, and Canada have agreed to join with us in a cooperative relationship that will substantially increase the capabilities of the U.S. station; indeed, we are about to sign intergovernmental agreements with these partners, who collectively will contribute over $7 billion to the Space Station. The Congress's failure now to fund adequately this vital project will significantly undermine our national space effort and raise serious questions about our reliability as a leader and partner in an area where our leadership has been so vital for three decades.

I am fully aware of the difficult decisions that must be made in setting priorities among the competing demands for funding this year, but this is not the time to turn our backs on the future or on needed defense spending. By making these difficult but necessary decisions, we can achieve the priorities our Nation needs. If we are to insure our future, funding of science, space, and technology programs must remain a top priority.

I am asking you to help assure that future by supporting appropriation of the funds necessary for the space program our Nation needs without sacrificing national security and other vital programs our Nation requires.

Agreement provides opportunities for fishermen from each country to conduct fisheries activities on a reciprocal basis in the other country's waters. The Agreement also establishes a framework for cooperation between the two countries on other fisheries issues of mutual concern. Several U.S. industry interests have urged prompt consideration of this Agreement because of their desire to conclude joint fisheries ventures with the Soviet fishing industry.

In accordance with Public Law 100 - 204, section 904(d), I am pleased to transmit a report on the roles and responsibilities of the Immigration and Naturalization Service and the Department of State in administering the United States refugee admissions program. Recommendations for improving the program's effectiveness and efficiency over the next few years are also included.

I am proud of the roles both the Immigration and Naturalization Service and the Department of State have played in the implementation of the Refugee Act of 1980. While improvements can still be made in the operations of both the Immigration and Naturalization Service and the Department of State as well as in other aspects of the admissions program, the programs, procedures, and processes established since 1980 represent a positive legacy for the next administration.

I've come here at a time when the creative energies of the American people have carried our economy into the midst of the longest peacetime expansion -- as Roger told you -- in our nation's history, at a time when world trade is strong and growing, when we see all around us technological breakthroughs that promise to carry us forward into a dazzling new era. Yet even today there is still work to do, a great deal of work, to make the economy of our nation and the world all that we would like them to be.

Some of that work our administration can do in the coming months. And let me interject here that one item of unfinished business that I know you're particularly concerned about is product liability law reform. Outlandish court awards have placed tremendous burdens on U.S. companies as they try to compete in an international marketplace. If Congress is serious about enhancing the competitiveness of American firms, it should pass meaningful product liability law reform this year -- reform that protects legitimate claims by consumers, but limits the level of awards to reasonable losses. But as I was saying, we must leave whatever part of our agenda is unfinished to those who will follow us, trusting that they'll benefit from the lessons that we've learned. And so, this evening I'd like to speak to you about both practical policy -- reporting to you in particular on the economic summit that just took place in Toronto -- and about the enduring lessons that have emerged from the experience of these 8 years.

First, if I may, I'd like to establish the scope of the topic under discussion. For when we speak about the economy, we're dealing with more than mere numbers, more than statistics about productivity and employment. We're dealing instead with one of the most basic aspects of human existence: We're dealing with the way the great majority of men and women spend most of their hours, most days, throughout the most productive years of their lives.

The historian William McNeill described the rise of social organization in the ancient Middle East this way: ``Only on irrigated land could rich crops be harvested year after year from the same fields, and only where irrigation was needed did large numbers of men find it necessary to cooperate in digging and diking. An agricultural surplus that could support specialists, together with habits of social organization embracing large numbers of men, this could and did emerge in the flood plains of the principal Middle Eastern rivers, and, until much later, not elsewhere.'' In other words, there was a surplus of goods to be traded, and that is economy. There, and only there, did civilization arise.

Now, it's not my intention to give a history lesson. But I believe it's important to remind ourselves that in dealing with the economy we're dealing with human creativity. This insight has represented the underpinning of our economic expansion.

We cut tax rates, reduced government regulation, and restrained Federal spending; and we unleashed the creativity of individuals and businesses. We gave them freedom to create; to keep the rewards of their own risktaking and hard work; and to reach for new, bold ideas.

I noted a moment ago, today we're in the midst of our nation's longest peacetime expansion. Real family income is up. Twice as many new jobs have been created here in the United States as in the other six industrialized nations combined. Unemployment has fallen to its lowest level in 14 years. And during this economic expansion, the number of Americans living below the poverty line has fallen, reversing its upward trend.

But in India and Argentina, in Botswana, in China, and, yes, even in the Soviet Union, state control of the economy is loosening in favor of freer markets. And the lesson is clear: If you want economic growth, work for economic and individual freedom. Another way of putting this is what I said before and during the Toronto summit. The future belongs to the flexible. It belongs to those countries that don't straitjacket the initiative of their people; to those who give reign to the creative, enterprising spirit that is in all people; to those who see the limit of government's understanding and its ability to respond to a world that is changing before our eyes.

The greatest historymakers in our time are not politicians and statesmen, but inventors, entrepreneurs, and others who are transforming the technological base of civilization and whose search for new markets is leading us into a more global economy. These people are making the world anew and knitting all of our nations together in ways more diverse and wonderful than we can fully comprehend. So, by flexibility, I mean, in a greater sense, humility -- humility of governments before the vastly diverse creativity of their peoples. At the Toronto summit our goal was to apply that lesson of flexibility to discussions on world finance and trade, including, of course, the troublesome question of agriculture.

On world trade, there are some substantial inequities, but the answer is not to close American markets: The answer is to open foreign ones. And that's why we leaders used this summit to encourage the international trade negotiations, what is called the Uruguay round, now going on in Geneva. Those negotiations are approaching their midway point. We hope by year's end to see agreement on specific goals for the final 2 years in such major areas as agriculture, services, intellectual property, and investment, along with a roadmap and timetable to the finish line.

I confirmed once more that free markets must be our goal. Now, that doesn't mean that areas of disagreement don't remain. Take agriculture, for example: We agreed to keep looking for an agreement. There's a simple rule that's as true of agriculture as it is of any other endeavor: When you subsidize something, you get more of it. This year the world's industrialized nations are subsidizing agriculture to the tune of $200 billion a year. There are world surpluses of agricultural products, and the result is that many markets for agricultural goods have become distorted. We in the United States want to eliminate all agricultural subsidies that distort trade. A tall order, perhaps, but we've filled tall orders before. In fact, the European press has given our position on agricultural subsidies a nickname that sort of appeals to me. They're calling it a second zero-option.

Toronto we talked about many issues. We agreed to direct our agriculture negotiators in Geneva to reach decisions that will reduce subsidies that directly or indirectly affect trade. We stated our belief that we should make agriculture more responsive to market signals. We further agreed on a general framework for dealing with Third World debt, particularly the debt of the poorest nations. And we discussed how to help debt-ridden countries that are making the transition to democracy -- for example, the Philippines.

We also talked about how we coordinate our economic policies. I know many people question the summit process. What do the summits do? Are they just so much sound and fury? Well, not on your life! Today, all year round, the summit countries are working more closely together than ever before, and the summits are a key reason why. One payoff is that last October, when the world markets began to shake, the international economy stayed steady. Working together, we guided the world ship through the storm.

Finally, we talked about East-West relations, terrorism, regional political issues, and something I know every American family will cheer, the Bush initiative to stop drug-money laundering. Thanks to Vice President Bush, the major industrial democracies have committed themselves to hanging up ``Gone Out of Business'' signs in drug-money laundries all over the world.

I've spoken of economic freedom and of the practical way to put that lesson into effect. Permit me to close now with one other practical matter, one that will put the great lesson of free markets into effect in an especially dramatic and historic way: the U.S.-Canada free trade agreement. Prime Minister Mulroney and I entered into this agreement in January of this year. It presently awaits enactment of implementing legislation by our Congress and the Canadian Parliament.

Today, as we await this final approval, the United States and Canada already generate the world's highest volume of trade. We are the two greatest trading partners in the world. The United States has a larger volume of trade with the Province of Ontario than with most other nations. United States citizens are by far the principal foreign investors in Canada, and on a per capita basis, Canadians are even greater investors in our country. This two-way traffic in trade and investment has created countless thousands of jobs and added immeasurably to the prosperity of both our nations. And now, with the free trade agreement, our two nations can do still more.

Upon enactment of the implementing legislation, the agreement will make Canada and the United States the largest free trade area in the world. For the United States, this agreement will remove all Canadian tariffs; secure improved access to the Canadian market for our manufacturing, agriculture, high technology, and financial sectors; and give us important additional access to Canadian energy supplies. For Canada, this agreement will make available the enormous United States market. Canadian producers of every kind of good and service will be able to benefit from enormous economies of scale. But beyond the benefits this free trade agreement will bestow upon our two nations, there is the immeasurable importance of the example it will present to all the world. To those who would engage in all the bitterness, all the destructiveness, of round upon round of trade battles, Canada and the United States will show the better way.

I'm confident that final approval of this free trade agreement will be completed during my own term in office. But I'd hope that those who'd follow me will not view it as an item of finished business, but rather as only a beginning. In Toronto, when we gave a push to the Uruguay round, we moved the world a step closer to free and fair trade for all nations. I would hope that in the years to come, America's leaders will fix upon the vision of a day when the free flow of trade, from the southern tip of South America to the northern outposts of the Arctic Circle, unites the people of the Western Hemisphere in a bond of mutually beneficial exchange. I would hope that America's leaders will fix upon the vision of a day when all borders become what the U.S.-Canadian border so long has been: a meeting place, rather than a dividing line. I would hope that America's leaders will fix upon that vision and work tirelessly to make it come true.

That's the thought that I would most like to leave you with: that even in economics -- the subject we're so often tempted to think of merely in terms of numbers and techniques -- even there, men and women are moved by the power of vision, by the power of dreams. Just a few decades ago, who would have thought that sand, mere sand, possessed the power to change the world? And yet today silicon, the stuff of sand, goes into the microchips that are ushering in the profoundest economic changes since the Industrial Revolution. Vision at the high technology firms like those so many of you represent -- vision has made it so.

Well, I'm convinced that today we stand on the verge of an economic and technological future of vast promise. We've embarked on an economic course that has led to new jobs, lower taxes, steady growth. And the challenge now is to recognize those voices that would construct barriers on this road to economic prosperity. These are the decisions that will be made over the next several months: individual opportunity and incentive or renewed government restriction and burden.

Already, we've seen new prosperity throughout the democratic world. And after my visit to Moscow, it's my belief that human creativity, expressed in economic freedom, can transform even the nations of the Soviet bloc. If we have the resolve, the patience, the willingness to work, and, yes, the vision, we can lead the world into a new age of prosperity and freedom.

The President. I look forward to meeting President Evren, a man who holds a special place in the modern history of Turkey. He and I have the opportunity to reinforce the ties of mutual interest, friendship, and cooperation that have historically linked our nations and peoples. As a major ally of the United States, Turkey is a country of great importance to the American people. President Evren's visit will mark another vital step in the development of this relationship.

How would you assess the course of the Turkish-American relationship during your Presidency? What were your priorities? What has given you the most personal satisfaction in regard to the Turkish-American relationship during this period? What have been your disappointments?

President gives me great satisfaction because the visit symbolizes the importance of the Turkish-American partnership to both our peoples. The interests and the democratic values of our nations and peoples coincide. In the past 7\1/2\ years, we have strengthened our friendship. Like all friends and allies, we have had occasional areas of disagreement, but when the overall relationship is as strong as it is between our two countries, disagreements do not prejudice the fundamental relationship. Today, following Turkey's successful resolution of the problems of anarchy and violence which it confronted during the 1970's, Turkey and the United States once again deal with each other and with the world as strong, self-confident democracies. This is a powerful bond between our two peoples. In addition, I think it very important that over the past 8 years there has been significant growth in the support for the Turkish-American relationship in our Congress.

Its democratic values, its secular orientation, and the political commitment it has made to full involvement in the Western community of nations are very significant. A glance at a map explains the unique geographic and strategic situation of your country. I have admired the way Turkey overcame the forces of terrorism and anarchy which threatened your freedoms in the late 1970's. The commitment of the Turkish people to democracy is obviously very strong. Turkey's economic potential has always been very great. I have been impressed by Turkey's economic advances in the 1980's through a market-oriented approach to economic growth and progress.

Although participating fully in such Western institutions as NATO, Turkey is an Islamic country and also a part of the Middle East. How does this fact affect the U.S. policy considerations towards Turkey? In your view, what is Turkey's role in the region?

The President. Turkey clearly can and does play a special role in the Middle East. In part, this role is a product of its traditions and its achievements, which gives it a special relationship to the area. We value the insights of your leaders into developments and trends throughout the region. More broadly, Turkey's success as a Western, modern, and secular state has a significant impact as a potential model for the region.

Several developments in Washington are contributing to a growing uneasiness towards the United States in the Turkish public and official circles. Among these developments, declining assistance levels, conditions added on assistance programs in Congress, and restrictions imposed on Turkish exports could be named. How do you plan to address those problems?

The President. None of the issues which you have raised are new, and all are more than outweighed by newer, positive elements in our relationship. As I noted earlier, I think the relationship between Turkey and the United States is stronger, in part, because of the greater appreciation in this country of its importance to both Turkey and the United States. While budget austerity in this country limits assistance levels, we have found ways to make the assistance itself more effective through the extension of forms of assistance which do not require repayment and through the development of such programs as the Southern Region Amendment, under which we were able to provide 40 F - 4E aircraft to Turkey last year. The United States and Turkey have enjoyed excellent bilateral relations during the past 7\1/2\ years. And as President, I have worked to expand the ties between Turkey and the United States beyond our security relationship. Today our two countries are increasingly linked by a growing variety of economic and cultural ties, and this gives me great satisfaction.

It is too important to us both for that attitude to prevail. But secondly, I must disagree with your statement. Such an approach assumes that Turkey does more for the United States than the United States does for Turkey. I believe that both nations are making great contributions to our common objectives. Our relationship with Turkey, like our relationships with our other allies, rests on the principle of collective defense. There is no doubt that both the United States and Turkey are more secure because of their alliance. The money the United States spends on strategic defense and conventional forces is money spent on the defense of Turkey as well. Our many years of sustained assistance to Turkey demonstrate that our commitment to the relationship is strongly rooted in American policy and belies the allegation that we take Turkey for granted. Finally, I think that President Evren's visit to the United States clearly indicates the importance which we give to our Turkish ally.

The President. As a friend and ally of both Greece and Turkey, we can only welcome the reduction in tensions that has followed the meeting of Prime Ministers Ozal and Papandreou at Davos. As I suggested earlier, we believe strongly in the utility of dialog to solve international problems. Certainly the efforts of the U.N. Secretary-General through his good offices mission, which we strongly support, provide a vehicle for getting such a dialog underway. The issues are difficult and complex and will take time to resolve.

The President. I was pleased to welcome Prime Minister Bob Hawke to Washington again, especially because this year Australia is commemorating its bicentennial. The United States and Australia have been steadfast partners through times of war and times of peace, and I'm sure the Prime Minister's visit to Washington and other cities in the United States will deepen the already close ties between our two countries.

During the Prime Minister's last visit in 1986, I promised to reciprocate Australia's contribution to our own bicentennial celebration. Last year Congress appropriated $5 million for a U.S. national gift to Australia that will be used for a permanent U.S. gallery in the Australian National Maritime Museum, with an exhibition commemorating 200 years of bilateral maritime relations. I expect this exhibit, along with other public and private efforts too numerous to list, will serve as a lasting testament of our two peoples' enduring friendship.

Our discussions have covered a range of topics, including security and progress in arms control. I shared with the Prime Minister my detailed assessment of my meetings a few weeks ago in Moscow with General Secretary Gorbachev. Australia is an important ally in our efforts to reach meaningful arms reduction agreements with the U.S.S.R. The joint facilities that Australia hosts are essential to deterrence and to the West's ability to monitor Soviet compliance with arms accords. The U.S. greatly appreciates Australia's contributions to the vital task of preserving peace in both the South Pacific and throughout the world.

Minister Hawke and I also talked a good deal about bilateral trade issues. The U.S. and Australia have closely parallel interests in the current round of multilateral trade negotiations. We're in full agreement on the need to open up international trade in agricultural products, a keystone of both our economies. We also agree on the need to redouble our efforts toward the elimination of trade-distorting government subsidies of agricultural products. The Toronto summit resulted in a strong, unified position on the pressing need to invigorate the multilateral trading system. I noted that the United States will continue to work closely with Australia and other like-minded countries to carry us through to a positive conclusion of the ongoing trade negotiations. Until we achieve that goal, we will ensure that any measures that the United States may take to counter unfair subsidization of agriculture take fully into account the interests of countries like Australia.

We also exchanged views on refugees and regional issues, particularly on the importance of cooperation among Pacific States to maintain a secure, peaceful, and prosperous environment in which democratic government can flourish. The stabilizing role the United States-Australia alliance plays in supporting our common efforts has helped foster the phenomenal growth the Pacific region has enjoyed.

In summing up, I cannot overstate the importance we attach to our relationship with Australia. Australia has made major contributions to our mutual security over the past 40 years as a responsible ally, a staunch defender of democratic freedoms, and as a major trading partner.

Bob, you've been a good friend, and I value your counsel. This is our fourth meeting, and I'm delighted that we've been able to have regular, personal exchanges of views and ideas. I know the American people will extend to you a warm welcome, in the tradition of hospitality that both Aussies and Yanks are famous for, as you continue your visit in the United States.

President. Ladies and gentlemen, I confirm that the President and I have been able to engage in a very useful discussion covering the range of topics to which the President has alluded. We have confirmed the strengths and the enduring nature of the relationship between our two great countries, a relationship which, as I was able to say in Congress and confirm with the President, is based upon a shared commitment to principles which we regard as fundamental to the operation of a free and open soci- ety.

I took the opportunity of thanking the President for the fact that during my Prime Ministership, as he has said, he has welcomed me here on a number of occasions; and I observed that this would almost certainly be the last occasion on which I would have the opportunity of meeting with him as President of the United States. And I expressed to him personally and on behalf of the Government and people of Australia our gratitude for the contribution of his Presidency to the improvement not merely of his own people but globally.

The fact that today, as I said to the Congress, we have more than at any other stage in the postwar period reason to look with optimism to a future where the world can live more constructively at peace is in very large measure, as I told the President, due to his ideas, to his persistence, to his strength, to his determination to shape the agenda and the context of the discussions between the two superpowers. He has ensured properly that when he has come to speak he has spoken both from a position of strength and from a position where he knows that he has consulted and has the support of his allies and friends.

He has insisted that, in those discussions, that the vital question of human rights shall be a central part of the agenda. And the results have shown not merely in the negotiation for the first time of an agreement which has eliminated a particular class of nuclear weapons but also in the area of human rights, the significant advances that have been made in the attitudes and practices of the Soviet Union, that his determination in the shaping of the agenda has been right and that it has borne fruit. And I repeat that we are this day able to look with a greater degree of confidence to a world in which the resources of mankind may be able, with a greater degree of confidence, to be channeled into constructive uses is significantly a result, Mr. President, as I told you, of the time of your Presidency. And we are indebted to you for that.

We are also indebted to you for the fact that in your own country, you have presided over a period of record growth and uninterrupted prosperity. Our relationship, as I've said to you, is so good and so mature that where we do have any differences we are able to discuss those.

I expressed to the President, in particular, the appreciation of the Government and the people of Australia for the way in which he has reflected the fact that the correspondence that takes place between us is no mere formality, but that the President reads, takes account of, and carries with him in his presentations the consideration of the Australian position. And in particular, of course, I refer to the fact that I -- for some time now and particularly just before the recent Toronto summit, wrote to the President -- stressed the importance that we attach to the attainment of a liberalized international trading system in general, and in particular, in regard to agricultural commodities. And as you know, ladies and gentlemen, the President took those matters seriously into account and pressed them at the Toronto summit. So, I expressed our appreciation to the President.

And so, I conclude, Ron, as I began in our private talks, in saying in front of the media, thank you for a contribution to the relations between our two countries, which I believe has been unique on your part. And thank you for the contributions that you have made, which means that at the end of your Presidency the world is going to be a better and safer place than it was when you took office.

Mental Health for the Department of Health and Human Services. Prior to this he was Chief of Clinical Psychobiology for the National Institute of Mental Health, 1977 - 1982. He has also served as chief of the section on psychiatry in the laboratory of clinical science. Dr. Goodwin's clinical research interests have been focused on biological and psychological factors in major depressive illness and in manic-depressive illness.

Fourth of July is much more than a date on the calendar -- it is celebrated here in the United States, and recognized around the world, as a turning point in history. No matter how many Fourths we Americans have seen, every new one revives in our hearts the pure patriotism of childhood. With each flag, with each parade and picnic and burst of fireworks, we can't help but recall the first stirrings of our deep love for America.

This year, on our Nation's 212th birthday, we recall another special anniversary, the Bicentennial of our first Independence Day under our newly ratified Constitution. In his diary entry for that date, John Quincy Adams recorded how the news of the latest State ratification was received in Boston: ``(I)mmediately the bells were set to ringing, and the guns to firing again, without any mercy, and continued all the remainder of the afternoon.'' For two centuries now, the Constitution whose birth these patriots so exuberantly hailed has endured, ensuring our liberty and preserving this great Republic.

The passage of time has only brought us even more reason to celebrate. Our Founders marked the Fourth of July, uncertain that the Union would be formed; our ancestors at the time of the Civil War marked it as well, uncertain that the Union would survive; and our parents and grandparents marked it, uncertain that it would withstand the ravages of global conflict. We can rejoice -- and be grateful to God -- that peace and prosperity, the hope of every generation, reign for us on this July 4, 1988.

Lyng showed the President a map that demonstrated the worsening condition of the drought in many areas of the United States. Despite the serious potential effects of the drought, the Secretary said rainfall in the next 2 weeks would alleviate much of the potential damage. The Secretary said that in discussions he has had with Congressmen and Senators, farm groups and Governors, there was agreement that it is too early for emergency relief measures. He also said that the Agriculture Department and other agencies have taken some steps to help, including haying and grazing on acreage conservation reserve and conserving use land and haying on conservation reserve program land.

Senator Stennis, honored guests, and ladies and gentlemen, this gathering tonight truly is a celebration. And the man we honor is no ordinary individual. The life and career of John Stennis are legendary in his home State of Mississippi and here in Washington, where he has served, as you've been told several times tonight, with quiet dignity for 41 years.

Probably half of the people in this room tonight had not even been born when John Stennis came to Washington, and I suppose there are plenty in the other half who would hardly care to admit it -- [laughter] -- over four decades of service in the United States Senate, a period during which this great country has undergone tremendous challenge and change. The humble man who came to Washington from a small town in Mississippi has made an impression on American government that is difficult to measure and hard to fully describe.

He has demonstrated for all of us that one man, committed to God and country, willing to work hard and sacrifice personal gain and comfort, can make a difference. Mississippi can take pride in the accomplishments of John Stennis, but he is a United States Senator, and so we celebrate his contribution to all of America.

Tangible evidence of the difference Senator Stennis has made abounds. Our strong and able military, represented so splendidly here tonight, owes much of its strength to this man who has always been an unwavering advocate of peace through strength. As chairman of the Senate Armed Services Committee in the seventies, Senator Stennis led some of the most crucial legislative battles in history on behalf of our national defense.

Back home in Mississippi, the economic opportunities that Senator Stennis has helped to bring about are beyond counting. Today there's room for even more economic growth in Mississippi, as there is in all the 50 States. But now Mississippi fully shares in the economic life of the Nation.

And yet perhaps John Stennis' greatest contribution to American Government has been his abiding example of integrity in public service. From the time he was elected to represent the people of Kemper County in the Mississippi House of Representatives in 1928 until this moment six decades later, Senator Stennis has been under the oath of public office. And for these six decades, he has done that oath constant honor. Here in Washington, John Stennis established his reputation early in his Senate career, always recognizing that the effectiveness of the Senate is harmed when Members fail to uphold the highest standards. It's no wonder the Senate looked to John Stennis as a leader when the Select Committee on Standards and Conduct was formed in 1965.

And now, if I might, I'd like to add a personal note. Life has not always been easy for Senator Stennis. We all recall his remarkable recovery from gunshot wounds in 1973. His sense of purpose, his commitment to duty, would not allow him to stop or even to slow down. Then there was heart surgery in 1983. And then in 1984 there was more surgery, radical surgery. I remember visiting Senator Stennis at Walter Reed Army Medical Center just days after the removal of his left leg. I admit I felt great pain for him, this fiercely independent man forced to undergo such a life-altering operation.

I went to Walter Reed to encourage Senator Stennis, but when I left, it was I who had been strengthened. For even then, from his hospital bed, John Stennis talked of the future of this nation. Determination to return to his post was evident in everything he said. It was December 4th when I made that visit to Walter Reed. And just over a month later, I stood inside the Capitol to take the oath of office for the second term as President, and, yes, there was John Stennis in the front row.

Senator, when I consider your career, there's a certain comparison that comes to my mind. In troubled places, you've brought calm resolve, like one of the many great fighting ships you've done so much to obtain for the Navy. Serene, self-possessed, but like a ship of the line possessed of a high sense of purpose -- that is John Stennis.

Senator, you have devoted your life to the service of our nation. I can do no more tonight than say, on behalf of the American people: Thank you for your dedicated service. Godspeed in your further endeavors, and God bless you.

Order is not intended to abridge in any respect privileges, exemptions, or immunities that the International Committee of the Red Cross may have acquired or may acquire by international agreements or by statute.

The election should proceed constitutionally, with a new President taking office as scheduled on September 23. It should also be orderly so that a smooth, legitimate transition can occur. The election provides an excellent opportunity for national reconciliation and should be seen in that light. In this context, the United States has responded to the request of Lebanese leaders to help Lebanese Moslems and Christians devise and agree upon a new arrangement for sharing political power. We are convinced by our conversations with these leaders that responsible Lebanese want to find fair guidelines for a process to establish a central government that exercises full authority over a unified, sovereign state. In that state, all Lebanese would enjoy comparable opportunities for advancement. The United States believes an agreement on such guidelines is possible and ought to be achieved as soon as possible.

United States is particularly concerned about the plight of innocent civilians in Lebanon. The tragic casualties from the recent fighting between rival militias in Beirut's southern suburbs and from terrorist bombings and the continued taking and detention of hostages, both Lebanese and foreign, demonstrate the urgent need to restore the authority of the central government throughout the country. Only the central government has the clear, unencumbered right and responsibility to maintain law and order.

Lebanese and American peoples have had a long and close relationship. Out of that friendship emerges both our deep concern about Lebanon's future and our enduring commitment to help the Lebanese ease their suffering and achieve national reconciliation. To those ends, the United States pledges both continuing humanitarian assistance and political support.

Well, thank you all very much. Secretary [of Defense] Carlucci, and members of the Congress who are here, and honored guests, thank you all. I've often noted that, in my lifetime, America has fought four wars: the First World War, World War II, Korea, and Vietnam. You, the men here today, are the Americans who fought those wars. You survived the battles, you survived captivity, and you came home. I salute your valor, and I thank you for being here today as we present a new medal that honors those who served honorably as prisoners of war.

You symbolize the sacrifice that our nation has made, and you can be proud of what you helped achieve -- a Western Europe that is strong and free, a democratic and prosperous Japan that is our critical ally in the Pacific, a South Korea whose remarkable economic and political achievements have become a model for building freedom in the developing world. And in Vietnam, you fought a noble battle for freedom. On the battlefield you knew only victory, only to have your victory lost by a failure of political will.

Nonetheless, you did honor to America. Your resistance to the evil of communism foreshadowed the growing movement toward democracy that we see today around the world. With your blood and valor, you won time for the rest of Southeast Asia and for the rest of humanity. You sustained the dream of freedom and leave as your legacy the free and vibrant nations of that region and the recognition that only free nations can prosper for their peoples. You, all of our former POW's, embody America's indomitable will to be free. Through your heroism, you have woven your lives into the fabric of American history and bound your flesh and spirit into our 200-year unbroken chain of freedom. Through your courage, you have demonstrated to the world that the American people shall always do that which is necessary to remain free. And for this the people of our nation and free people everywhere are in your debt.

I recall that returning prisoners of war said there were three things that helped them survive captivity and return with honor: faith in God, faith in their fellow prisoners, and faith in their country. As prisoners, many of you were subjected to terrible hardship and pain, which you resisted to the limits of your endurance, showing extraordinary courage time after time. You gained strength from each other and found it deep within yourselves.

He was periodically beaten and prevented from sleeping. As he grew weak, two fellow prisoners, despite the close watch of guards, spoke short words of encouragement that helped to sustain him. And another POW sent him a message in code by snapping a towel. The message was ``God bless you.'' Yes, when things seemed most hopeless, you spoke words of prayer. In your time of greatest suffering, your faith did not falter but instead grew stronger. And in the face of evil, you put your trust in God and praised His name.

II -- being held in a POW camp, learned of the end of the war and their impending liberation, instead of taking vengeance on the prison guards there in their place of pain and torment, they said a prayer of thanksgiving and then sang ``God Bless America.'' In the words of the song, America's soldiers ``stood beside her,'' and we must stand beside them. Our country has not forgotten your former comrades who are still missing, those who fought in Korea and Vietnam and who have not returned home or been accounted for. We must keep faith with them and their families and demand the fullest possible accounting of the fate of the Americans who are missing in action. I know that the ``River Rats'' have a scholarship fund for the MIA children, and many of you've supported our efforts to learn the fate of their fathers. And let me say, we write no final chapter here. If there are living Americans being held against their will, we must bring them home.

America must also remain strong and vigilant, so that we can prevent war. A strong defense is one of our most basic human needs because it's the price of maintaining peace. And the same is true of supporting our allies and friends. Those resisting tyranny and aggression today in Nicaragua, in Afghanistan, in Cambodia, in Angola, and elsewhere, these fighters for freedom are part of the age-old tradition of human courage in the face of oppression. All of our efforts in Central America, particularly our support for the Nicaraguan freedom fighters, are designed to help those people secure their own freedom, so that we will never have to go to war to defend that critical region. And who can know better than you, how much better it is to deter a war than to fight one.

We can all be grateful that during the past 50 years a special effort has made more employment opportunities available to blind and other severely disabled Americans. The Wagner-O'Day Act, which became law on June 25, 1938, directed Federal agencies to purchase products from sheltered workshops staffed by blind Americans. In 1971, amendments proposed by Senator Javits extended this program by including workshops employing those with severe disabilities and by expanding the role of the Committee for Purchase from the Blind and Other Severely Handicapped in the administration of the program.

Today, more than 16,000 blind and other severely disabled people work in nearly 350 facilities under this program. From a modest beginning, when traditional products such as mops and brooms were produced, the program has grown to include a broad range of sophisticated goods and services.

Under this law, now known as the Javits-Wagner-O'Day Act, countless blind and other severely disabled Americans have received training and employment and have developed and displayed the skills and abilities to take competitive jobs outside sheltered settings and to reach their full potential and independence. Our Nation benefits from such contributions, and the Federal government benefits from the program because fine products and services are provided at fair market prices. Achievements under the program have been many, but we must continue our efforts to hire and train the majority of disabled people of working age who have not yet become employed.

We should all appreciate the wisdom and dedication of Senators Jacob Javits and Robert Wagner and of Congresswoman Caroline O'Day, by whose names this Act is known. We should also commend the efforts of the Committee for Purchase from the Blind and Other Severely Handicapped, the National Industries for the Blind, and the National Industries for the Severely Handicapped, whose goals are making the wisdom of the Act a reality.

I call upon the people of the United States to observe this day with appropriate ceremonies and activities designed to reaffirm the Act's historical objectives of providing employment opportunities to blind and other severely handicapped Americans.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-fourth day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

But we're here tonight not to celebrate the movies but the theater -- Ford's Theatre. This has been quite an evening, and on behalf of everyone here tonight, I want to express my gratitude to all those who've made it possible.

It was 125 years ago this year that Ford's Theatre first opened, as we've been told. And Washington in those days was, for the most part, a village -- modest frame houses, dirt roads, chickens and livestock everywhere. The theatrical manager, John T. Ford, came here from Baltimore because he realized that Washington had a large natural audience -- the thousands of Union troops quartered here with little to do. But Ford's Theatre did much more than give the troops a way to fight off their boredom; it brought pleasure and refreshment into the heart of a city struggling with the Civil War. Think how uplifting it must have been to the people who crowded this theater in those dark days to be able to laugh, to be able to participate in an evening that lifted them out of themselves. His biographers tell us that Mr. Lincoln loved the theater and nothing could have pleased him more than the performances that he saw here.

Today the village of Washington has become a great international city, even a center of culture and the arts. But the work of this splendid little theater remains unchanged: to refresh, to uplift, and to give joy. And so, in supporting Ford's Theatre, we're both helping to preserve a piece of our own history and to provide theater of the highest standards for the audiences today. May Ford's first 125 years be followed by 125 to come.

This past week I traveled to Canada for my eighth economic summit with leaders of the industrialized democracies. The summit produced important results. We agreed on a plan to provide debt relief for some of the poorest countries of the world. We moved important agricultural reform negotiations forward. And we rededicated our nations to combating the modern day evils of airplane hijackings, terrorism, and illegal drugs.

It's this last matter, the fight against illegal drugs, that I'd like to take a moment to discuss with you this afternoon. This past week's meeting in Canada wasn't the first time the drug problem had been discussed among my summit colleagues. At the 1985 summit in Bonn, we established an expert group to identify areas for enhancing effectiveness and cooperation in fighting the scourge of illegal drugs. The expert group presented its report at our 1986 summit in Tokyo, and the report proved useful in setting our countries on a path of cooperation in combating drug abuse and illicit drug trafficking. Now the summit leaders have supported an initiative for a special group, launched by Vice President Bush and Canadian Prime Minister Mulroney, that would extend and promote the work done by the Bonn summit. This group will propose methods to improve international cooperation in combating production, trafficking, and financing of the drug trade. I'm hopeful this group can identify measures for a major coordinated assault on drugs.

But today the battle against drugs extends far beyond the seven industrialized democracies represented in Toronto. Just 1 year ago, 138 nations, members of the United Nations, met in Vienna to participate in the historic International Conference on Drug Abuse and Illicit Trafficking. This conference proved a resounding success in bringing together representatives from around the globe. Each of the participating governments declared its commitment to vigorous action against drug abuse and illicit drug trafficking.

Perhaps even more important, the 138 nations adopted a comprehensive outline of activities all nations can undertake to fight illegal drugs. These activities include the reduction of demand for illegal drugs, the suppression of illicit drug production and trafficking, and the treatment and rehabilitation of drug-dependent people.

One suggestion coming out of the U.N. Conference was the recommendation for a commemorative day: an International Day Against Drug Abuse and Illicit Trafficking. The U.N. General Assembly then set aside June 26th to serve as this day of observance. Around the world, nations will join the United Nations commemorating the international fight against drugs, and I'm pleased that the United States will be among them.

Attorney General Meese, who headed our delegation to the conference in Vienna, will host a ceremony to draw attention to the international day and to reaffirm the commitment of the United States to a drug free America and, yes, a drug free world.

Here at home this past week, the White House Conference for a Drug Free America released its report. This document included more than 100 recommendations for combating drug abuse and illicit drug trafficking. We'll be giving these recommendations careful consideration in the days ahead.

We are proud to have the Turkish President here. Turkey and the United States have the strongest of bonds: friendship and alliance. Our relations have been characterized by success. Together with their NATO allies, Turkey and the United States have been partners in the most successful alliance the world has ever known, an alliance that has maintained the peace for nearly 40 years.

The modern Turkish-American partnership began in 1947. The Turkish people demonstrated the will and the courage that were required to meet the threat of aggression. The American people, with similar will and courage, were able to support them. In the 40 years that have followed, the strength and durability of our partnership, and of the NATO alliance, have discouraged aggression. In Korea, Turks and Americans shed blood together on the battlefield in defense of freedom. Today the solidarity of our mutual commitment to collective security keeps us safe and enables us to seek improved relations with our adversaries from a position of strength.

The ties between Turkey and the United States are broader than our common security interests. We are brought together by the strong bonds that derive from shared values as well. And I might say, Americans have admired the way that Turkey pulled itself back to democracy when challenged by the violent forces of terrorism and anarchy a decade ago. We are well aware of your own distinguished role, Mr. President, in maintaining Turkey's devotion to the ideals of Ataturk. Your country's pride in that accomplishment is understandable. For our part, the American people are proud of the decades of support they have given to Turkey. Friendships must never be taken for granted. We want our ties with the Turkish Nation to grow and to deepen. Happily, that process is well underway. As vigorous democracies, our peoples should get to know each other better.

Last year the ``Suleyman the Magnificent'' exhibit, magnificent in itself, opened the eyes of Americans to the richness of the Turkish heritage. Visits between American Congressmen and women and Turkish parliamentarians have increased in recent years, and with that increase has come better understanding. Our trade relations are growing, and Turkey is strongly attracting American investors. And I firmly believe that trade and investment are the surest ways that Turkey can find to ensure the prosperity its people seek.

Mr. President, Turkey and the United States are allies and friends; as such, we have a record of success together. In our coming meetings, I know that we will enhance that friendship and add to the record of success. I am confident, too, that your full schedule, with its intense program of contacts with American political, economic, and cultural leaders, will further strengthen mutual understanding and our sense of common purpose. I look forward to discussing with you the ways in which we can strengthen our established ties and create new forms of cooperation in defense of these purposes and values. As Turkey and the United States look ahead to the next century, our continuing friendship and alliance will continue to serve us well.

And now, Mr. President, I have the honor of presenting to you the Legion of Merit, Chief Commander, one of the highest military honors our country awards, for the service of Turkish forces in the Korean conflict. I present this not only as a tribute to the valor of the Turkish military and the people of your nation but as a symbol of our alliance on so many fronts over so many years in the cause of peace and freedom.

Evren. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, I thank you for the kind invitation to visit the United States of America and for your generous hospitality. Your warm words of welcome have moved us. This ceremony, which marks the beginning of my visit, brings together the national flags of Turkey and the United States, allies whose ties have stood the test of time.

Thousands of Turks like myself still recall the memories of fighting shoulder-to-shoulder with American soldiers in Korea for the defense of freedom. We have been allies at war and in peace. This Legion of Merit award is a reflection of the fact that the outstanding services of the Turkish brigade in Korea are still fresh in the minds of our American friends, and I accept it with deep appreciation on behalf of the entire Turkish Nation. In so doing, I express not only my own personal thanks but also those of my 54 million fellow Turks who share with me the pride of their nation on this occasion. Recalling our comrades in arms who made the ultimate sacrifice in Korea, I assure you that the dedication of the Turkish people to the principle of freedom and democracy remains as undiminished today as it did 40 years ago.

President, my visit to your country is also the natural consequence of the interest and support which your administration from the outset has extended to Turkey and to the development of Turkish-American friendship. This interest, which we much appreciate, is rooted in Turkey's dedication to Western ideals of democracy, peace, and stability. As in the past, the core of Turkish-American relations continues to consist of commonly held political views and values. Those elements constitute the most valid guarantee of the durability and closeness of our friendship, as well as the fruitfulness of our cooperation. The stable development of Turkish-American relations, based on equality and mutual interests, is to the benefit of our countries, the free world, and international peace and security.

President, I am confident that my visit will provide the opportunity for a productive dialog on how we can further expand and deepen our bonds. At the same time, I hope that my visit will also contribute to a better recognition of Turkey and the United States by our respective peoples, and particularly of Turkey as a reliable partner.

President, the people of Turkey follow with admiration your determined efforts for the defense of freedom, strengthening of peace, and development and reduction of international tensions. Strengthening of peace, freedom, and independence remain high on the global agenda. Situated in a region where these issues are paramount, Turkey is determined to continue her contribution to peace and stability. Turkey serves as an anchor of democracy, freedom, and stability in a region in turmoil. Your own Thomas Paine once wrote: ``Those who expect to reap the blessings of freedom must undergo the fatigue of supporting it.'' Mr. President, let me say that in Turkey we do not feel fatigued by our support of the Western allies because we know that by supporting the allies we may all continue to reap the blessings of freedom.

President, I am delighted to meet you, the distinguished members of your administration, and be among the great people of this country. As a final word, let me say that I look with hope and confidence to the future of the relations between our two countries sharing the ideals of peace, stability, freedom, and prosperity. I thank you once again for your kind invitation.

I have just been briefed on the unanimous report of the Commission on the Human Immunodeficiency Virus Epidemic by Adm. James D. Watkins, the Commission's Chairman. The report represents an impressive effort and significantly increases our level of understanding to deal with AIDS. To begin implementing this report, I am today directing Dr. Ian Macdonald, a distinguished physician and my Special Assistant for Drug Policy, to present to me within 30 days a course of action that takes us forward. At Admiral Watkins' suggestion, I have also directed Dr. Macdonald to include among his priorities consideration of specific measures to strengthen implementation of the policy guidance from ``AIDS in the Workplace,'' recently issued by the Office of Personnel Management.

The report embraces the major concepts my administration laid out over a year ago: to be compassionate towards victims of the disease; to care for them with dignity and kindness; and at the same time, to inform and educate our citizens so that we can prevent the further spread of the disease.

There is a direct relationship between drug abuse and the spread of the HIV virus that becomes AIDS. It is critical that particular attention be focused on this relationship now, while developing a national consensus on additional anti-drug abuse measures.

I want to express my sincere appreciation to Admiral Watkins and all of the Commission participants for their perseverance and diligence in completing their work. It is my hope that we can continue to approach this problem, which is more than a medical crisis or a public health threat, in a thoughtful and bipartisan manner.

Americans and Turks sitting here will soon be sharing a cup of coffee. And earlier today, you and I shared our ideas and our hopes for the United States, for Turkey, and for the partnership between our peoples. And that's why I've long hoped that you would come to the United States, and that's why I'm glad you're here.

But you and I are building on a solid structure. The United States and Turkey have, for more than 40 years, shared much more than a cup of coffee. We've worked together to preserve the integrity of Turkey when it was threatened by aggression in 1947. We've been partners in the world's most successful partnership: the NATO alliance of democracies. Together with our allies, we have withstood aggression and made progress toward peace. Turks and Americans shed blood together in Korea. Americans have been proud to help Turkey in securing its democracy and seeking prosperity.

Our aspirations for our partnership remain large: peace, security, and freedom for our peoples; close cooperation in securing these objectives; and success in defending them. I am confident that 40 years from now Turks and Americans will look back and say that through their friendship Turks and Americans secured for themselves the kind of world we have envisioned together.

Our talks today with you and with the distinguished members of your administration have reaffirmed the strength and depth of the bond of friendship which we have continuously developed over the years between our countries. I am most pleased to observe this.

During your administration, Turkish-American relations have gained additional momentum, and the scope of our cooperation has vastly expanded. I am confident that I speak for the Turkish people in stating that we see you not only as a distinguished statesman of our era but also as a good friend of Turkey. We hope that future administrations will carry and further build on the revitalization process in our relations.

The strategic interdependence between our two countries, which we mutually identified almost 40 years ago, retains its validity today. But Turkish-American cooperation rests not only on strategic interests but also on common values embedded in the principles of respect for human rights, freedom, and democracy. We in Turkey are proud that, like other NATO countries with whom we share a common destiny, we have succeeded in establishing a democracy with all its institutions based on respect for human rights. Though this characteristic may not be all that well-known, it is the basis for Turkey's position as an island of peace and stability in a region in turmoil.

President, we followed with satisfaction and great interest the positive developments at the Moscow summit. It is the hope of Turkish and other peoples that the historical step taken by concluding the INF agreement will be followed by more comprehensive ones in the direction of disarmament. I would like to express my appreciation for this constructive initiative on the part of the United States and the Soviet Union and congratulate you for your tremendous success. We support the efforts of your administration to seek better relations with the Soviet Union without neglecting our defense requirements. It would be a tremendous achievement if, through these efforts, we could leave to future generations a more secure world.

President, with its present capabilities and future potential, Turkey can become an important economic partner. Internal stability and peace have fostered and sustained high rates of economic growth. This encourages us as we look to the future with confidence for a prosperous Turkey. We consider the economic dimension of our relations with the United States as integral to our traditional friendship and security partnership. Expanded economic cooperation will be an additional source of strength for our political and security relations. That is why we seek more dynamic and comprehensive economic collaboration as part of a multifaceted and therefore more robust relationship. We want our American friends to know of our desire for wide-ranging cooperation in this regard.

President, I thank you once again for your kind invitation, for the generous hospitality that the American people have extended to us, and for this beautiful evening. And I propose a toast to you; to your charming wife, Mrs.

You and I have known each other for many years as public servants, partisan allies, and good friends. You came to the United States Senate the same year I went to the Statehouse in California; and, as I'm sure you would agree, things haven't been the same for either of us since. Our paths often brought us together in those early years and helped determine the future direction of our Party and our country. And let me add: Our Nation has rarely seen a more dedicated and capable leader in its capital than Howard Baker.

Your dedication to public service was renowned during your 18 years in the Senate, but it became even more so when you set aside your personal and political interests to answer my call to service in the Executive branch. For that, I am particularly appreciative. You accepted the position of Chief of Staff and quickly assembled a top-flight team of senior aides to move my agenda forward.

A tone of cooperation and conciliation in those difficult early months of 1987 was communicated to the public and to those in the Congress. At the same time, the White House functioned efficiently and effectively in setting out and pursuing my policy goals.

I clearly appreciate the challenges you faced. Your tireless efforts on my behalf with your former colleagues to forge a sense of cooperation last October to reach a budget agreement; your counsel on many issues that enabled me to make the best decisions on behalf of all the people; your significant contributions to bring about the first reduction in United States and Soviet nuclear arms; and also your gentle Tennessee wit that can relax a tense moment -- these are attributes that come from the heart and that have made our relationship not a job but a friendship that will last forever.

No one understands better than Nancy and I the personal reasons that lead you to relinquish your responsibilities at this time. That, too, is a tribute to your character and your integrity. With all the years you and I have been associated, this truly is no farewell, but rather a note of enduring and heartfelt thanks for a job well done.

State Government as an assistant to Governor Richard Ogilvie and as executive assistant to the speaker of the house. Mr. Oglesby also spent 3\1/2\ years in management positions with the Illinois Bell Telephone Co.

United States and the Soviet Union concluded round two of the nuclear testing talks on June 28 in Geneva. The round, which began on February 15, is part of U.S.-Soviet step-by-step negotiations on nuclear testing. The first priority of these talks is agreement on effective verification measures for two existing, but unratified treaties: the Threshold Test Ban Treaty and the Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty.

During the round, we made considerable progress toward our goal of effective verification of these treaties. The two sides are now close to agreement on the verification protocol for the Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty. Agreement on this protocol will facilitate further progress on the verification protocol for the Threshold Test Ban Treaty. However, in the case of this treaty, the Soviets have insisted that the joint verification experiment is necessary before the protocol is finalized.

Preparations for the joint verification experiment are well advanced. Based on procedures detailed in an agreement signed in Moscow during the summit, personnel from each side are now on the other's test site, making arrangements for the experiment. We expect the joint verification experiment to be conducted this summer. We believe that the experiment will provide the Soviets the information they need to accept routine U.S. use of CORRTEX -- the most accurate method we have identified for verifying compliance with these treaties -- for treaty verification.

We condemn this senseless act of brutality. As of this time, no group has claimed responsibility for the act. Our deepest sympathies are extended to Captain Nordeen's family. We will work with Greek authorities to bring the murderers to justice.

Defense Minister Yitzhak Rabin over the past 2 days. The President noted that Israel and the United States will soon sign a memorandum of understanding (MOU) for the joint development of an antitactical ballistic missile (ATBM) which will be able to deal with ballistic missile threats. The U.S. contribution will be approximately 80 percent and that of Israel 20 percent. This joint development is an outgrowth of research on SDI.

President expressed his concern about ominous new military developments in the region. In particular, he called attention to the proliferation of ballistic missiles and chemical capabilities. He observed that such capabilities could change the military situation, making any future war far more costly, difficult to control, and dangerous. Both the President and Vice President emphasized in their meetings with Defense Minister Rabin the need for international efforts to stop this proliferation. They also stressed that these trends put a premium both on continuing U.S.-Israeli defense cooperation and energetically working for peace in the area.

Israeli capability for self-defense. Defense Minister Rabin has also done much to develop our strategic partnership and give it substance. He has recognized realistically what Israel can develop on its own and in partnership with the United States.

Israel could never be fully secure without peace. Realism and a willingness to nurture, rather than reject, possible opportunities for peace are essential, as is a climate that makes negotiations possible. While Israel should not be expected to make concessions under the threat of violence, the preservation of order in the territories must neither provide a justification for civilian lawlessness nor act as an excuse for avoiding political discourse with the Palestinians of the West Bank and Gaza. Neither should violence nor controls on violence become ends in themselves, making a political solution more difficult.

The Government of Romania has announced that it has decided to renounce the renewal of nondiscriminatory treatment accorded to the products of Romania by the United States subject to the terms of section 402 of the Act (19 U.S.C.

Effective with respect to all articles the product of Romania that are entered, or withdrawn from warehouse for consumption, into the customs territory of the United States on or after July 3, 1988, such articles, whether imported directly or indirectly, shall be subject to duty at the rates set forth in the Rates of Duty column 2 of the TSUS.

General Headnote 3(d) to the TSUS, setting forth those countries whose products, whether imported directly or indirectly, shall be dutied at the rates of duty shown in the column numbered 2 of such schedules, is modified by inserting in alphabetical sequence ``Socialist Republic of Romania''.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-eighth day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

At that time, he expressed his full support for the goal of ensuring public confidence in the impartiality and integrity of criminal law investigations of high-level executive branch officials. At the same time, the President expressed concern that the act's procedures were inconsistent with the text of the Constitution and the principle of separation of powers. Despite these doubts about the constitutionality of the Independent Counsel Act, the administration has faithfully and consistently complied with all of the act's requirements, even offering the ongoing Independent Counsels parallel appointments within the Department of Justice to protect them against constitutional challenge. Thus, today's decision by the Court will have no practical effect on the administration's implementation of the Independent Counsel Act or on the ongoing investigations. We cannot comment on the consequences of this decision for any existing cases.

Well, since his election to Congress in 1982, Connie has stood with us for reducing taxes, spending, and government; strengthening our defense, expanding world freedom; and restoring a strong, proud, and free America that puts its faith in God and trust in the people themselves. What the 1988 elections are all about is whether we continue to build on that progress and move ahead to an even brighter future or whether we hesitate and return to those worn-out policies that Connie mentioned that bring high taxes, low growth, and a loss of direction and purpose.

George Bush and I took office, the other party, which had long controlled Washington, had left America with its economic and foreign policy in disarray. Government spending was soaring out of control.

Business was being crushed under massive regulation and taxation. Unemployment and business failures were climbing. The prime rate was at a record 21\1/2\ percent. And working people had suffered under 2 consecutive years of double-digit inflation that had raised consumer prices an incredible 27.3 percent. Yes, soaring prices and a sinking economy -- that's what the other fellows, with all their lip service about compassion, inflicted on the American people. The economists called it stagflation. The Democrats termed it malaise. The liberal pundits said it was part of America's inevitable decline.

We refused to believe the so-called experts who announced that fuel shortages and gas lines were here to stay, that we had entered an age of scarcity and Americans would have to learn to get by with less. Instead we deregulated oil prices, said goodbye to Federal price fixing and fuel rationing, and helped put America back to work. When we proposed cutting tax rates and letting working people keep more of their own money, the Washington establishment immediately launched a counterattack, rolling out liberal economists to warn that lowering tax rates would cause runaway inflation.

Well, we pushed ahead and cut the tax rates, as you know. And the result was that inflation was slashed to a fraction of what it had been; interest rates were more than cut in half; the economy boomed; employment soared; and Federal revenues actually increased. The top tax bracket has now been lowered from 70 percent to 28 percent, and in the Senate, Connie Mack will help keep the rates down and work with George Bush and his fellow Republicans in Congress to cut the capital gains rate and open our economy for more jobs and growth.

But what about the Democrats? The $64 billion question is this: Should we expect that if the Democrats' all but certain Presidential candidate is elected that he would raise taxes? Yep. In fact, he just did. Not only has he hiked taxes as Governor of Massachusetts, but in the last 5 years he has increased Massachusetts' State spending at double the rate of Federal spending. He has spent every dime and more of the revenue generated in his State by the Reagan-Bush recovery. And since 1986, while the Federal budget deficit has been cut sharply, his deficit in Massachusetts has ballooned. So, yes, the man expected to head up the Democratic ticket that Connie faces is a true liberal who, instead of controlling government spending, raises taxes. The sad truth is that whenever liberals talk about reducing the deficit it's just a code word for boosting taxes. And once they raise taxes, they raise spending even more.

Connie Mack knows that to fight the deficit you must control spending. He supports the balanced budget amendment and the line-item veto, which your Governor has and which I had as a Governor, but which -- for some reason they just don't want to give it to a President. He helped lead the fight to pass Gramm-Rudman, and that law is already helping to put a lid on Federal spending. Connie knows that the American people are not undertaxed; the Federal Government overspends. Isn't that the kind of man Florida needs in the Senate?

You see, the new liberals -- or the liberals, not new -- the liberals in Congress have opened a new front in their assault on limited government and fiscal responsibility with a tactic designed to circumvent the budget process and slip past Gramm-Rudman. Their new strategy is to try to enact their multimillion-dollar social agenda by requiring private businesses, primarily small businesses, to carry out and directly pay for expensive social programs.

Now, here's an example: Senator Kennedy has tried for years to pass an exorbitantly expensive program of socialized medicine, and it hasn't happened. So, now he's proposing -- and the expected Democratic nominee has endorsed this plan -- that the Government pass a law requiring private companies to directly pay for a federally mandated health insurance program, a program not targeted to the needy and which would not provide for the retired or unemployed.

According to the Congress' own budget office, this law would cost the American people a whopping $27.1 billion a year. But the political angle of this scheme is that the tremendous expense of this mandatory program will not be called what it obviously is, a gigantic tax, a $27 billion tax, mostly falling on small businesses, that would reduce jobs, growth, wages, and economic opportunity across every segment of American society. The fact that the liberals try to disguise their big government ideology inside a legislative Trojan horse is proof that they haven't given up. It's up to conservatives like Connie Mack to just say no to big government and to lead the fight for greater opportunity and prosperity for America.

And each time the people have made the same decision to continue in the direction of economic freedom, entrepreneurship, and individual opportunity, and to move away from the heavy hand of government which seeks to control the people and the economy.

You see, we can either have an economy that puts the private citizen at the center -- the consumer, the worker, the entrepreneur -- and lets each individual be the judge of what to buy or sell, where to work, where to invest, and what to create; or we can put the Government at the center of the economy and let bureaucrats and politicians call the balls and strikes and decide who's out, and who's out of work, who's out of business, or who will get the big contract and be home free.

What is euphemistically called government-corporate partnership is just government coercion, political favoritism, collectivist industrial policy, and old-fashioned Federal boondoggles nicely wrapped up in a bright-colored ribbon. And it doesn't work. This kind of approach was tried in Europe, and it's being abandoned because it only resulted in economic stagnation and industrial decay.

Back in 1981, we passed a true jobs bill. We cut taxes, spending, and regulation, and got government out of the way and let free people create new jobs and businesses. Well, our jobs bill, what was once dismissed as Reaganomics -- funny, they don't call it that anymore -- has produced over 250,000 jobs a month over 66 straight months; and that is a record that no spending program or political gimmick can ever match. And do you know that most of those new jobs, those almost 17 million, were created by small, independent businesses in these 66 months?

Mack and the Republican Party stand for opportunity and jobs. We represent working people and entrepreneurs. The liberal leadership of the Democratic Party represents big government at the expense of the American worker and taxpayer. But the fact is that the Democrats have controlled both Houses of Congress for 27 of the last 33 years, and now more than ever it's time for a change.

Let me add to those figures I just gave you with regard to the other party. When we took office in January 1981, the Democrats had controlled both Houses of the Congress for 44 of the preceding 48 years. But in the 1980 election, we won control of one House: the Senate. And for 6 years, we had that. Now, we're back to the Democrats having both Houses. We couldn't have achieved the economic recovery we have if both Houses had remained in Democratic hands as they are now. We must get the Senate back if we're to continue our economic growth.

Never again! Connie Mack and I stand with the Nicaraguan resistance. We will not rest until we've won for them the full support they need and until they've won for themselves the genuine democracy and freedom for which they've so bravely struggled. By supporting courageous freedom fighters around the world, we're shining a light on the path out from Communism, and nowhere has that light shone brighter than in Afghanistan. And isn't it time we apply the lessons of Afghanistan in Nicaragua and show the same commitment to freedom fighters in our own hemisphere as we do to others in distant lands?

I just came from a meeting with Cuban-American leaders, and I want to tell you what I told them. In Communist Cuba, a man like Armando Valladares is considered a criminal. In the United States, we're honored to have him represent our nation before the world. In Communist Cuba, a man like Ramon Puig is labeled an enemy of the Government. In the United States, he's a respected citizen and a hero. And while Havana spreads communism, terror, and death in Central America, many Cuban-Americans like Dr. Manuel Alzugaray are providing food, medicine, and humanitarian assistance to the victims of Communist aggression.

So, yes, there is an unbridgeable gulf between the Governments of the United States and Cuba; it is the gulf between freedom and tyranny. And as far as this administration is concerned, freedom for Cuba, liberty for her people, is a nonnegotiable demand. And so long as Cuba remains an inhuman Communist dungeon, so long as it exports terrorism and revolution in the Western Hemisphere; has some 60,000 military, secret police, and other personnel propping up brutal Communist dictatorships around the world; and, yes, so long as Cuba is used as the personal instrument of Fidel Castro's violent anti-Americanism -- there cannot and must not be any normalization of relations with Cuba.

You can count on Connie Mack to defend freedom, to defend America, to defend the taxpayer, and to defend the family. He supports the Strategic Defense Initiative that would protect us from nuclear attack. And he supports tough Federal judges who would put violent criminals behind bars. And to protect our children from the menace of illegal drugs, he favors the toughest, most comprehensive drug enforcement policies, including the death penalty when narcotics traffickers commit murder. And when it comes to looking out for the rights and concerns of retired people, you can count on Connie Mack to be there. He has staunchly defended the Social Security system to ensure that it will be fiscally sound and available for Americans who worked so many years to earn its benefits.

Connie Mack cares about people. Ask Anatoly Michelson, who immigrated to America 30 years ago, only to have the Soviet Union keep his family from joining him. As a Member of Congress, Connie took up their cause, and last year -- after three decades apart -- a reunion took place. And Anatoly, who is here today, was reunited in America with his wife, daughter, and grandson.

And when I look at this tremendous group here today, all of you, I just wish I could take you all back to Washington with me, but I have to leave you here so you can get out the vote in November. I want to thank each one of you for everything that you're doing to help put Congressman Connie Mack in the Senate and to help build the Republican Party throughout the State of Florida.

Savimbi enjoys significant support among the Angolan population. He seeks the withdrawal of all foreign forces and a process of internal political reconciliation in Angola. The United States believes that true peace in Angola can only result from national reconciliation and that UNITA has the right to participate in such a process.

President and Dr. Savimbi discussed a range of issues concerning the situation in southern Africa. The President supports UNITA's struggle against the presence of Soviet and Cuban forces in Angola. Dr. Savimbi supports the ongoing U.S.-brokered negotiations with South Africa, Angola, and Cuba aimed at achieving Cuban troop withdrawal from Angola and independence for neighboring Namibia. During the recent Toronto summit, participating nations expressed strong support for the negotiations and the goal of national reconciliation within Angola.

The President. No, we've known this for a while, and the investigation goes on. And I think it's just evidence of what we've been saying, and particularly what Nancy has been saying, and that is that this problem -- no one is exempt. This problem crosses all kinds of lines.

I think that -- this is another indication of why compulsory drug testing is not bad. It is, I think, one of the principal answers. But let the people know that we'll do our best to salvage anyone who has been addicted.

Studies of motor vehicle crashes show that front-seat occupants who do not wear safety belts are twice as likely to be killed or seriously injured as occupants who wear their belts. In 1987 alone, safety belts saved the lives of 2,450 front-seat passengers and prevented thousands of serious injuries. ``Buckling up'' is clearly one of the most valuable acts we can perform for ourselves and our loved ones.

With the increase in publicity about safety belts and the enactment of safety belt use laws, belt use has been steadily increasing. But there is still a long way to go: Less than half of our citizens are using safety belts regularly. A higher percentage of children are restrained by child seats, but many of these seats are incorrectly installed. Each of us can help improve safety by wearing safety belts at all times, by encouraging others to do so, and by making sure that our children ride in safety seats that are properly installed.

In order to encourage the people of the United States to wear safety belts, to have their children use child safety seats, and to encourage safety and law enforcement agencies and other concerned organizations, individuals, and officials to promote greater use of these essential safety devices, the Congress, by H.J. Res. 485, has designated June 26 through July 2, 1988, as ``National Safety Belt Use Week'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this week.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirtieth day of June, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

National Drug Policy Board, presented me with the Board's report in response to my request for additional recommendations to strengthen our national drug policy. Next week I plan to approve an administration package that will be presented to the bipartisan executive-legislative drug task force.

These recommendations send a strong message to drug-law offenders, including users and traffickers. I join the Chairman in emphasizing that we cannot tolerate criminals who violate our borders, terrorize our communities, or poison our citizens. Likewise, we cannot tolerate drug users who provide the illegal market for the drugs or who benefit from the taxpayers' generosity through Federal grants, contracts, or loans. We must hold people responsible for their drug use through accountable treatment programs and through our parole and probations systems. This problem touches all of us at home, at school, at work, whether in government or in the private sector.

May 18, 1988, I called for a joint executive-legislative task force, a summit meeting of leaders in the Congress and the administration, to develop a comprehensive legislative package to address every aspect of the drug problem. I urge the task force to begin its deliberations with an initial meeting soon after the Fourth of July weekend so we can enact the necessary legislation quickly.

In addition, it is imperative for the Congress to restore hundreds of millions in cuts in our law enforcement budget requests and expeditiously pass legislation needed to successfully implement our drug strategy. The Drug Policy Board recommendations are a good starting point to pull together so that we can stop the sale and use of illegal drugs.

President today announced his intention to appoint Robert Boone Hawkins, Jr., to be a member of the Advisory Commission on Intergovernmental Relations for a term of 2 years. This is a reappointment. Upon appointment, he will be redesignated Chairman.

I transmit herewith, for the advice and consent of the Senate, the Treaty between the Government of the United States and the Government of Canada on Pacific Albacore Tuna Vessels and Port Privileges. Also transmitted for the information of the Senate is the report of the Department of State with respect to the Treaty.

This Treaty is necessary to resolve difficulties which have arisen between the United States and Canada concerning albacore tuna fishing on the Pacific Coast. In the past Canada has seized vessels of the United States fishing albacore tuna off the Canadian coast, and the United States has retaliated by prohibiting the import of tuna from Canada.

The Treaty solves these problems by securing free and unlimited access for vessels of both countries off the Pacific coasts of the United States and Canada. It provides reciprocal port access and rights to land tuna in specified ports. The Treaty will also assure that circumstances will not arise which would lead to Canadian seizures of American vessels in the albacore tuna fishery or require another United States embargo of Canadian tuna. This approach was suggested by and has the support of the United States albacore fishing industry.

Not only will this Treaty benefit the fishing industries of both countries, but it represents important progress in the resolution of the fisheries issues which have been troubling the United States and Canada.

In 1967 he was transferred to the State of California military department headquarters in Sacramento. His 7-year tenure there was served principally as the deputy adjutant general, Army, and later as the deputy commanding general of the California Army National Guard.

Combined in this campaign are the annual fundraising efforts of the United Way, the National Health Agencies, local non-federated voluntary agencies and the American Red Cross. Through the CFC, Federal Employees have the opportunity to help our neighbors and fellow citizens without going through government channels. We have the chance to prove what people can do on their own.

In America, we have traditionally accepted the responsibility of individual giving for good causes. The values that cause us to care for our neighbors, our countrymen and people in faraway lands are the values that make us great.

I request that you serve personally as Chairman of the Combined Campaign in your organization and appoint a top assistant as your Vice Chairman. Please advise Secretary Baldrige of the person you designate as your Vice Chairman.

Today, all over America, families and friends are reuniting to renew ties, enjoy each other's company, and celebrate our Nation's birthday. It is a day when liberty and laughter go hand-in-hand -- when we can acknowledge that, oh yes, we have our faults, and lots of problems, too, but we're happy and proud because we're free, and we know the best of America is yet to be.

If you close your eyes and try to picture our country, chances are the first thing you'll see is your own hometown. I always see mine, Dixon and Tampico in Illinois. Today it is the hometowns of America, both big and small, that remind us what a diverse yet united country we are. Each in its own special way will carry out a wish expressed by one of the Founding Fathers 205 years ago.

Well, Mr. Adams, rest assured that what you wanted is being done. Your traditions are now ours, and we guard them like national treasures. And you know why. When we unfurl our flags, strike up the bands, and light up the skies each July 4th, we celebrate the most exciting, ongoing adventure in human freedom the world has ever known.

It began in 1620 when a group of courageous families braved a mighty ocean to build a new future in a new world. They came not for material gain, but to secure liberty for their souls within a community bound by laws.

A century-and-a-half later, their descendants pledged their lives, their fortunes and their sacred honor to found this Nation. Some would forfeit their fortunes and their lives, but none sacrificed honor.

Then, it is said, one unknown man rose to speak. He was neither young, nor strong in voice; yet, he spoke with such conviction that he mesmerized the hall. He cited the grievances that had brought them to this moment. Then, his voice failing, he said: ``They may turn every tree into a gallows, every hole into a grave, and yet the words of that parchment can never die. To the mechanic in the workshop, they will speak hope, to the slave in the mines, freedom. Sign that parchment. Sign if the next moment the noose is around your neck, for that parchment will be the textbook of freedom, the bible of the rights of man forever.'' And sign they did.

We sometimes forget this great truth, and we never should, because putting people first has always been America's secret weapon. It's the way we've kept the spirit of our revolution alive -- a spirit that drives us to dream and dare, and take great risks for a greater good. It's the spirit of Fulton and Ford, the Wright brothers and Lindbergh, and of all our astronauts. It's the spirit of Joe Louis, Babe Ruth, and a million others who may have been born poor, but who would not be denied their day in the Sun.

Well, I'm convinced that we're getting that spirit back. The Nation is pulling together. We're looking to the future with new hope and confidence -- and we know we can make America great again by putting the destiny of this Nation back in the hands of the people. And why shouldn't we? Because, after all, we are Americans.

I am pleased to transmit to the Congress, in accordance with Section 123d of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (42 U.S.C. 2153(d)), the text of the proposed Agreement for Cooperation Between the Government of the United States of America and the Government of the Arab Republic of Egypt Concerning Peaceful Uses of Nuclear Energy and accompanying annex and agreed minute; my written approval, authorization and determination concerning the agreement; and the memorandum of the Director of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency with the Nuclear Proliferation Assessment Statement concerning the agreement. The joint memorandum submitted to me by the Secretaries of State and Energy, which includes a summary of the provisions of the agreement, and the views and recommendations of the Director of the Arms Control and Disarmament Agency and the Members of the Nuclear Regulatory Commission, is also enclosed.

The Atomic Energy Act sets forth certain requirements for new agreements for peaceful nuclear cooperation with other countries. In my judgment, the proposed agreement for cooperation between the United States and Egypt, together with its accompanying agreed minute, meets all statutory requirements.

The proposed bilateral agreement reflects the desire of the Governments of the United States and Egypt to establish a framework for peaceful nuclear cooperation between our two countries in a manner which recognizes our shared non-proliferation objectives, the economic and energy development needs of Egypt, and the friendly and harmonious relations between the United States and Egypt.

In February, Egypt ratified the Treaty on the Non-Proliferation of Nuclear Weapons. This is an important step toward controlling the dangers of the spread of nuclear weapons, and is a reaffirmation of Egypt's long-standing commitment to the objectives of this Treaty and its commitment to peace and stability in the Middle East and Africa. This proposed agreement fully recognizes this important step.

I believe that this agreement will further the non-proliferation and other foreign policy interests of the United States. I have considered the views and recommendations of the interested agencies in reviewing it and have determined that its performance will promote, and will not constitute an unreasonable risk to, the common defense and security. Accordingly, I have approved the agreement and authorized its execution, and urge that the Congress give it favorable consideration.

Mr. Nelson served in the United States Air Force in 1944 - 67, when he retired as lieutenant colonel. His assignments included: multiengine flying instructor, instrument flying instructor, aero engineer, pilot, project officer, instrument check pilot, and staff officer.

As President of the United States, I have the honor and the privilege to pick thousands of appointees for positions in Federal Government. Each is important and deserves a great deal of care for each individual called upon make his or her contribution, often at personal sacrifice, to shaping the policy of the Nation. Thus each has an obligation to you, in varying degrees, has an impact on your life.

In addition, as President, I have the privilege to make a certain number of nominations which have a more lasting influence on our lives, for they are the lifetime appointments of those men and women called upon to serve in the judiciary in our Federal district courts and courts of appeals. These individuals dispense justice and provide for us these most cherished guarantees of protections of our criminal and civil laws. But, without doubt, the most awesome appointment is a guarantee to us of so many things, because it is a President -- as a President, I can make an appointment to the United States Supreme Court.

Those who sit in the Supreme Court interpret the laws of our land and truly do leave their footprints on the sands of time. Long after the policies of Presidents and Senators and Congressmen of any given era may have passed from public memory, they'll be remembered.

After very careful review and consideration, I have made the decision as to my nominee to fill the vacancy on the United States Supreme Court created by the resignation of Justice Stewart. Since I am aware of the great amount of speculation about this appointment, I want to share this very important decision with you as soon as possible.

Needless to say, most of the speculation has centered on the question of whether I would consider a woman to fill this first vacancy. As the press has accurately pointed out, during my campaign for the Presidency I made a commitment that one of my first appointments to the Supreme Court vacancy would be the most qualified woman that I could possibly find.

Now, this is not to say that I would appoint a woman merely to do so. That would not be fair to women nor to future generations of all Americans whose lives are so deeply affected by decisions of the Court. Rather, I pledged to appoint a woman who meets the very high standards that I demand of all court appointees. I have identified such a person.

So today, I'm pleased to announce that upon completion of all the necessary checks by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, I will send to the Senate the nomination of Judge Sandra Day O'Connor of Arizona Court of Appeals for confirmation as an Associate Justice of the United States Supreme Court.

She is truly a person for all seasons, possessing those unique qualities of temperament, fairness, intellectual capacity, and devotion to the public good which have characterized the 101 brethren who have preceded her. I commend her to you, and I urge the Senate's swift bipartisan confirmation so that as soon as possible she may take her seat on the Court and her place in history.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Judge Sandra Day O'Connor to be an Associate Justice of the Supreme Court of the United States, filling the vacancy created by the resignation of Justice Potter Stewart. Judge O'Connor presently serves on the Arizona Court of Appeals. The President will forward to the Senate his nomination of Judge O'Connor upon completion of the required background check by the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

In the period that has elapsed since the last Report to Congress on Zimbabwe, the country has continued to gain political and economic momentum in an atmosphere that can be characterized as both dynamic and stable.

The overwhelming response from Western donor nations and international organizations at the March Donors' Conference, which resulted in $2 billion pledged over the next three to five years, will allow the government to move forward immediately with its economic development program and its plans for reconstruction and land resettlement. The success of the conference vindicated Prime Minister Mugabe's decision to turn to the West for economic and political support and allows the West to play a role in the emerging political/economic structure.

Recently there has been a significant increase in the volume and stridency of public exchanges between the governments of South Africa and Zimbabwe. The exchanges derive primarily from a concern of both countries that the other is giving support to anti-government groups. Despite this development, there remains a strong basis for cooperation, given the extensive interrelationship between the two countries in trade and communications.

The disarmament process in Zimbabwe is now well on its way to being completed. Approximately 18,000 former guerrillas in seven camps around the country have been completely disarmed. While it is likely that arms caches and illegally armed men are still present in the country, the disarmament that has occurred represents one of the most significant achievements since independence.

There has been some concern expressed by the business community lately on the foreign investment climate in Zimbabwe, with particular reference to the possibility that the government may decide to participate in the sale of Zimbabwe's minerals through a Minerals Marketing Board. Prime Minister Mugabe has publicly stated that his Government's policy is to provide an acceptable and effective marketing system for all minerals and metals produced in Zimbabwe with a view to increasing sales and profits. The Prime Minister made a general reference to the Marketing Board again in his May 1 speech but no determination has yet been made about the functions the Board will perform.

Since 1975 Mr. Korologos has been vice president and director of legislative affairs of Timmons and Co., Inc., a consulting firm representing corporate and association clients in the area of government relations. He was director of congressional relations in the office of the President-elect in 1980 - 81. Mr. Korologos was Deputy Assistant to the President for Senate Relations for 4 years under Presidents Nixon and Ford. Previously he served as assistant to Senator Wallace Bennett (R-Utah) for 8 years.

I don't know whether I'm the latest after-lunch speaker or the earliest after-dinner speaker that's ever been at an affair like this, but I am grateful that you've made it possible for me to speak early, because we have made a 2,000-mile round trip for dinner.

As I said during the campaign, I have long believed that the time has come for the highest court in our land to include not only distinguished men but distinguished women as well. And thus, when Justice Potter Stewart reported his retirement to us earlier this year, we began a search for a highly qualified woman who would serve this Nation well. And today I announced my intention to nominate just such an individual -- Judge Sandra O'Connor of Arizona.

I had the pleasure of meeting with Mrs. O'Connor last week, and I can report to you that she not only has a long and brilliant record as a legislator and jurist, but she also impressed me as a thoughtful, capable woman whose judicial temperament is highly appropriate for the Court. After listening to her and examining her whole record in public life, I am fully satisfied that her appointment is consistent with the principles enunciated in our party platform this past year.

But tonight we're here to honor a big man in Illinois. Now, there's no doubt that Jim Thompson's tall, but Jim built his fame and a different kind of size as a courageous prosecutor fighting corruption in places people said could never be rid of it. He restored the people's faith in those who hold public office, and he sought justice in government in the name of the governed. He brings to the office of Governor that same integrity and competence -- the qualities that build coalitions, the qualities that capture public support, the qualities of a great leader.

And I can tell you that he's been one of our strongest supporters in the fight to cut Federal spending. He knows that we have to balance the budget in Washington, because he's balanced the budget in Illinois for the last 4 years. Now, Jim Thompson knows that America has to compete in world markets, and he's worked hard to make Illinois the largest dollar-volume exporter of agricultural products in America. He knows people of different parties can work together, because that's how you do things in Illinois. I rely on his advice and counsel and am grateful for his friendship.

Now, there's someone who couldn't be here tonight that I would like to thank -- the colleague of those fine Congressmen you've already met -- Bob Michel. He's been the point man for our cause in the House of Representatives. Without his unfailing and able help, the victories we've won these past few weeks would never have been possible. Bob has our thanks and admiration.

And of course, there is another man missing who should be here -- Jim Brady. But Jim's parents are here. Mr. and Mrs. Brady, I want you to know I spoke with Jim just before I left. He's getting better every day, and his humor is as outrageously funny as ever. His job is waiting for him, and we all hope and pray that he'll be back soon, because we miss him very much.

My fellow Republicans, one year ago in a Midwestern city only a few hundred miles from here, those of us in the party of Lincoln met in convention. At that time and place, we pledged an end to those economic policies that had sparked double-digit inflation, soaring unemployment, and declining economic growth.

We pledged to end the unnecessary intrusions of government into the everyday lives of American workers. We pledged to end disrespect for America abroad and to rebuild our national defense so as to make America respected again among the nations. And yes, we pledged to rescue America from 4 years of malaise caused not by the American people, but by those who failed to give America leadership. We pledged, in short, to reopen all those roads to greatness that led America to unrivaled freedom and unparalleled strength in the world.

Now, we acknowledged that we couldn't undo all the harmful effects of misguided policy and special-interest politics in a few months or even a few years, but that early in our Republican administration, no matter how hard the decisions, we would stand by our commitment to get government under control and to put America back on the road to prosperity. And we're keeping that pledge.

We have moved to cut Federal spending, to eliminate excessive regulations, and to reduce the steadily growing tax burden on working men and women. You might have heard some talk of that lately. We've moved to reinvigorate our private institutions and to renew the confidence of the American people in the greatness of their nation and in their values of family, work, and neighborhood -- values responsible for that greatness.

This new national confidence isn't just reflected in opinion polls at home. Ten of our major steel producers and eleven other steel producers are spending $3.6 billion on modernization of plant and equipment. And then there is the new-found strength of the American dollar in the money markets. And certainly it's reflected in the new respect and deference shown American leadership by both friend and foe around the globe.

Well, to begin with, I just don't happen to believe it necessary to spell out in detail and in advance a formula which will guide our every move in international relations. Basically, good foreign policy is the use of good commonsense in dealing with friends and potential adversaries. Now, I assure you, we know where we're going, and we think it might be counter-productive to make a speech about it.

Over and over again in last year's campaign, it was emphasized that renewal of America's economic might and a return to a stable and sound prosperity was the first step to a credible foreign policy. During the last few months, in a startling and heart-warming display of national unity, Republicans and discerning Democrats have worked together toward that end. We've laid the foundation for a long-range buildup of our Armed Forces, bringing us nearer the day when Americans can once again enjoy a margin of safety and peace will be made more secure.

We've begun to solidify, after years of tension and softness, sometimes often discord, our ties with Japan and our European allies. Through the Habib mission, we have helped avert war in the Middle East. And the mission continues; he's on his way back there. We've further developed our relationship with China, while we've stood by and will continue to stand by our commitments to Taiwan.

In Southwest Asia we have reinvigorated our strategically important relationship with Pakistan. In southern Africa we have initiated work on a realistic Namibian solution. And in the Caribbean we've launched an effort to attack the root causes, of instability, while we're making it clear the United States will not tolerate interference by Cuba with the lives and freedoms of other nations in this hemisphere.

At home and abroad, in less than 6 months, we've worked quietly and effectively to set our agenda and give priority to our problems, addressing them headon. And this has been accomplished in a manner consistent with the promises made last year to the American people. We're keeping our promise to all of those millions of Americans who heard the call sounded last July and who responded last November with an overwhelming mandate. We're responding to that mandate not by politics of division or envy, but by claiming a share of the moral high ground, by summoning every American from every walk of life, from every ethnic and racial group, to a future of national prosperity, of expanded opportunity, and greater personal freedom.

Last year we were deeply distressed about the direction our country had taken. Our country faced grave threats. How, in these past few days, we've all known the joy of a great bipartisan victory! Well now, maybe not all of us knew the joy. The moment Members of the House affirmed the Gramm-Latta budget resolution and the people at last began to regain control of their government, there were some immediate cries of pain. It was even said that I was trying to destroy America.

You wonder where some of these people have been for the last few years. Well, the answer to that is: right in Washington, D.C., in responsible leadership positions in government. Double-digit inflation rates, unemployment rates of more than 7 percent, interest rates of 20 percent, mortgage rates of over 15 percent did not begin on the afternoon of January 20th, 1981.

They began when this Nation started down the path of government intervention, of ``tax and tax, spend and spend, elect and elect.'' Let no one fault the motives of those who implemented such policies. They only intended to help, but they based their efforts on an impossible equation. If I can't pay for my need, and you can't pay for yours, we can't solve our problem by hiring the government to take money from both of us to give to each other.

I submit that a 5.2-percent reduction of funding for those programs can be made without penalizing the truly needy or any of those people that the programs are intended to help. The reduction is based on knowledge of recipients who are unfairly receiving benefits through loopholes and loose management of entitlement funds. And so it is with the other proposed budget cuts.

Truly needy people, including our senior citizens, are being cruelly and unnecessarily frightened by those who contributed to our economic mess in the first place. The planned march on Washington this autumn will be far more representative of those who administer the benefits than of those who are really dependent on government help.

We Americans are a generous and a compassionate people, and no particular segment of our society has a monopoly on those traits. Jim Thompson, Bob Michel, and all these others who are here tonight who've been leading and helping secure the budget reductions in the Gramm-Latta bill have compassion for those who must be helped. They also have compassion for those long-suffering Americans who've been providing that help and whose voices have finally been heard in Washington, D.C.

Within the last few weeks the Congress of the United States has been an arena of ideas and courage, where elected representatives summoned strength born not of politics, but of statesmanship. Led by Republicans and joined by, as I've called them, discerning Democrats, the Congress voted to turn away from the established pattern of more and more spending and bigger and bigger government. Men and women of both parties are coming together with a spirit and drive that can only mean great things for all Americans.

The American people are taking their lives and their livelihoods back into their own hands. They are regaining control of their political institutions and making them respond again to their will. Now, this means that for a change the American people are winning.

We've begun the job, but this is no time to rest, for just ahead of us lies the largest and most difficult and most important step of all, to reduce the escalating tax burden that is crushing the spirit of enterprise.

Our punishing tax structure has the effect of discouraging people from earning more, taking away incentives to work harder and accept more responsibility. Our tax structure, coupled with inflation, is locking families and people rigidly in place as the cost of living, the pricetag on the American dream, passes out of reach. This always happens when policymakers lose faith.

For too long we've been burdened with people in Washington who wanted to spend more but had no faith that our economy could produce more. So what did they do? They taxed more and more and more, to the point that last year they approved the largest single tax increase in the history of this country.

Such a government-dominated economy can only be a withering economy. We need only look around us for evidence of what is happening. What is happening in Poland today is a classic example. There are probably few people as strong and as valiant as the people of Poland, and yet their economy is described as being in a vicious downward spiral. Now, this isn't the fault of the Polish people. It is the logical result of an illogical system, a system that has no trust, no belief or faith in people. And when government has no respect for its citizens, the citizens lose respect for government.

The problems with the American economy are not the fault of the American people. They're responding as you might expect. Consumers and businessmen are making decisions based on how to avoid burdensome and unnecessary regulations and punitive taxes. Decisions on investment are made not from maximum return, but on tax strategy. There's a growing underground economy, which is a deeply disturbing trend. And this kind of deliberate dishonesty can never be condoned. But even honest taxpayers are feeling a growing resentment toward inflation and a tax system that profits by that inflation. Continuing as we are is the greatest danger we face. The American people must have tax relief, and they must have it now.

Thursday morning in Washington a Congressman from Illinois will reconvene the Committee on Ways and Means of the United States House of Representatives. All tax legislation must begin in that committee. That Congressman from Illinois, Representative Dan Rostenkowski, must provide the leadership necessary to report a tax bill to the House floor in time for the Congress to debate it and for both Houses to agree -- and time is running out. The Congress must act by early August, when both Houses recess, so that new tax tables can be made. If there's no tax bill sent to my desk for signature by early August, there won't be a tax cut this year.

The Senate is ready, and you and I can take pride in that. Last November the people of this country elected a Republican majority in the Senate, and the Senate Finance Committee already has agreed on a tax cut bill. But let's be fair as well as proud of our Republican leadership. Democratic and Republican Senators on that committee worked together. The vote was 19 to 1 for a bipartisan bill that comes very close to what we had proposed.

Senator Bob Dole, chairman of the Finance Committee, tells me the Senate will act on that bill next week. That puts the ball, as the saying goes, in the court of Chairman Danny Rostenkowski and the House Ways and Means Committee. In the meantime, if all of you will join with your neighbors to send the same message to Washington, we'll have that tax cut, and we'll have it this year.

Whatever your faith might be in the post office, take a chance and send a letter to Congress. [Laughter] And I'm convinced that once debate is allowed to begin on the House floor, we'll have a tax-cut bill like the bipartisan bill announced at the White House last month.

We need a tax bill, but we need the right tax bill. Our proposal is not a ``rich man's windfall'' as some have falsely charged. It is fair, it is equitable, and it is compassionate. And three-quarters of the relief will go to those who are paying just about three-quarters of the tax.

Our tax cut proposal reduces taxes in proportion to the taxes paid. Nothing less would be fair. Our tax cut proposal reduces tax rates across the board by the same percentage for everyone who pays taxes. Nothing less would be equitable. Our tax-cut program will provide jobs in the private sector -- jobs that will last. Our program will provide opportunities for all. Nothing less would be compassionate.

The bipartisan tax cut bill that we support includes a 25-percent, across-the-board marginal rate cut over a 3-year period, a reduction in the marriage penalty, estate, and gift taxes, along with the elimination of any estate tax at all on a surviving spouse. We propose reducing the tax on investment income from 70 down to the top of 50 percent, such as an accelerated -- and also for business -- an accelerated recovery system.

Now, some of these features, I'm happy to say, are included in the tax proposals that are being talked of in the House Ways and Means Committee. At the same time, however, let me point out a very crucial difference -- a difference that makes all the difference in the proposal being bandied about by some of the Democratic leadership -- for it is no tax cut at all; it is a tax increase. They only propose a 15-percent reduction in the personal income tax.

There is presently an already built-in tax increase plus the bracket creep of inflation, which amounts to a tax increase of nearly 22 percent in the course of the next 3 years. Our tax proposal counters this 22-percent, built-in increase with a 25-percent decrease over those 3 years in addition to the other additional features such as the tax deductions for personal retirement plans, correction of the marriage penalty, et cetera. In other words, the present choice is between our tax cut or no tax cut at all -- indeed, a tax increase.

Well, we must cut the growth of spending this year, next year, and the next after that. We must also reduce the excessive percentage of the gross national product that the government is taking taxes. Government has become a drag on the economy. Now, it's true that I believe, as President Kennedy did, that our kind of tax cut will so stimulate our economy that we will actually increase government revenue, but the gross national product will be increased even more so that government's excessive percentage will be reduced.

You know, I'm tired of hearing our opponents justify their opposition by saying they're the party of the working people. Well, as you well know, for a long time I believed they were. In fact, I think some of their past leaders not only believed they were but dedicated themselves to that cause. But today, there's a disenchantment with the leadership of the Democratic Party on the part of millions of patriotic Democrats who see that leadership stubbornly clinging to the belief that only more and bigger government is the answer to our problems.

It's significant that at last year's Democratic National Convention an inordinate percentage of delegates were not rank-and-file working people, but public employees, who had a personal stake in continued big government. They were the majority.

Just the other week a former Democratic Congressman, recently elected to a liberal leadership position, said free enterprise could be too cruel. What we need, he said, is ``the gentle force of government.'' The gentle force of government? For the working men and women who can't get a job, can't buy a house, or can't keep up with the cost of living, that force of government has all the gentleness of a runaway bulldozer.

Which really is the party of the people? The party that embraces the failed policies that will continue high inflation, or the party that wants to stop it? The party whose only answer to unemployment is temporary make-work, or the party that is working to produce private-sector jobs, jobs with a future? The party that sees government as the benevolent master of the people, or the party that says the people are the master of government? The party that, as I said before, last year gave us the largest single tax increase in the history of this Nation, or the party that's fighting hard to reduce tax rates?

Carl Sandburg wrote of the days when our party was formed, tense and restless days of growth in the 1850's. America was torn by the issue of slavery. Neighbors were turning against neighbors in Kansas and Missouri. Liberty and freedom for all men was at stake. Political elements in Illinois and in other States were holding conventions to establish State parties and create a national Republican Party.

Illinois delegates met in Bloomington, in Major's Hall, upstairs over a store near the courthouse square. All stripes of political belief were there -- Whigs, bolting Democrats, Free-Soilers, and abolitionists. After several delegates spoke, there were calls for Lincoln. He stood up. There were cries, ``Take the platform,'' and he did. He observed that we were in a trying time and that unless popular opinion made itself very strongly felt and a change was made in, as he put it, ``our present course,'' the nation would turn against itself.

He gave the convention a rousing speech that was the tongue and voice of those present, a speech against slavery, but a speech about liberty and freedom. He told those present that if the safeguards of liberty are broken down for some, they're broken down for all. He called on Americans to be true to themselves and to protect their freedom with their ballot. He was telling why the Republican Party was being organized.

We are a coalition of Americans willing to be true to ourselves, willing to invest ourselves in ``a great common cause,'' the future of America. Our country needs our minds and our energies. There can be no wealth unless we create it, no new discoveries unless we find them, and we'll not create or discover until we're willing to risk a little.

You'd be surprised, though, we're beginning to run the government with them. They get us through a lot of late afternoon meetings, and you'd be surprised at the very important affairs that are being discussed and the jar of jellybeans is going around the table. I'm always interested in seeing the different styles. Some just grab a handful and some pick each one out one at a time -- [laughter] -- or it's passed on.

You know, the poet William Blake once wrote, ``Great things are done when men and mountains meet.'' Well now, I would add ``women'' to that statement and then say all of you certainly proved him correct -- and even more than correct. And so, it is with great pride that I accept this flag. By carrying it each step of your climb and planting it on top of Mount Rainier, you also planted courage and the capabilities of disabled people firmly in the minds of all Americans. Your triumph on Independence Day, during this International Year of Disabled Persons, clearly illustrated the independence disabled people can achieve when given the opportunity.

I take particular pride in the fact that we have on our White House staff someone who also serves as an example of that independence and self-confidence that disabled people can attain. I'm talking about Hal Krents, who carried this flag to you on our behalf, and I know he would have liked to have been on the mountain with you. Your 11-hour battle with snow, ice, and altitude, while carrying 40-pound backpacks, demonstrated to all of us that with spirit and determination, challenges are made to be met. We sometimes hear of the faith to move mountains. Well, you have the faith to climb mountains, and that faith is in yourselves.

When you came down from that mountain, it wasn't the experienced leading the disabled, but rather those who could see leading those who could not, those who could hear helping those who could not. And the tremendous bond that was forged by this experience, where you complemented each other and joined together to accomplish a great goal, is a significant lesson on what all of us as Americans can accomplish if we work together.

Nancy and I followed your progress, and when you reached the top, we, with the rest of America, shared your joy and were inspired by your courage. And we also must acknowledge the courage of your families, because we saw you, too, on television and, on television, heard through the radios, the walkie-talkies that you were carrying, the joy from the top of the mountain, all of you and your shouts as they were heard down below.

I know there must have been some tense moments during the climb and that the support you received from your families was an important element in your success. And I'm sure that Chuck O'Brien's twins will celebrate their birthdays with more than the usual sense of pride.

The corporations which sponsored this event believed in you. We must all work toward seeing that all businesses appreciate the possibilities of the disabled as fully as those gathered here today. As I stated in my February 6th proclamation of the International Year of Disabled Persons, disabled Americans represent one of our most underutilized resources. Your successful Mount Rainier ascent speaks more about the capabilities of our disabled citizens than any words can possibly state.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Kenneth L. Adelman, of Virginia, as the Deputy Representative of the United States to the United Nations, with the rank of Ambassador. He would succeed William J. vanden Heuvel, who has resigned.

The Task Force will review all aspects of manpower requirements and conditions in the Armed Forces, including such matters as the adequacy of the military compensation and incentives; educational benefits; current manpower readiness of the Armed Forces; effectiveness of training, leadership, and discipline; enlistment standards; recruiting and retention efforts; and Selective Service registration.

Speaking for Nancy and, I'm sure, for all of you, it was a thrill to hear the American premiere of this long-lost Mozart symphony performed here on the South Lawn of the White House and performed so beautifully by you, the Mostly Mozart Festival Orchestra of Lincoln Center. And I thank you, Leonard Slatkin, and all of you fine musicians, you very wonderful musicians, for bringing this traditional New York City Mostly Mozart Festival to Washington.

But, you know, when we talk about this incredible genius -- and Haydn, Mozart's instructor, called him the greatest composer ever -- we sometimes forget that important part that we were reminded of him, that Mozart was really a child prodigy. He played the klavier when he was three, and he composed a symphony -- the symphony you just heard -- as you've been told, when he was only nine. Now, personally I never forget little facts like that, because no one appreciates youth more than I do. [Laughter] I've had quite a while to appreciate it -- [laughter] -- but I mention this, because in a sense this afternoon is our way of saluting youth in arts.

You see, in addition to Mozart, we're doubly honored today to be able to pay tribute to another young prodigy -- one of our own. On June 25th, 17-year-old Amanda McKerrow, from Rockville, Maryland, made ballet history by winning the gold medal at the Moscow International Ballet Competition. No American has ever won this award before. And just to give you an idea how sensational she was, one of Amanda's performances drew eight curtain calls from one of the world's most partisan and knowledgeable audiences.

Before I take the spotlight off where it belongs, let me just invite all of you now -- and incidently, this is a very special audience, too, because this concert might have been played in this same way in this same place with a different cast of characters, both in the audience and myself, if it hadn't been for so many of you and what you did.

Mr. Harper. Mr. President, we're pleased to present this, the first consolidated report of the Inspectors General, to you this morning. And, as I mentioned, we're going to be having a press briefing in a few minutes with other members of the press to tell them about your plans for the program, the commitments that you've made. And then these three Inspectors General are going to be telling the press about specific projects we've undertaken to improve the effectiveness of the Inspector General program.

The President. Well, you have more than my interest; you have my support and enthusiastic backing in this. I think it is high time. We've spoken of this over a period of time -- going clear back to the campaign -- of fraud, waste, and abuse. And I never was in sympathy with the way one department in government, some time ago, eliminated fraud, waste, and abuse. As I understand it, they called a staff meeting and said they would no longer use those words. They would now call it mismanagement and something else. [Laughter] Therefore, fraud, waste, and abuse disappeared.

The Comptroller General holds a unique and critically important post in the Federal Government. His term of office is 15 years, and he's charged with overseeing the legal, accounting, and auditing functions of the General Accounting Office, which is the right arm of the Congress.

It's obvious that in this post a strong and effective leader can have an enduring impact on our political institutions. Such a leader can do much to restore the faith of the people in the integrity and efficiency of government. This is one of the most important appointments that I shall make as President, and that's why I'm especially pleased to announce today the appointment of Charles M. Bowsher as Comptroller General.

Mr. Bowsher is uniquely qualified for this position. He has served in the Pentagon as an Assistant Secretary of Navy for Financial Management, as a managing partner of Arthur Andersen, and an official of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants. He has spent the last decade working with and advising government leaders on financial and management problems. Mr. Bowsher's specialty has been financial systems in the Federal Government. He has supervised several notable studies in this area, including one comprehensive survey of Federal financial reporting. In addition, Mr. Bowsher has worked closely with several committees of the Congress and served on advisory boards of departments in the Federal Government too numerous to mention.

Mr. Bowsher, in short, has the expertise of an insider with the perspective of an outsider. He will need these qualities in great abundance. The problem of waste and fraud in the Federal Government is, as I said in my first speech to the Congress, an unrelenting national scandal. This administration has already taken action to deal with this problem. We'll continue to move methodically, but vigorously, in this area.

We've chosen our Inspectors General with deliberate speed and in consultation with the Congress. Our Council on Integrity and Efficiency at OMB, which coordinates the activities of our Inspectors General, is the major innovation, and its work is now underway.

By the way, I thought some of you would like to know that each week the desk officers at the Office of Management and Budget submit reports on recent government actions in the area of waste and fraud. During only one week last month, these reports showed projections of between $270,000 and $400,000 in questionable payments in one student assistance program; $36 million in bloated rental costs for Federal agencies; and more than $249,000 in invalid welfare payment claims. In the criminal area, the Project Match has produced indictments of 22 persons for allegedly defrauding the government of $100,000 in the Food Stamp program. In a Treasury sweep, three other persons were indicted in an alleged attempt to defraud the Customs Service of $1.6 million. And I want to stress to you -- these are only highlights from a single week's report.

So, Chuck, it's clear that your work is cut out for you. You'll have to be practical. You'll have to work in harmony with the branches and agencies of the Federal Government. But at the same time, I hope you never lose that sense of indignation that any private citizen feels at the spectacle of waste and fraud in the Federal Government.

You'll need the support of those of us who are here today. The Congress must give you the resources you need; the executive branch must cooperate and respond to your requests. Nothing has disturbed me more than the failure of some Federal agencies to enact fiscal reforms recommended in the General Accounting Office audits. If you have difficulties here, believe me, I'll want to know about it.

A word of gratitude is also in order to Congressman Jack Brooks and Senator Roth and Speaker O'Neill and these others on the congressional commission who worked so diligently to find a suitable candidate for this position.

When Lincoln Steffens wrote ``The Shame of the Cities'' earlier in this century, political power was centered in the big city political machines, many of which were corrupt. Today that locus of power -- with the staggering increase in Federal expenditures during the past two decades -- has moved to the national government. Waste, fraud, corruption, and abuse are severe problems. All of us in government have a moral responsibility to meet them head on.

Mr. Bowsher. Thank you very much, Mr. President, and I want to thank also the congressional leaders here today that sent my nomination to you, Mr. President. And I hope that I can carry on the fine tradition that my predecessor Elmer Staats performed as a great Comptroller General for 15 years, just prior to stepping down this past March.

It's a great challenge to work and to try to achieve efficiency and effectiveness in the government, and that's what I dedicate myself to today. And as soon as I'm through with the confirmation process, I would then be happy to take substantive questions, but at this time I would like to beg off until we get through the confirmation process.

I am pleased to transmit the annual report of the National Science Foundation for Fiscal Year 1980. I have long maintained an interest in the vitality of our scientific and technological capabilities. I consider these capabilities as crucial to the economic well-being of our Nation, a mainstay of our national security, and a beneficial influence on the quality of life of our citizens.

As this report is issued, we find ourselves at a turning point in our history, a time when we must make difficult choices. This Administration is committed to revitalizing the economy. Our success in this endeavor will depend greatly upon how well we can improve the productivity and competitiveness of our industrial sector. As we look for ways to enhance technological innovation -- a key to increase productivity and competitiveness -- we remember that the ultimate source of innovation is new knowledge. The National Science Foundation is unique among Federal agencies in that its primary responsibility is to promote advances in knowledge through encouragement and support of basic research. Such research, properly executed, is an essential investment in our future and one we must wisely and responsibly nurture.

When the National Science Foundation was created in 1950, the United States led all other nations in economic productivity, military power, the sciences, and technology. Today we face challenges in all these areas. But as the Foundation Director, John Slaughter, notes in his opening statement in this report, challenges also bring with them opportunities.

I know we have the talent and dedication to pursue and apply scientific knowledge to meet our present and future needs. We will continue to maintain our support of scientific research in a wise and responsible manner as a critical investment in our Nation's future.

The challenges and hostility toward fundamental United States interests, and the interests of its friends and allies, have grown significantly in recent years. These trends threaten stability in many regions and impede progress toward greater political and economic development.

The United States cannot defend the free world's interests alone. The United States must, in today's world, not only strengthen its own military capabilities, but be prepared to help its friends and allies to strengthen theirs through the transfer of conventional arms and other forms of security assistance. Such transfers complement American security commitments and serve important United States objectives. Prudently pursued, arms transfers can strengthen us.

Attainment of these objectives in turn requires effective United States Government control and direction over arms transfers. Because of the diversity of United States security interests, this administration will tailor its approach to arms transfer requests to specific situations and exercise sufficient flexibility to respond promptly to changes affecting the mutual interests of the United States and its allies and friends. We will review such requests with care.

All requests will be considered on a case-by-case basis. Those for coproduction, or the transfer of sensitive or advanced technology, will receive special scrutiny, taking into account economic and industrial factors for both the United States and other participating countries, the importance of arms cooperation with NATO and other close friends and allies, potential third party transfers, and the protection of sensitive technology and military capabilities.

Particular care must be taken to avoid any adverse impact on allied and friendly nations by encouraging them to assume burdens for which their economies are ill-prepared Therefore, careful consideration will be given to lower-cost alternatives including adaptations of military equipment for sale abroad, recognizing that first-line systems may not suit the needs of many countries. This consideration of the full range of available American alternatives will take place at every stage of review.

United States Government representatives overseas will be expected to provide the same courtesies and assistance to firms that have obtained licenses to market items on the United States Munitions List as they would to those marketing other American products.

The policy changes being initiated should not be seen as heralding a period of unrestrained military transfers. The United States retains a genuine interest in arms transfer restraint and remains prepared to consider specific proposals directed toward that end. There has been, however, little or no interest in arms transfer limitations manifested by the Soviet Union, or the majority of other arms-producing nations. In the absence of such interest, the United States will not jeopardize its own security needs through a program of unilateral restraint. At the same time, recognizing the special role that its major allies can play in strengthening common friends, it will seek to develop complementary policies with those allies.

The realities of today's world demand that we pursue a sober, responsible, and balanced arms transfer policy, a policy that will advance our national security interests and those of the free world. Both in addressing decisions as to specific transfers and opportunities for restraint among producers, we will be guided by principle as well as practical necessity. We will deal with the world as it is, rather than as we would like it to be.

There have been many important moments in the history of Virgin Islands self-government since the King of Denmark ceded sovereignty over the islands to the United States in 1917. In 1937 the Legislative Assembly of the Virgin Islands was established for the territory; in 1970 the territory inaugurated its first elected Governor; and in 1972, the first Virgin Islands delegate to Congress was sworn in. These were significant events for Virgin Islands self-government. All were accomplished, not by Virgin Islanders, but rather for Virgin Islanders through enactments by the United States Congress. Now, however, a locally written constitution, if adopted by the people of the Virgin Islands, will be the capstone of local self-government.

This legislation approves referring the constitution to the voters of the Virgin Islands for referendum. It does not represent a Federal endorsement of the constitution's substantive provisions. That task is reserved to the voters of the Virgin Islands.

The draft constitution represents a great deal of hard work and serious thought on the part of Virgin Islands constitution drafters. It is the product of the democratic process at work in the territory.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Abraham Katz, of Florida, to be the Representative of the United States of America to the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development, with the rank of Ambassador, vice Herbert Salzman, resigned.

The President. Ladies and gentlemen, it's a pleasure this afternoon to meet once again with Prime Minister Trudeau, and our discussion covered a number of bilateral and multilateral issues. As you know, the Prime Minister has just returned from Europe, and he brought a very good report on Europe's preparations for the economic summit in Ottawa that begins some 9 days from now.

I told the Prime Minister how much we're looking forward to those Ottawa talks. They come at a very opportune time for the seven industrial democracies that will be in attendance. All of our nations now face a common task of reducing inflation, increasing employment, and improving long-term economic prospects for our people.

It's clear that achieving economic recovery now poses one of the greatest challenges to the free world, and it's this challenge that shall lie at the heart of our summit in Ottawa. We must discuss not just our problems there but our own national policies to cope with them and what we must do together to restore general prosperity.

I also hope from this summit will come a new sense of confidence and community among the industrial nations that economic recovery can be achieved. And I hope, further, that in our meetings, our countries will reaffirm our fundamental partnership with each other. For many years we've shared democratic political institutions, market economic systems, and a belief and faith in human dignity and freedom. By meeting at this summit, we will express our quiet determination to defend those institutions against any threat.

Finally, let me say I look forward to the summit for personal reasons. I believe it's important to the vitality of our foreign policy that I have the opportunity to renew friendships with world leaders who've already visited here in Washington and also have an opportunity to forge new relationships with those who've recently been elected to office.

Prime Minister Trudeau and I, as well as others who will join us in Ottawa, all agree that we can achieve both progress and peace only through a close and continuous cooperation, which this meeting symbolizes. That's the basis of our partnership, and partnership is the basis of our common task.

I want to express my thanks to President Reagan for having made my job as Chairman of the Ottawa Summit easier by accepting to meet me today and discussing frankly not so much the areas of agreement, which are many, but the areas of possible disagreement amongst those seven industrialized democracies, which realized way back at the beginning of these summits that we are interdependent, that our policies do affect each other, that much of the world is watching us to see how democracies solve their difficult economic problems. They're waiting to see if we are successful in meeting the economic challenges, the difficult ones that are posed in every one of our countries, and whether we will be able to lead the democracies in the solutions of these problems.

As Chairman, I have found it important to meet with the President of the United States so that we could become acquainted with the areas of discussion. And I want to report that I am as optimistic as the President is that we will find the solutions by the discussions we will have together.

If I had any grudge with the President it would be that the way he spoke just now, he sounded as though he wanted to be the Chairman in Ottawa, and I don't think I'll let that happen. [Laughter] It'll be your turn some other time, Mr. President. But there was great value in meeting in preparation for the summit.

I would like to say in French that this meeting that will take place in Ottawa will permit us to explore not only the points of similarity, but the differences. I still have the hope, as Chairman of this summit, that we will find the way to form a consensus and reach solutions that we can all agree upon.

The meeting was the culmination of a series of meetings Mr. Thorn has had with officials of the United States. These include sessions with the Vice President, Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Treasury, the U.S. Trade Representative, and the Deputy Secretary of State.

The meeting with the President included discussion of a number of issues that will be presented by the United States and other countries at the economic summit in Ottawa. Mr. Thorn spoke of the interrelation between United States' economic policies and those of Europe and urged close consultation with European nations on the formulation and implementation of these policies. The meeting was described as warm and cordial.

Historically the budget process has been an annual cycle with the Executive Branch proposing early in the year and the Congress disposing during the rest of the year. More recently the budget process has changed. It is now a complex year-round process which involves virtually continuous adjustment.

The Mid-session report on the budget just released shows that our overall position has not significantly changed. However, this small overall net change obscures the many program level budget threats which have developed and the increased strain they place on our abilities to make our overall budgetary objectives. We cannot make any decisions -- foreign, domestic or defense -- unless their budgetary impact is fully considered.

Any situation, decision or impending emergency, which you feel could lead to unbudgeted expenditures or to an increase in budgeted allocations must be reported promptly to the Budget Review Board. Authorization from the Budget Review Board must be obtained prior to incurring or obligating any such expenditure or increase.

Once I have set a budget projection, each of you must extend every effort to make sure we achieve that projection. It should be clear that achieving our budget objectives is something that must be a personal priority of each of us.

Bringing federal spending under control and keeping it there is our most urgent priority. This is the only way we will be able to achieve our objective of giving the American people the strong, healthy economy which they demanded in last fall's election, and it is the fundamental precondition for achieving many of the other important objectives that we have established to restore our Nation at home and abroad.

Thank you, John and Howard. I appreciate that, and I appreciate your very warm welcome. I want to thank you all for accommodating to my schedule. It's nice to be on the end of a welcome for a change instead of doing it the other way in the Oval Office, especially when it's a welcome from the leadership of the new majority party in the United States Senate.

So, Mr. Vice President, the gentlemen I've recognized already, and Ted, Strom -- I don't think I've had a chance to congratulate you yet, Strom, on being the President Pro Tem, and I do so now. I think all of you remember that just a few years ago we were not only an endangered species, there were some who said we had become extinct. And if that's true, an awful lot of you must be awfully stubborn elephants, because as far as I'm concerned, the most exciting story in politics today is the resurgence of the Grand Old Party, and we're the emerging majority party in America.

We all know why that's happening. We're convincing more and more Americans to come under our tent, not just because we're Republicans, but because we're offering better, more secure, and more exciting visions of the future. What we're saying, and what more and more citizens, I think, are saying, is that it's time to give this economy and this government back to the people. And let me tell you, after watching the phenomenal progress that you've made in just 5\1/2\ months, I'm more convinced than ever that we can, and we will, give it back to the people.

Howard Baker, Ted Stevens, Bob Dole, Pete Domenici, all the rest of you, thanks to your tremendous leadership and, let me add, thanks to the tremendous leadership by your counterparts on the House side, we've done more in a shorter period of time to put the economy of this country back on a sound footing than any government in the past 50 years. And I think you can be proud of that. But remember, we're still a long way from home. Three obstacles stand between us and the victory we want to give the people this summer -- a victory they deserve and they've been waiting for so long.

First, we need a successful conference on the budget bill. And if you can give us that and pave the way for a final passage of more than $140 billion in budget savings, you will have demonstrated that reconciliation really works, and you'll have proved to the public that you really meant business when you promised to begin making this government live within its means.

Second, we have to have a good tax bill -- I'm sure you knew I'd mention that -- [laughter] -- completed and ready to sign before Congress leaves for recess in August. Unless that happens, the new incentives the economy so badly needs to encourage more savings and investment will once again be in doubt.

The bottom line is that our bill reduces taxes in word and in deed while theirs deals in make-believe. The irony is, so many in Congress who now criticize our proposed tax reductions as inadequate for the workers are the very people who approved the terrible tax increases on the working Americans a few years ago in the first place. And yet, those same people are unwilling to go far enough to get the huge future tax increases reduced.

They offer the mirage of tax reduction while working to lock in a tax increase so they'll have more and more money, I suppose, to spend on more and more government. But it won't work, because I don't think you're fooled. And the American people aren't fooled; and they want us to start protecting their family budgets by giving less to the Federal budget, and we agree.

Our present tax system exerts a heavy drag on the growth that it siphons out of the private economy -- too large a share of personal and business purchasing power -- and it reduces the financial incentives for personal effort, investment, and risktaking. The next time you're in a discussion with one of our friends across the aisle, you might quote that, because those are the words of John F. Kennedy when he gave us the last tax cut, real tax cut, that we've had in this government, almost 20 years ago.

Mr. Allen began his sports career as head football coach for Morningside College in Sioux City, Iowa, and Whittier College in California, then becoming the defensive coach for the Chicago Bears. He was the head coach of the Los Angeles Rams until 1971 when he become head coach, vice president, and general manager of the Washington Redskins. He is currently a football commentator and analyst with CBS Sports.

Our nation faces major challenges in international affairs. One of the most critical is the need to prevent the spread of nuclear explosives to additional countries. Further proliferation would pose a severe threat to international peace, regional and global stability, and the security interests of the United States and other countries. Our nation has been committed on a bipartisan basis to preventing the spread of nuclear explosives from the birth of the atomic age over 35 years ago. This commitment is shared by the vast majority of other countries. The urgency of this task has been highlighted by the ominous events in the Middle East.

The problem of reducing the risks of nuclear proliferation has many aspects, and we need an integrated approach to deal with it effectively. In the final analysis, the success of our efforts depends on our ability to improve regional and global stability and reduce those motivations that can drive countries toward nuclear explosives. This calls for a strong and dependable United States, vibrant alliances and improved relations with others, and a dedication to those tasks that are vital for a stable world order.

The United States will cooperate with other nations in the peaceful uses of nuclear energy, including civil nuclear programs to meet their energy security needs, under a regime of adequate safeguards and controls. Many friends and allies of the United States have a strong interest in nuclear power and have, during recent years, lost confidence in the ability of our nation to recognize their needs.

We must reestablish this Nation as a predictable and reliable partner for peaceful nuclear cooperation under adequate safeguards. This is essential to our nonproliferation goals. If we are not such a partner, other countries will tend to go their own ways, and our influence will diminish. This would reduce our effectiveness in gaining the support we need to deal with proliferation problems.

The administration will also not inhibit or set back civil reprocessing and breeder reactor development abroad in nations with advanced nuclear power programs where it does not constitute a proliferation risk.

To carry out these policies, I am instructing the Secretary of State, working with the other responsible agencies, to give priority attention to efforts to reduce proliferation risks, to enhance the international nonproliferation regime and, consistent with United States security interests, to reestablish a leadership role for the United States in international nuclear affairs.

In accordance with the Impoundment Control Act of 1974, I herewith report a new proposal to rescind $173.0 million in budget authority previously provided by the Congress. In addition, I am reporting ten new deferrals totaling $495.1 million, and revisions to four previously reported deferrals increasing the amount deferred by $76.4 million.

The steel industry has always been, of course, one of the vital components of our nation's economy, employing nearly 600,000 people with annual wages and salaries amounting to over $12 billion. But much like the economy as a whole, the steel industry has been abused by a decade of irrational taxation and overregulation. At a time when other nations nurtured their basic industries, our companies found themselves in an adversary relationship with their own government. H.R. -- House Resolution 3520 permits the steel industry to stretch out compliance with the Clean Air Act, providing regulatory relief without discarding our goals. Its phased-in program of compliance will, in the long run, improve the efficiency and productivity of the steel industry and will provide clean air as well.

This legislation uses the word ``reasonable'' twice. The dictionary says that word means ``being within the bounds of reason.'' Another definition says, ``not extreme, or to be moderate or fair.'' This Nation has been suffering from regulation that is not within the bounds of reason, regulation that is neither fair nor moderate. The bipartisan support given this legislation underscores that the American people, Republicans and Democrats alike, understand the need for a new balanced approach to regulation. In the years ahead, we intend to maintain a responsible working relationship with business and labor, ensuring that jobs and progress go hand-in-hand with necessary regulation.

This act, affecting one of America's most vital industries, is a symbol of the administration's commitment -- a commitment to cast aside the over-zealous and unnecessary regulation that has shackled the most productive forces in our economy. And with that said, I shall now sit down and affix my signature to that piece of legislation.

Our national energy plan should not be a rigid set of production and conservation goals dictated by Government. Our primary objective is simply for our citizens to have enough energy, and it is up to them to decide how much energy that is, and in what form and manner it will reach them. When the free market is permitted to work the way it should, millions of individual choices and judgments will produce the proper balance of supply and demand our economy needs.

Overall, the outlook for this country's energy supplies is not nearly as grim as some have painted it, although our problems are not all behind us. The detailed projections, along with the supplementary documents on environmental and economic questions, are being submitted separately by the Secretary of Energy.

The approach explained in the basic National Energy Policy Plan cannot be divorced from the Administration's program for national economic recovery. Energy is one important aspect of our society, but it is only one.

This Administration's actions to end oil price controls and to dismantle the cumbersome regulatory apparatus associated with those controls demonstrate the intent stated in my February 18 economic message to minimize Federal intervention in the marketplace. Reforms in leasing policies and the removal of unnecessary environmental restrictions upon the production, delivery, and use of energy are part of this same effort to reduce bureaucratic burdens on all Americans.

This does not mean that the Federal government is withdrawing from all involvement in energy. It cannot and should not. The Government itself is directly responsible for lands which contain a major share of our resource wealth.

There is also an appropriate Federal role in certain long-term research and development related to energy production and distribution. The goal of these projects is to develop promising technological innovations to the point where private enterprise can reasonably assess their risks.

Given our continued vulnerability to energy supply disruptions, certain emergency preparations -- such as rapid filling of the Strategic Petroleum Reserve -- remain principally a Government responsibility. But our basic role is to provide a sound and stable economic and policy environment that will enable our citizens, businesses, and governmental units at all levels to make rational decisions on energy use and production -- decisions that reflect the true value, in every sense, of all the Nation's resources.

I want to take this opportunity to affirm the United States Government's continuing commitment to whale protection and to urge you to support our proposal for an indefinite moratorium on commercial whaling.

Throughout human history, whales have evoked awe and wonder. They are the largest creatures ever to have lived on this earth; yet they are also among the most mysterious. It is this mysterious quality that gives whales their appeal and increases the importance of effective management that could assure whale populations for the future.

The United States has long supported scientific research and efforts to strengthen management procedures used by the International Whaling Commission. We believe that further revisions to management procedures are essential to reflect the inadequate information on whale biology, behavior, population dynamics, and, most importantly, abundance. Even such revisions, however, will probably not secure the necessary protection. Our cooperative efforts in the past to regulate whaling have been tragically unsuccessful and species after species has been successfully over-exploited and reduced to protected status. Indeed, the International Whaling Commission prohibits all commercial whaling on the majority of whale stocks because of their reduced abundance. We have no basis to believe that commercial whaling will not continue to reduce whale stocks.

It is time to recognize the errors of the past. Available information is inadequate to protect the whales while commercial whaling continues, and it is for this reason as well as others that the United States has proposed an indefinite moratorium on commercial whaling. I urge you to join with us and other people throughout the world to secure the protection of these magnificient creatures and wish you success in your important work.

The highest priority of my Administration is restoring the integrity of the Social Security System. Those 35 million Americans who depend on Social Security expect and are entitled to prompt bipartisan action to resolve the current financial problem.

At the same time, I deplore the opportunistic political maneuvering, cynically designed to play on the fears of many Americans, that some in the Congress are initiating at this time. These efforts appear designed to exploit an issue rather than find a solution to the urgent Social Security problem. They would also have the unfortunate effect of disrupting the budget conference and reversing the actions of a majority of both Houses of the Congress. Such a result would jeopardize our economic recovery program so vital to the well-being of the Nation.

In order to tell the American people the facts, and to let them know that I shall fight to preserve the Social Security System and protect their benefits, I will ask for time on television to address the Nation as soon as possible.

During this address, I will call on the Congress to lay aside partisan politics, and join me in a constructive effort to put Social Security on a permanently sound financial basis as soon as the 97th Congress returns in September.

Prime Minister Trudeau. Good afternoon, ladies and gentlemen. I should wish first on behalf of my colleagues at the table here to express our welcome to the press here and in accordance with the practices, established practices, and as Chairman of the summit meeting this year, I must make a statement summarizing the main points we have dealt with in the course of the last few days, and each of my colleagues will in turn speak to you.

The Ottawa Summit was met at a time of rapid change and great challenge to world economic progress and peace. East-West relations have been affected by the increase in the armed forces of the U.S.S.R. and its ever-increasing presence in the world. The political and economic situation of many countries has made it difficult for them to adapt to the new changes. The members of the summit meeting have also been victims of these changes and whatever we have attempted to do in the course of the last years was not necessarily carried out. We have had to reexamine the situation and restructure our activities so that, of course, there has been some pessimism about this summit.

Of course, it seemed to have been a difficult one but in my dual capacity as a participant and Chairman I am able to say, ``No, the pessimists were not justified.'' We have met for many hours, and these contacts, of course, promote mutual trust and confidence in facing the crises we may have to -- which challenge us. We've had very comprehensive discussions and frank discussions during our meetings. We have not tried to hide our divergences. We realize that we are dealing with economies which have different structures and have different reactions to the evolving situation. We have agreed that we could not revitalize our economies by isolating ourselves from one another. We have agreed on the fundamentals and realize we must take into account in our politics the impact it may have on our partners.

The whole burden of that fight cannot be made on monetary policy alone. And third, levels and movements of interest rates in one country can make life more difficult for other countries by influencing the exchange rates. This is something to which we must all remain sensitive and which we must try to minimize.

We must also pursue responsible trade policies. Over the years, as summit partners, we have warned against succumbing to the temptation of protection. These warnings have served us well. If we had drifted into protectionism, we might have conjured up an economic crisis similar to that of the 1930's. We have reiterated our strong commitment to an open, liberal, and multilateral trading system. We have agreed to deal with trade distortions. But we are determined not to lay the burdens of adjustment at the doorstep of our neighbors. We are looking forward to working with others on a trade agenda for the 1980's.

One of the uncertainties hovering over this summit was how it would deal with the North-South relationship. It's no secret to anyone that I attach very great importance to that relationship as an element of fundamental equity of mutual interests and benefits, and of global security.

The Ottawa Summit was the first of a series of important meetings this year where the North-South relationship will be at the center of the agenda. It seemed important to me, therefore, that the signal emanating from Ottawa should be clear and that it could be positive. For such a signal to be persuasive, it had to come from all of us jointly. That was the purpose of much of the travel, that as Chairman of this year's meetings I undertook in the weeks immediately preceding the summit.

The world looked to the Ottawa Summit for some sign of movement, some basis for hope that progress is possible, that the logjam can be broken. I'm very pleased with what we've been able to achieve. Our discussions showed a common appreciation of the magnitude of the problem and a common readiness to respond to it. There is now a disposition on the part of all summit countries to pursue any opportunity for meaningful progress, including what are known as global negotiations. That openness to the process of global negotiations represents a consensus which did not exist before our summit and seemed very remote not too many months ago.

The message we send from this meeting to the developing countries is the following: First, we respect your independence and support genuine nonalignment as a contribution to international peace and stability and as a basis for cooperation. Second, we look to you to play a full part in the international economic system and to become closely integrated to it. Third, we are ready to participate with you in preparations for a process of global negotiations. Fourth, we appreciate the problems of energy supply which you are encountering and are prepared to join with the surplus oil-exporting countries in examining how best we might jointly help you in developing your indigenous energy reserves. Five, we recognize the importance of more food production in your countries and of greater world food security and will try to make increased resources available for these purposes. Six, we will maintain our strong multilateral commitment to the international financial institutions and to the role they have played in alleviating the problems of development. And lastly, we will direct the major portion of our aid to the poorer countries.

On the occasion of this year's summit meeting, it seemed to us we could not ignore the fact that the strengthening of the armed forces in the Soviet Union has had an impact on the resources of our country and on the orientations which we have had to follow. We are convinced of the need for a strong defense capability, but we're also open to the possibility of dialog and negotiation with the Soviet Union, particularly as regards the nuclear armaments and security with less armaments and diminished cost.

I should wish, in conclusion, as Prime Minister of Canada, to say that we were very happy to be the host nation of this summit meeting. I am particularly grateful to all those who have accepted the challenge for this great endeavor and have provided the maximum of effort in assuring success. May I be permitted also to express deep gratitude to my colleagues at this table for having made my task so easy and to wish them Godspeed as they return to their own countries.

President Reagan. Prime Minister Trudeau, I am sure I speak for all of us in thanking you for the welcome we've had and the hospitality that we've enjoyed during our 2 days together in Montebello. Merci. You've been a most gracious host, and my fellow countrymen and I shall long be grateful.

Not long ago, the conventional wisdom was that our seven nations were more sharply divided than any time in years. Only three of us had attended an economic summit before, and the rest of us are still in the first grade, the first-year class.

To the outside world this looked like it would be a difficult summit. Inflation rates are running at incredible levels. Unemployment, I should say, disrupts the lives of millions of people, and new fears of protectionism are sweeping across our continents. The agenda of Montebello represented an enormous challenge for all of us. The true measure of these past 2 days, days filled with candid but always friendly talks, is that we leave with a true sense of common understanding and common purpose. We've discussed at great length how each one of us is addressing economic problems at home while working in concert to assure that we are sensitive to the impact of our actions upon our partners.

I'm grateful to the other leaders here for their degree of understanding and support for the economic policies we're embarked upon in the United States. We have also resolved that we shall resist protectionism and support an open, expanding system for multilateral trade. And, as you have been told by the Prime Minister, we shall work together in helping the developing nations move toward full partnership in that system.

As Chancellor Schmidt has told us, our unity in economic matters is the best insurance we have against a return to the disastrous ``beggar-thy-neighbor'' policies of another era. Economic unity and political unity are two great goals we must continue to pursue. All our nations share democratic insitutions based on a belief in human dignity, freedom, and the preeminence of the individual. I believe that we depart with fresh confidence and optimism about the future of democratic values and our societies.

Now, today, as we leave Montebello, I just can't resist the suggestion that over the past few years our nations have suffered from an affliction too, an economic affliction. I hope sometime in the future people will look back and say that here, in these talks, we began to put our nations back on the road to economic recovery and that a new Sun rose at Montebello.

President Mitterrand. I, too, would like to express my thanks to Mr. Pierre Elliott Trudeau, Prime Minister, and I would like to thank the Canadian Government for their excellent welcome and for the very favorable conditions under which the Ottawa or Montebello Summit was carried out. These conditions were so favorable that we were able to progress, to achieve work, and even to achieve some conclusions.

You know that France has an original policy, a new policy, if you like, within this framework, as compared to the theme generally put forward. Now, I call this an original policy. It is our own peculiar policy. We have our own objectives, and it was important for us to see whether it was possible -- and I had no doubt this was possible -- for us to fulfill this policy in harmony with the others. By the others, I mean our main partners, those represented here and a few others as well. This has been possible partly because everybody participated, partly because everybody has realized what elements in our own policies can harm other countries' policies and what must, therefore, be set aside.

We have all realized what can be favorable to our common success and should, thus, be supported. But this has succeeded also because France is in favor of solidarity. We support, first of all, our friends. We think of history -- particularly the history of the past half century in which we have seen disruptions, crises, and war -- and we, thus, are united behind a certain number of fundamental changes, particularly freedom -- freedom concerning the international level and freedom concerning democracy and democratic values within each of our countries.

We stand solidly behind our friends, and we also fully support those who, without being represented here, have been kept in mind in many of our discussions, and in many, in fact, of our decisions. I'm thinking more particularly of the countries of the Third World, more particularly the poorer among the countries of the Third World.

Right from the beginning, I wanted to emphasize the fact that we have to cooperate, to restrict as much as possible erratic exchange rates in our currencies, and to avoid as much as possible, as well, high interest rates. This is not a French problem; it is a European problem. In fact, I can say that this is a worldwide problem. I can say this taking into account possible consequences of present trends.

If you have a look at the text of our communique, you will see that there are a certain number of points being put forward concerning these issues. Similarly, right from the start, our position was in favor of everything that is able to bring down protectionism provided, of course, that right from the start we are all familiar with the whole set of existing mechanisms -- mechanisms which mean that here and there protectionism is much too present.

Concerning trade with East bloc countries, as the communique says, a new examination of the situation will be carried out shortly. I have expressed the hope that, concerning this issue as concerning all the others, we take stock very precisely of the state of trade with those countries and that we take stock of the strategic consequences that might arise. This is also a point included in the communique.

In addition to this, priority had to be given during our talks to a policy towards countries of the Third World, what we call North-South relations. This is necessary not simply because it is our duty, but also because it is in our own interest. We must be distrustful of any attitude that I would term paternalistic. It is when we will be able to expand trade on stable bases, when we will be able to stabilize raw material prices -- once this is done -- it will be possible for those countries to set up lasting development plans. And once they have done this, we, the industrialized countries, will be able to fulfill our tasks.

And I think that along the lines of what we call the energy affiliate and along the lines of global negotiations which will be referred to again at Cancun, and also concerning international relations, I would say that on all these points progress has been achieved. We have been able to outline our objectives clearly.

And then, particularly during our informal meetings, we discussed problems concerning international relations, concerning the balance of forces. The position of France has always been as follows: equilibrium above anything else. Of course, equilibrium has to dominate not simply the matter of forces, but it should determine the nature, the type of negotiation to be opened up -- the aim being to ensure disarmament and peace.

In conclusion, I would like to say that in Paris, or perhaps I should say in France, the next summit will be held. As you know, we have reached the end of a first cycle here in Canada. This was the seventh summit. So a new cycle of such summit meetings will begin, and I am very happy that the first element, the first step in this cycle, will take place in France. I will be happy to welcome there, my friends and partners, gathered here today. And since it is my task, I will continue to put forward and defend the interests of my country, but I will make sure that the summit of the industrialized countries will make it possible for us to continue along the path of understanding of our common interests and of our common tasks.

Chancellor Schmidt. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, ladies and gentlemen. First of all, I, too, would like to thank you very warmly for the welcome, the hospitality of your country, and for the way you have acted as Chairman. You have been a very fair, very just Chairman. Thank you very much, Mr. Trudeau.

I think that we have found many areas in which we have been able to agree, and there were also many other areas or sectors in which close cooperation is possible and in which I think we can achieve or have already achieved a compromise. We have all expressed our desire to fight inflation and unemployment and to achieve competent and strong world trade and world economy.

I would like to stress these points because this time, even more so than in the past, the countries were represented by heads of state who use different economic policies or recipes, if I can call them this, in their own countries, in the range between monetarism and Keynesian theory.

I would like to bring up four points. Firstly, the main role played by trade policy. We agreed here that we do not wish to adopt any policies that take account only of national goals and do not take account of the repercussions they may have on the world economy. We do not wish to pursue such national policies.

I'd like to refer you to points 21 through 24 of the communique more particularly. We all face considerable pressure towards protectionism in our own governments, and we have all here expressed the desire to avoid such protectionism with a view to maintaining the strength and freedom of world trade.

Secondly, another important subject was that concerning the problems caused by high interest rates. We had a very detailed and interesting discussion without any accusations from one of the other parties, and several participants mentioned what negative repercussions a longlasting, high interest rate would have on their national economies. This is true in any case for the German economy, particularly if you keep in mind the fact that the European economies have already been more strongly affected by the second oil price rise than was expected a couple of years ago.

We also welcome the fact that the United States of America has expressed the intention to do their very best to bring down these high interest rates. President Reagan, too, has told us that the American economy is also suffering from high interest rates.

It has not yet been able to see whether the fight against inflation in the United States might take certain different paths, which is why I have had to point out that my government, when I go back to Bonn, will begin to take certain decisions concerning the fact that, unfortunately for the time being, we will still have to deal with high interest rates and that we will thus have to take certain measures.

The third point, North-South relations, I would like to emphasize what Prime Minister Trudeau said a moment ago, and I would like to say, quite clearly, that we have full respect towards truly nonaligned countries, towards genuine nonalignment, which we consider to be an essential element of stability throughout the world.

I would also like to announce that the Federal Government in Bonn will support the organization of global negotiations in the near future. I am happy that we have already been able to hold discussions on the upcoming summit in Cancun.

Fourthly, I would like to emphasize the importance of the exchange of views involving the basic agreement concerning East-West relations where we are talking about equilibrium in military forces, dialog, and preparedness to cooperation. An exchange of views about present-day problems, about arms limitation and arms control, more particularly, were particularly important to me.

And I was also very much interested in the exchange of views about the present-day situation in the Middle East. We have expressed the common desire to see peace be established in that part of the world in the near future. We all want the vicious circle of the use of violence in that part of the world to be ended.

As far as I am concerned, I have been very much enriched by this summit meeting, and I have to say that I'm happy to note that we have become better acquainted and that we are all determined not to accept that we should act without taking account of each other's problems. But quite on the contrary, we have said strongly that we will take into account everybody else's interests and problems. These are two essential points for me.

Prime Minister Thatcher. Mr. Chairman, can I join my colleagues in paying a very warm tribute to your skilled chairmanship and thorough preparations. I think our success at this summit owes a great deal to those two things. I'd like also to say thank you to our Canadian hosts for the excellent arrangements they made, both in Montebello and in Ottawa.

It is my third economic summit. And over that period, we've increasingly given time in our discussions to the major political issues of the day such as Afghanistan and the Middle East, as well as to the economic problems that face us. I think this development reflects reality, because political issues and economic matters can't be isolated from one another and treated separately. They interact at every level, national and international. And I think this reality was recognized more at this summit than at any other. And the result, I think, was a workmanlike, balanced discussion which comprehended all of the major problems, whether economic or political, that face the Western world.

On these substantive issues, I'd like to confine my comments to four points: First, the world economy. At the last two summits in Tokyo and Venice, our work was dominated by the impact of the second oil price shock on the world economy. We then considered the impact it would have and how we should react to it. This time, of course, we met in the trough of the recession which that shock produced. But we've had to look at the whole range of economic questions, at the twin evils of inflation and unemployment, the need to adopt our economies and attitudes in order to beat unemployment, and of monetary disorders producing high interest rates and volatile exchange rates.

We all agreed on the need to fight inflation as the precondition for defeating unemployment as you have emphasized, Mr. Chairman, and on the need for low monetary growth, on the need for containing public borrowing, and for tight control of government expenditure. We are all giving effect to these principles in our own policies according to our own different circumstances.

Now, the second substantive issue on which I'd like to comment is developing countries. I think I take away three salient thoughts from our discussions on relations with developing countries. The first is that we share many of the problems of the world economy with them -- the need to develop energy resources, to encourage investment, to fight inflation and unemployment, and to expand trade. All of these things we share with them. The second thing that we share is that we welcome discussion with them in whatever ways or groups are useful. And the third is, we must pay particular regard to the needs of the poorer countries. We agreed to direct a major portion of our aid to the poorer countries, and I would like to stress that the United Kingdom has a particularly good record on that.

Thirdly, a few comments about the Middle East. We have been meeting in the shadow of a further outbreak of fierce fighting in the Middle East. Once again, the unfortunate people of Lebanon are bearing the brunt of a conflict that is not of their seeking. And whatever any of us may think about the causes, we all agree on the need for an urgent cease-fire in Lebanon, for an end to the loss of innocent civilian life there and, above all, for a solution to the conflict between Arabs and Israel from which this violence flows. In the United Kingdom, we shall continue to use all our influence for this purpose.

And the last issue on which I'd like to comment -- East-West relations. We discussed this scene and the concern that we all feel about the extent of the Soviet military threat to our interests. Speaking for Britain, I've been heartened by the strength of common purpose that I sensed in our discussions. We all agreed, and we agreed with real determination, on the need to maintain a strong defense capability and to insist on the need for military balance. Of course, that goes hand-in-hand with our readiness to negotiate arms control agreements that will ensure genuine security at a lower level of weaponry and resources.

So, Mr. Chairman, our discussions have linked the two aspects of the preservation of the free world and the free market economy which sustains it, namely, defense and the maintenance of peace and the health and soundness of the world economy. Altogether, a very successful summit on which you, Mr. Chairman, and Canada deserve our thanks and congratulations.

Prime Minister Suzuki. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. For this most successful conclusion of this Ottawa Summit, we are indebted to the outstanding chairmanship of Prime Minister Trudeau and the most generous cooperation by the Government of Canada. I am grateful, Mr. Prime Minister, beyond expression.

The fundamental task of summitry, particularly this summit, is for us to deal with political and economic difficulties that threaten the peace and the prosperity of the world. It is in this sense that as the sole representative having crossed the Pacific Ocean to join this summitry, to say that the nations of Asia and the Pacific also have much expectation of and interest in this summit.

Now, as regards the fruits of this summit, there have been many fruits -- on East-West relations, North-South issues, and various problems that face all of us in the West within us. We have committed ourselves and expressed this commitment that we should tackle these problems with a common perception and sense of common objectives in a way that befits our respective nations and its strength and circumstances.

Another fruit is that we have felt strongly that we should demonstrate that the Western political, economic, and social institutions are superior to those in the East. And also to step up our cooperation with the Third World and pledging ourselves to the steadfast maintenance of free trade institutions is a most important fruit out of this summit. I believe this is indeed the message from Ottawa to the world.

The North-South question was an important item on our agenda. We have been united in recognition that our interdependence in international community is becoming more important than ever, and we have committed to further expand official development assistance.

In conclusion, I would like to say that for this most successful summit conference, I am again grateful to Prime Minister Trudeau personally and to the people of Canada for their most generous support and cooperation and, with that note of thanks, I would like to conclude my comments.

Prime Minister Spadolini. The Government of the Italian Republic is very grateful to the Canadian Government and in particular to Prime Minister Trudeau, who was the animator and coordinator of our discussion, for the perfect organization of this summit meeting of the main industrial countries of the Western world -- a summit meeting which has coincided with one of the most difficult periods of the Western industrial countries and after many events which have affected our countries, which has had an impact on all our countries and which have made it necessary to search for new points of view and coordinated views.

In this case, also, as in the past, the work of the summit meeting developed in a spirit of civil and constructive confrontation and a frame of tolerance and a mutual understanding within a frame of a common understanding of our pluralistic, complex society, which is shaken by serious events. In a short period of time, the societies we have constructed on the basis of a reliance on and a firm belief in our values have gone over to uncertainty and doubt. And it is our responsibility to interpret and to understand the reasons for these upheavals, which are affecting the very foundation of our societies, in order to revitalize our societies and to broaden consensus and trust in our political democratic institutions based on stability of our economy and the social progress.

The Italian Government has explained its own policy in the field of economics, and social policies as well, which is aimed at controlling inflation through a range of initiatives and activities aimed at reducing the cost -- government costs -- and conciliating the interests of unions and management, just as all of the nations participating in these matters. We are convinced that we must defeat this monster of inflation and unemployment since they absorb ever-increasing resources and leave very little room for productive investments.

We consider it very significant that the joint communique refers explicitly to the common desire of the seven governments that the fluctuations of interest rates cause difficulties for other countries in pursuing their affairs. The problem of foreign exchange and stability of markets is considered very important for the proper and consistent development of our economies.

As regards the problems affecting our societies, many derived from the need to find a common measure between industrialized countries and developing countries, mindful of the mutual interdependence of the summit, has made forward progress in this. We are well aware that developing countries, that is to say, the Third World, their public debt has reached proportions which can no longer be sustained, and therefore, there is an urgent need to provide aid to those countries so that they will not be burdened with further debts. And we have given appropriate priority to the harmonious development of relations between the North and South. And if we forego this need, we would be abdicating our own responsibility as regards peoples who are faced with those problems of underdevelopment and hunger. That is why we have proposed that Italy should assume, as soon as possible, in concert with the European economy, the development of specific proposals for action in the field of food and agriculture, in coordination with the international agencies in Rome and that should -- priority interest should be devoted to those countries. One of the results of our summit meeting has been to unite our bonds even stronger on the basis of effective common activities and pursuits beyond all rhetoric and ritual. And this is a battle which, as Chancellor Schmidt indicated, is of essential importance.

Italy reaffirms, just as France, as Prime Minister Mitterrand, its solidarity with the Western powers in the knowledge and that there is a close link between Europe and the United States, and this has been again confirmed by President Reagan. And we may say that this is a great satisfaction for us to observe that we have -- there are many common points on which we have agreed -- social justice, international peace, and other items are all indivisible problems for us.

President Thorn. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I'm sure it's no exaggeration to be the seventh to thank you. And I would like to say that the heads of state and of governments represented here have decided to start up a new cycle, a second cycle of summits. And they have done so because the results quite justify such a second cycle. This is because the conference was very well prepared, of course, and also because the welcome extended by Canada and the beautiful site at which the conference took place favored such success. Moreover, Prime Minister Trudeau had taken up the pilgrim staff and had made sure that debates be restricted as much as possible, that as many results be achieved as possible.

Speaking on behalf of the Community, on behalf of the Commission of the European Communities, I'm not speaking at the same level and not speaking on behalf -- for example, I'm not wishing to take the place of Mrs. Thatcher, who's President of the Council at the time being.

But I would like to say that the Community, particularly countries not represented at the summit, wish to be heard, wish to speak. And we have been heard. It has been sufficiently often said that times are very hard. They are particularly hard for the European Community. Why is this so? Well, because in terms of trade, we are more vulnerable than anybody else -- we depend much more on foreign trade -- and also because, in monetary terms, our interdependence is greater and, thus, perhaps we suffer more greatly from the repercussions of policies carried out in other industrialized countries. Moreover, perhaps our commitment is greater towards the Third World, since we are committed to the Lome Convention, for example, which binds us to a large number of Third World countries.

It has been said that it was important for us to get to know each other. It was particularly important through personal contact to become aware of the limits of everybody, to understand why perhaps each of us have adopted somewhat different attitudes. I think that once this understanding exists, there should no longer be any unclarity among ourselves. We understand the essential points. We agree, although we do, all of us, understand that sometimes we have to act differently. We agree that trade at the world level must remain open, that protectionism is something we all should avoid, it being fully understood that free trade is a common rule that has to be respected by everybody, and this is why another conference at the ministerial level will perhaps be organized.

Now, we also understand why the United States follows a certain policy while other countries adopt another policy, and we have to see, as the Chancellor of Germany has just said, we have to -- we will have to see how each of us will have to react to the results of this conference between us. You will have to react as well, of course.

Finally, I would like to say that I'm very happy that during this summit of the industrialized nations we did not concern ourselves only with industrialized nations. We dealt also with other countries, with the developing countries, not for reasons of charity but because we know that the future of those countries will play an important part in our own future. And I am happy on behalf of the European Community to be able to see that on this point people have moved closer together and that dialog, perhaps even global negotiations, and perhaps even the energy affiliate, on all these points I think that we have achieved greater agreement. We are happy to see that concerning substantive matters we all agree. And once again, I would like to thank Canada warmly for their excellent organization of this summit.

Ladies and gentlemen, this ends the meeting we have with the press. I believe the press of the various countries will have some occasion to meet the heads of state or government of its own country. At this time, however, we adjourn this meeting.

Anyway, it's good to see you all. You know, I always realized that each of you, your group, command great respect, but I never realized how much until today. You've corralled nearly half our top people and arranged it so that you were getting all the briefings on taxes, and I wasn't. [Laughter] So, finally I decided if you can't lick 'em, join 'em. So, you'll get a little more briefing here.

As you'll notice, I didn't come unprepared. I brought along a little art work to highlight what we believe is the single most important part of this entire tax debate. Our bipartisan coalition offers a real tax reduction, while the House Democratic leadership, I think, is offering still another make-believe tax cut that dissolves into a huge tax increase.

As you can see -- the first chart on the right -- they're offering only a 15-percent tax cut against nearly a 22-percent built-in tax increase. Now, of course, we're being told that there's -- I should say, in 1984 they offer no tax cut at all. Now, of course, we're being told there's a possibility of triggering a third-year tax cut if the economic conditions improve. But by holding the people's tax reduction hostage to future economic events, we'll be removing the certainty that they need to begin saving or investing more of their money, precisely what is needed to get our economy back in shape.

I have said before, and will repeat: Government does not tax to get the money it needs; government always finds a need for the money it gets. And so that third possible tax cut would be dangling out there. A trigger will do far more to preclude a third-year tax cut than to promote one. And that's why, on this chart on the right, I like that line marking the break-even point on taxes at about 22 percent. It's colored ocean-blue because, obviously, that's the line every taxpayer must remain above to stay afloat. But under the other proposal you won't, you're sunk.

Now, maybe that's why when I asked their leadership last week how they can look the American public in the eye and say, ``We're reducing your taxes,'' I got no answer. They had no answer. And then I wondered why they're willing to give a business tax cut for at least 7 years, staged out in advance, but they think it's too dangerous to give individuals a commitment for 3 years. We're still waiting for an answer to that one, too, but we shouldn't hold our breath. It seems they rest their entire case on just one claim -- that their bill does more for middle-income Americans. And today, we're going to bury that fairytale also. To paraphrase a wise Englishman, Samuel Johnson, these fellows have had only one idea their whole life long, and what a pity because it's dead wrong.

You see, if we're sincere about giving the American people real tax reduction, then we have to do better than the typical one-shot, here today and gone tomorrow rebates of old. We must make the people a commitment, the kind of commitment that says if you work or save more tomorrow than you did today, then your reward will be higher. More of every added dollar that you earn will be yours to keep. And that's why it's so important to reduce tax rates.

Now, for all those who will work hard for their families, and who could succeed over time in raising their incomes, we must make a commitment that they won't be punished by tax rates designed only to feed the already bloated Federal budget. So, this is why in addition to reducing tax rates, we must also reduce those rates across the board. Only then can we look the public in the eye and say we're providing real incentives that will help all Americans create, build, and share in growing prosperity. And only then can we truthfully say we're making a commitment to your future and not just to the next election. We think that's the real difference between our bill and the House leadership bill.

We make this commitment without qualifications. They offer half a loaf and a vague promise. Take a look at these charts on the left which show what the real tax payments will be for income earners between $15,000 and $30,000 under the two bills. The dotted line is theirs. Yes, it goes down and, as they have boasted, a little bit more sharply in the first year than ours. But you come to this point down here where their tax cut stops and starts going back up again, not only in the form of social security taxes that have already been adopted, but in the form of bracket creep through inflation. And you will notice that our tax line does not go down as steeply beyond there but continues to go on down. And that orange space in there is the money that you'll have in your pocket, differing -- between which tax you'll have in your pocket or out of your pocket, depending on which one of those tax programs we choose.

By 1983, under their bill, your tax cut as you can see is already a thing of the past. Your taxes are rising again, and they'll begin shooting higher and higher as time goes on. They want to rig the tax code to take back their tax cut as quickly as possible, and that way they'll be able to spend more and more. Under our proposal working Americans do much better, because the bipartisan bill makes a commitment to get rates down, and we're going to keep them down.

I believe these charts speak wonders about two very different views of the world. And we're going to do everything we can to be sure the public sees them, because while they show the bipartisan bill making a genuine commitment to the future of middle-income Americans, they show the Democrat leadership bill throwing the public a bone now, knowing they'll get it back -- if you'll forgive the expression, with an arm and a leg attached.

The bottom line then is not a choice between two different versions of a tax cut as so many have said. It's a choice between reducing taxes on the American people or increasing them. And that's why we're so determined to hang tough on our bill.

The simple truth is that there is a gigantic tax increase presently built into the tax system, and what we're really talking about with our tax bill is eliminating that tax increase. We go a few percentage points beyond. The tax increase that's built in is 22 percent. Our tax cut is about 25 percent. And we look forward, when we get out of the hole and have some leeway, we're already talking about a second tax cut bill in which we'll correct some more of the inequities that still exist. But we have to get that rate of growth up there.

I don't have a chart for this. You'll have to just look at my arms. The simple truth is we're not, in our budget cuts, trying to do that line of growth in government down that way; we just want to lower it. And we want the tax bill that is being taken from the people lowered. And there will be the legitimate growth built-in that we will need for our increase in size, for just normal growth that takes place. The difference will be that where we have been increasing spending in the government about 14 percent a year, we seek to bring it down to half that, to about a 7-percent increase a year.

Since his graduation from law school, Mr. McGrath has been in the general practice of law with the firm of Dewey, Ballantine, Bushby, Palmer and Wood in New York City. He concentrated mainly on litigation, especially antitrust, securities, and various other Federal court litigation for major corporate clients.

We also note with pleasure that the Committee on Missing Persons held its inaugural meeting on July 14. Although procedural questions delayed the initial session, these now appear largely to have been overcome. As I noted in my report of May 19, although the problem of missing persons in Cyprus is not officially an issue for the intercommunal negotiations, it is an important humanitarian concern for both communities. Consequently, progress on this issue could be conducive to facilitating a positive negotiating atmosphere and we hope the Committee will be able to proceed with its substantive mandate in the near term.

More importantly we hope that during the coming months the parties, under the aegis of United Nations Secretary General Waldheim, will seek to move vigorously on the issues dividing them. During almost a year of steady negotiating, the parties have examined in detail the complex issues separating them. We hope they can now begin with imagination and flexibility to attack the problems and advance toward a just, fair and lasting resolution of the Cyprus question.

I'm glad to have this chance to talk with you all today, although I must say I stand here with kind of mixed emotions. I know that you've been briefed, and I know that others have addressed you, and the Vice President, I know, has been talking to you about regulations, and I wonder if there's anything that I can say that won't have been said before. But I'll try for just a few minutes, and then we'll get to a dialog instead of a monolog from me.

I think the American people are on the verge of making some historic changes in the way their government is run -- changes that will return this country to the way that it was supposed to be run all along -- and your help is a key to making sure these changes are made.

Today in the Congress, the Senators and Representatives from your States and districts are negotiating on the final dimensions of the largest budget cuts in our history. And they're also determining how much flexibility you'll have in deciding how money in your communities is to be spent. They're also reaching the crucial stages in the struggle to give the American people a meaningful tax cut -- a struggle that will leave more money where it's earned -- to offset the largest single tax increase in the history of our country, an increase that was passed last year.

There is a blur about it, but there's one indisputable fact in the fight that's going on now, or the debate, about the tax bill. The House leadership is offering the American people a tax increase, no matter what we may say about it or how many cuts may be enclosed in their bill. We think that our bipartisan bill, in fact we know, offers a real tax cut. The proposal coming out of the Ways and Means Committee provides for a 15-percent cut during the time when your real tax burden will go up by nearly 22 percent due to that built-in tax increase. Now, that is a tax increase, no matter how much they reduce it or somewhat.

We would offset that 22-percent climb with a 25-percent cut to actually eliminate the tax increase and at least have a few points below the present level. The Democratic leadership talks magically of a mystical trigger that would, after the second year, provide enough of a cut to match ours in that third year. But that trigger was designed by people who don't really believe in cutting taxes. And they're the ones who raised the taxes on the American people in the first place.

And I have a feeling our tax program is designed to stimulate the economy, to offer optimism to people to where they will move forward and begin expanding productivity in this country. I have a hunch that the American people are just cynical enough that a trigger that 3 years from now is supposed to, maybe, cut the taxes again -- they'll figure no one is ever going to pull that trigger. So, we think of it as avoiding a long-term commitment to the American people to cut taxes decisively and permanently.

And our bipartisan bill, supported by an overwhelming majority of Democrats and Republicans in the Senate and supported by members of both parties in the House, makes that kind of commitment. And I'd like to say a word to you about my own strong personal commitment to this. Let there be no doubt I'll go any place, any time, to ensure that the working people of this country get their first real tax reduction in nearly 20 years. Anything less will not get the economy back on track.

The economic mess that we're in doesn't mean there's something wrong with our American system. Our economic system is sound, and our way of government is the best yet devised. But we've abandoned basic principles of that system. Of everyone in government, you know best what is happening in the workplaces of this country, to family budgets, and to savings accounts. You know what's happening to the productivity and what is not happening in investment. You're closer to the people, and you hear their cry for reform. With your help, the Members of the Congress may also hear that cry.

Our program of budget cuts will discipline the Federal Government to live within its means, and the bipartisan tax rate cuts will once again reward the hard work and the spirit of enterprise that is the foundation of our economic program.

We've also taken important steps to reduce the burden of overregulation, as I'm sure the Vice President told you, and established a coordinating task force on federalism and a federalism advisory committee, both chaired by Senator Paul Laxalt, who was Governor of Nevada, to restore power and authority to local governments.

Thomas Jefferson wrote that ``Were we directed from Washington when to sow and when to reap, we would soon be wanting for bread.'' Well, figuratively speaking, I'm afraid that's exactly what's been happening. To return America to prosperity, we must call on the people at the local level, on the talent in our State legislatures, in our county seats, and our city halls. We must respond to the needs and the dreams of our people, and you are the officials who know best in government what they are.

I believe as our Founding Fathers did that local governments should do as much as they can, because they can do so much so much better than distant officials in some faraway bureaucracy. We're unique in all the world. I had this borne in on me at the summit meeting in Ottawa the other day. We are a federation of sovereign states with as much law as possible kept at the local level. And federalism has been the secret of America's success, and it will be a priority again. America must return to her first and well-charted course. And with your help, that's exactly what we're going to do.

Jack and Bob and Trent, thanks to your efforts and those of the rest of you, we're on the brink of fulfilling the promise we made to the American people. And today we take the last historic steps to provide the first real tax cut for all Americans in nearly 20 years. We have this chance because many of you have been working very hard. But I think our special thanks go to people like Barber Conable and Dick Cheney and Stan Parris and Newt Gingrich.

This tax cut is the most crucial item left on our agenda for prosperity. Last fall, most of us in this room stood out on the steps of the Capitol and pledged to work as a team, united in the goals of our party. We pledged that within the year we would not only cut Federal spending that had grown out of control, we would cut taxes that had stolen the hope for a better tomorrow. We made a solemn covenant with the American people, and today we're within striking distance of those goals.

You and other members of the House and Senate are working out the final details of the largest budget cuts the Congress has ever considered. And today you and your colleagues will begin an historic debate as our final tax cut proposal is introduced.

This is a good and a fair tax bill. It includes incentives to further stimulate our economy. I promise my enthusiastic support, and I think it'll have yours. The choice is between a tax increase or this bipartisan tax cut. The choice is clear, and the momentum is with us. We've gotten this far because we've all stood together. If we remain together during these last critical days, we'll realize the goal to which we pledged ourselves, a goal the people said, actually, they didn't think could ever be reached. Together, we can change the course of history, reverse the decline of America's economic strength, and start her on the road to recovery again.

Now, I said the choice before us is a tax cut or a tax increase. The Speaker boasts that this tax cut of 15 percent gives a bigger break to the worker than our bill. And if you're only planning on living for 2 years, it does. [Laughter] But then bracket creep takes over, and the taxes start going up again.

The other day -- to a bunch of newspaper editors -- I had a chart to show them about this. And of every bracket, from the bottom right on up, those tax brackets -- and their line was dotted and our line was a solid line; I thought that was more appropriate that way. [Laughter] But our line kept on going down in the tax cut. Their line, dotted line, started down and then turned up. And it turns up when they come to the end of that 15 percent, and bracket creep continues to take over.

Now, they claim it's too risky to cut taxes for 3 years ahead; you just can't figure that far ahead. That's for individuals. But it's perfectly all right for business, to offer them a tax cut every year for the next 7 years, which is in their proposal.

In the last 10 years, the majority leadership in the House has given the American people five tax cuts. But in those same 10 years, taxes have increased by more than $400 billion. That's a kind slight of hand at which you and I have no talent. That all belongs to them. When is a tax cut not a tax cut? When they do it.

Now, some things that I know you already know: Our bipartisan tax bill, Conable-Hance bill, targets three-fourths of the tax relief to the middle-income wage earners, indexing to eliminate bracket creep, and estate tax relief that will keep family farms and family-owned businesses in the family. Now, which bill really sounds like a bill for the working people?

I've been concerned lately that rhetoric has begun to blur the sharp edge in this debate, and many people are unaware of the clear choice before them. Now, everyone should know that their taxes are already doomed to rise by 22 percent during the next 3 years because of the built-in tax increase and the bracket creep of inflation. The committee bill offers a 15-percent cut; we offer 25.

It's been said that government performs its highest duty when it restores to its citizens taxes oppressively collected. Well, let us respond to that duty call that we have sounded and rally others here and across America. Let us point out a simple truth. We have worked out between us, all of us here, a tax bill that we believe will provide incentive and stimulate productivity, thus reducing inflation and producing jobs for the unemployed. That is the one and only purpose of the tax bill that we're proposing. What is it that they are proposing? What is their purpose? Well, they have put together a tax bill for the simple purpose of defeating us to provide a political victory for themselves. And that's not good enough for the people.

Now, if there's any question about that, let me point something out. It was only a few months ago that they derided and denounced the very idea of a tax cut at all. They said it would be wildly inflationary in these times. Then as we persisted, and as the voice of the people began to be heard, why, suddenly they also were for a tax cut. But they were just against ours. They wouldn't hear of a 3-year tax cut, no, sir. You couldn't do that. But one day we learned that they thought a 2-year cut might be practical. [Laughter] And now it's 2 years and maybe 3 if some economic standard is met 2 years from now.

Well, as I said the other day, I think the American people have enough cynicism that they don't think that trigger will ever work if you leave that much of an opening for 3 years from now. What we need is for people to look ahead 3 years and be able to plan on the knowledge of a sure thing.

My final word this morning is let us gently point out to the people that the alternative to what we propose was written by people who are better at increasing taxes than they are at reducing them. And no matter how much they call this one a tax cut, it's another increase.

New Zealand is a longtime friend and ally in the closest relationship with the United States. They've been by our side in every war that has taken place that we've been involved in in this century. And we've had a very good meeting in getting acquainted, discussing the trade relations between us, and they're numerous and of mutual advantage to all of us.

We've discussed the world situation, our own proposals for a project in the Caribbean and Central America, but they have had such a project for a number of years in the island nations of the South Pacific. So all in all, it has been a very, very warm and helpful experience. We're delighted, as I say, to have the Prime Minister here, and I hope that this is just the first of many meetings in the years to come.

The Prime Minister. Thank you, Mr. President. I've been delighted to have this opportunity of making the acquaintance of President Reagan and some of the members of his Cabinet who hold responsibilities that are particularly important to the bilateral relationship between New Zealand and the United States.

I don't think that there are closer friends than New Zealand and the United States. We see so many things alike, and we admire so much the way in which this country shoulders the burden of leadership of the free world. And today, in some of the early months of a new administration, I'm delighted to have had the opportunity of spending some time with the President and members of his Cabinet, making an acquaintance which I'm sure will be fruitful in the years to come in further cementing the great friendship between our two nations.

Well, thank you for coming today. It gives us a chance to bring you up to date on the progress of our economic programs, and it also give us a chance to ask you for a little help. And it isn't the kind of help -- don't reach for your checkbooks -- this time we want blood. [Laughter] But we know that you're an interest group for free enterprise, and you know full well what is at stake as we struggle to put in place our program for economic recovery.

We've accomplished a great deal. The Congress is completing work on the largest budget cuts that body has ever considered in the history of this country. We've done much to reduce the burden of overregulation, and we're going to continue along that line. And someday, maybe, the blizzard of paperwork will just be a light snowstorm each year on Washington.

We're working closely with the Federal Reserve Board to maintain a slow and steady monetary growth. But the last and the most crucial item on our agenda for prosperity still lies ahead. We must cut taxes.

The day after tomorrow, the Members of the Congress will choose between the bipartisan tax cut called for in our program for recovery, a bill coauthored by a Republican and a Democrat, and a tax increase proposed by the House leadership. They don't call it that, but it is. And the choice will determine the future of our economy, of your business or organization, and of your family.

Tonight on television, I'll be on at 8 o'clock tonight on television, talking about this tax program, and I'm going to have some charts pointing out that, yes, with their 2-year cut and our 3-year cut, theirs seems to be a deeper cut as we go down. But their line then starts steeply upward at the end of those 2 years; ours keeps on going down for the third year, and then levels off, because we're indexing the tax brackets to stop government's illicit profiteering on the basis of inflation.

Now, we want to cut taxes for tomorrow as well as today. For the majority leadership to talk about a tax cut at all is puzzling, because the taxes will go up by nearly 22 percent over the next 3 years and continue going up beyond that period, due to that bracket creep that I mentioned, plus the tax increases already built into the system, four more tax increases to take place in social security payroll tax between now and 1990 -- and not only will there be increases in the rate, they will also increase the amount of earnings against which that rate will apply.

Now, their 15-percent cut will still leave a sizable tax increase. We counter that 22-percent climb with a 25-percent cut, and then we stop that increase that I mentioned that will be on that graph tonight by stopping bracket creep.

But when the details of the debate are cleared away, let everyone remember this: The concepts at the heart of our first tax proposal, the first thing that we came out with, remain intact today. There had been compromises and changes made, and the compromises weren't in principle at all. Actually, it proved that more cooks were better than just one, because we found legitimate proposals made that could benefit the package although we stayed within the same rough figure as to amount.

Our bill cuts taxes across the board, for 3 years, as I said, and cuts them by the same percentage for everyone who pays them and has a 3-year guarantee to let the people know where they stand. The independent businessman, the farmer, the shopkeeper -- they will be able to look ahead for 3 years and see what their tax situation is going to be and thus be able to plan ahead.

Now, as you probably know, the bipartisan bill has business provisions such as the accelerated cost recovery system. And last week, we added incentives to further encourage investment in research and development. We've been lowest among all the industrial nations in that for a number of years. And our bill will almost eliminate estate taxes, ensuring that family farms and family-owned businesses will stay in the family and won't have to be sold to pay the tax.

The bipartisan proposal was designed to encourage small businesses that provide 80 percent of the new jobs that we must have. And, incidentally, in that estate tax, the thing that I'm happiest about of all is we do end that tax on a surviving spouse. There won't be any estate tax leveled when the inheritor is a husband or wife.

Only a few months ago, remember, the same people who are presenting that alternative tax bill, the so-called committee bill, made fun of the idea of trying to cut taxes at all. The voters didn't think it was so funny, so before the month of January was out, they suddenly discovered that they, too, were for a tax cut -- just not for our tax cut. Of course, 3 years were out of the question, to see if you could plan for a tax cut 3 years ahead. But then in February, they discovered that, well, a 2-year tax cut might be practical. And now they say that's 2 years and maybe 3, if some economic standard is met 2 years from now, that if we've achieved that goal, then that would trigger the third year's tax cut.

Well, the bottom line is simply this: Ours is a permanent commitment, and theirs is not. And tonight I will be telling the people that their tax bill is so rigged, by the end of the second year, the deficit will be $7 billion or more bigger than it will be under our program, which will automatically ensure that they will never pull that trigger that would bring about the third year's tax cut.

We want to restore individual incentive; they do not. We offer a real tax cut, and they do not. And the choice is clear. For our country to have real chance at renewal, we must have economic recovery. And tonight, I'm going to appear, as I said, to discuss these taxes. But what I'm really going to be talking about is what I think is our plan to renew American prosperity. That was the mandate of the people last November, and I would like to have your help and be able to count on it to pass the kind of legislation needed to give that recovery a chance.

And now, I'm going to turn this meeting over to Don Regan for further explanation in detail and for your questions that you might have on these tax programs, because I've got a meeting with a fellow that just came back from the Middle East, named Habib, and I think all of us are kind of interested in finding out a few things we need to know there, too.

I have just reported to the President on the mission which he directed me to undertake not long ago. This is a satisfying moment. An end to hostile military actions and the consequent bloodshed in the Israel-Lebanon area has now taken place. The situation, however, remains fragile and sensitive. That is normal and in the nature of such things. The progress achieved so far must not be lost. Everyone involved must exercise the greatest care and caution.

The end of armed attacks, which has been achieved, could be a first, important step on the road to greater calm and security in the area. This will be indispensable if future progress is to be made toward a broad and lasting peace in the Middle East. What has been accomplished could not have been done without the help and understanding of many people. The final result, I believe, is in the interest of all the parties involved.

I transmit herewith, for the advice and consent of the Senate to acceptance, an amendment to regulation 49(4)(b) of Annex II of the International Convention on Load Lines, 1966. The report of the Department of State is also transmitted for the information of the Senate in connection with its consideration of this amendment.

The International Convention on Load Lines established uniform principles governing the safe loading of ships on international voyages. The annexes, which form an integral part of the Convention, embody the regulations for determining the location of ships' load lines and divide the world's oceans into regions in which particular load lines must be observed depending upon the season of the year in which they operate. The amendment to regulation 49(4)(b) of the Convention, which was proposed by the Government of Australia, would redefine the seasonal tropical area in the South Indian Ocean to include waters in the new offshore oil development area off the northwest coast of Australia.

The supplementary extradition treaty updates an existing extradition treaty with Sweden of October 24, 1961. It expands the list of extraditable offenses to include: tax evasion, obstruction of justice, offenses relating to the international transfer of funds, and conspiracy to commit extraditable offenses. Upon entry into force it will amend the extradition convention between the United States and Sweden.

This treaty will improve upon our current extradition treaty with Sweden and will thus contribute to international cooperation in law enforcement. I recommend that the Senate give early and favorable consideration to the treaty and give its advice and consent to ratification.

Section 1. The fifth paragraph of paragraph 70a of the Manual for Courts-Martial, United States, 1969 (Revised edition), is amended by inserting the following after the first sentence: ``If the plea is accepted, such evidence shall be introduced during the presentencing proceedings under paragraph 75, except when the evidence is otherwise admissible on the merits.''.

Sec. 3. The fourth paragraph of paragraph 115 of the said Manual for Courts-Martial is amended as follows: a. Insert the following after the second sentence: ``With respect to a witness for the prosecution on the issue of sentencing, he will not take such action unless further satisfied that it will not cause a subpoena or travel orders at Government expense to be issued, except as authorized in paragraph 75e.''.

Sec. 4. The second sentence of paragraph 117b(2) of the said Manual for Courts-Martial is amended as follows: a. Insert ``(a)'' after ``unless''; and b. Strike out the period at the end of the sentence and insert the following: ``; (b) the accused consents to appointment of assistant counsel at the site of the deposition; or (c) the deposition is ordered in lieu of production of a witness on the issue of sentencing under paragraph 75e and the authority ordering the deposition determines that the interests of the parties and the court-martial can be served adequately by (1) an oral deposition without the presence of the accused or (2) a written deposition without the presence of the accused or counsel at the site of the deposition.''.

Sec. 6. These amendments shall take effect on August 1, 1981. These amendments apply to all court-martial processes taken on or after that date: Provided, that nothing contained in these amendments shall be construed to invalidate any investigation, trial in which arraignment has been completed, or other action begun prior to that date; and any such investigation, trial, or other action may be completed in accordance with applicable laws, Executive Orders, and regulations in the same manner and with the same effect as if these amendments had not been prescribed.

The President. From the bottom of my heart, I want to express my thanks to the Congress for responding this afternoon to the pleas of millions of taxpayers. The victory we've just won doesn't belong to any one individual or one party or one administration. The victories -- as a matter of fact, because there have been more than one today -- are for all the people. A strong bipartisan coalition of Congress, Republicans and Democrats together, has virtually assured the first real tax cut that this country has had in nearly 20 years. And it has also removed one of the most important remaining challenges on our agenda for prosperity.

I believe this first 6 months of 1981 is going to mark the beginning of a new renaissance in America. Now we can face the future with confidence and courage, because we know we're united, and we know that we are a government of the people, by the people, and for the people.

No one should doubt the difficulties that we still face, but we have made a new beginning. We're back on the right road; we're making progress. And if we keep working together, we can reach that new era of prosperity that we all want. And as we do, we'll be showing the world that our democratic system of government works because you, the people, make it work.

The President. Yes. Because of the bipartisan nature, there have been changes from the original program that we submitted, but the bulk of that program, the theme as we wanted it put together, is there. And as you know, the vote was completely bipartisan -- 238 to 195 in the House and in the Senate this afternoon, 89 to 11.

The President. No, not a bit. As a matter of fact, I had several of the -- even those gentlemen that I called who didn't feel that they could go with our plan have remarked that they'll testify there's been no arm-twisting or anything of that kind.

The President. Well, I said that there were difficulties that we face. We've been a long time -- we've been decades coming to the point where we are, and you're not going to cure this overnight. But I think this program -- as a matter of fact, I think the very fact of its passage before the program begins to show the results is going to have a psychological effect that we will see in the expectation of the people here and in the business community. But it's going to take -- that's why it's a 3-year program, it's going to take those 3 years.

The President. I think that we should be seeing some signs by then. But remember, it's a 3-year program because that was our target, that we wouldn't be reaching our goal for 3 years. The effect of the tax cuts in putting money back into the economy, well, those can't be seen until that money is invested in the economy. And of course, the budget cuts in government are going to be felt as they begin to take place in the 1982 budget year that begins October 1st.

The President. I think there are a lot of things that maybe are, you might say, in the beginnings, in the works now, but matters that have to be dealt with that we're talking about that have to do with our relations with other countries. There's the Middle East situation and this, too, is looking better. At least we've stopped the bulk of the violence there. But our building up of our defenses, our going forward with the plans for discussing reduction of armaments with the Soviet Union -- there are many social issues to be settled, also. I don't think that we'll close up the desk and go fishing.

The President. They didn't seem to, they unanimously said they wanted him to remain as Director of the CIA. I'm not surprised, because we knew that those first wild charges and accusations had no substantiation behind them. And we're very pleased with that.

The President. Actually, Helen, [Helen Thomas, United Press International] what we did was when we talked to them, we said, ``Remember, in 6 months we have come from tax cut versus no cut at all.'' That was the first position against us. And now it came to a choice of which tax cut. And what we discussed was, in every meeting and every phone call, I said that I happened to believe that our plan was better geared to getting the economy going again; did they have any questions, any particular concerns that I could speak to? And many of them did and would take a point or two, and I would give them what I thought was the proper answer to the questions they raised.

And I had some outstanding help from a number of people, but particularly from a very fine salesman named Secretary Don Regan. We were able to clarify points that, for many of them, that did put them on our side. In some instances, there were those who sincerely felt the other way, and there was never any animus or anything else. I understood their position, and that's what the game's all about.

Our nation is a nation of immigrants. More than any other country, our strength comes from our own immigrant heritage and our capacity to welcome those from other lands. No free and prosperous nation can by itself accommodate all those who seek a better life or flee persecution. We must share this responsibility with other countries.

The bipartisan select commission which reported this spring concluded that the Cuban influx to Florida made the United States sharply aware of the need for more effective immigration policies and the need for legislation to support those policies.

For these reasons, I asked the Attorney General last March to chair a Task Force on Immigration and Refugee Policy. We discussed the matter when President Lopez Portillo visited me last month, and we have carefully considered the views of our Mexican friends. In addition, the Attorney General has consulted with those concerned in Congress and in affected States and localities and with interested members of the public.

We shall continue America's tradition as a land that welcomes peoples from other countries. We shall also, with other countries, continue to share in the responsibility of welcoming and resettling those who flee oppression.

At the same time, we must ensure adequate legal authority to establish control over immigration: to enable us, when sudden influxes of foreigners occur, to decide to whom we grant the status of refugee or asylee; to improve our border control; to expedite (consistent with fair procedures and our Constitution) return of those coming here illegally; to strengthen enforcement of our fair labor standards and laws; and to penalize those who would knowingly encourage violation of our laws. The steps we take to further these objectives, however, must also be consistent with our values of individual privacy and freedom.

We must also recognize that both the United States and Mexico have historically benefited from Mexicans obtaining employment in the United States. A number of our States have special labor needs, and we should take these into account.

Illegal immigrants in considerable numbers have become productive members of our society and are a basic part of our work force. Those who have established equities in the United States should be recognized and accorded legal status. At the same time, in so doing, we must not encourage illegal immigration.

We shall strive to distribute fairly, among the various localities of this country, the impacts of our national immigration and refugee policy, and we shall improve the capability of those agencies of the Federal Government which deal with these matters.

Finally, we recognize that immigration and refugee problems require international solutions. We will seek greater international cooperation in the resettlement of refugees and, in the Caribbean Basin, international cooperation to assist accelerated economic development to reduce motivations for illegal immigration.

Immigration and refugee policy is an important part of our past and fundamental to our national interest. With the help of the Congress and the American people, we will work towards a new and realistic immigration policy, a policy that will be fair to our own citizens while it opens the door of opportunity for those who seek a new life in America.

Effective implementation of these improvements will require a coordinated effort by those agencies with travel policy and oversight responsibilities. Accordingly, I am directing the Secretary of State, the Secretary of Defense, the Director of the Office of Personnel Management, and the Administrator of General Services to implement the necessary changes to the regulations they promulgate. I have asked the Director of the Office of Management and Budget to coordinate the implementation activities.

But some of you spotted me in there, and I wasn't loafing. [Laughter] I had one brief spot in there, and I was trying to get some mail answered. Yesterday was a busier day. You probably read about that.

But it's good to see you all here, and God bless all of you. Just looking at you makes the job a little easier. There are some people -- you know, here in Washington you're subjected to the doomcriers and the people that think that the world is all going downhill. Don't you believe it. You're going to have greater opportunities, you're going to see more, you're going to know more, you're going to be able to live longer and be healthier, and the only credit we can take is that maybe we had a little something to do with that in bringing you along to this point.

But there's a great big world out there, and this Nation is not going to go downhill or continue on the present path. There isn't anything that we cannot do if we set our minds to it, and we're going to set them to it, and I take courage from you.

You know, as a former Governor standing before so many State legislators, I feel as though I should either ask for an appropriation or veto something. [Laughter] Some of my fondest memories are of my years in Sacramento, so I'm very pleased to be surrounded once again by those who believe in State government as devoutly as I do.

All of you in State government know full well what is at stake as we struggle to put in place our program for economic recovery. That program has four pillars: budget cuts, deregulation, monetary control, and tax reduction.

On the spending reductions, the Congress is finishing up the largest budget cuts that body has ever considered in the history of this country. The conference committee has completed its work and now, as you know better than anyone else, their work will go back to the House and the Senate for approval.

On regulatory relief, the entire Government is working to ease the burden. And someday, maybe the blizzard of paperwork will be just a light snowstorm for the private sector, for education, and for State and local governments.

And last night, the most crucial and the most exciting item on our agenda for prosperity passed in the House and now will go with the Senate version to a conference committee. I've been thinking over and over what this tremendous vote on taxes will mean to our nation and to our future. America is better off today than she was yesterday. America is more confident today. And the economic possibilities for all Americans are greater than they were 24 hours ago.

America now has an economic plan for her future. We know where we're going. We're going forward; we're going onward, and we're going upward. And as I said before, we're leaving no one behind. The outpouring of support from the people has been one of the most inspiring events I can remember. Since Tuesday morning, Washington has been filled with the voices of the people, the voices of democracy. They've been ringing throughout the Capitol. The Congress and the White House have been flooded with calls and telegrams from thousands and thousands of Americans in support of our economic program that crossed party lines and is truly bipartisan.

The people of this country are saying that we've been on a road that they don't want to stay on. Now we're on a road that leads to growth and opportunity, to increasing productivity and an increasing standard of living for anyone. It was a road once that led to the driveway of a home that could be afforded by all kinds of Americans, not just the affluent.

The tax vote yesterday means that the independent businessman, the farmer, the shopkeeper will be able to look ahead for 3 years and see what the tax situation is going to be and thus be able to plan. The families who are struggling to keep up will not fall further and further behind while being pushed into higher and higher income tax brackets because of inflation. And as a result of this vote, the government will not be able to tax away more of the people's money without voting on the record to do so.

When the details have been cleared away, let everyone remember this: The concepts at the heart of our first tax proposal remain intact. Yes, there were changes made, but not changes in principle. Actually, as I said Monday night, it just proved that more cooks were better than one, because we found legitimate proposals that could benefit the package even though we stayed within the total amount that we had thought was necessary to be reduced.

The American people have achieved a great victory for themselves with this vote. You know, there was much in the news about lobbying and arm-twisting and every kind of pressure, but what really sold this bill was the lobbying of the American people. They contacted their elected representatives in Washington, and it was plain they were ready to chart a new course to get this country moving again. My gratitude to the American people is as deep as my respect for what they can do when they put their minds to it.

With the help of these same Americans and with the help of the States, one of our next goals is to renew the concept of federalism. The changes here will be as exciting and even more profound in the long run than the changes produced in the economic package.

This Nation has never fully debated the fact that over the past 40 years, federalism -- one of the underlying principles of our Constitution -- has nearly disappeared as a guiding force in American politics and government. My administration intends to initiate such a debate, and no more appropriate forum can be found than before the National Conference of State Legislatures.

My administration is committed heart and soul to the broad principles of American federalism which are outlined in the Federalist Papers of Hamilton, Madison, and Jay and, as your President told you, they're in that tenth article of the Bill of Rights.

The designers of our Constitution realized that in federalism there's diversity. The Founding Fathers saw the federal system as constructed something like a masonry wall: The States are the bricks, the National Government is the mortar. For the structure to stand plumb with the Constitution, there must be a proper mix of that brick and mortar. Unfortunately, over the years, many people have come increasingly to believe that Washington is the whole wall -- a wall that, incidentally, leans, sags, and bulges under its own weight.

The traumatic experience of the Great Depression provided the impetus and the rationale for a government that was more centralized than America had previously known. You had to have lived then, during those depression years, to understand the drabness of that period.

Americans have at last begun to realize that the steady flow of power and tax dollars to Washington has something to do with the fact that things don't seem to work anymore. The Federal Government is overloaded, musclebound, if you will, having assumed more responsibilities than it can properly manage. There's been a loss of accountability as the distinction between the duties of the Federal and State governments have blurred, and the Federal Government is so far removed from the people that Members of Congress spend less time legislating than cutting through bureaucratic redtape for their constituents.

Our economic package, which consists of tax cuts, spending cuts, block grants, and regulatory relief, is a first phase in our effort to revitalize federalism. For too long, the Federal Government has preempted the States' tax base, regulatory authority, and spending flexibility. It has tried to reduce the States to mere administrative districts of a government centralized in Washington. And with our economic proposals, we're staging a quiet federalist revolution. It's a revolution that promises to be one of the most exciting and noteworthy in our generation.

The bipartisan tax plan which passed the House yesterday is not only a critical element of our economic recovery, it's an essential element of our federalist plan, because the rate of taxation is closely linked to the power of the Federal Government. We're strengthening federalism by cutting back on the activities of the Federal Government itself.

Our budget proposal is a dramatic shift in the growth of government. Without a structural shift of this kind, there's little hope for a long-term resistance to the burgeoning of Federal powers. Yet, our budget is more than a slowing of the growth rate of government; it reorders national priorities, seeking to return discretion, flexibility and decisionmaking to the State and local level.

Well, a major aspect of our federalism plan is the eventual consolidation of categorical grants into block grants. Today there are too many programs with too many strings offering too little a return. In 1960 there were approximately 132 intergovernmental grants. The programs were in existence, costing slightly more than $7 billion. By 1980, 20 years later, the number had grown to 500 programs costing $91.5 billion.

Block grants are designed to eliminate burdensome reporting requirements and regulations, unnecessary administrative costs, and program duplication. Block grants are not a mere strategy in our budget as some have suggested; they stand on their own as a federalist tool for transferring power back to the State and to the local level.

In normal times, what we've managed to get through the Congress concerning block grants would be a victory. Yet, we did not provide the States with the degree of freedom in dealing with the budget cuts that we had ardently hoped we could get. We got some categorical grants into block grants, but many of our block grant proposals are still up on the Hill, and that doesn't mean the end of the dream. Together, you and I will be going back and back and back until we obtain the flexibility that you need and deserve.

The ultimate objective, as I have told some of you in meetings in Washington, is to use block grants, however, as only a bridge, leading to the day when you'll have not only the responsibility for the programs that properly belong at the State level, but you will have the tax sources now usurped by Washington returned to you, ending that roundtrip of the peoples' money to Washington, where a carrying charge is deducted, and then back to you.

Our regulatory task force, chaired by Vice President Bush, has already taken some 104 regulatory relief measures in the first 100 days of the administration. And of these measures, 34 provided significant relief to State and local governments on a range of regulations ranging from Medicaid to pesticides.

Secretary of Education Bell withdrew proposed rules that would have required a particular form of bilingual education -- at a cost to school boards of over a billion dollars over the first 5 years. But while there's a need for bilingual education, it's absolutely wrong-headed to encourage and preserve native languages instead of teaching the language of our land to the non-English speaking, so they can have the keys to opportunity.

Just recently, on another front, Secretary of Transportation Drew Lewis modified transit accessibility rules that would have cost an estimated $7 billion. Rather than imposing specific, rigid regulations, Secretary Lewis has allowed local communities themselves to decide how best to meet the transportation needs of the handicapped people in their areas. And that, my fellow citizens, is how federalism should work.

The job of relieving the Federal Government of the powers that it has so jealously built up over the years is a difficult one. Consequently, I asked Senator Paul Laxalt, who's been a Governor, to chair both an administrative task force and a Presidential advisory committee on federalism. These groups have been asked to examine ways to reduce the Federal Government's overshadowing power in our society and to do so as soon as possible.

Now, one of their goals will be recommending allowing States to fulfill the creative role they once played as laboratories of economic and social development. North Dakota enacted one of the country's first child labor laws. Wyoming gave the vote to women decades before it was adopted nationally. And California, during the term of a Governor Reagan -- I wonder whatever became of him -- [laughter] -- we enacted a clear air act that was tougher than the Federal measure that followed years later.

And, incidentally, while it's true that I do not believe in the equal rights amendment as the best way to end discrimination against women, I believe such discrimination must be eliminated. And in California, we found 14 State statutes that did so discriminate. We wiped those statutes off the books. Now, if you won't think me presumptuous, may I suggest that when you go back to your statehouses you might take a look at the statutes and regulations in your respective States.

The constitutional concept of federalism recognizes and protects diversity. Today, federalism is one check that is out of balance as the diversity of the States has given way to the uniformity of Washington. And our task is to restore the constitutional symmetry between the central Government and the States and to reestablish the freedom and variety of federalism. In the process, we'll return the citizen to his rightful place in the scheme of our democracy, and that place is close to his government. We must never forget it. It is not the Federal Government or the States who retain the power -- the people retain the power. And I hope that you'll join me in strengthening the fabric of federalism. If the Federal Government is more responsive to the States, the States will be more responsive to the people, and that's the reason that you, as State legislators, and I, as President, are in office -- not to retain power but to serve the people.

Well, de Tocqueville would still be awed by the will of the American people. As we've recently seen, even in our society of 225 million people scattered across an entire continent and complex in makeup, the people made their will known, and their elected representatives listened.

Our intention, again, is to renew the meaning of the Constitution. Our aim is to rescue from arbitrary authority the rights of the people. Together then, let us restore constitutional government. Let us renew and enrich the power and purpose of States and local communities and let us return to the people those rights and duties that are justly theirs.

Now, after all this, let me say there are legitimate and very important functions of the Federal Government, of course -- the maintaining of national security, for one; and for another, the protection of the constitutional rights of even the least individual among us, if that person's rights are being unjustly denied. In such a case, it is the responsibility of the Federal Government to restore those rights. And that is a responsibility that I will gladly accept, even as I do all I can to restore your autonomy under that same Constitution.

Thank you very much, and thank you all also for more than that and for all that I know you did to help. I have to tell you, it wasn't any one single victory. The victory goes to everyone, and I mean everyone in this country, as well as a great team there in Washington, and people on both sides of the aisle in Washington, who worked as hard as they could work. This truly was a bipartisan thing. Yesterday, they weren't Republicans or Democrats in the halls of Congress; they were Americans.

When I say you the people, just let me tell you a little bit of what it was like and what happened. Monday night in the Oval Office I went on with the television program. And an hour later, I got the first count on the calls that had come in just to the White House in that hour. By morning, we had received four times as many calls as we have received at any time in these 6 months on any of the other appearances that I've made or issues that we've discussed.

But up on the Hill, the Capitol switchboards were jammed. [Laughter] The calls were coming in. The wires were coming in from all over the country. And you'd be amazed how many, because I'm very proud of the fact that there wasn't any real arm-twisting. I can tell you that people that I called -- Congressmen that I called and who had to tell me that, well, no, they thought they were going, leaning the other way. Many of them responded with the ``but thanks'' -- because what can you do but say to them: ``Well, I'm sorry. If there's anything I could tell you to change your mind, I would, but I understand.'' And they have commented and thanked for the fact that we didn't try to pressure them or threaten them or do anything else to get them.

This, I think, reflects that there is a change going on in this country. And the things that we used to say and wonder if we could ever get accomplished, now, we're on the side of the people. They feel that way, too.

So, now we go forward from here. I think this is the dramatic turn in the direction the government's taking, but it also means now the responsibility's on us. We've got to prove that what we said about it is true; it'll work. And I happen to believe that very definitely, that leaving more of the people's earnings in their hands and reducing government spending as we have, it will work.

But, all of us together are going to have to make sure that what we call ``the safety net'' remains, and that is no one must fall between the cracks. We have no intention of any of those cuts ever reflecting against or making it difficult for some person with real need, some person truly handicapped, some person who through no fault of his own must depend on his neighbors for help. And we all together, in our communities and every place else, have got to see that it works that way and that no one is cast aside.

The President today announced his intention to nominate William Courtney Sherman to be Deputy Representative of the United States of America in the Security Council of the United Nations, with the rank of Ambassador. He would succeed Richard Wilson Petree.

It has been an honor and a privilege to serve in your Administration. In the first year and one half in office you have established a new direction in economic policies for the country which will endure long after we have all left office. For personal reasons I am resigning from the Council of Economic Advisers, but I do so knowing that the country is beginning a new period of prosperity that will demonstrate the wisdom of the policies you have been pursuing since taking office.

The example the United States is setting for the rest of the world is important to the preservation of personal liberties and private initiative. It has not been easy for us to begin implementing your economic policies, and it will not be easy for other countries to follow. But, a successful model of regulatory reform, tax reduction, spending limitation and monetary stability will tempt others to follow our example. It is a good and well-balanced program that challenges the advocates of statism and protectionism more than any other time in modern history.

The President. Ladies and gentlemen, thank you very much for giving me this opportunity -- and to the working press in the back as differing from the lunching press in the front. The questions, when they come, are going to be limited to the guests who are here at the luncheon.

California is where the stirrings of the tax rebellion were first heard, and judging by the recent election here, they're still being heard. Those who've come from out of State, just about every spending measure that was on the ballot in this recent June election was defeated, and all of those that called for more savings and so forth and tax cuts were approved. So, it's especially appropriate to be here on this day when one of the largest Federal tax cuts in American history takes place.

Actually, though, this tax rebellion and the tax cut itself is only a symbol of much deeper change that's taken place in national politics during the last year and a half. In pointing out the enormity of this change, Murray Weidenbaum, the Chairman of our Council of Economic Advisers, sometimes liked to talk about the Sherlock Holmes story where the key clue was not found in anything that happened, but in that which didn't happen -- the dog that didn't bark. Historically, whenever the economy hit a slowdown or recession in the past, the hounds of big government started their ritualistic baying, and there were demands for all sorts of pump-priming, make-work programs, public-service jobs, increased spending, and bigger deficits. You remember how we were always told with those deficits not to worry about the debt; we were told that we owe to ourselves.

Well, during our present economic troubles we've managed not only to stifle the calls for government spending and expansion or intervention, but we've actually attacked the root causes of the recession by reducing taxes, dramatically slowing the rate of growth in Federal spending, and cutting and streamlining hundreds of Federal regulations, and getting a firm hand on inflation.

I have told some audiences recently George Bush is in charge of the task force on eliminating the unnecessary regulations that we talked about during the campaign. In the coming year, the American people will be saved 200 million man-hours of paperwork by the regulations that have been eliminated so far.

Well, these things mark more than just a change in those government policies that led to the boom-or-bust cycle of periods of recession and high unemployment followed by periods of high inflation. Until this present recession there had been seven or eight -- I may have lost track and I'll cover myself by saying that so I won't be charged with an inaccuracy. It means that we've broken a long and destructive historical trend and that gradually economic decisionmaking is being put back in the hands of the people. It means that we're taking economic power away from the public sector and getting it back to the private sector so they can prosper and expand.

And this provides for more than just a quick upturn in the economy for the months ahead. We're getting undue government intrusion out of the marketplace. By encouraging incentives and rewarding enterprise, we're laying the groundwork for steady and sustained growth over many years. We're releasing the pent-up energy and initiative that has for so many years laid dormant in the American economy.

Although as news men and women you have all you can do to faithfully and accurately report the events of the day, you also know that you perform a most important service for your readers and listeners when you can provide them with more historical perspective on those events. I think there's been a sea change in American domestic policy during the year and a half since we arrived in Washington, and that's why I wanted to mention it today.

I think we've made a long overdue break with this psychology. I can't think of an administration that has been more energetic or sincere in coming forth with new arms control initiatives. Yet, at the same time, we've candidly pointed to the decay of the Soviet experiment and robustly defended the ideas of personal freedom and representative government. I think this kind of candor dramatically improves our chances to negotiate meaningful arms control agreements.

Let me just add: Our willingness to speak for freedom is no bargaining chip. It's an integral part of our foreign policy. Without timely expression and emphatic endorsement, our own belief in the principles of human freedom and representative government must eventually atrophy and wither.

So, in little more than a year and a half on the domestic front, we've turned away from state power and back to the real source of economic progress, the energy and intiative of the American people. And on the international front, we've come forth with important new initiatives, while embarking on a forward strategy for freedom that reinvigorates our own commitment to individual liberty. It increases the chances for the expansion of democratic rule to the rest of the world.

The President. As a matter of fact, if I had thought that such a thing as this could have impeded in any way our legitimate effort to get a reduction in the strategic nuclear weapons, I would have not accepted, but fought against accepting, the resignation. It had nothing to do with anything of that kind, and I am convinced that we're going forward with the best opportunity that we've had in a long time, in a number of years.

In recent years in our efforts -- first of all, I don't know how many people are aware that since the war -- since World War II, this country has proposed and tried to secure arms reductions and limitations and so forth of various kinds 19 times with very little success. I think part of it in recent years has been because we ourselves embarked on a program of unilateral disarmament, and the Soviet Union was out to catch up. We at the end of World War II were the only truly superpower in the world. We were the ones who still had no industrial damage done to us by the scars of war. Our military was intact and had not suffered as great a loss as those who had been in prior to our going into the war. And we tried from that vantage point, as we all know, to bring about these reductions.

Q. About natural rubber. You're trying to build a natural rubber industry, which is going to bring jobs to this country, which is great, especially in Salinas, California. But the Navy is embedded with regulations which are preventing its moving out. Can we do anything about it?

Q. Mr. President, relative to your arms control initiative, the coordinators of the California nuclear freeze program are suggesting that if you're serious about reducing nuclear arms, the obvious place to start is with a stop. And they wonder whether you would accept that and supporting the California nuclear freeze on the ballot in November.

The President. Jeff, I think the only problem that I have with the freeze is, I know the people are sincere and all, but they've got the freeze at the wrong end of the negotiations. The Soviet Union does have a decided edge on us and does have, at the moment in strategic weapons, a nuclear -- a building, a production capacity greater than ours. They had three assembly lines going. We have none. The last administration closed down the only assembly line for them in 1977.

This -- a freeze is just fine. And that's very much a part of START. Once we get down on an equal basis and to a vastly reduced level -- and, as you know, the talks that started several months ago, the INF talks in Geneva having to do with the intermediate-range missiles that are aimed against the cities of Europe, while there is nothing to match them until our NATO allies get the Pershing missiles and the cruise missiles from us -- and so we've advocated there a total zero base.

And, again, I think they came to the table only because they know we're building those Pershings and those cruise missiles and the European allies of ours said that they would station them in their countries. And they accepted our invitation immediately.

The President. I think there were some things learned about ship construction there. I don't think that it applies to any of our ships. And, with regard to missiles and missile defense, and I know that our people in the Pentagon are studying everything that happened there. I can't say yet that I'm privy to whether there was anything that's really surprised them. I don't know whether there was.

Q. By way of a follow on that, sometime next month, the U.S.S. Ohio, the first Trident nuclear submarine, will move into its home base at Bangor, Washington, on Hood Canal, not far from Seattle. What would you say to those individuals who are strongly opposed to such a large and lethal weapons system, not only to it but to the idea of basing it in Seattle's backyard, so to speak?

The President. Well, it's got to be based someplace. [Laughter] But I think we've proven over the years that there is no risk -- well, you can never say that there is no risk, any kind of accident, sometime or other, could happen. But we've had nuclear-powered vessels. We've had nuclear weapons. We have nuclear weapons being carried airborne and so forth. I can't see that there's a legitimate reason why that should be denied a base.

There's quite a procedure that has to take place before they can be detonated. And so I cannot see anything that would cause them to be -- they probably have a higher level of safety than normal munitions, explosive munitions, have.

We started with the land-based missiles, because we felt they were the most destabilizing. I can tell you our thinking and why we based the decision, which was my own. The missile is the thing that the person's -- the average -- when I say destabilizing, the average person can foresee, whether accidentally or not, or inadvertently or not, someone pushes a button and 30 minutes later a city blows up in our country or, if it's the other way, in theirs.

Submarines and airplanes carrying such missiles are conventional type weapons in themselves that have got to put themselves in position. In other words, they can be intercepted and destroyed in normal warfare without that 30-minute doomsday threat. Now, doesn't not mean that they shouldn't be eliminated.

But we've set out first to reduce those destabilizing ballistic missiles and then to reduce the others at the other level. And what we have come up with is a proposal that no more than half of the warheads that each country would have under the terms of this treaty would be land-based. And the other half -- surface vessels carry missiles now as well as submarines, on both sides.

Q. Mr. President, you said yesterday that Mr. Begin's pledge to you that came during the meeting last week had been mistakenly reported as a promise that Israel would not invade further into Lebanon, that in fact he had said only that he hoped that Israel would not have to invade further into Lebanon. If that is true, number one, how could that have happened? And number two, why did the erroneous report -- why was it allowed to go uncorrected for so long?

The President. On the pledge idea? I didn't know -- he had several conversations with other people. And when I first heard that he had made this promise, I was going to check with the State Department to see had he said it there. It turned out that it -- and how it could happen was, I think, explainable. It was a case of the second hand repeating -- maybe even third hand -- within the shop of the conversation that I had had with him, which was a conversation just between the two of us and which he had expressed the fact that he did not want to invade Lebanon. And this had never been his intention -- and how the cease-fires kept being broken and so forth and it arrived to that threatening place. And so, as soon as I realized that it was based on my conversation with him, I corrected the fact that, no, he had not promised. He had said that that had not been his intention, and he did not want to if he could avoid it.

The President. I wish I could promise an instant cure. We believe, however, that our economic program, which is aimed at restoring our economy and getting it going, the things that we've been doing with the budget we believe are all designed to, hopefully, in the coming months get interest rates under control -- get them to come down to where they properly should be -- and that all this will stimulate.

I can say by way of encouragement, you know it's taken 3 months -- the economic indicators 3 months in a row are on the upturn -- that you've bottomed out in the recession. We said that we would, at the end of the second quarter, that by that time that in the third and fourth quarters we would be in the recovery stage. We don't think that's going to be a sudden upsurge or a boom, but we do think we're on the way up, and in the month of May housing starts increased by 22\1/2\ percent.

We felt that that housing bill that I vetoed when it was tacked onto another measure would be counterproductive -- that first of all, by the time that it was implemented and in place that it would be tagging along behind what could be a better recovery, particularly if we can get some drop in interest rates. We felt also that it being a spending program, which would increase the deficit, would send the wrong signal to the money markets, who are the ones who must lower those interest rates, and would send a signal that we were going back to the old-fashioned way of the quick fix -- the things that I mentioned in my remarks of government trying to stimulate the ecomomy with government deficit spending, and they would then protect themselves against possible resurgence of inflation by keeping or raising the present interest rates.

I think that we were right in that decision. I also, though, am encouraged -- and maybe some of you could with your ability to contact the public -- maybe you could start writing and telling some of the stories about various areas in the United States where local banks have gotten together and have put up each one a certain amount of money. It started with automobiles. They put up a certain amount of money and said this money is available as long as it lasts for automobile loans, and they had a figure that was well below the going interest rate.

Now in several areas in the country local banks are doing this with regard to home mortgages and are bringing them down to a few points below the going rate. And I just think the word ought to be spread, because this is where we're going to get the recovery. There's no question but both automobiles and housing, separately or together, can create a recession. And it is a hard-hit industry.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. Jeanne Innerson from King Television in Seattle. It was reported today the Egyptian foreign minister said that your administration knew about Israel's pending invasion of Lebanon and didn't do anything about it in return for Israeli promise of support for Mr. Haig's Presidency in 1984. Could you comment on both parts of that question?

The President. Oh. He needs to be talked to. [Laughter] No, and we do know -- and this is very troublesome; it's very difficult for me to comment -- and I've been grateful that there haven't been more Lebanon questions, because the negotiations are so delicate right now that, as I said last night in the press conference, there's very little that I can answer. But this I can answer.

We know that the Arab States -- and many of which we've been trying to establish a bond with them so that we can bring them into the peace-making process with Israel, and we've called it ``create more Egypts.'' This is the only way we're going to settle that particular problem in the Middle East, is if we can get more Arab nations that are willing to come forward as Egypt did and establish a peace treaty, recognize the right of Israel to exist. And we've been doing this.

We're terribly disturbed, because it has come to our attention that for some reason they are convinced that we -- if we did not actually connive and give our consent, that we were aware of it and did nothing about it. We were caught as much by surprise as anyone.

But we knew that they had gone up to the border as a threat. We knew they'd mobilized; the whole world knew that, and you were all writing and talking about it. And it is true that the PLO from across the border had shelled and rocket-attacked some of the villages in Israel. But when they crossed the border -- and presumably to go only 40 kilometers and then form a line to protect their border against these artillery attacks -- that was a surprise. Then when they did not stop -- and they justified that on the basis that once they tried to stop, they were under attack, and they had to keep pursuing the enemy -- no, this was not done with our approval or our consent.

And we're continuing with everything we can do now. We've been 5 days in the present cease-fire, and we're just hanging on that -- we can maintain and that the negotiations will be successful. And as I said last night -- I'll repeat them -- the three goals are: for Lebanon to create a stable government, which they haven't had for 7 years -- they've had several factions, each with its own militia -- but a single united Lebanese army and government controlling its own territory; guaranteeing the border between Israel -- because so far they've had another government and army living within their midst, the PLO -- changing that; and then all the other countries getting out of Lebanon. And we're working as hard as we can to that end.

Now I have to -- this is the same thing as last night at the press conference. The one thing that I can never get used to is having to walk away from all the hands that were raised and that weren't recognized. And to all of you, I'm sorry, and I apologize. And if every question could be answered yes or no, maybe we could get to all of them, but we can't.

In scientific and engineering research there are surely many exciting developments to report. But, as NSF Director John Slaughter notes in his opening statement to this report, research breakthroughs are ``built on thousands of individual research projects done over many years.'' It is that kind of perseverance that makes our scientific enterprise strong. But such perseverance is necessary because in the long-term our economic growth and productivity, our national security, and the general well-being of our people depend on the new knowledge that results from research.

My fellow Americans, 206 years ago one of history's greatest adventures began when a small band of patriots in Philadelphia resolved to stake their all -- their lives, their fortunes, and their sacred honor -- for freedom and independence. On that distant day America was born. Our country has been an inspiration for free men and women around the world ever since.

Thanks to the faith and fortitude of our ancestors, freedom has flowered on our shores and has brought a legacy of liberty and opportunity to wave after wave of immigrants from every quarter of the globe. In war and peace, in good times and bad, each generation of Americans has passed on the torch of freedom.

Some of our ancestors faced trials that we will never know -- the snows of Valley Forge; the crucible of a bitter, bloody civil war; and the incredible hardships endured in taming a savage wilderness. But the spirit of determination and love of country that saw them through to victory still beats in American hearts today.

We, too, face strong challenges to our free, abundant way of life. America is at peace, but we live in a troubled world. American abundance is still the marvel of mankind, but we still face serious economic and social problems.

The President. T.K. and Hank -- as you can see, we've gotten well acquainted already -- you've just given the American people a Fourth of July present to remember. I think all of us, all of us who've just witnessed the magnificent sight of the Columbia touching down in the California desert, feel a real swelling of pride in our chests.

In the early days of our Republic, Americans watched Yankee Clippers glide across the many oceans of the world, manned by proud and energetic individuals breaking records for time and distance, showing our flag, and opening up new vistas of commerce and communications. Well, today, I think you have helped recreate the anticipation and excitement felt in those homeports as those gallant ships were spotted on the horizon heading in after a long voyage.

Today we celebrate the 206th anniversary of our independence. Through our history, we've never shrunk before a challenge. The conquest of new frontiers for the betterment of our homes and families is a crucial part of our national character, something which you so ably represent today.

The space program in general and the shuttle program in particular have gone a long way to help our country recapture its spirit of vitality and confidence. The pioneer spirit still flourishes in America. In the future, as in the past, our freedom, independence, and national well-being will be tied to new achievements, new discoveries, and pushing back new frontiers.

The fourth landing of the Columbia is the historical equivalent to the driving of the golden spike which completed the first transcontinental railroad. It marks our entrance into a new era. The test flights are over. The groundwork has been laid. And now we will move forward to capitalize on the tremendous potential offered by the ultimate frontier of space. Beginning with the next flight, the Columbia and her sister ships will be fully operational, ready to provide economical and routine access to space for scientific exploration, commercial ventures, and for tasks related to the national security.

We've only peered over the edge of our accomplishment, yet already the space program has improved the lives of every American. The aerospace industry provides meaningful employment to over a million of our citizens, many working directly on the space program, others using the knowledge developed in space programs to keep us the world leader in aviation. In fact, technological innovations traced directly to the space program boost our standard of living and provide employment for our people in such diverse fields as communications, computers, health care, energy efficiency, consumer products, and environmental protection. It's been estimated, for example, that information from satellites has saved hundreds of millions of dollars per year in agriculture, shipping, and fishing.

The space shuttle will open up even more impressive possibilities, permitting us to use the near weightlessness and near-perfect vacuum of space to produce special alloys, metals, glasses, crystals, and biological materials impossible to manufacture on Earth. Similarly, in the area of national security, our space systems have opened unique opportunities for peace by providing advanced methods of verifying strategic arms control agreements. The shuttle we just saw land carried two kinds of payloads, one funded entirely by private industry, and the other, related to our national security, sponsored by the Air Force.

This versatility of the Columbia and her sister ships will serve the American people well, yet we must never forget that the benefits we receive are due to our country's commitment made a decade ago to remain the world leader in space technology.

To ensure that the American people keep reaping the benefits of space and to provide a general direction for our future efforts, I recently approved a national space policy statement which is being released today. Our goals for space are ambitious, yet achievable. They include continued space activity for economic and scientific benefits, expanding private investment and involvement in space-related activities, promoting international uses of space, cooperating with other nations to maintain the freedom of space for all activities that enhance the security and welfare of mankind, strengthening our own security by exploring new methods of using space as a means of maintaining the peace.

There are those who thought the closing of the western frontier marked an end to America's greatest period of vitality. Yet we're crossing new frontiers every day. The high technology now being developed, much of it by byproduct of the space effort, offers us and future generations of Americans opportunities never dreamed of a few years ago. Today we celebrate American independence confident that the limits of our freedom and prosperity have again been expanded by meeting the challenge of the frontier.

We also honor two pathfinders. They reaffirm to all of us that as long as there are frontiers to be explored and conquered, Americans will lead the way. They and the other astronauts have shown the world that Americans still have the know-how and Americans still have the true grit that tackled a savage wilderness.

Charles Lindbergh once said that ``Short-term survival may depend on the knowledge of nuclear physicists and the performance of supersonic aircraft, but long-term survival depends alone on the character of man.'' That, too, is our challenge.

Hank and T.K., we're proud of you. We need not fear for the future of our nation as long as we've got men like you to serve as our inspiration. Thank you both, and God bless you for what you're doing.

Before I introduce you, if you'll all just look -- well, I'm sure down in front maybe you can't see -- but way out there on the end of the runway, the space shuttle Challenger, affixed atop a 747, is about to start on the first leg of a journey that will eventually put it into space in November. It's headed for Florida now, and I believe they're ready to take off.

Mr. President, you mentioned something about people having a desire to maintain a presence in space. Not very many hours ago I know two guys who really wanted to maintain that presence in space a while longer. That is, you never get tired of it. The most remarkable thing, besides the machine and the team that put it together, is that it's a new discovery every minute and every day.

The machine we built is a first stepping stone. Here comes the second one. We're standing in front of its pathfinder, and there's more to come. Where we're going to go in the future is something that depends on you. [The space shuttle Challenger and its transporting aircraft passed overhead, enroute to the John F. Kennedy Space Center at Cape Canaveral, Fla.] And maybe that's our second stage.

The people that make all this work are the thousands of designers and engineers that made it work. And as the President pointed out, all the technology in the world is just a tool. And the only thing that makes the difference between our technology and the trip that we've just had and the sights that we've seen and the things that we've thought and the ideas that that's spurred -- all the difference between that and just plain old technology is the people that made it happen. And the country is blessed with having a team that's dedicated to the United States and to the exploration and exploitation of space. And I am just as proud as I can be to be a part of that NASA team.

There's one other thing that I'd like to say, and I'll let Hank talk to you. Hank's had to endure me for a long time now, and he probably thinks that this last year has been the longest year of his life.

And it's certainly had more hours packed into it than most. But throughout it all, this guy has maintained a sense of humor and an industry that's second to none. And this is the finest pilot that ever flew in a spacecraft.

I think back to 206 years ago when our forefathers ushered in a new era of true democracy for the world. And here today I think we have ushered in a new era also -- a fully operational space transportation system. We've got a real fine vehicle there. That vehicle performed far beyond my expectations, and I think T.K. and I brought all you folks about the best spacecraft that's ever been built. It will be tough for Challenger and the ones coming down the line to top it.

But as Ken said, the people that put all this together are the important part. T.K. and I are only just a little tip of the pyramid, and we're standing on the top of a huge number of people who have dedicated their lives and their efforts to making it all work. It can't be done without you folks.

And when we start sending people up routinely, as the President pointed out, we just opened a railroad. T.K. referred to it once as ``opening up the freeway.'' Once they're built, we know no bounds to what we can do. And I am very, very proud to be a part of this initial effort.

The President announced today a national space policy that will set the direction of U.S. efforts in space for the next decade. The policy is the result of an interagency review requested by the President in August 1981. The 10-month review included a comprehensive analysis of all segments of the national space program. The primary objective of the review was to provide a workable policy framework for an aggressive, farsighted space program that is consistent with the administration's national goals.

DoD for operational control of the STS for national security missions. Mission management is the responsibility of the mission agency. As the STS operations mature, the flexibility to transition to a different institutional structure will be maintained.

The directive states that normal interagency coordinating mechanisms will be employed to the maximum extent possible to implement the policies enunciated. A Senior Interagency Group (SIG) on Space is established by the directive to provide a forum to all Federal agencies for their policy views, to review and advise on proposed changes to national space policy, and to provide for orderly and rapid referral of space policy issues to the President for decisions as necessary.

The SIG (Space) will be chaired by the Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs and will include the Deputy Secretary of Defense, Deputy Secretary of State, Deputy Secretary of Commerce, Director of Central Intelligence, Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, Director of the Arms Control and Disarmament Agency, and the Administrator of the National Aeronautics and Space Administration. Representatives of the Office of Management and Budget and the Office of Science and Technology Policy will be included as observers. Other agencies or departments will participate based on the subjects to be addressed.

In August 1981 the President directed a National Security Council review of space policy. The direction indicated that the President's Science Adviser, Dr. George Keyworth, in coordination with other affected agencies, should examine whether new directions in national space policy were warranted. An interagency working group was formed to conduct the study effort and Dr. Victor H. Reis, an Assistant Director of the Office of Science and Technology Policy was designated as Chairman. The group addressed the following fundamental issues: (1) launch vehicle needs; (2) adequacy of existing space policy to ensure continued satisfaction of United States civil and national security program needs; (3) shuttle organizational responsibilities and capabilities; and, (4) potential legislation for space policy. The reports on the various issues formed the basis of the policy decisions outlined here.

I was deeply saddened to learn of the tragic death of President Antonio Guzman Fernandez, a man, who was a good friend of the United States and who made a lasting contribution to the continuing growth of democracy and freedom in the Dominican Republic. As you assume your duties, I wish to assure you, the family of President Guzman and the Dominican people that the United States shares your sense of loss and wishes to maintain the close cooperation and friendship which exists between our governments and peoples.

The President. Before turning to the question of federalism, I know that many of you here today share our great concern about the tragedy that's been occurring in Lebanon. And I thought I might give you just a brief update.

Middle East] and others have been working tirelessly to bring peace to that troubled region. We're dealing with extremely delicate and fast-moving negotiations to save West Beirut and to bring the withdrawal of all forces from Lebanon. The situation is too sensitive for detailed discussion, but I can report to you that this weekend in discussions with Mr. Habib the Government of Lebanon told us that a multinational force might be essential for temporary peacekeeping in Beirut and informally proposed that the United States consider making a contribution to that force.

The Lebanese Government has not made a formal proposal, but I have agreed in principle to contribute a small contingent of U.S. personnel, subject to certain conditions. The United States has pledged to do all that it can do to bring peace and stability to the Middle East, and we must keep that pledge.

Obviously, there's much work still to be done. I can't overemphasize the delicacy of these negotiations. I can only say that in coming days we'll press forward. And I can, once again, praise the work of Ambassador Habib, who has labored heroically in recent days.

I know that I talked to some of you in Washington recently about this program and assured you then -- and I will now assure those others who weren't present -- that this is not, as you've probably already been told by two briefers -- I have a feeling I'm plowing plowed ground here -- but that this is not a budget-balancing gimmick. This is something that's been a dream of mine. It goes back a great many years, and particularly back to the days when I was a Governor growing increasingly frustrated with Federal redtape.

And we came up with the concept. We didn't present it as a finished plan, as some of you know, but we presented it as a plan as a beginning place for consultations with local officials, mayors, with State legislators, with county officials, and, of course, with Members of the Congress.

Of course, our answer to that is: Let's look forward to a day where they're not raising those funds, where the tax sources which were usurped by the Federal Government at the same time it usurped so many, once, State and local functions -- they usurped the tax sources also. And so, the thing is to accompany the functions with the resources to pay for them.

Now, I'm going to be very brief here in my remarks, because I think we're going to have a dialog rather than my go on talking. But, you know, traveling the mashed potato circuit for many years -- and I know that many of you have done the same thing -- I have often quoted Thomas Jefferson in my protestations, then, against government intervention and big government, particularly, intervening. His line when he said -- ``Were we directed from Washington when to sow and when to reap, we should soon want for bread.'' And yet I never have put that -- I had put that in the context of -- as I'm sure many of you have -- of intervention by, particularly, the Federal Government in things that were not its proper province. Would you like to hear that put in the context in which he said it? -- because it's even more timely than it was in that supposed context in which I myself used it and perhaps many of you.

And, as I say, I know that you must share in that frustration too. I could go on citing anecdotes here and examples of the frustration I felt sometimes at the Federal Government's insistence on doing it that way. And yet, I can understand now, being there, how, once they're entrusted with that, they feel that whatever problem comes up must be nationwide. They lose sight of the great diversity of this country. So, they pass a rule that's supposed to fit -- I won't say South Succotash, Wisconsin, anymore, because everybody's started trying to find South Succotash -- [laughter] -- but to fit all these diverse 50 States and all the local communities within them.

Q. Mr. President -- [inaudible] -- Oregon, and as you know, the Pacific Northwest has been particularly hard hit by unemployment and also by the economy, although I'm pleased to report to you our own indicators on unemployment started turning around in that State, as we heard yesterday. How does it look nationally? And what do you hope will be the first visible trend in that direction?

I've gotten into a thing where I go back and forth between the seasonally adjusted figures and the unadjusted figures. And they don't always match. And it confuses me somewhat by that. But I know that, in the month of June, there was an increase in the seasonally adjusted figures that was -- I hope I have it right -- but -- no, they about stayed even -- but anyway -- I may be confused on that between the two in just recently reading them. But at the same time that we have this great unemployment, in June we increased the number of employed by 600,000 and the number of unemployed by 400,000. In other words, a million people, probably due to schools letting out and so forth, entered the job market. And 60 to 40, they found jobs, even in this time of great unemployment.

State like your own, everything to do with construction and homebuilding -- we know everything to do with automobiles, everything, then, to do with steel and rubber and things of that kind around them; those industries that are terribly hard hit -- and we must lay that to the high interest costs.

But part of our problem would be here without recession. And that is the great expansion of the labor force. A higher percentage today of people of employable age is actually in the job force than ever before in our history; so that at the time we have this great unemployment, we still have over a hundred million people actually employed which, to me, gives some encouragement with regard to the economy. I would think, for your particular State -- and I'm delighted to hear what you said, and it jives with the figures we received that in May home construction increased housing starts by 22 percent -- and that would have a reflection immediately in a State as dependent on lumber as Oregon is.

So, I have to believe that all the other indices are that we've bottomed out in this recession. And slow though it may be and always is, there is the beginning of the upturn as -- I'll be an I-told-you-so, saying we always predicted that in the third quarter it would, and increasingly so in the fourth.

As a student of Von Mesis -- I'm sure you're familiar with Von Mesis, the economist -- he was saying that the market should control the interest rates. Do you feel the Federal Reserve System is controlling -- or putting interest rates higher than normally should be?

The President. No. I have to tell you we can't make a scapegoat of the Federal Reserve at this time. Since the first of the year, they've been working very hard on holding an even increase in the money supply. And some of this is supply and demand. The high interest rates -- and I've been meeting with all manner of people in the financial world to discuss this problem. The available money -- I mean, available borrowers who are willing to pay the high interest rates for short-term loans in business and industry to tide them over cash-flow problems and so forth, is such that there is a market there at the present interest rates for that money.

Now, we're hoping that we can do something that would help persuade them. One thing that has encouraged us is that throughout the country, here and there, there are groups of bankers, local bankers who themselves -- it started with automobiles -- that they got together and each put up a certain amount of money and said, ``This is available for automobile loans at an interest rate that was well below the present market rate.'' And they said, ``As long as this money lasts.'' And the upsurge in automobile buying in those areas was dramatic, to the point of being drastic.

Now, since then, there have been some local banks and groups of banks that have been doing this with regard to home mortgages, bringing them down to less than the market rate of interest, but putting up a specified amount of money and saying, ``As long as this sum lasts, we'll do that.'' I'm just hoping that this will not only spread but that this might lead then to just the general reduction of interest.

Part of it is also psychological. They've still got to be convinced that we and the Congress intend to keep on hammering away at government spending to bring down inflation where it has been brought down.

Incidentally, you might all be interested to know -- this is one of the figures that's overlooked -- that in the decline of inflation over the last year, the increase in purchasing power for people at the poverty level is greater than all the benefits that were ever prescribed through government social programs. The $15,000-a-year family of four, that income has received about a thousand-dollar raise in purchasing power simply due to the drop in the inflation rate.

The President. Let me just say, we support looking at that. It's a very tempting thing, because let's all of us admit that probably there is more resistance to the income tax in America today, not from the amount of it, but from the complexity of trying to figure out what the amount should be, that the people are pretty fed up with something so complex that even the government has to warn that their own agents cannot be depended on to give you sound advice as to what your tax burden should be. I can remember when you used to go in there to them and just hand it to them, and they'd tell you what you owed and that was it. They can't even do it anymore. So, the flat rate does look tempting.

There are some other things. I know that many charities and educational institutions are concerned lest a flat rate doing away with that deductibility for them might dry up giving. I was concerned about that, but the more I think about it, we're the most generous people on Earth. I don't think that people would quit giving what they give simply because you've changed the system of taxation. After all, people were contributing to charity in America long before we had an income tax.

So, I think it is something worth looking at. Certainly, we've got to find some way to simplify the tax paying. I just got the figures the other day from the Treasury Department that out of the 4,112 people with million-dollar-a-year incomes in this country, a million or above, about 40 of them used the simplified form this year.

Thomas Jefferson's federalism program, and I'm all for it. But I am concerned about the third layer of government that we have called Regional Council of Governments. Do you have any plan to do away with that?

The President. No. I do know this, that in an effort -- as the Federal programs over the years grew and grew and became so complicated and so authoritarian in their directions, that some years ago an administration proposed and did start regionalizing, thinking that this would simplify and make it easier for States and local governments to go to a regional administrator of some of these programs than to have to go to Washington each time.

My own feeling is, that just further involved the Federal Government and, if anything, made it even more complicated than it was. But I can assure you that all of these things and such as that will be looked at as we go forward with this.

Q. Mr. President, I'm Harley Hoppe from Seattle, Washington. We were invited here to learn about your concept of new federalism, and it's a concept I'm sure everyone here in the room will applaud and work very hard to promote. My question is, what is the single most important thing that we can take home to our area to help sell your new program?

The President. I would think the simplest thing and the simplest answer is that under the programs the way they are -- and I remember in Governors' conferences getting frustrated at hearing some of my fellow Governors advocate that the answer to their distress was turn more over to the Federal Government, give it to the Federal Government, get away from -- and I think some of that was a reluctance to be responsible for raising the funds themselves to handle these things at a different level, at their own level of government.

But the money was coming out of the same pockets and the same people -- their own constituents, their own citizens in their State, their county, their local community. And when the Federal Government has to take it, the Federal Government dips deeper and takes more money for the same programs than will be spent on those programs if they are administered closer to the people. It is just a known fact that the percentage for administrative overhead to deliver a service to the people increases the higher you go in the echelons of government. So, when I said it wasn't a budget-balancing thing, but it is a budget-relieving thing for all of us.

And what I think is that federalism will get rid of a gigantic layer of administrative overhead based in Washington. And maybe this is one of the reasons why so much of bureaucracy is opposed to this, because, you know, I think that poverty has become a career for a lot of well-paid people.

My goodness, I know he tells me I can only take one more question, so I'll take yours. But I also just wanted to say -- it's been called to my attention that -- I know this is a bipartisan gathering, but the Republican nominee for the United States Senate is here, the mayor of San Diego, Pete Wilson. Pete, where are you? Hey, good to see you. I'll bet if Pete gets there he'll support federalism. He's had to deal with it at the local level too.

Q. Mr. President, Fred Adams from Colorado. I'm curious, has the administration taken a stand on the two pieces of legislation that would force the States, on the public employees retirement program where we have a program that -- which would federalize it and throw it into social security? I can't see that this will help social security. But we're concerned; it will cost us a tremendous amount of money if we have to go this route.

I have to tell you that so far we've had no Cabinet meeting -- the Cabinet Councils, which meet in those -- who are interested in the particular subject -- meet on some of these things before they come to an actual Cabinet meeting -- then for final decision and where I'm involved. And I have not been involved in that, but I understand some of what your concern is.

May I also just say I'm leaving here to speak to a group of senior citizens with regard to social security, and I can say to you, as I'm going to say to them, that this has become such a political football every time someone's tried to deal with it. It is a program that -- in 1977 they passed a tax increase and boasted that they had -- for social security -- that they had solved the problem of social security's fiscal integrity to the year 2015. Now, a couple of the tax increases have already gone into effect. There are a couple more in the coming years still to go into effect, in addition to increasing the amount of income against which the percentage of the tax is based -- I think it winds up somewhere in the 60,000 range or above -- that would be taxed for social security. And even with that, the biggest tax increase in our history, social security must have something done to restore its fiscal integrity before July 1983, or it will be out of money.

So, we've decided that just raising the taxes isn't the answer to that problem. And we have a task force that is to report back in December, made up of -- bipartisan -- of representatives appointed by Speaker O'Neill, by the leader of the Senate, Howard Baker, and by myself. And I don't know and have not inquired of them where they are in their deliberations.

But we think that there has to be a whole restructuring of social security. And I could tell you that, from my own view, I don't believe that the answer is just getting more people into it or involved in it. The one thing that I will say to you is -- as I'm going to say to them also -- the one thing that I've insisted on that in any plan that is drafted, there must be a guarantee that those people presently dependent on it are going to continue getting the benefits and the checks that they expect. There's no way that we can pull the rug out from those senior citizens who are totally dependent on this program. And we're not going to do it.

Now, they tell me that I've run out of time here. I'll have to keep straight now when I get to the next stop that I'm speaking to my own generation and not a mixture -- [laughter] -- of local and State officials here.

But thank you all again for coming here and the interest that you have shown in this. And if I could make one last appeal to you all, it is going to take you and the people at the grassroots to get this through the Congress. And I do know that when they hear from home, things happen. I've used the expression sometimes that, while it's nice to make them feel the light, it's better to make them feel the heat.

So, I'll count on those of you, even some who might not be sold yet, to keep your minds open and then let your Congressmen know that you want this federalism program and that the people who run the affairs of the cities, the counties, and the States, believe it or not, are just as compassionate and considerate of their fellow citizens as is the bureaucracy on the shores of the Potomac. I know that for a fact. And you know it also.

I just want to talk for a few minutes to you, and then maybe we can have a little dialog. And I know the whole thing has to be very short. But I walked in on your lunch today, because I've been very frustrated in Washington. I've been wanting to talk to people of my own generation so that we could talk about some of the misinformation that has come out with regard to one program in particular, social security. And if I was guilty of all the things with regard to social security that I've read about myself and heard said about myself, I wouldn't like me either. And I just want to tell you what the problem is and why it's being talked about and what we're trying to do about it.

The social security program, when it started, there were 16 people working for every retiree and paying the social security tax to support them. Today, there are only -- well, a little under 2\1/2\ people working for each retiree. And this has presented financial problems. And in recent years, the Congress has tried to resolve those problems of fiscal stability by simply raising the tax and raising the percentage of income against which that tax is assessed.

Now, I'm not saying that to frighten anybody, because, believe me, the people today dependent on social security are going to continue getting their checks. And we're not going to let that rug be pulled out from under anyone dependent on that program.

I must say, the timing is right for me to be here since those of you who are getting social security got that cost-of-living pay raise on July 1st, also. I remember when they said we wouldn't, but we did.

Now, what we -- it became such a political football, many people trying to make some political edge out of this, that what I finally settled for and got the concurrence of the Speaker of the House, Tip O'Neill, and the leader of the Senate, Howard Baker, and that is, we, between us, the three of us, appointed a commission which will come in in December with recommendations for a program as to how we meet the fiscal problems for the ongoing integrity of social security. And, again, I say with regard to that that the instructions that were given to them, and that I will still hold to, is that any program -- and I think there are ways that this can be put on a sound basis -- but whatever they do must agree with what I said just a moment ago to you, that any plan for a change in social security must not take away from those people dependent on that program today.

The President. You all hear the question there? Well, let me tell you. This is one that -- and I've confessed to them that it bothers me very much. There are hundreds who are accredited as White House correspondents who are there. There are two automatic -- the first two questions come, alternating which is first and second in each press conference, between the representative of the United Press and the representative of the Associated Press. So, those two ask the first questions.

And I know that there are going to be dozens and dozens more hands raised than I can possibly recognize. So, really I just simply kind of try to spread it around. I start it in the middle, and I start in here and there's -- they are in three sections -- and I try to take some from each section, and I leave with more hands up than were recognized.

We did try at the beginning -- and it was a press suggestion -- very early on, the press suggested why not draw lots, that we draw numbers and they all have numbers and then just simply say, ``All right. This number.'' Well, we did it once, and the press said they didn't like it. So, I don't know any other way.

The other night after the last press conference I did say to our people, why don't we suggest that those who have gone to several press conferences and never been recognized out of all those hands, put their names down and then a few of those each press conference we automatically call on by name -- as well as just hitting it like I'm hitting it here -- [laughter] -- to just -- wherever the hand is up.

But it bothers me. It's the hardest thing in the world when the Dean of the Press Corps stands up and says ``Thank you,'' which indicates the press conference is over, to know that I'm walking away from dozens and dozens of hands that I haven't been able to recognize.

The President. I'll tell you, the only comment I can make to that is that a court of justice had its way, with a jury and a judge, and they found that verdict. And so we stay with it. And I just don't feel that I can comment on that.

Q. Mr. President, as a member of your task force -- Presidential task force, I would like to let you know that in the symposium on social security we are informed -- I want you just please to verify -- there are 170 million people putting into the security system, and only 65 million are drawing out of it. So, they say there's no fear of ever draining or bankruptcy of the social security system.

One thing more is about the nutrition program, that exactly fearing that too many cutbacks had been placed in it. And therefore, Mr. President, be compassionate -- not to cut our very important benefits for the senior citizens. Thank you, Mr. President.

Q. Mr. President, you and I met in pictures. I worked in pictures. And when you were Governor of California, every year you sent my late wife and I congratulations. And I've still got the one that you remembered to -- it's nice to see you. God bless you.

You know, everyone today emphasizes youth so much. And there've been so many of us -- I know that young people, we were the same way -- you kind of challenge the things that you've learned from the people that went before and the mores and the customs and everything. I get concerned sometimes that there's a tendency to throw away some of the values just because they're old without recognizing that they have true worth or they wouldn't be around.

But one day back in those riotous days -- the universities were in flames and so forth -- while I was Governor -- and if I went to a campus, I'd start a riot. But some student leaders from the University of California campus demanded to see me as Governor. And I was delighted, because, as I say, I couldn't talk to them otherwise.

Well, they came to see me. And they kind of -- some of them were barefoot, the custom of that day in those riotous times. And they all sat around, and one of them was the spokesman. And he said, ``Governor, it's impossible for you to understand our generation.'' Well, I tried to pass it off.

And just stop and think about it. We did. In our lifetime, all those miracles they were talking about came in to be. I can remember my first automobile ride. Up until then, it had been horses and buggies. And now, the other day, I'm out watching those fellows come back from outer space. When we got on the platform to see them land, they told me it was 20 minutes till landing.

But I'll tell you, if I could just say it -- and then I'm going to get out of here, because I know I'm running late for the next stop -- I'm very proud to be here because -- I want to say this about our generation. There are generations that preside over transition periods like this, when there are great changes in the world. And we've been one of those. And no generation in history, no people have ever fought harder, paid a higher price for freedom, or done more to advance the dignity of man than our generation. And I'm not going to apologize to anyone for what we've done with our lives so far.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this sixth day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

The manufacturing clause requires that many printed materials be printed in the United States in order to enjoy copyright protection. The clause was written into law nearly a century ago, in an effort to strengthen our relatively new printing industry by limiting foreign competition. However, the ``infant industry'' justification for protecting our printing industry is no longer valid; our industry is now one of the most modern and efficient in the world.

During the recent Tokyo Round of Multilateral Trade Negotiations, our trading partners objected to the manufacturing clause as inconsistent with our international obligations. Extension of the clause, as provided in H.R. 6198, could result in increased international trade tensions that could endanger American jobs. I would further note that if the printing or publishing industry believes itself injured, or threatened by injury, due to the expiration of the manufacturing clause, it has the option of requesting relief under the Trade Act.

My Administration has placed a very high priority on strengthening free trade, and we are energetically seeking to remove artificial foreign barriers to American exports. We are confident that our free enterprise system will enable American products to face foreign competition in our own open market and to do well in markets overseas, provided our access to those markets is not blocked by protectionist barriers that distort international competition.

A dispute exists between the Brotherhood of Locomotive Engineers and certain railroads represented by the National Carriers' Conference Committee of the National Railway Labor Conference designated on the list attached hereto and made a part hereof.

Section 1. Establishment of the Board. There is established effective July 10, 1982, a board of three members to be appointed by the President to investigate this dispute. No member of the board shall be pecuniarily or otherwise interested in any organization of railroad employees or any carrier.

Sec. 3. Maintaining Conditions. As provided by Section 10 of the Railway Labor Act, as amended, from the date of the creation of the Emergency Board and for 30 days after the board has made its report to the President, no change, except by agreement, shall be made by the carriers or by their employees, in the conditions out of which the dispute arose.

The United States has long recognized how critical the world's oceans are to mankind and how important international agreements are to the use of those oceans. For over a decade, the United States has been working with more than 150 countries at the Third United Nations Conference on Law of the Sea to develop a comprehensive treaty.

On January 29 of this year, I reaffirmed the United States commitment to the multilateral process for reaching such a treaty and announced that we would return to the negotiations to seek to correct unacceptable elements in the deep seabed mining part of the draft convention. I also announced that my administration would support ratification of a convention meeting six basic objectives.

On April 30 the conference adopted a convention that does not satisfy the objectives sought by the United States. It was adopted by a vote of 130 in favor, with 4 against (including the United States) and 17 abstentions. Those voting ``no'' or abstaining appear small in number but represent countries which produce more than 60 percent of the world's gross national product and provide more than 60 percent of the contributions to the United Nations.

We have now completed a review of that convention and recognize that it contains many positive and very significant accomplishments. Those extensive parts dealing with navigation and overflight and most other provisions of the convention are consistent with United States interests and, in our view, serve well the interests of all nations. That is an important achievement and signifies the benefits of working together and effectively balancing numerous interests. The United States also appreciates the efforts of the many countries that have worked with us toward an acceptable agreement, including efforts by friends and allies at the session that concluded on April 30.

Our review recognizes, however, that the deep seabed mining part of the convention does not meet United States objectives. For this reason, I am announcing today that the United States will not sign the convention as adopted by the conference, and our participation in the remaining conference process will be at the technical level and will involve only those provisions that serve United States interests.

We recognize that world demand and markets currently do not justify commercial development of deep seabed mineral resources, and it is not clear when such development will be justified. When such factors become favorable, however, the deep seabed represents a potentially important source of strategic and other minerals. The aim of the United States in this regard has been to establish with other nations an order that would allow exploration and development under reasonable terms and conditions.

These sanctions, which were imposed April 30, include withholding of new Export-Import Bank credits, insurance, and guarantees, and new Commodity Credit Corporation guarantees. I have made this decision after a thorough review of the situation in the South Atlantic following the cessation of hostilities. It is important now for all parties involved in the recent conflict to put the past behind us and to work for friendship and cooperation. The United States, for its part, will do all it can to strengthen its historic ties among nations of this hemisphere.

As the U.S. economy has become more international in the past decade, foreign trade has an increasingly important role to play. The value of exports increased fivefold in the past ten years so that now 19 percent of U.S. goods is sold abroad. In 1980, five million jobs were related to exports; up from 3.5 million jobs in 1970. Because of the importance of foreign trade to the U.S. economy, support for a more open trading system is the cornerstone of our trade policy. This Report begins with a comprehensive statement of U.S. trade policy reaffirming both our commitment to trade liberalization and our resolution to secure compliance with international trade law and agreements on the part of our trading partners.

For this policy of open markets to be effective, U.S. firms need to be assured that foreign markets are free from barriers and distortions. This report relates how we have dealt with violations of this nature in our bilateral relations with our trading partners, and in our participation in multilateral fora, such as the OECD and the GATT. We will continue to be vigilant in identifying distortions relating to trade and investment, such as export subsidies, export performance and local content requirements, creeping bilateralism, and excessive use of safeguards. We will be persistent in resisting the use of such practices by our trading partners, and insist on their adherence to international trade laws and responsibilities. We will also be identifying important new areas of the world economy that are ripe for formal international trade disciplines, especially in service sectors.

Trade liberalization is the responsibility of all nations, although the differing levels of development may make it difficult to define the equitable reductions in tariff and nontariff barriers that developing countries should undertake. We are convinced that trade can have greater leverage for improving their economies and their relations with us than development assistance. In 1980, for example, earnings from trade with the United States were twice the value of aid received from all bilateral and multilateral sources by the non-OPEC developing countries. As these countries evolve into mature international traders capable of greater liberalization, we will encourage their adoption of more fully reciprocal conditions of trade with us.

The process of liberalizing trade and extending international disciplines is a challenging one, but it is one that offers important opportunities to improve the economic welfare of our own country as well as realize our national commitment to promoting economic development abroad.

The President. The Vice President and these Senators -- these Members, these Representatives in the House are here with me today for an announcement. And let me warn you now, there won't be any questions. I just wanted to make this announcement.

Nearly 3 months ago, I told the American people that we'd made dramatic progress in reducing the growth of Federal spending, but that we need more time to get the job done. For too long the legislative process has simply been overwhelmed by the powerful and relentless pressures for more spending. So, I asked the Congress to pass, as soon as possible, a constitutional amendment requiring that it balance the Federal budget.

Baker, Senators Thurmond, Hatch, DeConcini, and Helms, as leaders of the 61 cosponsors, to help us secure its passage as rapidly as possible. I understand that Representatives Conable and Jenkins, who are here, are filing a discharge petition so the full House can consider their resolution. Then we send the amendment on to the States.

All over America, citizens are asking each other the same question: Why is this government incapable of doing what their families, municipalities, and State governments do as a matter of course -- spend within the limits of their revenues? Twenty-one unbalanced budgets in 22 years is proof that our Federal budgetary system needs fundamental reform. We must not and we will not, permit prospects for lasting economic recovery to be buried beneath an endless tide of red ink.

And with that, just a ``thank you'' to these gentlemen here with me and to their colleagues for all that they're doing to make this come about. And we intend that it shall come about once and for all.

Sec. 8. The amendments made by this Order are effective with respect to articles entered, or withdrawn from warehouse for consumption, on or after the day following the date of this Order, and for all articles previously entered for which liquidation has not been made final as of such date.

Bernie Hillenbrand, [President, vice president, past president, and executive director, respectively, of the National Association of Counties] has been invaluable during the last year as we have worked to reshape American government, crafting a plan to return the reins of government to the American people.

You were elected to offices that are among the closest to the people. I'm sure you know the names of many of your constituents, and they know yours. When you pass them on the street, they ask you about a recent decision or a vote. They attend your board and commission meetings to speak about their concerns. You're held responsible for your decisions by the people you represent, and that's what democracy is all about.

At the level of government you deal with, the daily lives of your citizens, managing their schools, repairing their roads, protecting their neighborhoods from fire and crime -- of course, Washington involves itself in these things too, but too often that kind of Federal intrusiveness has become part of the problem, not the solution.

I'm reminded of the story about a young student who handed in a test paper riddled with errors, and his teacher asked him how one person could make so many mistakes. And he said, ``One person didn't. My father helped me.'' [Laughter] Well, maybe the Federal Government has helped local governments make some mistakes, and that's what I want to talk with you about today.

Together you and I are involved in an epic struggle to restore the governmental balance intended in our Constitution and desired by our people. We're turning America away from yesterday's policies of big brother government. We're determined to restore power and authority to States and localities, returning as much decisionmaking as possible to the level of government where services are delivered.

Thomas Jefferson once said, ``I know no safe depository of the ultimate powers of society but the people themselves.'' Well, I agree with him. And I think you do too. The more government we can keep at the local levels, in local hands, the better off we are and the more freedom we will have.

Well, forcing the American people to accept the dictates of a swollen government in Washington has been one of the more serious mistakes of this century. Either you believe in democracy or you don't. And like you, I believe.

Our Founding Fathers knew the value of diversity in America. They understood the need to control the size of government and to hold it accountable to our people. They wrote those principles into the Constitution and, as Madison points out in the Federalist Papers, ensured republican remedies -- now, that's republican with a small ``r'' -- for problems that have brought down other republics.

Traditionally, we've been able to adapt well to change and to meet our challenges, because we could reach across a vast continent for ideas and experience. In the recent past, as the Federal Government has pushed each city, county, and State to be more like every other, we've begun to lose one of our greatest strengths -- our diversity as a people. If we're to renew our country, we must stop trying to homogenize America.

I believe the extent of the problems that we face today is in direct proportion to the extent to which we have allowed the Federal Government to mushroom out of control. Ignoring careful checks and balances, Federal bureaucrats now dictate where a community will build a bridge or lay a sewer system. We've lost the sense of which problems require national solutions and which are best handled at the local level.

Let me quote Jefferson again. I'm sure you've all heard and possibly used yourself in a speech as I have his statement that if we look to Washington to find out ``when to sow and when to reap, we shall soon want for bread.'' Well, that line takes on much more meaning if we hear it in the entire context of what Jefferson was discussing.

As the distinctions blur, our people have lost far too much control over public policies that affect their daily lives. They no longer know who to blame when things go wrong. For example, if you have a problem with the way your child's school is run, who do you talk to? The teacher? The principal? The superintendent? The Governor? The courts? A department in Washington or, perhaps, the President? We must sort out responsibilities to better manage resources and restore accountability in government.

Having mentioned education, may I digress for a moment. Recently a national convention having to do with education was held in California. A central theme at that gathering was an attack on our efforts to get control of runaway Federal spending and what a threat that was to education.

I have charged that the Federal Government in recent years has interfered unnecessarily in the classroom, claiming its right to do that by virtue of Federal financial aid to public schools. Well, that aid amounts to only 8.1 percent of the total cost of public school education. Local and State government put up the other 91.9 percent.

Now, we haven't canceled out that 8.1 percent of Federal help in our budgeting. We've shifted some of that spending to other government agencies for administrative purposes. Rehabilitation programs for adults, for instance, will be part of the Health and Human Services budget now.

Yes, there will be savings, but not because we're depriving children of necessary educational programs. Many of the savings will be in the elimination of Federal administrative overhead and in giving local authorities more flexibility, free of useless regulations and redtape. And that, incidentally, is the underlying principle of federalism.

Our federalism initiatives are not incidental proposals. They lie at the very heart of our philosophy of government -- a philosophy I've long held and, I believe, most of you have as well. We are committed to restoring the intended balance between the levels of government, and, although some people may find this cause not as glamorous or as immediate as some others, we're determined to see it through.

For the first time in too many years, the Federal Government will recognize a limit on what it should do, how fat it can grow, and the power it can claim. With your help, we'll reverse the flow of power, sending it back to the localities.

But the battle is barely begun. So, while I want to thank you, I also want to ask for your continued help. Rest assured that we in this administration understand that such support is a two-way street. As your partners in government, we pledge that this administration will never turn its back on the problems you face in the counties of America.

In my State of the Union message last January, I outlined the principles of our federalism proposals. I pledged to place federalism at the top of our national agenda, recognizing that the Federal Government has become overloaded with far more responsibilities than it can properly manage. Then as now, we focused on the need to sort out responsibilities and turn back to States and localities many Federal programs, insisting they be accompanied by the resources to pay for them.

We also promised to create no winners or losers among the States, and that these initiatives would not be means to simply cut the budget. Even at that early stage, our proposal reflected many of your concerns. It included an 8-year transition to avoid dislocations for States and local governments, revenue sharing was protected, funding of $4.6 billion a year was called for. The original turnback proposal, including more than 40 programs and the funds to pay for them, was in itself a giant revenue sharing program. The package guaranteed stability and certainty by guaranteeing 1983 budget figures through 1987.

Though only an outline, our proposal opened a great, national debate on the structure of our government. We presented a working proposal to be altered and polished during consultations with State and local officials. Since that January address, my staff and I have consulted with State and local officials as well as Members of the Congress. As I said earlier, NACO's representatives played a key role in shaping the package which we will send to the Congress by the end of this month.

While we've remained true to our first principles, significant changes have been made. The new package calls for Federal assumption of Medicaid responsibilities in return for State takeover of Aid to Families With Dependent Children. But the food stamp program has been dropped from the swap. The number of programs to be turned back has been reduced to about 35. And the windfall profits tax has been replaced by general revenues as a funding source. The pass-through provision has been revised so that localities will be guaranteed 100 percent of funds historically passed to them from the Federal Government. States will not be able to opt out of programs until 1985, and, when they do, will be required to consult with local elected officials.

Now, these measures are designed to strengthen the stability and certainty of funding. I believe that together they go along toward answering your needs as we begin to reorder the way the American people govern themselves. I hope that we can count on your support.

Baltimore's H. L. Mencken, a profound observer of American life, once said, ``It doesn't take a majority to make a rebellion; it takes only a few determined leaders and a sound cause.'' Well, let those be our rallying words. For it falls to us and our responsible colleagues at all levels of government to carry the message of the people to the Congress. Representative Barber Conable of New York has pointed out that if the States and localities want these federalism reforms, they can get them.

Roy Orr, your past president, has often said that with fewer strings attached, you people could do more with half the money that Congress appropriates than Federal bureaucrats -- even with the best of intentions -- are able to do with all of it. I believe him.

Your organization has formed an alliance of another kind that's adding to local resources and solving problems where they occur. ``The Alliance of Business and Counties'' -- the theme of this conference -- and your Good Neighbor Awards are excellent examples of what can be done when communities look inward for answers to problems.

Baltimore. I'm told, for example, that in Essex County, New Jersey, the Chamber of Commerce has recruited a team of business executives to do a budget and management analysis for the county. Results included the coordination of cost-containment activities and the drafting of specific steps to reduce energy consumption.

In Fairfield County, South Carolina, the utility company and county government built an efficient, modern facility to house not only a 24-hour ambulance service but a 60-member fire department in a sparsely populated area of the State. They tell me that response time has dropped from 20 minutes to 6.

I'm sure you know these case histories better than I do, and there are dozens more I don't have time to mention now. But I want to congratulate NACO and these counties, the businesses, and all the best of your ``good neighbors'' for reviving the ``can do'' spirit. We built America with the good neighbor policy. I believe that kind of attitude can make us great again.

Earlier this morning I visited an area of Baltimore that would be depressed were it not for the great hope of its citizens, their readiness for hard work, and the cooperative bond between local government and private business. Just over a year ago a bindery was begun in a warehouse in Park Heights in the northwest corner of this city. The enterprise was designed to turn a profit while providing jobs and training for 2,500 people within 5 years.

Inner Harbor, an area that is being restored through the cooperation, once again, of government and business. So far, about half the funds for the Inner Harbor restoration have come from the government, but the private sector is expected to pick up nearly 95 percent of future costs. And maybe you missed my point about a fig leaf -- that's quite a fig leaf that you've heard about before.

The idea used in Baltimore is similar to the enterprise zone experiment our administration would like to test across America. Designated zones would be relieved of many tax and regulatory burdens, producing incentives for new business and new jobs. Although not a comprehensive answer to the problems in our inner cities, enterprise zones offer real hope for the mostly minority communities trapped at the bottom of America's economic ladder, in the heart -- the forgotten heart, all too often -- of our cities.

My administration remains committed to the enterprise zone experiment as part of our overall economic recovery plan. Of course a growing economy will be the best Federal program we can provide local governments, as well as the larger share of the tax base that will go along with it.

It's a simple yet a revolutionary concept -- this idea of giving the voters what they voted for. And it has startled some people a little bit we're actually doing what we said we were going to do, and that's not something Washington is used to. We're determined to return our government and our economy to the people. Together, with the support of people like you, we will shrink the Federal establishment, start our economy growing again, and restore America to greatness.

I have no doubt that the American people, with God's help, are up to the challenge. We need only believe in ourselves. In the course of our history we've overcome far greater challenges. If we look at the daily lives of Americans we can see case after case of individual mettle and pluck.

Thirty-two-year-old J. R. Richard, once an ace pitcher for the Houston Astros, stepped up to a minor league mound. Two summers ago a stroke had left him partially paralyzed, and his doctors wouldn't predict whether he could ever play again. But that summer night in Daytona the packed ballpark erupted in thunderous applause as J. R. jogged onto the field.

Newspaper accounts reported his performance was not overpowering, but neither was it an embarrassment. In four innings, the lanky righthander gave up only two earned runs and left the game to another enthusiastic ovation.

J. R. has the kind of American spirit that we all must tap to continue our struggle for national renewal. We've won some major victories in the last year and a half, but there's a long, hard road still ahead of us. If we can focus as clearly on our goal as J. R. Richard has on his, if we can imagine America once again strong and vibrant and alive with jobs for all our people, security for our elderly, wealth enough for our poor, and new opportunities for every new generation, then I believe we, too, can find the strength to make our dreams come true.

Well, Mayor Schaefer, thank you very much. This has been a very wonderful day. It's long delayed. As you know, a storm did away with this, and we had the lunch in Washington and -- because that big thing I fly around in wouldn't fly in that storm.

I promised our group before we came up this morning that this would be a memorable visit, a time of learning for us all. Now, of course, it isn't a time of learning for Senator Mathias or for our lovely Representative Holt here and -- from Washington -- but they must get a reinspiration from coming back here every once and a while. There is so much going on.

Governor, all you other ladies and gentlemen, when I said it'd be -- it has been a time of learning for all of us. After touring the bindery and seeing this breathtaking view of the harbor, I know I speak for everyone when I say we're impressed, and congratulations.

Shakespeare said, ``The people are the city.'' Baltimore is a city of, by, and for its people -- a place of excitement, growth, diversity, full of sound, color, warmth, and delight. The renaissance that you're creating and enjoy would not have been possible without a strong, shared commitment between government and industry, a partnership for progress between the public and the private sector. This is the cornerstone for rebuilding our cities and restoring hope to our people.

As you know, we intend to return more decisionmaking to State and local governments. I've been talking about that already this morning to the National Association of Counties, who have been meeting here. We'll return tax resources, as well as responsibilities, to the levels of government closest to the people.

Baltimore has been the recipient of many Federal programs. Yet there are areas of this city beyond Harbor Place that face severe unemployment. The problem is deeply imbedded. It produces pain, frustration, and a loss of hope. And unless we correct it, dreams that are every American's birthright will have been needlessly destroyed. And I know that, being with your mayor these several occasions, and particularly this morning, I know that that's not going to happen here. And I'm determined to not let it happen elsewhere.

I think it's time for new ideas that can produce real solutions. And the best social program is a productive job for anyone who's willing to work. That's why we're urging the private sector to get more actively involved in job training and urban development. The business of business is America. And that's why we're calling on the Congress to take prompt action on our enterprise zone proposal. And I am reinspired to press for that after what I've seen that has happened here without our enterprise proposal.

The people at this luncheon today and the communities that you represent are doing much to combine private and public resources to revitalize America. Bill Verity has told me of the Blue Chip-In program here in Baltimore. Private companies are investing in programs that create jobs, train the unemployed, and provide some emergency services to the city. And the efforts here in Baltimore and your work in cities across America are proof that our potential is unlimited if the public and private sectors can and will work together.

Some say their mission is to save free enterprise. I say their mission -- or our mission -- is to free enterprise so together we can save America. And with your help and continued leadership that's what we're going to do.

The United States Government has remained from the beginning, and will remain, neutral in the war between Iran and Iraq. We remain deeply concerned, however, about the continuation of this conflict and the attendant loss of life and destruction. The United States supports the independence and territorial integrity of both Iran and Iraq, as well as that of other states in the region. In keeping with our policy worldwide, we oppose the seizure of territory by force. We urge an immediate end to hostilities and a negotiated settlement. We support constructive international efforts for a peaceful solution to the conflict on the basis of each state's respect for the territorial integrity of its neighbors and each state's freedom from external coercion. In keeping with this policy we have joined with other members of the United Nations Security Council in 1980 and on July 12 of this year in resolutions calling for an end to the conflict.

Our support for the security of friendly states in the region which might feel threatened by the conflict is well known, and the United States is prepared to consult with these states on appropriate steps to support their security.

Honduras is a good and valued friend and partner of the United States. President Suazo's leadership has returned Honduras to democracy. And his government has embarked on a prompt and courageous effort to return the country to economic health.

We had a good discussion about the situation in his country and elsewhere in Central America. I told the President of our shock on learning of the recent terrorist attacks against power stations in Honduran territory, which cut off vital electricity to hospitals, water, and to other essential facilities. And faced with threats of this kind, the people of Honduras should be able to rely on their friends for help. And they can count us. The United States will provide assistance so that Hondurans can defend themselves from aggression.

President Suazo has been a strong voice for peace and democracy in Central America. He has put forward a plan to reduce tensions between states by agreement on the reduction of arms and the number of foreign advisers, and by international supervision of borders, airfields, and ports so that each country can be free of the fear of aggression from its neighbors. It's a concrete plan for peace which we fully support.

President Suazo also has explained frankly the seriously depressed economy of his country and the austerity measures he has adopted. The proposals before our Congress for the Caribbean Basin would substantially increase our ability to be of help to the people of Honduras.

I told President Suazo that I was sure the Congress would respond with strong, bipartisan support for a program that is obviously in the interest of both the United States and his country. I'm happy to say that he will be speaking to Members of the Congress on the Caribbean Basin Initiative while he is here.

Mr. President, I hope you return to Honduras confident that the United States -- it's people and its government -- remains a reliable friend and good neighbor. And that, Mr. President, is my personal pledge to you.

And I want to say to the people of the United States of this great democracy of the north that we admire and we have great affection for the two centuries in which you've been able to conserve your republic here, this system of democratic government that you have, and have been able to project it on a worldwide basis and have become an unswerving bulwark in defense of freedom, of justice, and of democracy.

With all clearness, I have expressed to President Reagan what Honduras means in these critical times for Central America, for this hemisphere, and for the very development of present international relations.

I have reaffirmed to him that Honduras, governed by a government that is born out of the will of the people -- the free will of its people -- because of its geopolitical location, represents a fundamental element in order to achieve democratic stability in Central America by peaceful means and to achieve economic progress and social change. We have wanted this to be understood completely and objectively without any reticence.

I said when I took over as President of the Republic a little less than 6 months ago, and I repeat it now: Honduras does not seek, does not wish to become the arbiter of regional expectations, anguish, and hopes. This is not our role. But we do aspire, being faithful to the principles of nonintervention and self-determination, to be a factor of the balance and of concord in the search for a common destiny for Central America. With this conviction, we respect the others with a same firmness with which we will defend, and will earn, the respect for our democratic system of life and of government.

I bring with me on my visit to the United States, members of my government that are responsible for basic areas of public affairs, as well as members of our armed forces, in order that you will understand better that the Government of Honduras is as one and is asking for cooperation and requiring understanding in its struggle in favor of participatory and pluralistic democracy, for an authentic peace for the good of the entire region, and unrestricted respect for human dignity.

We have nothing to hide, because this is the conduct that is proper for a democratic government based on popular sovereignty. But we do have a lot to say to the leaders of this country, to those who run international organizations, as to the social and economic realities of Honduras and the solution of its problems, on the operation of its republican institution, and of the danger that they might be undermined if the menace of violence is not faced with a genuine spirit of cooperation in favor of peace, of progress, and democracy.

It is for this reason that we hope for the friendship; that the friendship offered to us be frank, realistic, and effective, as is the content of our own friendship towards you. The present and the future of Honduras depend, therefore, on a combination of two basic factors: self-effort and the honest cooperation from friendly nations and the international community.

I have come to this country, then, with this spirit in order to better guide the path of our conversations and our objectives. With this spirit, I bear witness also of my faith in the mass media and the organs of information to which I attribute the virtue of being bulwarks of objective truth, of constructive criticism, of freedom, and of peace.

Section 1. Federal agencies shall provide opportunities for consultation by elected officials of those State and local governments that would provide the non-Federal funds for, or that would be directly affected by, proposed Federal financial assistance or direct Federal development.

Sec. 3. (a) The State process referred to in Section 2 shall include those where States delegate, in specific instances, to local elected officials the review, coordination, and communication with Federal agencies.

Sec. 4. The Office of Management and Budget (OMB) shall maintain a list of official State entities designated by the States to review and coordinate proposed Federal financial assistance and direct Federal development. The Office of Management and Budget shall disseminate such lists to the Federal agencies.

Sec. 5. (a) Agencies shall propose rules and regulations governing the formulation, evaluation, and review of proposed Federal financial assistance and direct Federal development pursuant to this Order, to be submitted to the Office of Management and Budget for approval.

Sec. 8. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall report to the President within two years on Federal agency compliance with this Order. The views of State and local elected officials on their experiences with these policies, along with any suggestions for improvement, will be included in the Director's report.

Initiative. It is my hope that the compromise will be supported by a large majority of the members of the committee. The bill will authorize the full amount of our request of $350 million. A total of $100 million would be authorized for El Salvador, with $20 million of this for support of that country's land reform program. While somewhat less than our original request, this $100 million will provide a vital boost to the Salvadoran economy and help to ensure continued progress in the political and economic reform in that country.

Early action on the Caribbean Basin Initiative is a high priority for my administration. It is my hope the Appropriations Committees of the House and Senate will give early and favorable consideration to this legislation. Favorable action in both Houses on the critical trade and investment intitiatives of our program is also imperative.

On behalf of the American people, I want to compliment the Senate for its wisdom in approving, so decisively, the nomination of George Shultz as our next Secretary of State. The Senate's swift action augurs well for continued cooperation between the Congress and executive branch and for strong leadership at the State Department.

Relations Committee. His articulate and convincing presentation sent a strong signal to friend and foe alike -- America is blessed with a man of exceptional character and qualifications for this vital position. I very much look forward to having George with us as a member of the team.

Foreign Relations Committee. His articulate and convincing presentation sent a strong signal to friend and foe alike. Our country is fortunate to have a man of exceptional character and qualifications for this vital position.

America's always been blessed in times such as these with citizens of stature who come forward to make certain the job gets done and done right. George Shultz follows in that tradition. He has served three previous Presidents. He has been immensely successful in his endeavors in the private sector, and he's highly respected for his academic achievements. Those who know him testify that he's a man with character and common sense, affable, yet decisive. He's a man who inspires confidence and leaves no doubt that he's capable of the vital task that we're giving him.

Over the last few years in the private sector leading one of the giants of American enterprise, he has first-hand knowledge of the dynamics of economic progress. He brings with him perhaps a deeper understanding of world economics than any previous Secretary of State, having dealt internationally with leaders of commerce as well as heads of state. This experience will, I have no doubt, add depth and meaning to the decisions that he'll be making. I look forward to his counsel.

I said in my statement to the Committee on Foreign Relations that I would muster every ounce of energy and intelligence and dedication I could and pour all of it into performance on this job, and I restate that and remake that pledge to you on this occasion, Mr. President.

Committee on Foreign Relations, of course I've been impressed with the importance and depth and difficulty of the problems that we face. But also, Mr. President, as you so characteristically do, I think it's essential that we take that coin that has ``problems'' as its label on one side and turn it over and see that on the other side is the word ``opportunities.'' And I certainly want to approach this task fully conscious and realistic about the problems, but even more, conscious of the opportunities which with creative and constructive effort we may be able to do something wonderful with. I say that with some confidence here, because I am with friends. And I feel the warmth of this gathering and that it's a family affair, and it gives me a certain sense of both humility but also a sense of support.

And in that regard I would like to thank especially the Members of the Congress, the Members of the Senate who gave me such a thorough working-over and examination -- and, I think, in a very constructive way and thorough way -- and in the end voted promptly and decisively to confirm me as Secretary of State. And I appreciate that, and I recognize it as a kind of marker that we should approach these things together and in the spirit of bipartisanship and in trying to find the broad consensus that sustains our policies abroad and has done so for so many decades.

Mr. President, in your Inaugural Address you said that no arsenal, no weapon in the world ``is so formidable as the will and moral courage of free men and women.'' I think, as you often do, you put succinctly the essence of the matter, and I say to you that I will take these words of yours as my touchstone and foundation as I approach the conduct of this great office.

In accordance with the Impoundment Control Act of 1974, I herewith report two new proposals to rescind $63.6 million in budget authority previously provided to the Congress and one revision to an existing deferral increasing the amount deferred by $61.1 million.

The rescissions include $47.4 million previously deferred for the employment and training assistance program administered by the Department of Labor, and $16.2 million for the exploration of national petroleum reserve in Alaska account in the Department of the Interior. The deferral affects the facilities and equipment account (Airport and Airway Trust Fund) in the Department of Transportation.

I am writing to you and your colleagues to enlist your support in a bipartisan effort that I feel is essential to our national security and indeed the security of the free world in the troubled decades ahead. We have begun to negotiate with the Soviet Union what we earnestly hope will be an equitable and verifiable Strategic Arms Reduction Treaty. I know that you will agree with me that we must maintain a position of unity and strength during these talks which are so vital to mankind.

Last fall I presented my Strategic Modernization Program to you for approval. I am pleased to say that since then we have taken the critical first steps needed to put the plan into action. Our initiatives for bomber modernization, strategic communications improvement, the Trident II program, and strategic defense are well under way. Implementation of our plan for ICBM modernization, however, is not keeping pace with the overall program. I believe that we need positive and prompt action to correct that situation.

As you know, however, the Senate failed to authorize the production funds needed to begin the production of the M - X missile itself. I cannot over-emphasize to you the serious negative impact this can have on our negotiations with the Soviets and our modernization program. Failure to authorize these funds will delay the program a year and increase the cost. Thus, it is essential that the House act to approve the production funds and that this action prevail in conference.

I believe that we must make a solid commitment this year to deploy the M - X missile. We simply cannot allow the land-based leg of the triad to remain vulnerable. We must also show our Allies that we can make the hard decisions necessary to modernize our strategic nuclear capacity -- decisions that promise to have great influence on the pace of ongoing Theater Nuclear Force modernization initiatives within NATO. And while it is my intention that the M - X not be a ``bargaining chip'' in the START negotiations, we need to secure the powerful leverage that a commitment to produce the M - X would provide as we begin effective arms reduction talks with the Soviets. Finally, we need to capitalize on the sizeable investment of some $4.5 billion that has already been made in the M - X program. These goals can only be achieved if decisive action is taken now to proceed with M - X production and deployment.

One of my primary goals in restoring our defenses is to improve our capability to deploy forces rapidly to defend United States interests. Our airlift program as outlined in the FY 83 Budget will reduce the critical mobility shortfall.

The Congressionally Mandated Mobility Study (CMMS) recommended we increase our air cargo capability by about 25 million ton-miles per day, including at least 10 million ton-miles per day in ``outsize'' cargo capacity to accommodate critical combat equipment that will not fit on any existing aircraft except the C - 5. It is of paramount importance that, when needed, outsize equipment arrive in a timely manner and in a usable configuration. Reassembly of critical components at a forward staging area, as required using commercial aircraft, would limit our combat capability. Moreover, procuring commercial carriers would also require the expenditure of additional funds for modifications that would still not yield the needed outsize cargo capability.

In summary, I hope you will agree that the Department of Defense should not be required to substitute commercial aircraft that do not meet our needs. There are no savings if what we buy will not do the job that needs to be done. Therefore, I urge you to reject the commercial aircraft proposal and support our airlift budget as submitted.

The President. Well, I don't know whether I'd have the nerve to use that word ``mastery'' as you did. But I had 8 years experience as Governor of California in which for about 7 of those 8 years both houses of the legislature were of the opposing party, and we managed to get a great many reforms in -- the welfare reforms that were so tremendously successful, things of that kind. But I came here with the same idea, that we're coequal branches of the government.

They have got their problems, and it is a case of common sense and consultation. And I've had 11 formal meetings with the leadership of the House and the Senate here. I've gone to the Hill 9 times myself, and I understand that for 18 months that's kind of a record.

Mr. Duke. Senator Baker, the Republican leader, said that you have an instinctive feel for how the legislative branch works, and others who've come down to the White House say that you've also capitalized on your charm and your personality and your persistence. And I am wondering, did acting give you the training and the skills to sell your program to Congress?

Baker and to Representative Bob Michel, the Minority Leader in the House, for the great cooperation and the help that I've had from them, the masterful job they've done in those two positions that they hold as leader of the Senate and Minority Leader of the House.

Mr. Duke. Well, you go beyond that, though, Mr. President, because, when you talk to people on the Hill, there's a common refrain that comes through. They all say, we go down to the White House, and Ronald Reagan is a terribly charming man. Is there a politics of affability which has served you well? Is that a real skill in getting things done?

The President. Well, I don't know whether it's a skill or not, but I like people. And I certainly don't meet them with a chip on my shoulder. I think of it as the President is the only one in town who's elected to represent all the people. Their problems are that, as Senators, they are elected, yes, to represent the people of this country, but, also, to have in mind the particular interests of their State and the problems of their State. A Representative, again, represents all the people, but also has specific things that he's responsible for with regard to his congressional district.

So, I know that. And I know that they, too, have problems. And these problems have to be reconciled. And sometimes it's going to weigh on them that something that they might be able to feel might have some benefit nationwide, but would be at a cost to their district or their State, that they can't support, and so you try to reconcile all of those viewpoints.

Mr. Duke. And that's difficult, because we know that there's a great deal of hypocrisy which goes on at all times. I mean, we know that Members will get up on the floor, and they will do a great deal of grandstanding, and they'll talk about cutting Federal spending. And then they'll be running down to the White House or running to some of the agencies, demanding that ``no cuts be made in my tobacco subsidies or my sugar subsidies,'' or the dam project that you want for back home, additionally. How do you deal with all that?

The President. Well, again, as I say, it's one in which you -- I can understand their responsibilities for those particular areas or projects of their district or State. And then I have to weigh that against the advantage or disadvantage for the whole country. And if it's one in which they must lose, that the national benefit outweighs the local benefit, then it's just a case of presenting that to them. And you'd be surprised how many times they recognize that the overall national good has to come first.

Mr. Duke. Mr. President, I think one of the things which surprised us a great deal in Washington was that you turned out to be a far better politician than a lot of us thought you would be. And people will tell me that you have a gritty, competitive side to your personality. Do you enjoy the attack and counterattack that characterizes so much of the warfare between Capitol Hill and the White House?

But in the last analysis, you have to come down on the side of what you feel inside is right, and then you do your utmost to convince someone who's in an adversary position at the time why you feel you're right and why you feel you must take the position that you do and have what you've asked for.

Mr. Duke. When you get into battles with Congress, obviously there's a matter of timing -- when do you call Senator X who's been wavering; when do you make the practical compromise; how do you decide that? How involved do you yourself get in the legislative strategy of the White House?

The President. Well, I must be honest and confess that it would be impossible with all that's on my plate to know the timing of things of that kind. And so, there I depend on, again, this group in the White House to tell me, because -- in other words, is something coming up in committee; is it coming to the floor; is this the time now; and that it's the best time to make the call before something comes to a vote. So, I depend on them for that.

Mr. Duke. But do you feel that the experience you've gained as Governor of California, in dealing with the California Legislature, has enabled you to have this sense of timing, to know when to move, when to maneuver?

Mr. Duke. It is not totally, 100-percent favorable from the Hill standpoint, Mr. President. While everybody does talk about your affability and the fact that they come down -- they love to come down to see you, and they love the stories which you spin -- you also get another side from some Members who say that you're not always strong on substance, that sometimes you're out of touch, and that sometimes you have too simplistic a view of things. How do you see yourself?

The President. Well, I know there are criticisms of that kind. I don't particularly admit that the criticisms are justified. I think now and then to use an anecdote saves a lot of words sometimes to be able to tell something that illustrates what it is we're trying to do. If you have some example, for example, of bureaucratic dillydallying or repetitive things that aren't needed and you can tell that example, it saves several paragraphs of just trying to reason with someone in explaining what it is that you're trying to correct.

And I find, though, it's not only that you come down at the moment of consultation -- for example, something to do with foreign policy right now and the act that requires consultation with the Congress with regard to -- well, my announcement recently of saying that in principle, if it was essential to bring peace to the Middle East and to Lebanon, the use of American troops in a multinational force. But the other day, I didn't wait -- they hadn't been invited, so there is nothing to go to the Congress about -- but since the word was out and was in the press and had been leaked that this had happened, I had a very fine meeting with the leadership of the Congress on this in explaining exactly where we were and so forth, in advance, a totally informal meeting that would precede, if the need arises, when I must go to them formally. And I understand that some of them from both parties went out and said it was one of the best meetings of that kind they'd ever had.

Mr. Duke. But would you concede, Mr. President, by nature that you are the kind of political leader who sees the broad, general picture and is not that interested in the specifics or the detail of a lot of legislative matters?

The President. No, I think I brought that from the experience in California, that I know the importance of the detail. My job, of course, is to sell -- if there is a dispute there -- is to sell the overall goal that we're trying to achieve. And so I center on that.

Mr. Duke. There are also complaints about the administration's managerial style, Mr. President. In talking with many Republicans at the Capitol in recent days, I find a common thread running through what they say. Most of them say we don't have that much quarrel with the President himself, but they do say that your agents and the administration's representatives on the Hill frequently are too arrogant, that they don't return phone calls, that they don't pay attention to the advice given from Capitol Hill, that they're insensitive to the political needs of Members of Congress. Are you aware of that?

The President. I don't think it's true. I think anyone can find some incident or some oversight or something and complain about it. But I have to again say that I became accustomed in the 8 years in California, and already here, that there is a tendency to invent a palace guard and pretend that the President is being protected from the palace guard, and therefore is not aware of these things.

I know that in the hectic pace that now and then something can slip by. I have not heard anyone -- if there is anyone on our side that's being arrogant, I certainly want to know about it. But I don't know of anyone that is, and I have not had that complaint come to me.

Now, I get the summary of all of the mail also, and it's a considerable reading problem, the congressional mail. And so that isn't ignored. And I see all those letters that are written -- and some with an individual or particular problem or some with a group of Representatives or Senators -- that's all put on my desk.

Mr. Duke. Mr. President, there's also the matter of comity between the legislative and the executive branches -- the bond of respect. And some of the Republicans at the Hill say there is a problem in that they will negotiate deals with the Democrats, and then White House officials and others will come along and undermine those deals. And this makes it much more difficult, that it affects their credibility at the Capitol.

The President. That, I think, is a part of the whole process that goes on. Let's take the economic program a year ago in the combination of the tax program and the budget reductions. We didn't get all we wanted, and we had to -- in addition to not getting everything we asked for, we also had to take some things that we hadn't asked for. Now, that's a case of in the give and take in the legislature, of what they can get. Well, then, still I'm a party to that also, and I have to speak up, or my representatives, if there is a price that we feel is too high. I can't accept something that is totally contrary to the principle that we're trying to obtain in that program.

And the same was true of this most recent budget bill. That was not the bill that I would have submitted -- and there were seven versions on the floor at one time, most of which were unacceptable, because they wouldn't do the job, and they wouldn't come close to the goal we're trying to achieve. But they did evolve one that I could call back and say, yes, this one I support.

Now, I'm sure that someone, say, on our side who has negotiated something and been willing to give to get something in there, can be a little irked if I don't agree that he was paying the right price.

The President. If they're budget-busters, yes. I said that. They've passed a resolution, a budget resolution. I realize that that must be followed by appropriation bills. If they ignore the ceilings that have been put in the budget resolution, which they can do, send an appropriation that would, if passed, have the budget go way beyond the bounds that were set, then I have to veto it.

The President. Well, if they only pick up 10, then we've won a great victory, because if you look back in history, the first off-year election the party that is out of power in the White House normally picks up about 40 seats. That's just been traditional. And so you start from behind with this bielection that is coming up. And I'm just -- I'd like to pick up some more. I'd like to have more Representatives in there than we have. But I understand I would be bucking tradition and history. So, when you use that figure 10, that would be only about a fourth as many as traditionally you're supposed to lose.

The President. [Laughing] I'll tell you, Tip and I, we get along fine. There's nothing personal in our contest. And, actually, there's nothing really political. It is philosophical. Tip really and sincerely and honestly believes in the philosophy -- which I once believed in and found I could no longer follow -- of taxing and spending and government trying to do things that I think are beyond government's proper province. And he sincerely believes that. So, it's a battle of philosophies between us. But, as Tip said, come 6 o'clock, we're friends.

Mr. Duke. Mr. President, as you sit here every day grappling with the affairs of state, do you ever wish that you had run for the Senate from California as you once considered? Do you ever wish that you were up there instead of being here?

Congress when I was a Democrat and -- by fellow party members -- and said, no, I liked the career I had. I never in my life intended or believed that I would ever have a desire to run for office. And it was in 1965, after the 1964 election, when our party in California was badly shattered, that people began pressing me to run for the Governorship. And it got to the place that neither Nancy or I could sleep. They kept emphasizing that they felt that this was the only way that we could pull the party together and that I could win.

And I have to confess something. I honestly believe that when I finally gave in, very reluctantly, and said yes, I really hadn't thought beyond winning the election. And it dawned on me after I'd said yes that if I won the election, I was going to have a job for several years.

Rather than raising taxes across-the-board, the bill focuses on improvements in taxpayer compliance, the removal of obsolete incentives, and the elimination of unintended abuses. In fact, more than three-fourths of the increased revenues will come from increased compliance and base broadening measures.

I am particularly pleased the bill preserves the individual rate reductions enacted last year. These provisions are essential to ease the burden on individual taxpayers and to restore long-term health and vitality to our economy.

Although I do have some reservations about a few items, it is a good and balanced bill which I can endorse. I know you are aware of my views but I hope you will assure your colleagues of my support for the bill.

Yesterday I signed a supplemental appropriations bill, H.R. 6685, which will continue funding for numerous Federal agencies and programs which need the money on an urgent basis. While I do not believe this bill goes far enough to reduce spending, it does represent significant improvement over two previous proposals.

Since last April, I have vetoed two supplemental funding bills because appropriations were far too high -- H.R. 5922 and H.R. 6682. Both of these vetoes were sustained, and in the wake of these vetoes, the Congress went back to work and slimmed down spending plans. Altogether, this process of vetoes and reconsideration by the Congress has saved the taxpayers more than $3.6 billion.

While we still have a long way to go before reining in the budget monster, the restraint and compromise in this bill bring us one step closer to control. Under the circumstances, I consider this action a sound economic measure and a victory for the American taxpayer over runaway Federal spending.

Six weeks ago when I visited our friends and allies in Europe, I found a warm response to this nation's call for a global campaign for freedom. Our straightforward criticism of totalitarian regimes and our willingness to promote the ideals of individual liberty and representative government struck a responsive chord among Europeans and, I believe, many other millions of people around the globe. Yet, even as I expressed our confidence that the ideals of freedom and the aspiration of self-government would ultimately triumph over those who wish to subordinate the individual to the state, I was confronted with the hard evidence of just how difficult this struggle will be.

In Berlin, a gray, grim monument of steel and stone stands as a reminder of those whose self-proclaimed goal is the domination of every nation on Earth. The tragedy of our time is that this goal has been so widely achieved. Throughout the Baltic States, Eastern Europe and Asia, now in Africa and Latin America, nation after nation has fallen prey to an ideology that seeks to stifle all that's good about the human spirit, even as it attempts to justify Communist rule.

It hasn't meant, as promised, a new classless society or the dictatorship of the proletariat. It has, instead, meant forced labor and mass imprisonment, famine and massacre, the police state and the knock on the door in the night. And it's also meant the growth of the largest military empire in the history of the world, an empire whose territorial ambition has sparked a wasteful arms race and whose ideological obsession remains the single greatest peril to peace among the nations.

In 1959 the Congress of the United States, spurred on by the ruthless and bloody attack in 1956 on the free Hungarian Government, first decided to commemorate the heroism and fortitude of those living in nations in which the right of self-determination has been denied. Today, in this Captive Nations proclamation, and at this first public signing of this proclamation, we keep faith with this tradition and with those to whom it is intended to give hope and moral substance.

Today we, as a nation, also remind ourselves of the preciousness of our own freedom, renew our sacred resolve that someday all the people of the Earth will enjoy the God-given rights of free men and women. We renew especially our hope that those countries of Eastern Europe, Asia, Africa, and Latin America now under Communist domination will someday regain their national sovereignty and, again, enjoy the dignity of their own national traditions.

Since that first Captive Nations resolution passed by the Congress, we've seen equally distressing examples of the assault on the human spirit. The independent people of Afghanistan are giving their lives resisting aggression of the bloodiest kind, and, again, in Poland, the suppression of the rights of Polish workers, the imprisonment of the leaders of Solidarity. All of this, sustained and directed by Soviet military might, is another tragic chapter in the quest of the Polish people for freedom and national sovereignty.

We in the West must do more than merely decry attacks on human freedom. The nature of this struggle is ultimately one that will be decided not by military might, but by spiritual resolve and confidence in the future of freedom, especially in the face of the decaying and crumbling dreams of Marxism-Leninism.

Lenin advocated resorting to all sorts of stratagems, artifices, maneuvers, illegal methods, evasions, and subterfuges. Well, we in the West have at our command weapons far more potent than deceit and subterfuge. We have the power of truth -- truth that can reach past the stone and steel walls of the police state and create campaigns for freedom and coalitions for peace in Communist countries.

Well, these leaders went on to say, ``We appeal to you for the same appreciation of the power of ideas and the effectiveness of broadcasting as their carrier. In the long run it may prove to be the least expensive and the most effective option at your disposal.'' Well, today let me make it clear that we intend to move forward consistent with budgetary requirements with a program to modernize our primary means of international communication, our international radio system.

I made to the American people during the campaign, a pledge deeply felt at the time and deeply felt today. This plan of modernization for a relatively modest expenditure over a number of years will make it easier for millions of people living under Communist rule to hear the truth about the struggle for the world going on today between the forces of totalitarianism and freedom.

The sad fact is that the Voice of America, Radio Free Europe, and Radio Liberty have been neglected for many years. Their equipment is old and deteriorating, their programing resources strained. Little has been done to counter the jamming that has intensified in recent years. The Soviets, I think you should know, spend three to four times more to jam foreign broadcasts than we spend to transmit them. And somebody -- we can only speculate as to their identity -- perpetrated a devastating bombing of Radio Free Europe and Radio Liberty's headquarters last year.

I want to extend my appreciation to the Congress for agreeing recently to reorganize the management of these international broadcasting channels. And I especially want to urge them today to approve the funds so desperately needed to bring to the people of Cuba, through Radio Marti, the truth about the struggle between freedom and totalitarianism.

Communist world, those who are willing to violate flagrantly the Helsinki agreements or even to engage in terrorist violence to stifle the truth -- for the events in Poland during the last 2 years show that when given air time and a little breathing space, the truth becomes a powerful weapon, one which even the most repressive police states must fear.

We're confident that in Poland, in Afghanistan, and in all the captive nations the forces of totalitarianism have won only a temporary, fleeting victory. Against the appeal of democratic ideas, against the hunger and thirst of men and women who would be free, the threat of martial law, imprisonment, or any of the other artful forms of repression can never win lasting triumph.

The love of liberty, the fire of freedom burns on in Poland just as it burns on among all the peoples of the captive nations. To the leaders of Solidarity, to the people of Poland, to all those who are denied freedom, we send a message today: Your cause is not lost. You are not forgotten.

During the past year, we have witnessed another tragic demonstration of the failure of tyranny to compete with the principles of freedom. The imposition of martial law in Poland on December 13, 1981, served as a bitter reminder that the quest for freedom and self-determination can only be restrained by force. It clearly demonstrated the moral bankruptcy of a system which has been unable to earn the support of its population after more than 35 years in power.

The same repression imposed on the Polish people is evidenced in various ways in other captive nations dominated by foreign military power and an alien Marxist-Leninist ideology. The brutal suppression of sovereignty in Afghanistan and the bondage of the captive peoples of Eastern Europe continue. Among the oppressed we must also count the peoples of many nationalities within the Soviet Union itself; they are victims of long decades of repression.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 19th day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

But for to long, their voices have been ignored. But no army on Earth can stop an idea whose time has come, and our time is now. We don't come as a special-interest group pleading for personal gain; we're messengers of a united people demanding constitutional change.

President Coolidge said, ``There is no dignity quite so impressive and no independence so important as living within your means.'' But then, without quite knowing how it happened, we began surrendering to a siren song that was called ``the new economics.'' Budgets became chronically unbalanced. Inflation, we were told, was good for us -- necessary to prosperity. And the growing debt was no problem, we were told. We owed it to ourselves.

So, we've only balanced the budget once in the last 22 years; the national debt more than doubled in just the last 10. It was ready to break the trillion-dollar barrier when we took office. The debt prorates out to $18,000 for each and every family in the United States. Borrowing to finance the annual interest on that debt, which is greater than the entire national budget just 22 years ago, more than a hundred billion dollars, crowds out investment and keeps interest rates too high.

Since 1960 Federal spending has increased nearly 700 percent. That's much faster than our ability to pay for it. This spending was excused in the name of fairness and compassion. But it turned out that fairness and compassion also meant local governments losing control of their communities; working people, small business, and pensioners being hit by record interest rates, inflation, and taxation. And that golden era of growth that we once knew in this land gradually slipped from our grasp.

While we were doing all this, did we forget the function of government is not to confer happiness upon us? The Declaration of Independence does not say, life, liberty and happiness. It says, ``life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness.'' There are some things that are left to us to do.

Now, these are not Republican or Democratic principles. They're American principles, as important today as they were 200 years ago, when our ancestors were fighting a revolution so that we could be free to work out happiness for ourselves.

Families stand at the center of society. They're the vanguards of America's future. Yet, how can families and family values flourish when big government, with its power to tax, inflate, and regulate, has absorbed their wealth, usurped their rights, and too often crushed their spirit? This nation's greatest transfer program is not welfare; it's the annual turnover of you and your neighbor's income to Uncle Sam.

Well, you know, our administration has the strange idea that you all weren't born just to help government grow fatter. As a matter of fact, we promised to make a new beginning, to build together a brighter future filled with opportunity and hope. Together with a bipartisan coalition, we've cut the growth of Federal spending nearly in half. Imagine how much worse this expected deficit would be if we had permitted spending to keep shooting up at its 1980 rate of 17 percent a year.

Another of our ideas was a reform that I'm mighty proud of, an historic program of incentives for savings and investment with a 25-percent personal tax rate reduction for every American who pays taxes. Now, some critics complain, your tax cut is too big, that it costs government too much. Well, this may be a shock to them, but that money isn't the government's to begin with. It belongs to you, the people who earn it, and it's about time you were allowed to keep a bigger share of your own earnings.

You know, the plain truth is, our tax cut actually does little more than offset the biggest tax increases in our history passed by many of these same complainers back in 1977. We didn't get that trillion-dollar debt because you're not taxed enough; we got that debt because government has spent too much.

Maybe some of you are older to remember a gentleman named Will Rogers. Will Rogers once said, ``I see a great deal of talk from Washington about lowering the taxes. I hope they get 'em lowered down enough so people can afford to pay 'em.'' [Laughter] Well, that's what preserving the third year of the tax cut and indexing are all about. Eliminate them, and low- and middle-income earners lose nearly 40 percent of their entire tax reduction.

Committee meets these objectives, and I urge its enactment. It is only by reducing tax rates and slowing price increases that Americans can finally have more money to spend, save, and help the economy grow.

America moving again, but not by taxing the American people into the poorhouse. We've only begun to wean ourselves from the long misery of overtaxing, overspending, and the great myth that our national nanny always knows best. We should go further in reducing tax rates and making the whole system more fair and simple for everyone. But before we can do that we must correct and control a budget system that has run amok.

Time and again the good sense of the people is trampled by powerful special interests lobbying to spend and spend and spend. The Congress passed legislation in '78 requiring the budget to be in balance by fiscal year 1981, but just like Rodney Dangerfield, that legislation didn't get no respect.

Now, of course, we have to recognize all balanced budgets aren't created equal. The crucial question is how do we balance the budget? I don't think you want us to balance the budget by weaseling out of the first decent tax program since John Kennedy's tax cut nearly 20 years ago.

There is a better way. Balance the budget by bringing to heel a Federal establishment which has taken too much power from the States, too much liberty with the Constitution, and too much money from the people.

The growth in tax revenues could not exceed the prior year's growth in national income. This would be a limitation against reaching a balanced budget by simply sending the taxpayers a bill for whatever the deficit might be.

The Congress would have to make tough choices to control so-called uncontrollables. And believe me, that's what this skeptical country is waiting to see. The public could see who's hiding behind the rhetoric of balanced budgets, at the same time they're unwilling to make the cuts in spending to bring them about.

Now, this doesn't mean, as some contend, that the Congress would be bound by a fiscal straitjacket, never able to plan a deficit. It could do so by going on record with a 60-percent vote of the full membership of both Houses. This would be an important discipline.

Now, ratification should not be difficult. Thirty-one States have already undertaken a separate initiative in favor of an amendment. And surveys show four out of five Americans want a constitutional check on red-ink spending. My mail reflects this strong support. Republicans and Democrats alike are ready for a goalline stand against big spending, even if that means pruning some popular programs.

Balancing the Federal budget will also bring lasting benefits to State and local governments. Once the Federal Government can no longer preempt State and local revenues, then those governments closest to the people can better fulfill their mission envisioned by the Founding Fathers -- they can become the true laboratories of democracy in the United States.

I'm encouraged by the spirit of solidarity of the 65 responsible Democrats in the House and 17 in the Senate who are cosponsoring this amendment. They know this is no partisan issue. It is the people's crusade, and today we urge the Congress: Let their will be carried out.

You know, now there are some say that it is dangerous to push for dramatic reform in a period of crisis. Well, I believe it's more dangerous not to. We may always have a crisis of one kind or another. We may not always have another opportunity.

Others insist that a constitution should not embody economic theory. Well, I've got news for them. A wise and frugal government which does not take from the mouth of labor the bread it has earned is not economic theory. The integrity to stand for sound money, an end to deficit spending, and eventual retirement of the national debt is not economic theory. Those principles are the very heart of a tried and proven system -- our system, the system which created the greatest outpouring of wealth in all history and distributed that wealth more widely among the people than anywhere else in the world. It's a pity that some seem to have forgotten that.

Then there are elitists who resent Americans like yourselves getting involved in the serious business of changing the Constitution. But our Constitution was not written to protect the government from its people. It was written to protect the people from their government.

I've told on several occasions, you know, there are a lot of constitutions in the world -- haven't read all of them, but have read a lot of them -- and what is the great difference that makes ours so unique? In most all of those other constitutions, it says, we, the government, permit the people the following things -- they can do this or that. Ours says, we, the people, permit the government to do the following things, and no others.

George Washington told us, in his Farewell Address: ``The basis of our political system is the right of the people to make and to alter their constitutions of government.'' It's been said that nothing will ruin a country if the people, themselves, undertake its safety; and nothing can save it if they leave that safety in any hands but their own.

Fellow citizens, isn't it time to put the safety of our beloved country back into your hands where it belongs? Isn't it time to mobilize the great American lobby and make government understand its job is to wipe out deficits and not let deficits wipe us out?

Our purpose is to provide, within a system of laws, the ultimate in dignity and individual opportunity to every American, without exception. Let us accept our responsibilities. Let history record that, when America needed us most, we didn't cut and run.

From 1962 until the present, Mr. Wallis has been affiliated with the University of Rochester, first as president and chief executive officer and professor of economics and statistics, and since 1970, as chancellor and trustee. Concurrently, in 1978, he become professor emeritus and honorary trustee.

Over the past 20 years, Mr. Wallis has been elected to the board of directors of nine major U.S. corporations, including Bausch & Lomb, Macmillan, Eastman Kodak, Metropolitan Life Insurance, and Standard Oil of Ohio. In addition, Mr. Wallis holds several trusteeships and has served the academic, civic, and philanthropic communities in numerous capacities. He has authored 10 books and monographs and frequently has published scholarly articles on economics and public and international policy.

Dr. Schneider is presently the Associate Director for National Security and International Affairs for the Office of Management and Budget. Dr. Schneider is an economist and defense analyst and was formerly a staff associate of the Subcommittee on Defense of the Committee on Appropriations in the U.S. House of Representatives (1977). Prior to joining the House of Representatives staff, he was a U.S. Senate staff member and a professional staff member of the Hudson Institute. At the Hudson Institute he contributed to studies on strategic forces, Soviet affairs, theater nuclear force operations, and arms control. Dr. Schneider is the author of several works on defense policy.

Nancy and I are especially pleased to welcome you to the White House, our national home, this afternoon. I realize that many of you have broken training to be here, and we appreciate that. We ask, however, that, if you feel a sudden urge to run windsprints, just avoid the Rose Garden.

No one belongs on these grounds or in these halls more than you. Someone once said that youth was America's oldest tradition, but I would amend that to be youth striving for excellence. You live that tradition. You've worn your country's colors in contests around the globe. Setting world records and winning world championships, you've made your countrymen proud. And in you, we've looked for courage, excellence, and honor. And in you, we have found it.

Well, on behalf of all Americans, I want to thank John and each of these athletes here for the inspiration that they've given us, on snow as well as on the courts. If every American strives for individual excellence, we can find it together as a nation. Watching you, we renew our faith in ourselves and our country.

It's a thrill to have the Davis Cup here at the White House and to celebrate with your tennis and skiing accomplishments. Your country's very proud of you. And we thank you for the honor you bring us, wish you luck in the future, and leave you with a very American challenge, that you continue to live up to the best and the highest standards that you know.

I hope that your presence here today assures you that we do not take the Hispanic community for granted. I'd be less than candid if I didn't admit that there's an election coming up and that we want to see the healthy bipartisan trend in the Hispanic community continue. But at the same time I don't want anyone to get the idea that we've adopted the tactic used by the other party of just rediscovering blocs of voters every election year. That has not been and will not be our way.

Americans of Hispanic descent have been playing a major role in this administration and have been doing so since day one. Recently at the United Nations I talked about the need for deeds, not words. Well, the record shows that while we may not have matched the rhetoric of the other party, we've more than matched them when it comes to deeds. We've brought more Hispanic Americans into the executive branch at higher levels than any previous administration.

By the end of our first year, there were 17 in policymaking positions requiring Senate confirmation. Now, that's almost twice as many as there were after the first year of the previous administration. Of course, we didn't stop at the end of the first year. We've gone right on. We've continued to make significant Hispanic appointments.

Veterans Administration. That name should be familiar to you -- the man who served the longest as a POW in Vietnam. And I was very proud and happy to meet him upon his first arrival home in California. Elizabeth Flores Burkhardt, when confirmed by the Senate, will be a member of the National Credit Union Administration. And Tony Gallegos has been confirmed as a Commissioner of the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission.

Closer to home we've also brought Hispanic Americans onto the White House staff as never before. Some of you may already know this -- news has a way of leaking out around here. I sometimes think that I'll just start talking to the chandeliers and see how quickly I'll find it in the paper. [Laughter] I'm appointing a new Special Assistant to the President for Public Liaison to be our outreach person to the Hispanic community, and his name is Henry Zuniga, who has been doing a fine job. And I have the utmost confidence -- and evidently you do too -- that he'll continue to be an indispensable link between us, bringing your concerns and ideas into the inner circle of the White House as well as taking some of our concerns out to you.

I don't want to belabor this point, but there are many fine Hispanic Americans throughout the executive branch and on the White House staff. Velma Montoya was appointed just a few weeks ago to a major policy formulation position in the White House. Many of you know Rafael Capo, who is one of Vice President Bush's closest advisers. And two weeks ago Susan Alvarado was made Vice President Bush's chief assistant for legislative affairs. And certainly you're all aware of Diana Lozano, who plays a major role coordinating our outreach program, not only to Hispanics but to other groups of citizens with special concerns -- women's organizations, veterans groups, other minorities, and conservative groups.

But let me point out. These Hispanic members of the administration are not picked because of their ethnic background. They were chosen because they're skilled, intelligent people who have a contribution to make. They just happened to be the best people for the jobs that we asked them to do. Perhaps that's one difference between our approach and that of the other side. They talk about equality, but we believe in it.

Now, a tough battle is going to be fought in the Hispanic community this election year. The words get pretty thick out there at election time, and the demagogues get all revved up. So today, assuming that you are on our side, I thought I'd give you some ammunition for the coming months.

First, it's widely recognized that the basic values that we spoke about in the last campaign and long before that are values identified closely with Americans of Hispanic descent. With this in mind, our political compatibility on many issues is more than just a coincidence. We seek to reaffirm basic institutions which during the last decade have come under severe attack.

Knowing this, we believe, for example, our tuition tax credit plan should have a natural appeal to you who feel so strongly about the moral values maintained by this country's religious school systems. Already many Hispanics send their children to these independent schools in great numbers, and our plan will give them some relief from the double taxation of supporting both private and public schools.

We have no reason to hang our heads on issues that may be of special concern to your community. Perhaps you can remind others that this administration did support the voting rights bill. We've developed a new rapport with Mexico, a rapport that's based on mutual respect, that is better than at any time in the history of our two proud nations.

The issues I've talked about are of course concern to all Americans. The fact that they may have particular appeal to Hispanics only suggest that you're darned good Americans, and we should never forget it. This has been no secret in the military, where Hispanic Americans have served with exceptional courage and valor, as I mentioned with connection with Commander Alvarez a moment ago. And they've achieved a memorable record for courage.

Just last year I was honored to present Roy Benavidez with this country's highest military award for his service in Vietnam, the Congressional Medal of Honor. I don't know why there'd been such a delay in his receiving that medal, but when we discovered that it had not been awarded -- and I think maybe some of you might like to hear why. That medal is only given for service above and beyond the call of duty.

This former farmboy from down in Texas was working at headquarters when some helicopters came in all shot up, their crews wounded, from trying to rescue an American patrol surrounded totally by the Viet Cong. And he, just on his own, climbed into one of the outgoing helicopters that was to go out and make another attempt to rescue these men.

He dropped from the first helicopter that came in before it touched the ground, made his way 75 yards under fire to the location of the surrounded patrol. There were only eight of them left alive -- all wounded. One by one he picked them up and under fire continued to carry them out to the helicopters that would come in and land to get them. At one point they had men on a helicopter, and the pilot of the helicopter was killed as it started to take off. It crashed back to Earth. He took them out of that helicopter and to another helicopter. He was shot four times while he was doing all this.

Finally, bringing out the eighth man with four bullet wounds in himself, he was attacked hand to hand by a Vietnamese with a rifle and bayonet. And I have to tell you in his own words -- he put the wounded man down and then tried to get his own bayonet out of his belt. But in the meantime, he told me that they're told how to ward off a bayonet with their arm if they can, but he said you don't really think about that. So he grabbed the other man's bayonet under his arm -- and his arm is totally disabled now from the sawing the man did trying to get that bayonet out. But when he told me about this particular incident on our way over to the medal presentation, Roy said to me, said, ``That's when I got mad.'' [Laughter] And he did. And he finished off his assailant and picked up the wounded man and made it out.

And then at the presentation over at the Pentagon we had brought back as many of the eight men as we could get that he had rescued to be present as guests at that ceremony. And you would have puddled up as I did to stand there beside him and see those men when they came to him in the receiving line, to see them throw their arms around him, to see their tears, and to see them thank him for saving their lives. And then they turned to me, some of them, and tell me what their life was like and how much they owed to Roy Benavidez, master sergeant.

I could go on all day about this, but I know you've got a full schedule ahead of you -- and they have some other things for me to do. So, I want to just thank you again for being here and for representing a proud part of our American culture and heritage.

The President. Well, of course we all know why we're here. And I think it's wonderful that so many of you would join in what is a most, I think, wonderful and worthy endeavor, the idea being to start a foundation. It'll be named the Brady Foundation in honor of Jim Brady. And, of course, the purpose is to have a permanent foundation for individuals who have happen to them what happened to Jim in attempts of the same kind, from the past and for the future.

So, there is much more to be said for it than that. This thing -- and we -- I think all of us are going to do everything we can to see that it succeeds and that it does become permanently established and able to make provision for those who paid a price and who need its help.

The foundation is a public foundation established to provide assistance to any needy individual wounded or killed in an assassination attempt on any senior Federal official, Presidential candidate, or family member of the President or Vice President of the United States. Assistance would also be provided to the victim's family. The foundation also is authorized to create certain scholarships as a tribute to such victims or to encourage young people to enter government service.

Our air must be fit to breathe and our water fit to drink. We require standards of environmental quality that will protect the most vulnerable -- the very young and the very old, the infirm and the yet to be born. We care about our parks, our wilderness, our wetlands and our endangered species.

We have already made great progress toward ensuring a healthy environment. Our general course has been charted with the passage of numerous Federal and state environmental laws. Our state governments and many localities have strengthened their capabilities for dealing with environmental issues. Many of our industries are coming to view the generation of wastes as lost profit potential. It is now time to make sure that the paths we have chosen are the best ones. It is time to review the environmental regulations and to make certain we are doing the most efficient job possible. Certainly we can afford a clean environment, but we must work for it in the most creative and effective way.

To operate more efficiently, I believe we must take two major initiatives. First, we must create a more innovative and flexible regulatory and economic framework in which our environmental programs operate. Regulations should complement, not stifle market forces in determining the most cost-effective methods of proper environmental management.

Second, I believe that environmental decisions should be brought closer to the people most affected by them. Particularly in the past decade, the various state and local governments have substantially improved their capability for dealing with environmental issues. Therefore, we should increase our reliance upon that expertise. The Federal government should continue to establish environmental quality standards, assure the enforcement of such standards, help to resolve environmental issues of a regional and interstate character, and continue to develop the scientific and technical information necessary to carry out environmental protection programs at all levels of government.

Working together, we can make the necessary changes to reach our environmental goals, and at the same time use our resources wisely with the help of the free market. As we do, we will create a healthful environment in a healthy economy.

Cypriot President Kyprianou and on June 9 with Turkish Cypriot leader Denktash. These meetings provided a further opportunity for useful discussion of the status of and developments in the intercommunal talks.

The United Nations continues to pay close attention to the Cyprus problem. In his June 1, 1982 report to the Security Council on Cyprus, a copy of which is attached, the Secretary General reviewed recent developments and emphasized that ``the intercommunal talks continue to represent the best available method for pursuing a concrete and effective negotiating process.'' He noted that negotiations are proceeding at ``a deliberate but reasonable pace'' and while major substantial problems are still to be resolved, ``they are being systematically reconsidered, reformulated and reduced.'' The Secretary General also noted the prospective need for devising solutions to unresolved constitutional and territorial issues and urged the communities to give ``earnest thought'' to the requirements for an agreement. We fully endorse the efforts and observations of the Secretary General and his Special Representative on Cyprus, Ambassador Hugo Gobbi.

I am most gratified by today's House vote approving funds for production of the MX missile. This strong, bipartisan action demonstrates clearly the commitment of the Congress to improving America's defenses, thereby providing important support for Ambassador [Edward L.] Rowny in his negotiations with the Soviet Union on strategic arms reductions. I look forward to working with House and Senate conferees to ensure final passage of the MX authorization.

I assure you I'm not going to keep you from your dinner long or your festivities long, but I am delighted to be with you this evening and to congratulate all the Caribbean Basin Coalition members. You've come up with a wonderful way for all of us to express our support for strengthening Caribbean Basin economies.

Last February, in this same great Hall of the Americas, I spoke of my conviction that this hemisphere was a special place with a special destiny. The Caribbean Basin Initiative was launched to help our neighbors by the sea, some two dozen countries of the Caribbean Basin, to reach their full potential. We're talking about assistance to support a modern economy, but also, trade, investment, and commercial financing to develop the magic of the marketplace, the only hope for eventual escape from dependence to self-sustained growth.

Our countries are neighbors, linked geographically, politically, economically, culturally, and strategically. We have our differences, as neighbors always do, but we can deal directly with and manage these differences because we're neighbors.

Recovery in the United States and world economies will help, but we must also think about and build for the longer term. That's why the countries of this region have pulled together to initiate this program.

The idea of democracy is strong there. Over two-thirds of the countries in the area are democracies. In Central America democracy has made great strides and inspired enthusiasm, as was clear in the massive vote in El Salvador.

Since I submitted the CBI program to the Congress in April, I've met with a number of leaders from the region -- most recently, President Suazo of Honduras, President-elect Jorge Blanco of the Dominican Republic -- and I know that the economic crisis in the area has worsened. We must act now, and I want you to know that I'm personally leading the effort to assure passage of this vitally needed legislation before the summer recess.

Earlier in the day, the President met at the White House with chief executive officers of several corporations and associations which support the Caribbean Basin Initiative. He also met with representatives of 24 governments involved in the initiative.

The President, by Executive order, is establishing the Emergency Board on the recommendation of the National Mediation Board. The UTU has identified nine of the largest railroads in the United States as strike targets. In response to this action, the carriers countered that operations would cease on nonstruck railroads. A nationwide railroad strike was therefore impending for July 30, 1982.

A strike by the UTU threatens substantially to interrupt interstate commerce to a degree such as to deprive a section of the country of essential transportation service. Carriers represented by NRLC operate approximately 90 percent of total U.S. railroad trackage and serve all of the contiguous States except Rhode Island. Last year, railroads carried 38 percent of all intercity freight, and their share of this market has increased in recent years. A strike would have a severe impact on movement of Department of Defense material, coal, winter wheat, and intercity rail passengers, among other things.

Board No. 195 to investigate a dispute between the United Transportation Union and certain railroads represented by the National Carriers' Conference Committee of the National Railway Labor Conference.

Our Nation is blessed with two important qualities that are often missing in other societies: our spirit of entrepreneurship and our capacity for invention and innovation. These two elements are combined in the small businesses that dot our land. And, as we meet here today, there's some fellow or gal in a research park or a garage inventing something that will make our future healthy or more productive or more comfortable. I believe the bill recognizes the contributions of small high-technology firms to the Nation's growth, productivity, and competitiveness.

Small business is a tonic for what ails this country. By passing and signing this act, we're showing our resolve to unleash this most innovative sector. The Small Business Innovation Development Act recognizes that we in government must work in partnership with small business to ensure that technologies and processes are readily transferred to commercial applications.

This is a beautiful facility. You and your community should be very proud of it. With the inspiration and dedication of Martin Mathews, Hubert Dickey Ballantine, and others who devoted so much time and energy, you and your neighbors, local government, and businesses have moved this club from the shade of a convenient tree to a storefront and now to this multipurpose and multimillion-dollar, magnificent building. My hat is off to you. And as your project has grown, corporations based here and around the country, companies like Monsanto, Anheuser-Busch, and Emerson Electric have joined your effort.

Enrollment has grown from, I understand, 30 to more than 2,000 boys and girls and has served more than 30,000 St. Louis young people. Many of you, I know, participate in the Earn and Learn program and teach yourselves the meaning of leadership and responsibility, often earning your own club dues. This club is an exciting example of the private sector cooperation that I believe can renew the quality of life across America.

Initiatives Task Force, and he's leading an effort that we've started in Washington to encourage the private, public, and nonprivate sectors to work together in all our communities. I believe the idea's catching on.

Operation Bright Side that's a program to clean up the city while providing summer jobs for youth. I understand some Mathews-Dickey alumni are involved in that. The Ralston Purina Company, which sponsors eight youth jobs here at Mathews-Dickey, is also working with other nonprofit groups around the country in one of the Nation's most successful summer jobs for youth programs.

America could stand where I am now, looking out at all of you, you young people with your hopes, your dreams -- because of the cooperation of the people in this city, giving you a chance for a real and a bright and a prosperous future. I wish America, all of it, could see these positive, practical results of neighbor helping neighbor. And if they could, every American would be as convinced as I am that the people of this country are a good and giving people, capable of accomplishing great deeds.

As a matter of fact, I think I'll leave a note for future Presidents suggesting what to do when they need a little inspiration: Go to St. Louis. There's a spirit here that has caught our national imagination more than once. Countless tales of courage and generosity are told about this gateway to the West. My favorite happens to be about a young fellow, however, who was going the other way -- Charles Lindbergh. That's a little before your time. But he was a brave young aviator.

We called him Lucky Lindy. You can understand why, of course, when you stop to think that he flew a small, single-engine propeller plane -- no jets in those days -- the first time anyone had ever flown such a thing across the Atlantic Ocean. He made history. And he talked all the time as if his plane were his best friend. He called it the Spirit of St. Louis.

You club members are also learning team spirit -- working individually and together for excellence. I'm sure that out of 65 baseball teams, there must be a few of you who dream of playing in the major leagues some day -- is that right? [Applause] You bet. And I understand that some of your alumni have made that also and are doing that.

But I had the privilege of broadcasting the Chicago Cubs one season when the only mathematical chance they had toward the end of the season to win the pennant was to win the last 21 games of the season. Couldn't drop a one. And they did it. It still stands in the record book as a baseball record. And I don't know why I brought that up, because they had to beat out the Cardinals to do it. [Laughter] Kind of tactless of me.

But in one of those games with the Cards -- I can't resist telling you a little story, a little reminiscence here. Billy Jurges of the Cubs was up at the plate. And I was broadcasting the game by telegraphic report. That meant I had a fellow sitting on the other side of a window with a telegraph key and headphones on, and he got it dot-and-dash, Morse code, from the ballpark. And I took the slip of paper, and I announced the play. And I'd see him start typing, and I'd start in with, ``The pitcher's out of the windup. Here comes the pitch,'' and fake this. And it'd say, ``S-1-C.'' And I'd say, ``And that's a called strike breaking over the outside corner into a batter that liked . . .'' and so forth and so on.

I don't suppose being in the business I'm in now I should ever tell you that I faked something out that way. [Laughter] But I've been a real ball fan ever since. So, it was a great treat when I was able to meet one of the recent additions to the Baseball Hall of Fame at the White House last year.

Well, during the '68 major league season, he held the batters who faced him to the lowest earned run average in modern baseball history. After the season, he opened the world series against the Detroit Tigers with 17 strike-outs in the game and a shut-out. And he pitched them to two victories in the world series. But he's another St. Louis success story.

His father was a millworker who died before he was born. His mother worked in a laundry to support her seven children. As a young boy, his brother encouraged him to take up baseball, and as a man he made his boyhood dreams come true. Now, they say that if you ask him, he'll attribute his success to a keen competitive drive and a motivation of financial reward. Well, that's all right.

Once when Franklin Delano Roosevelt was President, speaking to a group of young people as I am now, he too spoke about dreams. He said one of the reasons the world gets better so slowly is that too many young people lose their dreams as they get older. In growing up, he said, they throw away their enthusiasms and grow away from their ideals. And he said, ``You ought to thank God . . . if, regardless of your years, you are young enough in spirit to dream dreams and see visions . . . .'' Hold fast to your dreams, he said, America needs them.

Now, the young people that he spoke to then have grandchildren now that are your age, and still we haven't achieved all our vision of what an America can be -- an America without poverty, without unemployment, free of class struggles, and in a world at peace. We've done a lot. I think we've accomplished much. But we have a lot yet to do.

And I think that the Mathews-Dickey Boys' Club is full of youthful dreams. And if you can hold on to the ideals of your youth, neighbor keeps helping neighbor not only here but around the country, then together we'll renew the spirit that made this country great and makes our dreams come true.

One of the great pleasures of being President is the ability to honor individual Americans whose spirit and sacrifice have bettered the lives of their fellow citizens. I believe this may be a surprise, but it's my privilege today to present individual awards to two outstanding citizens that you all know very well.

It is with great respect and admiration that I award Martin Mathews and Hubert Dickey Ballantine the Presidential Citizens Medals for outstanding service that they have given to this community, to St. Louis, and to the United States of America. And it reads -- [applause] -- may I -- let me just read the citation. They are -- I will read one. They are both the same except for the names on them being different.

Mr. Ballantine. Today really is a great day. It's one of the biggest days in my life, and I sure have enjoyed it very much. I enjoyed the personal contact with the President of the United States. And I say God bless America, and God bless him in his work.

The President. Well, yes, I did. And it was a most inspiring thing. From the history of that place, those two men that had a dream and literally, as they've said, took it out from under a shade tree and into a store front and now into that magnificent building. And all those thousands of young people who were there, 65 baseball teams, it just shows what someone with a dream and with determination to make it come true can do.

Mr. Hunter. On another subject, you were noticeably silent following the Hinckley verdict. Yet, for someone who was so personally invovled in that shooting incident, you must have had some feelings about what that jury's verdict, what effect it will have on your safety and security and on the safety and security of future Presidents. Would you share those feelings with us?

The President. Well, I'd rather not comment. I haven't commented on that particular verdict. I would, however, touch on the subject that has been brought up by that, because that goes back before this trial, this whole question of insanity as a defense. And the Attorney General has recommended and the Justice Department is studying the idea of making insanity -- in other words, it's guilty or innocent, but then insanity introduced at the time of sentencing as a mitigating factor.

American Bar Association, many legal groups, for a long time. And they have come to the decision that the technical experts in front of a jury on both sides, giving conflicting opinions with regard to this, it doesn't really belong in the trial.

The President. Well, you don't have to limit it to a President. This defense is being used more and more in murder trials. And we've seen, I think, something long before this trial that led to the study of this question, with the incidence of people found innocent by reason of insanity put in a mental hospital and turned loose, you might say, virtually by the members of the same profession that had gone into court and proved they were insane, then a few months later telling them they were cured. And we've had the double tragedy of they go right out in the street and commit the same crime over again.

Mr. Hunter. If the polls are to be believed, you are not a popular President among such groups as environmentalists, the poor, the black, educators, organized labor. What are your feelings on a President's responsibility to try to meet the needs and demands of groups which feel they are alienated from the White House?

The President. Well, I think the biggest problem is one of communications. And maybe the media has something to do with that, because I think if representatives of those groups that you've just mentioned and others who are listed in the polls as not favoring me -- if they understood my views and understood what it is we're actually trying to do.

Environmentalists, for example. I'd never heard the word, but as Governor of California, one of the first things I did was correct a problem, and before I left as Governor, the environmental movement was underway nationwide -- and from the Federal level under an administration that was not necessarily supportive of me. People came to California and said that we were out ahead of the Nation. We took the Federal Government to court in order to have automobile standards in the State of California with regard to the smog problem.

And I grew up that way. And as a sports announcer in radio broadcasting major league baseball, how many young people today remember that when I was broadcasting baseball, no blacks were allowed in organized baseball. There were no Willie Mayses for me to talk about or Hank Aarons -- anyone of that kind. And there were a number of us in the sports field then who editorialized and used the pulpit that had been given to us by virtue our job, to campaign against that. And finally, the dam was broken. And baseball is better for it and the Nation is better for it.

But then when I became Governor -- I was the 33d Governor of Califorina -- I found out that the civil service tests were rigged to prevent blacks from getting any but the lowest possible jobs in State government. I changed that. More than that, up and above civil service, I appointed to policymaking and executive positions more blacks than all the previous 32 Governors of California before me put together. Now, we're doing the same thing at the Federal level. And I could go on from there.

But let me also point that when you say the poor, I know that there's been a misconstruing of many of the things that we're trying to do in getting control of this uncontrollable budget -- the spending that has brought the country into this recession and caused the trillion-dollar debt.

Much of the misinformation about what we're trying to do comes from the bureaucracies who feel threatened because they have a nice living administering those programs. But as to the people, let's take one -- you mentioned educators -- the educators and the charge that we are somehow taking away the possibility of help for needy students to go to college. What we're really doing -- we found that much of the aid, the low-interest loans and the grants, were going to students whose families had incomes that suggested the families could do more to help send their children to college. We have redirected this help down to a financial level that makes sure that those people who are close to the poverty line can have the help they need for their sons and daughters to go to college.

The President. Well, I think there is an improvement. I think we've bottomed out. But let me tell you what that inflation rate already has done for those who are poor, who have to spend every penny for the necessities of life, and therefore as the prices go up, they can buy less and less of the necessities. Families at the poverty level today, with the cuts that we've already made in the inflation rate, have several hundred dollars more in purchasing power than they had a year ago under the previous high inflation rate.

The President. My projections are that the signs are kind of mixed when you bottom out in a recession. But in these last few days, the Federal Reserve, cutting the discount rate for the banks -- the prime rate being set by the banks at a lower rate. The interest rate was 21\1/2\ percent when I started a year and a half ago. For the first time in several months we are showing an increase, small though it may be, in the gross national product.

Now, I'm not going to jump up and down and say that, well, you know, there's going to be a boom just around the corner. It won't get cured that way. The previous seven recessions have seen the government using what I call a quick fix -- artificially stimulating the economy, pouring printing-press money into the marketplace. And, yes, temporarily there is an easing of the situation. But look back at those recessions, and you'll find that about 2 to 3 years later, we would have another recession, deeper and worse than the one before. This one is the deepest and the worst of those since World War II.

Now, what we're embarked on is a plan to restore the economy, to restore industry -- not a quick fix -- to get back to where we're on an even keel without government deficit spending, without the government having to go into the market and use up the capital that belong to the people. We have given the tax cuts to the people with the third installment yet to come next year to provide incentive for them. And for the first time, again, in a long period of time, real earnings -- not inflation earnings of phony dollars -- real earnings are increasing at a rate of 4 percent. That's the highest it's been in years.

Mr. Hunter. On the international scene, were you surprised this morning when France announced that it was going to go ahead and give U.S.-developed technology to the Russians for the development of that Russian pipeline? And have you and your foreign policy advisers determined some sort of way to dissuade France from taking that action?

The President. Well, what really they are doing is going forward with contracts that were already signed. I have talked with President Mitterrand about his situation. He said when he came there he found the contracts already agreed to and signed by the previous administration, and they feel legally bound by those.

What I have asked our Commerce Department to do is do a study and come back to me with a report on what our situation is, because where it involves us -- with our sanctions that we've imposed against the Soviet Union -- where it involves us is what is our legal position with regard to subsidiary companies in France and in the other European countries owned by American firms, and whether they are legally bound, possibly, by contracts that were made before.

The President. Well, we tried our best in the meetings over there. I think they knew what we were going to do, because we'd announced what we were going to do way last December. They, as I say, had gone forward with the contracts. We have been investigating, with some of the European countries, the possibilities of energy sources closer, and that would not have the two problems which we are very concerned about with our European allies -- number one, making themselves dependent on the Soviet Union, and putting themselves in a position to be blackmailed by the Soviet Union if they decide to shut off the gas. There are sources in the North Sea, in Norway, in the Netherlands. We would be happy to help them with the development of those.

Our allies, on the other hand, pointed out to us that they had already gone forward to the point that they did not feel they could retreat from that -- although they did join us in shutting off or reducing credit, so that we, at least, aren't helping finance a potential adversary.

Mr. Hunter. One final question, Mr. President. Washington is buzzing with some stories that your top aides are telling your Cabinet members not to look for any jobs soon, because Ronald Reagan has decided to run again for reelection. Have you decided that you want a second term?

The President. No. No, and that isn't a decision that should be made now. But what had happened was I suddenly found out that some people were spreading the word around that I had decided I wouldn't. And I just thought that since that's a decision yet to be made -- and I think the people help you make that decision as the time goes on -- that for the purposes of my own staff and my own Cabinet and all, they'd better know that no decision had been made. And so, I used the phrase, in telling them that, that -- or publicly I told them to stop reading the ``Help Wanted'' ads.

I was going to bring good Senator John Danforth out here. But there was a tax bill on the floor of the Senate, and he figured that you'd want him there voting. And I can assure you I wanted him there voting. [Laughter] But we did have the pleasure of his daughter accompanying us out here.

I've felt for a long time that the work of the Olympic Committee isn't good work; it's great work, because the dedication and the selflessness of the people of the Committee and through the generosity of people like yourselves -- we keep America participating in a tradition that goes back thousands of years. Yes, the Olympic Games are athletic games and contests. They give us an opportunity every 4 years to see our young men and women giving their best to their country. But let us also remember that there is a longer and a deeper meaning behind the Olympic torch.

Those games started in ancient Greece as a means of bringing peace and trying to end the wars that went on constantly between the city-states of Greece. And the tradition, the Olympics, became so pronounced even then in its first beginning that if wars were going on when Olympic time came, the wars were called off while they performed and joined together in the games.

Seriously, we have known such moments of pride in this great 4-year event -- the individuals going back to the great Jim Thorpe, and then there was Jesse Owens repudiating the arrogance of the Nazi cult and Hitlerism. And just a few years back -- and you'd be surprised what glowing words I was going to have here about a hockey team until by this time -- it has all been said.

No, but it was up in a small, upstate New York town, a bunch of down-the-block American kids did the impossible and did electrify our nation. One thing that hasn't been told here about that victory over the Russian hockey team -- sensational victory that it was -- that before that game in the locker room these down-the-block kids who weren't supposed to have a chance against that great team -- their coach told them that they had been born for that moment. They were there because they had been born to be there for that event. And of course when they left that ring chanting, ``U.S.A.! U.S.A.!'' I think the whole Nation was chanting it with them.

American spirit. They also represented what amateur sports and the Olympics are all about: to foster a noble and inspiring patriotism, yes, but also the healthiest possible kind of international relationship, free for a time of animus and hatred, in keeping with the original tradition of the Olympics.

It is a cliche to say that sports are a character builder, but then, you know what a cliche is. A cliche really is something that is so obviously true that it is spoken and repeated over and over again until we call it a cliche. More than any other people, Americans are sports-minded. And maybe this is what has contributed to what we call the American personality. With all our faults, we're the most generous people in the world.

Suppose he grew up to represent you in Congress or possibly in the statehouse -- maybe even in the house I'm living in now. Or he could have become a Supreme Court Judge. What then? Would we say then he should've kept his mouth shut in the interest of political advantage or expediency?

Now, I know there are those who decry the emphasis placed on sports. They say, ``Kid games, athletics.'' Maybe sometimes we wonder about all of the great time and effort that's put into these athletic spectacles.

But I remember -- and have remembered 50 years now -- my senior year, and we were playing a team. And there was a center -- and I played beside the center, being a guard on our team -- and this center took off on our center in the most vicious manner, fouling, every dirty thing he could get away with -- but also his language. And the things that he was saying. And what he was saying made it plain that his whole motive was nothing more than the difference in the color of his skin and that of our center, Burkie.

And in the huddles, I looked across once, and Burkie's lip was bleeding. He had a bad knee, and this fellow had discovered it. His lip was bleeding from biting it, trying to keep down any sounds of pain. The rest of us wanted to do something about this opponent of his, but over and over again in the huddle, Burkie said, ``This is my fight.'' And he just played football. Nothing dirty and no fouling. He just played football until he had played this man opposite him off his feet. And late -- just a few minutes to go in the fourth quarter -- they sent in a substitute, and this fellow started off the field. And he was wobbling, and he got about halfway to the sideline, and he turned around. He came back, and he elbowed his way through the two teams standing there waiting for play to begin again, stepped up to Burkie and -- the tears were coming out of his eyes -- and he stuck out his hand and, crying, said, ``I just want you to know, you're the greatest guy I've every met,'' and turned and left the field.

I think the young man learned something very important that Saturday afternoon. Now, maybe he might have learned it some other way sometime in life. But then maybe he might not. He might have gone through life soured and embittered, unreasoning, by unreasoning prejudice and hatred.

Well, that's why the work of the Olympic Committee is so vital. Wrapped up in all the difficult nuts-and-bolts work that goes with an event like these great games is the importance, the overriding importance of the contestants themselves, the young men and women learning the importance of honest striving, fair play, love of country, and, yes, love of their fellow man.

They need our support now during this time when the all important training and recruiting of athletes is going on. I can tell you, they've got a friend in Washington. And I'm going to do everything I can to be of help.

We have with us tonight a very special guest and honoree. But before we get to him, I hope you'll forgive me if I indulge in a little paternal pride. Mike, my son, you know, broke the record in that boat run, New Orleans to St. Louis. And, Mike, I'm proud of you. But not just proud of what you did, but proud because you did it for the cause that brings us together here tonight. I know it wasn't just a boat ride. I don't know how you're still awake, but a lot of effort went into that boat ride, and it was for a great effort, the effort of the Olympic Committee. Whether you'd gotten a record or not, I think all of us here hope that other Americans will emulate you and give of themselves in behalf of our country and our Olympic team.

A few years ago, the New York Times wrote of the business success of August Busch III. And among the accolades, they described his grasp of detail, his voracious appetite for work, and his ability to attract and keep talented executives. August, you wouldn't like to spare a few minutes and give me some suggestions as to how I could get that -- [laughter]. I'd like to get that kind of coverage in the New York Times. I've been reading it more and enjoying it less lately.

But enough fooling around. Your accomplishments, as the head of one of America's most important countries [companies] is impressive. But tonight we're here to thank you for your generosity, your hard work on behalf of American sports, and especially on behalf of the U.S.

You have arranged to give the Committee more than a million dollars of seed money for the training and recruiting of our young athletes precisely at this moment when it is needed. At the same time Anheuser-Busch is guaranteeing a $10 million contribution for the '84 games in Los Angeles. You've been the guiding force behind this cause. And it is this personal effort on your part -- your interest in the Olympic sports and a willingness to give of yourself, even with all the demands on your time -- for which all of us are particularly grateful. And we hope that other Americans will be inspired by your example.

Because of your effort, I am privileged here to participate with something that is being done on behalf of the U.S. Olympic Committee. And I am going to ask Bill Simon to come up here with me as we will present to August Busch III the Sportsman of the Year Award.

Q. Mr. President, last night in talking about the pipeline, you sounded fairly conciliatory toward the French. Is it possible that you won't try to -- you wouldn't go to court to fight these new sanctions?

The President. Yes, because there are plenty of people that are trying to step the level of rhetoric up. And I don't think there are any -- I think that Premier [Chancellor] Schmidt called it himself publicly when he said there are no real and deep differences between us. It's still all in the family.

Well, to welcome you all here today is indeed a great pleasure for me, as one interested in the art of entertainment. We're grateful that you've come to America to introduce us to Kabuki, a 400-year-old art form little known here.

To most Americans, Japanese history before the nineteenth century is clouded in mystery and romance. Your tour should help us to understand better the flavor of those days and history of the Japanese people. We're especially honored that such a renowned troupe should be here to introduce us to Kabuki.

Thank you for your letter of July 20 expressing your desire, which we had previously discussed, to return to Washington University. It is with deep regret that I honor your request and accept your resignation as Chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers effective September first.

I shall always appreciate the extraordinary contributions you have made to the formulation, advocacy, and refinement of all elements of our Economic Recovery Program. You have applied not only the tools of economics, but also prudent judgment, to the analysis of the economic challenges facing America at home and abroad.

Economic Advisers. It has been a special privilege to serve in your Administration during this period of fundamental change in economic policy. Yet the time has come for me to return to Washington University, which is expecting me to be on campus in September.

Although the difficult adjustments are far from complete, I believe that it is becoming clear that your Economic Recovery Program is succeeding in shifting the balance of power from the Federal government to the private sector. Important progress has been made in achieving this objective on all four fronts: reducing the average citizen's tax burden, slowing down the growth of government spending, reforming the costly and burdensome regulatory apparatus, and moderating the growth of the money supply.

From the outset, we have said that yours is a long-term program, unlike the quick fixes of the past. The substantial reduction in inflation is heartening evidence of the progress that has been made. Yet the overall condition of the economy underscores both the difficulty of carrying out fundamental changes as well as the continuing need to move ahead on each of the four key aspects of economic policy in order to achieve your basic goal of restoring the economic strength of our country.

I will carry with me many fond memories of working with you and the outstanding people that you have attracted in your Administration. I leave you with the best of wishes for your continued health, happiness, and success.

This act extends for 3 years the authority of Federal agencies to allow employees more flexibility in scheduling their workweeks. For example, where the nature of the work allows, employees may work 4 10-hour days per week, or begin their workday earlier or later than usual. The total time on the job remains the same, but the particular hours when the work is performed can vary.

For the past 3 years, the Federal Government has been experimenting with these alternative work schedules, following the lead of a number of private companies that found this kind of work scheduling beneficial. In the Government, too, most of the experiments were successful.

These alternative work schedules also had a very positive effect on the morale of employees, who were able to adjust their work schedules to meet personal needs. This was particularly important to working mothers who used the flexibility in scheduling work hours to help them meet their responsibilities both at home and at the office. The overwhelming majority of Federal employees taking part in the experimental program said that it allowed them to spend more time with their families, as well as providing a better opportunity to participate in their children's school activities.

As you would expect with an experimental program, there were some Federal agencies where alternative work schedules did not work too well -- where there were problems of accountability or where the demands of the public business were not well served. The act I am signing today recognizes the danger of such problems and gives Federal managers the necessary tools to prevent such problems from developing, or to deal with them if they do. I should also note that Federal employee unions will be fully involved in working with agency managers to see that alternative work schedules are used in ways that will meet the needs of both Federal employees and the taxpayers.

Less than a month ago, we embarked on a major effort with the Soviet Union to negotiate a reduction in the strategic arsenals of both sides and thus to reduce the risk of nuclear war. I view this initiative as one of the most important and challenging of my Presidency, and I am determined that the United States will do everything in its power to achieve an effective, equitable, and verifiable agreement. The American people will not be satisfied with anything less.

As we engage in the sensitive and complex START negotiations with the Soviet Union, we need to demonstrate that the American people and Congress are behind the proposals carried by Ambassador Rowny to Geneva. The bipartisan resolution recently introduced by Congressmen Broomfield, Carney, and Stratton will make clear to the Soviets that the American people are united in seeking substantial reductions to equal and verifiable levels in the arsenals of both sides, and reducing the risk of war by accident or miscalculation. I strongly support the resolution.

We must not allow this opportunity to reach an agreement on substantial nuclear force reductions to be lost. I am concerned that the resolution reported earlier by the House Foreign Affairs Committee will signal to the Soviet Union that we are willing to accept something less than these reductions; that is, a freeze that leaves dangerous asymmetries in the nuclear balance and a return to the flawed SALT II agreement. Both these provisions would seriously undercut our negotiating position and reduce the chances for achievement of our START objectives.

With your support, we can achieve the goals we have set and enhance the prospects for peace and stability. I urge you and your colleagues to support the substitute resolution sponsored by Congressmen Broomfield, Carney, and Stratton.

Our discussions today reconfirm the mutual respect our two countries have enjoyed for over 20 years. Our meeting covered a wide range of issues. Particularly useful was our discussion of southern Africa and the Middle East. I listened with interest to President Ahidjo's views on these difficult issues, and I hope he has also gained a better understanding of the role that we're trying to play.

We also had a useful discussion of the enormous economic burdens faced by Africa's developing countries and a possible role for the United States private sector in addressing these problems. An American trade and investment mission, headed by Secretaries Baldrige and Block, visited Cameroon and several other African countries last January. We continue to believe that private enterprise is the most effective means for fostering sound economic development. And I'm very pleased that Cameroon has opened its doors to American businessmen. I hope that our two countries will enjoy increasingly close economic and trade relations in the years ahead.

Finally, our discussion gave me an opportunity to commend President Ahidjo for his outstanding leadership concerning the refugee problem. Over the past several years, Cameroon has hosted over 200,000 refugees fleeing civil wars and harsh regimes in neighboring countries. The United States has tried to help where it could, working through the United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees, to alleviate the heavy burden that this has brought to Cameroon. We urge other nations to contribute to the international effort and give continuing support to the countries of first asylum and to the refugees themselves.

Members of the House and Senate during his Washington stay. And I am certain that he will find them eager to expand the excellent working relations that we have with the Government of Cameroon. His discussions here are laying a foundation for enhanced cooperation and ever closer ties of friendship between the United States and Cameroon. And we're delighted to welcome him here to the United States.

President Ahidjo. I am pleased after my last visit to the United States of America in 1967 to have been given this opportunity to come back once more to this great and beautiful country on the kind invitation of President Ronald Reagan, with whom I have just had cordial and fruitful discussions.

With regard to our bilateral relations, the discussions were an opportunity to reaffirm the esteem that the Cameroonian and American people have for each other and to express our satisfaction with the close links of mutually advantageous cooperation existing between our two countries for over 20 years now.

With regard to the determination expressed on both sides and with the potentials of our two countries, there is no doubt that this cooperation will grow and be consolidated in the future. This is already evident in the four agreements recently signed in Yaounde by our two governments to finance interior agricultural projects and training programs for a total amount of $12,000,200.

We also carried out a wide review of problems of common interest in Africa and the world. With regard to Africa, we expressed the need to accelerate the accession of Namibia to independence and to work towards the elimination of apartheid for the advent of majority rule in South Africa.

With regard to world affairs, we expressed our common determination to support in all circumstances the right of peoples to progress, peace, and self-determination. In this connection, we acknowledge the need to work in a concerted manner to ensure respect for the basic principles of international relations such as nonrecourse to force, the peaceful settlement of conflicts, and peaceful coexistence, as well as the promotion of a more just, balanced, and stable framework of cooperation between industrialized and developing countries as part of global negotiations to usher in a new international economic order.

It is our intention to deal with the most potentially destructive and politically destabilizing weapons first. In the INF talks, begun in Geneva, we are seeking to have the Soviet Union dismantle its intermediate-range nuclear weapons in exchange for our pledge not to deploy Pershing II and cruise missiles as requested by the North Atlantic Treaty Organization in December 1979.

These and other important arms control initiatives of my Administration are reviewed in my address of June 17, 1982, to the United Nations' Special Session on Disarmament, provided for your further information in an annex to the attached annual report.

Rather than seeking upper limits in arms control treaties, we seek to bring about real arms control through negotiated reductions. We are dedicated to reducing the threat of nuclear war by gradually reducing nuclear arsenals so that only those weapons which can reasonably guarantee mutual deterrence remain.

I am firmly convinced that the road we are following is both rational and realistic. We have analyzed the Soviet approach to military strategy and the threat posed by Soviet forces. We have concluded that arms control must play a vital role in the conduct of our foreign policy and as a complement to our policy of deterrence.

We are committed to deterrence. We shall stand by our Allies and friends, and we shall consult with them regularly as we go about the business of reestablishing our conventional and nuclear deterrent forces. Deterrence has worked in Europe for more than 35 years.

As you read through this 1981 Annual Report, I hope you will find, as I did, that the measured and considered approach to arms control, made possible by an exhaustive review and analysis, has, for the first time, resulted in a well considered program to reverse the trends of the past and bring about lasting peace.

We intend to pursue arms control and disarmament through agreements that are understandable, verifiable, and equitable. I am certain that I shall be able to call your attention to similar progress in future annual reports.

Just a few years ago we had a Congressman from a very large city who knew very little about rural life and found himself appointed to the agricultural committee. That kind of makes sense in government, doesn't it? One of his first efforts was to get the committee to declare that food was a natural resource and therefore should be equally distributed among all people. Well, I know some people that have been working at producing that natural resource that would differ with him.

I want you to know that in this administration, we're trying our hardest to bring more common sense at least from government's angle to the farm situation. In fact, one of your own members is our Secretary of Agriculture, Jack Block.

The FFA embodies the best of the volunteer spirit. And there are so many instances that I could cite here. Flagler County, Florida: An FFA chapter set out to reduce beach erosion in a dune area by planting vegetation. The result was an estimated 95-percent reduction in erosion. In Glen Gardner, New Jersey, a chapter landscaped a newly renovated library. In Howells, Nebraska, the FFA constructed a basketball court and scoreboard and repaired picnic tables and benches in a local park. In Elma, Washington, the FFA chapter built nearly 8 miles of fire trails and planted over 219,000 seedlings.

I could go on with these kind of stories -- I love them -- and I'd only be citing FFA examples. But on behalf of all Americans, I want to thank you, the members of FFA, for what you're doing for our country. America needs your kind of leadership. America also needs your contributions to farming and agribusiness.

Well, you of the FFA fulfill that ideal. And as you go along in your careers, I just want you to know that you carry not only my genuine respect and that of millions and millions of your fellow citizens but our heartfelt best wishes and appreciation.

Scott Neasham. President Reagan, it means a lot to us as young people that you have visited with us today. The last line of our motto is, ``Living to serve.'' The Bible says, ``The greatest among you shall be the servant of all.'' And we are here today to recognize a great servant of our country.

We as young people look to you for counsel and guidance, and we respect you very much. And it is because of this great respect that we have for you that we have elected you to the highest degree that the FFA can present upon anyone, and that is the Honorary American Farmer Degree.

If I could just say to your national president here and to all of you, that line in your motto -- a very wise man once said, ``Life begins when you begin to serve.'' So, your lives have begun earlier than most.

In accordance with the Impoundment Control Act of 1974, I herewith report one new proposal to rescind a total of $83.5 million in budget authority previously provided to the Congress. The rescission affects the fossil energy construction program in the Department of Energy.

Economic Affairs. Following his tenure at the Treasury Department, McCormack was a consultant to the White House Office of the Special Trade Representative, where he analyzed potential international commodity agreements.

Since the Revolutionary War, when General George Washington praised the Indians under his command, the United States has been privileged to have members of the Indian Nation serve in its armed forces.

From the bravery demonstrated at Valley Forge and the establishment of the U.S. Indian Scouts on August 1, 1866, to the present day, Native Americans have heeded the call to duty. Though often excluded from the annals of United States history, these people, nonetheless, have defended the only land they have ever known, asking for nothing more than opportunity in return.

The Navaho Nation, when called upon to serve the United States, contributed a precious commodity never before used in this way. In the midst of the fighting in the Pacific during World War II, a gallant group of men from the Navaho Nation utilized their language in coded form to help speed the Allied victory.

Equipped with the only foolproof, unbreakable code in the history of warfare, the code talkers confused the enemy with an earful of sounds never before heard by code experts. The dedication and unswerving devotion to duty shown by the men of the Navaho Nation in serving as radio code talkers in the Marine Corps during World War II should serve as a fine example for all Americans.

It is fitting that at this time we also express appreciation for the other American Indians who have served our Nation in times of war. Members of the Choctaw, Chippewa, Creek, Sioux, and other tribes used their tribal languages as effective battlefield codes against the Germans in World War I and the Japanese and Germans in World War II.

Beyond this unique role, American Indians serving in the United States military forces have established an outstanding record of bravery and heroism in battle. Many have given their lives in the performance of their duty. Their record should be recognized by all Americans.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 28th day of July in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Long years of runaway inflation, interest rates, and high taxes had robbed people of their earnings and weakened every family's ability to pay its bills and save for the future. The American people understand that we need fundamental reform -- reform that goes beyond promises and gives them real protection for their earnings. They want this government to draw the line and to pass without delay a constitutional amendment making balanced budgets the law of the land.

Our current economic troubles are the direct result of the mistakes of the past -- mistakes that we're working to correct. We've begun to rescue this economy, and the first evidence of recovery has been cited -- but it's only a beginning. Many of our people are still suffering, and nothing has been more painful to me than the slowness of our progress.

I understand that statistics like falling interest rates, smaller price increases, and a better gross national product are cold comfort to Americans who feel trapped by the economy. I wish recovery could be easier and faster. Unfortunately, it isn't. It's tough, slow work, and it's going to require enormous effort and patience from every one of us to correct the problems we inherited.

The worse thing that we could do would be to turn back, to resort to the same political quick fixes that got us into this mess. If we have the courage to believe in ourselves and stop wringing our hands, roll up our sleeves and get the job done, and for once get it done right, we can start repaying that mortgage on our future and create opportunity and hope again for every American.

Q. Mr. President, with the somber nature of this economic report and with bad news continuing to come in on inflation, which had been, until recently, coming down -- unemployment still high, budget deficit continuing -- are you paving the way for more bad news? And how much longer -- weeks, months, a few more years -- should the American people expect to wait until the program begins to really work?

The President. Well, Jim, no, I'm not trying to pave the way for more bad news. I was just trying to get a little more publicity for the American people to urge their Congressmen to adopt the constitutional amendment. I think that that could have a very profound effect.

The other day when a major bank in New York, Manufacturer's Hanover, reduced interest rates, I thought it was very interesting that the man in charge said that they were reducing them because of a feeling of public obligation, that so much of our present problem is psychological. And I think it is. And I think that some of what's going on in the Congress has held back the psychology, a change that is needed. And this is why I believe, in addition to the constitutional amendment being a very practical way of getting us out of a situation that has seen us have 19 deficits in the last 20 years, would be the psychological effect that it would indicate that the government is really determined to end this kind of runaway spending and have some fiscal integrity and common sense.

Q. Mr. President, Chancellor Schmidt says that the allies, Western allies, are united against your ban on equipment for the Siberian pipeline, and they're going ahead with it anyway. Since you seem to be about to make a new deal with the Soviets on grain and want to continue that, what do you think is happening to the allied relationship? And do you have any second thoughts about the pipeline?

The President. No, no second thoughts, Helen [Helen Thomas, United Press International]. And I know that we discussed this at great length in both the summit meeting and the NATO meetings when I was in Europe with them. We know their position. We know that several of their -- or some of their governments insist that contracts had been made before the Polish situation and that, therefore, they felt obligated to go forward with them.

We, as you know, in December we announced that from our standpoint this would be one of the steps that we would take because of what we think is the Soviet pressure causing this repressive government in Poland and the actions that have taken place there. And we have made it clear that there are things -- that if the military government should soften and go away, if the military government should release all of the people, including Lech Walesa, if they should reopen conversations with Solidarity, we'd be very happy to review our position with regard to the pipeline.

Soviet Union because of the Poland situation. We continued simply on a year-to-year basis selling it. But the differences that I mentioned are that, number one, the technology for the pipeline is mainly only obtainable from the United States. Grain, the Soviet Union can get in other places, if they want it. So, we wouldn't be achieving very much if we had used that as it was used back a couple of years ago by the previous administration with regard to the Afghanistan invasion. It didn't hurt the Soviet Union, but it was a terrible economic blow to our farmers. That's one element.

The other element is that grain will result in the Soviet Union having to pay out hard cash, and they're not too flush with that right now. The pipeline, when finished, will result in the Soviet Union getting hard cash, which it does not now have and which it can then use to further build up its military might.

The President. Yes. Let me say also that that same Helmut Schmidt has made a remark even on his visit back here that indicates that -- just what I feel. When I say we have a better relationship, we do.

This is kind of like a fight inside a family, but the family is still a family. And we know that we're bound together in a great many ways. And in the recent European trip, we solidified agreements having to do with protectionism, having to do with curbing low-interest loans to the Soviet Union that was literally subsidizing their ability to continue their military buildup and so forth.

Q. Mr. President, I would like to stay with foreign policy, but turn to the Middle East. And I wondered what effect you believe the constant, day-after-day bombing by the Israelis and shelling by the Israelis in Beirut is having on your efforts and your special envoy, Mr. Habib's, efforts to try to bring some kind of a settlement? And, secondly, Mr. Habib has been there nearly 7 weeks.

The President. John, there's nothing we would like more than to see an end to the bloodshed and the shelling. But I must remind you it has also been two-way. The PLO has been, and in some instances has been the first to break the cease-fire. That we would like to see ended, of course.

We want the central government of Lebanon to once again, after several years of almost dissolution -- to once again be the authority with a military force, not several militias belonging to various factions in Lebanon. And then we want the foreign forces, Israeli and Syrian both, out of Lebanon.

Habib -- Ambassador Habib has been doing a magnificent job. I don't comment on specifics, because I know how sensitive these negotiations are. And sometimes you lose some ground that you think you'd gained, and sometimes you gain again. I still remain optimistic that the solution is going to be found. As I say, he has returned from that trip to other countries -- some of the other Arab States and to Tel Aviv.

The President. Well, when I say that, what I should say is, we want the bloodshed and the conflict to stop. And I'm hesitant to say anything further about where we are in those or who might be providing the stumbling block, now, to the steps that I just outlined that are necessary to bring peace there. So, I can't go beyond that except to say that unless and until Ambassador Habib would tell me that there's nothing more to be negotiated and he can't solve it, I'm going to continue to be optimistic.

Q. Mr. President, a question concerning a member of your Cabinet, Secretary Watt. You recently had to disavow some comments by him when he suggested that U.S. support for Israel might be curtailed if American Jews do not support your energy policy. Now Mr. Watt in a letter to Congress suggests that American troops might have to fight in the Middle East if there's any interference with the vast new offshore oil drilling. Is Secretary Watt reflecting your views? Is he reflecting the foreign policy of the administration? Or, as Senator Moynihan suggests, has he embarrassed your administration and is someone who should be fired?

The President. No, Mike, he shouldn't be fired. And as I say, the whole context of his letter and the opening statement you made from that letter, or paraphrasing it, was the result of a conversation with [Israeli] Ambassador Arens, a lengthy discussion of this subject at a social gathering the night before. And as many of us do, you go home and you think of a couple of points you hadn't made, and he made them. What he was suggesting, with regard to the danger to Israel, was our vulnerability as long as we are dependent on oil -- energy from insecure sources, and that if there should be, as we once had, an embargo and if we should find ourselves without the energy needed to turn the wheels in this country and the wheels of industry, we wouldn't be much of an ally to our friends. And that would certainly include Israel. And he was making it very plain that we are morally obligated to the support of Israel.

Now, he has made a speech to a group in New York, I believe it was B'nai B'rith, today, and I understand that in outlining his whole position and where he stands, that his audience was most enthusiastic and supportive of what he had to say.

His letter to the Congressmen -- I think he was only trying to make the example that some of those who had been the most outspoken up there have also been the -- had the most objections to us trying to improve our energy situation. And what he was pointing out is, where would the Western world be if someday our source of supply was purely there in the Persian Gulf and it was denied to us? So, this was his dramatic statement about the other.

The President. We want to continue developing the relationship that was started some years ago by President Nixon with the People's Republic of China. But at the same time, they know very well our position, and it has not changed. We are not going to abandon our long-time friends and allies on Taiwan. And I'm going to carry out the terms of the Taiwan Relations Act. And this has been made clear. And we have no secret agreements of any other kind or anything that should cause the government or the people of Taiwan to have any concern about that. It is a moral obligation that we'll keep.

Q. Mr. President, earlier this year there was a good deal of discussion about a possible summit with Mr. Brezhnev. On one occasion you said it was ``in the works.'' Now, this issue seems to have faded, and I wondered what you anticipate in the way of a summit this year.

The President. Well, I don't know whether it's going to be this year or next or at all. That's going to depend on -- it takes two to tango. We have -- I had suggested with the belief that he was possibly coming to the U.N. meeting, as you know, that while he was here that we have a meeting, just as I had with some of the other heads of state who were here. It developed he wasn't coming. And this led to the talk of a possible summit.

A summit, you know, isn't the answer or the cure for everything that's wrong in the world. But it has to be carefully planned. An agenda has to be set, and that begins with foreign ministers meeting. When I say that it's in the works, I can only tell you that our State Department has been communicating and in communication with the Soviet Union. With regard to this, there had been no positive replies or steps. Indication of interest is all. And we continue, and if at such time we know that there is an agenda and there is a real purpose in having this, we'll have a summit.

Q. Mr. President, in terms of the economy, in the short run, with the government needing to do so much borrowing in the coming months with the high Federal deficit, what are the prospects that interest rates can come down much further in the face of that and that, therefore, there could be any substantial economic recovery in the near future?

Mr. President, you mentioned earlier the sensitivity of the Lebanese negotiations. Did you consider it harmful to those diplomatic efforts last week when several U.S. Congressmen met with PLO leader Arafat? And do you feel Congressman McCloskey and the others were either manipulated or used by Arafat to make it look like there was progress?

Q. Mr. President, you say that we're in a transition period in terms of the economy. When do you expect the recovery to get underway? How strong do you think it'll be? And how long do you think it'll last?

The President. Well, I think the recovery that we're talking about, with the plan that we've put into effect, is based on being a more or less permanent one. All of the previous recessions have been ended by a quick fix, the flooding of money into the market, temporary spending, artificially stimulating the economy, which resulted in high inflation but did give you a kind of a quick fever that seemed like prosperity. And the next recession came usually about 2 years later. We're trying to restore the economy, to get back to a growth economy that will be based on solid principles.

And I think that we're going to see an improvement in the second half of this year. But I'm not going to try to project exactly what level it will reach and exactly what date it will reach that level.

Q. Just let me follow up. Some of your previous predictions have been somewhat -- too optimistic. What do you think about predictions that the recovery will begin to taper off in the beginning of next year?

The President. I don't think that -- if we stick with our guns, I don't think it will. And as to optimism, let me just say this: I think what has happened is that we've made as legitimate predictions as we could, and if you'll recall, all last year we were talking about a sluggish economy, that no one should expect any sudden booms or anything, that we knew what we were up against and how far we had to go. But when we had to give figures, as the law requires, in projections and then found that our own -- we hadn't been optimistic enough about inflation, that we had no idea that we could bring inflation down as quickly and as much as we did. And while that was a fine thing for the people -- and I hope we can keep on doing it -- it did change our estimates about taxes, because the government prospers and profits from inflation. It is a form of tax. And not having expected it to come down so quickly, we had to alter our estimates of revenues, and that changed some of our previous prognostications.

But I don't feel self-conscious at all. If we have been in an economy that has built into the budget a growth pattern that has seen, as I said before, 19 deficits in the last 20 years -- and before that you can add several more in -- they were almost that thick 4 years before that -- then what we're trying to do is turn around a policy of government that has built this into the system. And we're meeting opposition in trying to do that.

Now, I'm not through with cutting and spending. The '83 budget resolution goes into effect, and they start implementing it, and I will be watching the appropriation bills. For 1984 I'm going to aim at more, and I'm going to be asking them for more cuts. We're still determined that we're going to balance this budget. We can't balance it this year or next or maybe -- or the one after that, but we're working toward that goal.

Q. As you've said before and as your spokesmen have been saying, PLO chief Arafat has not yet met the conditions that the United States Government has set for direct talks with you. However, do you think that Mr. Arafat is moving in that direction? And would you welcome such a development?

The President. Well, I think it would be a step forward in progress if the PLO would change the position it has had, and that is that Israel must be destroyed or that it has no right to exist as a nation. And what that would require is agreeing to abide by the U.N. Resolutions 242 and 338, agreeing that Israel is a nation and does have a right to exist. Then I would feel that the United States could enter into discussions with the PLO.

Now, I'm not speaking for Israel. That's up to them, and we could not speak for them. But we're not -- we're there as an intermediary, offering our services to try and help bring about peace in the Middle East.

The President. That again, I think, is up to the negotiators. We wouldn't impose anything on them. But Egypt and Israel, under the Camp David agreement, they are supposed to enter into now an area of talking of autonomy for the Palestinians. And that, again, is something that has been delayed because of this tragedy in Lebanon. But I think that is up to them as to how that autonomy develops and what they see as a proper solution to the Palestinian problem.

Q. Mr. President, you said recently, and you said again this evening, that we're entering a period of economic recovery. My question is: Do you expect this period of economic recovery to be evident to anyone besides the economic statisticians before the November elections? And are you concerned about the possibility of major Republican losses this year?

The President. Well, I think it should be evident to them right now. For example, real wages -- real income is increasing for the first time in a long time at a rate of 4 percent. Heretofore, while the number of dollars a worker received increased, he didn't really -- he or she -- get any increase in purchasing power; they actually went down. They've been going down in purchasing power for some time. That is up.

Since January, on an annualized basis, retail sales are up 12 percent, annualized. Inflation and the gains that we've made there -- a family of four with $15,000-a-year income would today have a thousand dollars less purchasing power if tax rates and inflation had remained where they were in 1980.

So, I think there are a number of signs -- and, of course, interest rates have come down, as I pointed out -- I think there are a number of signs that indicate that things are better for the people and that they should be able to see.

The President. This is a question, Judy, that what I've said is that I reserve the right to have the flexibility with regard to individual programs. In '83, we settled on that and what the figures would be. And there was some decrease in the military budget. But I don't feel bound by -- while I feel bound by the overall figures, the projected deficits and the projected overall cuts and so forth to try and reduce those, I feel bound to stay within those. But I feel that I should have the flexibility based on when that time comes to come forth with the 1984 budget to delegate that spending to programs based on what I feel the needs are.

Q. Just a followup, Mr. President. When some of your Republican allies in the Senate were asked about reports about this today, Senator Dominici, for example, accused you of reneging on a commitment, and Senator Dole said that now is not the time to be backing off spending cuts.

The President. I'm not backing off of spending cuts. We'll be within that figure. As a matter of fact, it's my determination that that'll even be a -- the total figure will be smaller, because we still have much further to go in reducing the increase in government spending.

Q. Mr. President, critics have said that there is no progress on human rights in El Salvador nor progress on land reform. The government there has yet to cooperate in the investigation of the four American missionaries who were killed there. Can you explain why you decided to go ahead with the certification, the approval for continued military aid to El Salvador, and why people should not think you're sending the wrong message to the right-wing forces there?

The President. Andrea, the State Department is the one that issued the certification, and in the next few days, they will be having witnesses, observers, who will be testifying as to why they certified that the Salvadoran Government is making progress in improving the human rights situation there.

